ttention or got no attention because she was
a poor conversationalist.

"You going to be here much longer?" he asked and then turned
rather red. She might suspect his reasons for asking.

"Another week," she answered, and stared at him as if to lunge at
his next remark when it left his lips.

Warren fidgeted. Then with a sudden charitable impulse he decided
to try part of his line on her. He turned and looked at her
eyes.

"You've got an awfully kissable mouth," he began quietly.

This was a remark that he sometimes made to girls at college
proms when they were talking in just such half dark as this.
Bernice distinctly jumped. She turned an ungraceful red and
became clumsy with her fan. No one had ever made such a remark to
her before.

"Fresh!"---the word had slipped out before she realized it, and
she bit her lip. Too late she decided to be amused, and offered
him a flustered smile.

Warren was annoyed. Though not accustomed to have that remark
taken seriously, still it usually provoked a laugh or a paragraph
of sentimental banter. And he hated to be called fresh, except
in a joking way. His charitable impulse died and he switched the
topic.

"Jim Strain and Ethel Demorest sitting out as usual," he
commented.

This was more in Bernice's line, but a faint regret mingled with
her relief as the subject changed. Men did not talk to her about
kissable mouths, but she knew that they talked in some such way
to other girls.

"Oh, yes," she said, and laughed. "I hear they've been mooning
around for years without a red penny. Isn't it silly?"

Warren's disgust increased. Jim Strain was a close friend of his
brother's, and anyway he considered it bad form to sneer at
people for not having money. But Bernice had had no intention of
sneering. She was merely nervous.



II


When Marjorie and Bernice reached home at half after midnight
they said good night at the top of the stairs. Though cousins,
they were not intimates. As a matter of fact Marjorie had no
female intimates--she considered girls stupid. Bernice on the
contrary all through this parent-arranged visit had rather longed
to exchange those confidences flavored with giggles and tears
that she considered an indispensable factor in all feminine
intercourse. But in this respect she found Marjorie rather cold;
felt somehow the same difficulty in talking to her that she had
in talking to men. Marjorie never giggled, was never frightened,
seldom embarrassed, and in fact had very few of the qualities
which Bernice considered appropriately and blessedly feminine.

As Bernice busied herself with tooth-brush and paste this night
she wondered for the hundredth time why she never had any
attention when she was away from home. That her family were the
wealthiest in Eau Claire; that her mother entertained
tremendously, gave little diners for her daughter before all
dances and bought her a car of her own to drive round in, never
occurred to her as factors in her home-town social success. Like
most girls she had been brought up on the warm milk prepared by
Annie Fellows Johnston and on novels in which the female was
beloved because of certain mysterious womanly qualities always
mentioned but never displayed.

Bernice felt a vague pain that she was not at present engaged in
being popular. She did not know that had it not been for
Marjorie's campaigning she would have danced the entire evening
with one man; but she knew that even in Eau Claire other girls
with less position and less pulchritude were given a much bigger
rush. She attributed this to something subtly unscrupulous in
those girls. It had never worried her, and if it had her mother
would have assured her that the other girls cheapened themselves
and that men really respected girls like Bernice.

She turned out the light in her bathroom, and on an impulse
decided to go in and chat for a moment with her aunt Josephine,
whose light was still on. Her soft slippers bore her noiselessly
down the carpeted hall, but hearing voices inside she stopped
near the partly openers door. Then she caught her own name, and
without any definite intention of eavesdropping lingered--and the
thread of the conversation going on inside pierced her
consciousness sharply as if it had been drawn through with a
needle.

"She's absolutely hopeless!" It was Marjorie's voice. "Oh, I know
what you're going to say! So many people have told you how
pretty and sweet she is, and how she can cook! What of it? She
has a bum time. Men don't like her."

"What's a little cheap popularity?"

Mrs. Harvey sounded annoyed.

"It's everything when you're eighteen," said Marjorie
emphatically. "I've done my best. I've been polite and I've made
men dance with her, but they just won't stand being bored. When I
think of that gorgeous coloring wasted on such a ninny, and
think what Martha Carey could do with it--oh!"

"There's no courtesy these days."

Mrs. Harvey's voice implied that modern situations were too much
for her. When she was a girl all young ladies who belonged to
nice families had glorious times.

"Well," said Marjorie, "no girl can permanently bolster up a
lame-duck visitor, because these days it's every girl for
herself. I've even tried to drop hints about clothes and things,
and she's been furious--given me the funniest looks. She's
sensitive enough to know she's not getting away with much, but
I'll bet she consoles herself by thinking that she's very
virtuous and that I'm too gay and fickle and will come to a bad
end. All unpopular girls think that way. Sour grapes! Sarah
Hopkins refers to Genevieve and Roberta and me as gardenia girls!
I'll bet she'd give ten years of her life and her European
education to be a gardenia girl and have three or four men in
love with her and be cut in on every few feet at dances."

"It seems to me," interrupted Mrs. Harvey rather wearily, "that
you ought to be able to do something for Bernice. I know she's
not very vivacious."

Marjorie groaned.

"Vivacious! Good grief! I've never heard her say anything to a
boy except that it's hot or the floor's crowded or that she's
going to school in New York next year. Sometimes she asks them
what kind of car they have and tells them the kind she has.
Thrilling!"

There was a short silence and then Mrs. Harvey took up her
refrain:

"All I know is that other girls not half so sweet and attractive
get partners. Martha Carey, for instance, is stout and loud, and
her mother is distinctly common. Roberta Dillon is so thin this
year that she looks as though Arizona were the place for her.
She's dancing herself to death."

"But, mother," objected Marjorie impatiently, "Martha is cheerful
and awfully witty and an awfully slick girl, and Roberta's a
marvellous dancer. She's been popular for ages!"

Mrs. Harvey yawned.

"I think it's that crazy Indian blood in Bernice," continued
Marjorie. "Maybe she's a reversion to type.  Indian women all
just sat round and never said anything."

"Go to bed, you silly child," laughed Mrs. Harvey. "I wouldn't
have told you that if I'd thought you were going to remember it.
And I think most of your ideas are perfectly idiotic," she
finished sleepily.

There was another silence, while Marjorie considered whether or
not convincing her mother was worth the trouble. People over
forty can seldom be permanently convinced of anything. At
eighteen our convictions are hills from which we look; at
forty-five they are caves in which we hide.

Having decided this, Marjorie said good night. When she came out
into the hall it was quite empty.



III


While Marjorie was breakfasting late next day Bernice came into
the room with a rather formal good morning, sat down opposite,
stared intently over and slightly moistened her lips.

"What's on your mind?" inquired Marjorie, rather puzzled.

Bernice paused before she threw her hand-grenade.

"I heard what you said about me to your mother last night."

Marjorie was startled, but she showed only a faintly heightened
color and her voice was quite even when she spoke.

"Where were you?"

"In the hall. I didn't mean to listen--at first."

After an involuntary look of contempt Marjorie dropped her eyes
and became very interested in balancing a stray corn-flake on her
finger."

"I guess I'd better go back to Eau Claire--if I'm such a
nuisance." Bernice's lower lip was trembling violently and she
continued on a wavering note: "I've tried to be nice, and--and
I've been first neglected and then insulted. No one ever visited
me and got such treatment."

Marjorie was silent.

"But I'm in the way, I see. I'm a drag on you. Your friends don't
like me." She paused, and then remembered another one of her
grievances. "Of course I was furious last week when you tried to
hint to me that that dress was unbecoming. Don't you think I know
how to dress myself?"

"No," murmured less than half-aloud.

"What?"

"I didn't hint anything," said Marjorie succinctly. "I said, as I
remember, that it was better to wear a becoming dress three
times straight than to alternate it with two frights."

"Do you think that was a very nice thing to say?"

"I wasn't trying to be nice." Then after a pause: "When do you
want to go?"

Bernice drew in her breath sharply.

"Oh!" It was a little half-cry.

Marjorie looked up in surprise.

"Didn't you say you were going?"

"Yes, but---"

"Oh, you were only bluffing!"

They stared at each other across the breakfast-table for a
moment. Misty waves were passing before Bernice's eyes, while
Marjorie's face wore that rather hard expression that she used
when slightly intoxicated undergraduate's were making love to
her.

"So you were bluffing," she repeated as if it were what she might
have expected.

Bernice admitted it by bursting into tears. Marjorie's eyes
showed boredom.

"You're my cousin," sobbed Bernice. "I'm v-v-visiting you. I was
to stay a month, and if I go home my mother will know and she'll
wah-wonder---"

Marjorie waited until the shower of broken words collapsed into
little sniffles.

"I'll give you my month's allowance," she said coldly, "and you
can spend this last week anywhere you want. There's a very nice
hotel---"

Bernice's sobs rose to a flute note, and rising of a sudden she
fled from the room.

An hour later, while Marjorie was in the library absorbed in
composing one of those non-committal marvelously elusive letters
that only a young girl can write, Bernice reappeared, very
red-eyed, and consciously calm. She cast no glance at Marjorie
but took a book at random from the shelf and sat down as if to
read. Marjorie seemed absorbed in her letter and continued
writing. When the clock showed noon Bernice closed her book with
a snap.

"I suppose I'd better get my railroad ticket."

This was not the beginning of the speech she had rehearsed
up-stairs, but as Marjorie was not getting her cues--wasn't
urging her to be reasonable; it's an a mistake--it was the best
opening she could muster.

"Just wait till I finish this letter," said Marjorie without
looking round. "I want to get it off in the next mail."

After another minute, during which her pen scratched busily, she
turned round and relaxed with an air of "at your service." Again
Bernice had to speak.

"Do you want me to go home?"

"Well," said Marjorie, considering, "I suppose if you're not
having a good time you'd better go. No use being miserable."

"Don't you think common kindness---"

"Oh, please don't quote 'Little Women'!" cried Marjorie
impatiently. "That's out of style."

"You think so?"

"Heavens, yes! What modern girl could live like those inane
females?"

"They were the models for our mothers."

Marjorie laughed.

"Yes, they were--not! Besides, our mothers were all very well in
their way, but they know very little about their daughters'
problems."

Bernice drew herself up.

"Please don't talk about my mother."

Marjorie laughed.

"I don't think I mentioned her."

Bernice felt that she was being led away from her subject.

"Do you think you've treated me very well?"

"I've done my best. You're rather hard material to work with."

The lids of Bernice's eyes reddened.

"I think you're hard and selfish, and you haven't a feminine
quality in you."

"Oh, my Lord!" cried Marjorie in desperation "You little nut!
Girls like you are responsible for all the tiresome colorless
marriages; all those ghastly inefficiencies that pass as feminine
qualities. What a blow it must be when a man with imagination
marries the beautiful bundle of clothes that he's been building
ideals round, and finds that she's just a weak, whining, cowardly
mass of affectations!"

Bernice's mouth had slipped half open.

"The womanly woman!" continued Marjorie. "Her whole early life is
occupied in whining criticisms of girls like me who really do
have a good time."

Bernice's jaw descended farther as Marjorie's voice rose.

"There's some excuse for an ugly girl whining. If I'd been
irretrievably ugly I'd never have forgiven my parents for
bringing me into the world. But you're starting life without any
handicap--" Marjorie's little fist clinched, "If you expect me to
weep with you you'll be disappointed. Go or stay, just as you
like." And picking up her letters she left the room.

Bernice claimed a headache and failed to appear at luncheon. They
had a matinee date for the afternoon, but the headache
persisting, Marjorie made explanation to a not very downcast boy.
But when she returned late in the afternoon she found Bernice
with a strangely set face waiting for her in her bedroom.

"I've decided," began Bernice without preliminaries, "that maybe
you're right about things--possibly not. But if you'll tell me
why your friends aren't--aren't interested in me I'll see if I
can do what you want me to."

Marjorie was at the mirror shaking down her hair.

"Do you mean it?"

"Yes."

"Without reservations? Will you do exactly what I say?"

"Well, I---"

"Well nothing! Will you do exactly as I say?"

"If they're sensible things."

"They're not! You're no case for sensible things."

"Are you going to make--to recommend---"

"Yes, everything. If I tell you to take boxing-lessons you'll
have to do it. Write home and tell your mother you're going' to
stay another two weeks.

"If you'll tell me---"

"All right--I'll just give you a few examples now. First you have
no ease of manner. Why? Because you're never sure about your
personal appearance. When a girl feels that she's perfectly
groomed and dressed she can forget that part of her. That's
charm. The more parts of yourself you can afford to forget the
more charm you have."

"Don't I look all right?"

"No; for instance you never take care of your eyebrows. They're
black and lustrous, but by leaving them straggly they're a
blemish. They'd be beautiful if you'd take care of them in
one-tenth the time you take doing nothing. You're going to brush
them so that they'll grow straight."

Bernice raised the brows in question.

"Do you mean to say that men notice eyebrows?"

"Yes--subconsciously. And when you go home you ought to have your
teeth straightened a little. It's almost imperceptible,
still---"

"But I thought," interrupted Bernice in bewilderment, "that you
despised little dainty feminine things like that."

"I hate dainty minds," answered Marjorie. "But a girl has to be
dainty in person. If she looks like a million dollars she can
talk about Russia, ping-pong, or the League of Nations and get
away with it."

"What else?"

"Oh, I'm just beginning! There's your dancing."

"Don't I dance all right?"

"No, you don't--you lean on a man; yes, you do--ever so slightly.
I noticed it when we were dancing together yesterday. And you
dance standing up straight instead of bending over a little.
Probably some old lady on the side-line once told you that you
looked so dignified that way. But except with a very small girl
it's much harder on the man, and he's the one that counts."

"Go on." Bernice's brain was reeling.

"Well, you've got to learn to be nice to men who are sad birds.
You look as if you'd been insulted whenever you're thrown with
any except the most popular boys. Why, Bernice, I'm cut in on
every few feet--and who does most of it? Why, those very sad
birds. No girl can afford to neglect them. They're the big part
of any crowd. Young boys too shy to talk are the very best
conversational practice. Clumsy boys are the best dancing
practice. If you can follow them and yet look graceful you can
follow a baby tank across a barb-wire sky-scraper."

Bernice sighed profoundly, but Marjorie was not through.

"If you go to a dance and really amuse, say, three sad birds that
dance with you; if you talk so well to them that they forget
they're stuck with you, you've done something. They'll come back
next time, and gradually so many sad birds will dance with you
that the attractive boys will see there's no danger of being
stuck--then they'll dance with you."

"Yes," agreed Bernice faintly. "I think I begin to see."

"And finally," concluded Marjorie, "poise and charm will just
come. You'll wake up some morning knowing you've attained it and
men will know it too."

Bernice rose.

"It's been awfully kind of you--but nobody's ever talked to me
like this before, and I feel sort of startled."

Marjorie made no answer but gazed pensively at her own image in
the mirror.

"You're a peach to help me," continued Bernice.

Still Marjorie did not answer, and Bernice thought she had seemed
too grateful.

"I know you don't like sentiment," she said timidly.

Marjorie turned to her quickly.

"Oh, I wasn't thinking about that. I was considering whether we
hadn't better bob your hair."

Bernice collapsed backward upon the bed.



IV


On the following Wednesday evening there was a dinner-dance at
the country club. When the guests strolled in Bernice found her
place-card with a slight feeling of irritation. Though at her
right sat G. Reece Stoddard, a most desirable and distinguished
young bachelor, the all-important left held only Charley Paulson.
Charley lacked height, beauty, and social shrewdness, and in her
new enlightenment Bernice decided that his only qualification to
be her partner was that he had never been stuck with her.  But
this feeling of irritation left with the last of the soup-plates,
and Marjorie's specific instruction came to her. Swallowing her
pride she turned to Charley Paulson and plunged.

"Do you think I ought to bob my hair, Mr. Charley Paulson?"

Charley looked up in surprise.

"Why?"

"Because I'm considering it. It's such a sure and easy way of
attracting attention."

Charley smiled pleasantly. He could not know this had been
rehearsed. He replied that he didn't know much about bobbed hair.
But Bernice was there to tell him.

"I want to be a society vampire, you see," she announced coolly,
and went on to inform him that bobbed hair was the necessary
prelude. She added that she wanted to ask his advice, because she
had heard he was so critical about girls.

Charley, who knew as much about the psychology of women as he did
of the mental states of Buddhist contemplatives, felt vaguely
flattered.

"So I've decided," she continued, her voice rising slightly,
"that early next week I'm going down to the Sevier Hotel
barber-shop, sit in the first chair, and get my hair bobbed." She
faltered noticing that the people near her had paused in their
conversation and were listening; but after a confused second
Marjorie's coaching told, and she finished her paragraph to the
vicinity at large. "Of course I'm charging admission, but if
you'll all come down and encourage me I'll issue passes for the
inside seats."

There was a ripple of appreciative laughter, and under cover of
it G. Reece Stoddard leaned over quickly and said close to her
ear: "I'll take a box right now."

She met his eyes and smiled as if he had said something
surprisingly brilliant.

"Do you believe in bobbed hair?" asked G. Reece in the same
undertone.

"I think it's unmoral," affirmed Bernice gravely. "But, of
course, you've either got to amuse people or feed 'em or shock
'em." Marjorie had culled this from Oscar Wilde. It was greeted
with a ripple of laughter from the men and a series of quick,
intent looks from the girls. And then as though she had said
nothing of wit or moment Bernice turned again to Charley and
spoke confidentially in his ear.

"I want to ask you your opinion of several people. I imagine
you're a wonderful judge of character."

Charley thrilled faintly--paid her a subtle compliment by
overturning her water.

Two hours later, while Warren McIntyre was standing passively in
the stag line abstractedly watching the dancers and wondering
whither and with whom Marjorie had disappeared, an unrelated
perception began to creep slowly upon him--a perception that
Bernice, cousin to Marjorie, had been cut in on several times in
the past five minutes. He closed his eyes, opened them and looked
again. Several minutes back she had been dancing with a visiting
boy, a matter easily accounted for; a visiting boy would know no
better. But now she was dancing with some one else, and there
was Charley Paulson headed for her with enthusiastic
determination in his eye. Funny--Charley seldom danced with more
than three girls an evening.

Warren was distinctly surprised when--the exchange having been
effected--the man relieved proved to be none ether than G. Reece
Stoddard himself. And G. Reece seemed not at all jubilant at
being relieved. Next time Bernice danced near, Warren regarded
her intently. Yes, she was pretty, distinctly pretty; and
to-night her face seemed really vivacious. She had that look that
no woman, however histrionically proficient, can successfully
counterfeit--she looked as if she were having a good time. He
liked the way she had her hair arranged, wondered if it was
brilliantine that made it glisten so. And that dress was
becoming--a dark red that set off her shadowy eyes and high
coloring. He remembered that he had thought her pretty when she
first came to town, before he had realized that she was dull. Too
bad she was dull--dull girls unbearable--certainly pretty
though.

His thoughts zigzagged back to Marjorie. This disappearance would
be like other disappearances. When she reappeared he would
demand where she had been--would be told emphatically that it was
none of his business. What a pity she was so sure of him! She
basked in the knowledge that no other girl in town interested
him; she defied him to fall in love with Genevieve or
Roberta.

Warren sighed. The way to Marjorie's affections was a labyrinth
indeed. He looked up. Bernice was again dancing with the visiting
boy. Half unconsciously he took a step out from the stag line in
her direction, and hesitated. Then he said to himself that it
was charity. He walked toward her --collided suddenly with G.
Reece Stoddard.

"Pardon me," said Warren.

But G. Reece had not stopped to apologize. He had again cut in on
Bernice.

That night at one o'clock Marjorie, with one hand on the
electric-light switch in the hall, turned to take a last look at
Bernice's sparkling eyes.

"So it worked?"

"Oh, Marjorie, yes!" cried Bernice.

"I saw you were having a gay time."

"I did! The only trouble was that about midnight I ran short of
talk. I had to repeat myself-- with different men of course. I
hope they won't compare notes."

"Men don't," said Marjorie, yawning, "and it wouldn't matter if
they did--they'd think you were even trickier."

She snapped out the light, and as they started up the stairs
Bernice grasped the banister thankfully. For the first time in
her life she had been danced tired.

"You see," said Marjorie it the top of the stairs, "one man sees
another man cut in and he thinks there must be something there.
Well, we'll fix up some new stuff to-morrow.  Good night."

"Good night."

As Bernice took down her hair she passed the evening before her
in review.  She had followed instructions exactly.  Even when
Charley Paulson cut in for the eighth time she had simulated
delight and had apparently been both interested and flattered.
She had not talked about the weather or Eau Claire or automobiles
or her school, but had confined her conversation to me, you, and
us.

But a few minutes before she fell asleep a rebellious thought was
churning drowsily in her brain--after all, it was she who had
done it.  Marjorie, to be sure, had given her her conversation,
but then Marjorie got much of her conversation out of things she
read.  Bernice had bought the red dress, though she had never
valued it highly before Marjorie dug it out of her trunk--and her
own voice had said the words, her own lips had smiled, her own
feet had danced.  Marjorie nice girl--vain, though--nice
evening--nice boys--like Warren--Warren--Warren-- what's his
name--Warren---

She fell asleep.



V


To Bernice the next week was a revelation.  With the feeling that
people really enjoyed looking at her and listening to her came
the foundation of self-confidence.  Of course there were numerous
mistakes at first.  She did not know, for instance, that
Draycott Deyo was studying for the ministry; she was unaware that
he had cut in on her because he thought she was a quiet,
reserved girl. Had she known these things she would not have
treated him to the line which began "Hello, Shell Shock!" and
continued with the bathtub story--"It takes a frightful lot of
energy to fix my hair in the summer--there's so much of it--so I
always fix it first and powder my face and put on my hat; then I
get into the bathtub, and dress afterward. Don't you think that's
the best plan?"

Though Draycott Deyo was in the throes of difficulties concerning
baptism by immersion and might possibly have seen a connection,
it must be admitted that he did not. He considered feminine
bathing an immoral subject, and gave her some of his ideas on the
depravity of modern society.

But to offset that unfortunate occurrence Bernice had several
signal successes to her credit. Little Otis Ormonde pleaded off
from a trip East and elected instead to follow her with a
puppylike devotion, to the amusement of his crowd and to the
irritation of G. Reece Stoddard, several of whose afternoon calls
Otis completely ruined by the disgusting tenderness of the
glances he bent on Bernice. He even told her the story of the
two-by-four and the dressing-room to show her how frightfully
mistaken he and every one else had been in their first judgment
of her. Bernice laughed off that incident with a slight sinking
sensation.

Of all Bernice's conversation perhaps the best known and most
universally approved was the line about the bobbing of her hair.

"Oh, Bernice, when you goin' to get the hair bobbed?"

"Day after to-morrow maybe," she would reply, laughing. "Will you
come and see me? Because I'm counting on you, you know."

"Will we? You know! But you better hurry up."

Bernice, whose tonsorial intentions were strictly dishonorable,
would laugh again.

"Pretty soon now. You'd be surprised."

But perhaps the most significant symbol of her success was the
gray car of the hypercritical Warren McIntyre, parked daily in
front of the Harvey house. At first the parlor-maid was
distinctly startled when he asked for Bernice instead of
Marjorie; after a week of it she told the cook that Miss Bernice
had gotta holda Miss Marjorie's best fella.

And Miss Bernice had. Perhaps it began with Warren's desire to
rouse jealousy in Marjorie; perhaps it was the familiar though
unrecognized strain of Marjorie in Bernice's conversation;
perhaps it was both of these and something of sincere attraction
besides. But somehow the collective mind of the younger set knew
within a week that Marjorie's most reliable beau had made an
amazing face-about and was giving an indisputable rush to
Marjorie's guest. The question of the moment was how Marjorie
would take it. Warren called Bernice on the 'phone twice a day,
sent her notes, and they were frequently seen together in his
roadster, obviously engrossed in one of those tense, significant
conversations as to whether or not he was sincere.

Marjorie on being twitted only laughed. She said she was mighty
glad that Warren had at last found some one who appreciated him.
So the younger set laughed, too, and guessed that Marjorie didn't
care and let it go at that.

One afternoon when there were only three days left of her visit
Bernice was waiting in the hall for Warren, with whom she was
going to a bridge party. She was in rather a blissful mood, and
when Marjorie--also bound for the party--appeared beside her and
began casually to adjust her hat in the mirror, Bernice was
utterly unprepared for anything in the nature of a clash.
Marjorie did her work very coldly and succinctly in three
sentences.

"You may as well get Warren out of your head," she said coldly.

"What?" Bernice was utterly astounded.

"You may as well stop making a fool of yourself over Warren
McIntyre. He doesn't care a snap of his fingers about you."

For a tense moment they regarded each other--Marjorie scornful,
aloof; Bernice astounded, half-angry, half-afraid. Then two cars
drove up in front of the house and there was a riotous honking.
Both of them gasped faintly, turned, and side by side hurried
out.

All through the bridge party Bernice strove in vain to master a
rising uneasiness. She had offended Marjorie, the sphinx of
sphinxes. With the most wholesome and innocent intentions in the
world she had stolen Marjorie's property. She felt suddenly and
horribly guilty. After the bridge game, when they sat in an
informal circle and the conversation became general, the storm
gradually broke. Little Otis Ormonde inadvertently precipitated
it.

"When you going back to kindergarten, Otis?" some one had asked.

"Me? Day Bernice gets her hair bobbed."

"Then your education's over," said Marjorie quickly. "That's only
a bluff of hers. I should think you'd have realized."

"That a fact?" demanded Otis, giving Bernice a reproachful
glance.

Bernice's ears burned as she tried to think up an effectual
come-back. In the face of this direct attack her imagination was
paralyzed.

"There's a lot of bluffs in the world," continued Marjorie quite
pleasantly. "I should think you'd be young enough to know that,
Otis."

"Well," said Otis, "maybe so. But gee!  With a line like
Bernice's---"

"Really?" yawned Marjorie. "What's her latest bon mot?"

No one seemed to know. In fact, Bernice, having trifled with her
muse's beau, had said nothing memorable of late.

"Was that really all a line?" asked Roberta curiously.

Bernice hesitated. She felt that wit in some form was demanded of
her, but under her cousin's suddenly frigid eyes she was
completely incapacitated.

"I don't know," she stalled.

"Splush!" said Marjorie. "Admit it!"

Bernice saw that Warren's eyes had left a ukulele he had been
tinkering with and were fixed on her questioningly.

"Oh, I don't know!" she repeated steadily. Her cheeks were
glowing.

"Splush!" remarked Marjorie again.

"Come through, Bernice," urged Otis. "Tell her where to get off."
Bernice looked round again--she seemed unable to get away from
Warren's eyes.

"I like bobbed hair," she said hurriedly, as if he had asked her
a question, "and I intend to bob mine."

"When?" demanded Marjorie.

"Any time."

"No time like the present," suggested Roberta.

Otis jumped to his feet.

"Good stuff!" he cried. "We'll have a summer bobbing party.
Sevier Hotel barber-shop, I think you said."

In an instant all were on their feet. Bernice's heart throbbed
violently.

"What?" she gasped.

Out of the group came Marjorie's voice, very clear and
contemptuous.

"Don't worry--she'll back out!"

"Come on, Bernice!" cried Otis, starting toward the door.

Four eyes--Warren's and Marjorie's--stared at her, challenged
her, defied her. For another second she wavered wildly.

"All right," she said swiftly "I don't care if I do."

An eternity of minutes later, riding down-town through the late
afternoon beside Warren, the others following in Roberta's car
close behind, Bernice had all the sensations of Marie Antoinette
bound for the guillotine in a tumbrel. Vaguely she wondered why
she did not cry out that it was all a mistake. It was all she
could do to keep from clutching her hair with both bands to
protect it from the suddenly hostile world. Yet she did neither.
Even the thought of her mother was no deterrent now. This was the
test supreme of her sportsmanship; her right to walk
unchallenged in the starry heaven of popular girls.

Warren was moodily silent, and when they came to the hotel he
drew up at the curb and nodded to Bernice to precede him out.
Roberta's car emptied a laughing crowd into the shop, which
presented two bold plate-glass windows to the street.

Bernice stood on the curb and looked at the sign, Sevier
Barber-Shop. It was a guillotine indeed, and the hangman was the
first barber, who, attired in a white coat and smoking a
cigarette, leaned non-chalantly against the first chair. He must
have heard of her; he must have been waiting all week, smoking
eternal cigarettes beside that portentous, too-often-mentioned
first chair. Would they blind-fold her? No, but they would tie a
white cloth round her neck lest any of her blood--nonsense--hair--should
get on her clothes.

"All right, Bernice," said Warren quickly.

With her chin in the air she crossed the sidewalk, pushed open
the swinging screen-door, and giving not a glance to the
uproarious, riotous row that occupied the waiting bench, went up
to the fat barber.

"I want you to bob my hair."

The first barber's mouth slid somewhat open. His cigarette
dropped to the floor.

"Huh?"

"My hair--bob it!"

Refusing further preliminaries, Bernice took her seat on high. A
man in the chair next to her turned on his side and gave her a
glance, half lather, half amazement. One barber started and
spoiled little Willy Schuneman's monthly haircut. Mr. O'Reilly in
the last chair grunted and swore musically in ancient Gaelic as
a razor bit into his cheek. Two bootblacks became wide-eyed and
rushed for her feet. No, Bernice didn't care for a shine.

Outside a passer-by stopped and stared; a couple joined him; half
a dozen small boys' nose sprang into life, flattened against the
glass; and snatches of conversation borne on the summer breeze
drifted in through the screen-door.

"Lookada long hair on a kid!"

"Where'd yuh get 'at stuff? 'At's a bearded lady he just finished
shavin'."

But Bernice saw nothing, heard nothing. Her only living sense
told her that this man in the white coat had removed one
tortoise-shell comb and then another; that his fingers were
fumbling clumsily with unfamiliar hairpins; that this hair, this
wonderful hair of hers, was going--she would never again feel its
long voluptuous pull as it hung in a dark-brown glory down her
back. For a second she was near breaking down, and then the
picture before her swam mechanically into her vision--Marjorie's
mouth curling in a faint ironic smile as if to say:

"Give up and get down! You tried to buck me and I called your
bluff. You see you haven't got a prayer."

And some last energy rose up in Bernice, for she clinched her
hands under the white cloth, and there was a curious narrowing of
her eyes that Marjorie remarked on to some one long afterward.

Twenty minutes later the barber swung her round to face the
mirror, and she flinched at the full extent of the damage that
had been wrought. Her hair was not curls and now it lay in lank
lifeless blocks on both sides of her suddenly pale face. It was
ugly as sin--she had known it would be ugly as sin. Her face's
chief charm had been a Madonna-like simplicity. Now that was gone
and she was--well frightfully mediocre--not stagy; only
ridiculous, like a Greenwich Villager who had left her spectacles
at home.

As she climbed down from the chair she tried to smile--failed
miserably. She saw two of the girls exchange glances; noticed
Marjorie's mouth curved in attenuated mockery--and that Warren's
eyes were suddenly very cold.

"You see,"--her words fell into an awkward pause--"I've done it."

"Yes, you've--done it," admitted Warren.

"Do you like it?"

There was a half-hearted "Sure" from two or three voices, another
awkward pause, and then Marjorie turned swiftly and with
serpentlike intensity to Warren.

"Would you mind running me down to the cleaners?" she asked.
"I've simply got to get a dress there before supper. Roberta's
driving right home and she can take the others."

Warren stared abstractedly at some infinite speck out the window.
Then for an instant his eyes rested coldly on Bernice before
they turned to Marjorie.

"Be glad to," he said slowly.



VI


Bernice did not fully realize the outrageous trap that had been
set for her until she met her aunt's amazed glance just before
dinner.

"Why Bernice!"

"I've bobbed it, Aunt Josephine."

"Why, child!"

"Do you like it?"

"Why Bernice!"

"I suppose I've shocked you."

"No, but what'll Mrs. Deyo think tomorrow night? Bernice, you
should have waited until after the Deyo's dance--you should have
waited if you wanted to do that."

"It was sudden, Aunt Josephine. Anyway, why does it matter to
Mrs. Deyo particularly?"

"Why child," cried Mrs. Harvey, "in her paper on 'The Foibles of
the Younger Generation' that she read at the last meeting of the
Thursday Club she devoted fifteen minutes to bobbed hair. It's
her pet abomination. And the dance is for you and Marjorie!"

"I'm sorry."

"Oh, Bernice, what'll your mother say? She'll think I let you do
it."

"I'm sorry."

Dinner was an agony. She had made a hasty attempt with a
curling-iron, and burned her finger and much hair. She could see
that her aunt was both worried and grieved, and her uncle kept
saying, "Well, I'll be darned!" over and over in a hurt and
faintly hostile torte. And Marjorie sat very quietly, intrenched
behind a faint smile, a faintly mocking smile.

Somehow she got through the evening. Three boy's called; Marjorie
disappeared with one of them, and Bernice made a listless
unsuccessful attempt to entertain the two others--sighed
thankfully as she climbed the stairs to her room at half past
ten. What a day!

When she had undressed for the night the door opened and Marjorie
came in.

"Bernice," she said "I'm awfully sorry about the Deyo dance. I'll
give you my word of honor I'd forgotten all about it."

"'Sall right," said Bernice shortly. Standing before the mirror
she passed her comb slowly through her short hair.

"I'll take you down-town to-morrow," continued Marjorie, "and the
hairdresser'll fix it so you'll look slick. I didn't imagine
you'd go through with it. I'm really mighty sorry."

"Oh, 'sall right!"

"Still it's your last night, so I suppose it won't matter much."

Then Bernice winced as Marjorie tossed her own hair over her
shoulders and began to twist it slowly into two long blond braids
until in her cream-colored negligee she looked like a delicate
painting of some Saxon princess. Fascinated, Bernice watched the
braids grow. Heavy and luxurious they were moving under the
supple fingers like restive snakes--and to Bernice remained this
relic and the curling-iron and a to-morrow full of eyes. She
could see G. Reece Stoddard, who liked her, assuming his Harvard
manner and telling his dinner partner that Bernice shouldn't have
been allowed to go to the movies so much; she could see Draycott
Deyo exchanging glances with his mother and then being
conscientiously charitable to her. But then perhaps by to-morrow
Mrs. Deyo would have heard the news; would send round an icy
little note requesting that she fail to appear--and behind her
back they would all laugh and know that Marjorie had made a fool
of her; that her chance at beauty had been sacrificed to the
jealous whim of a selfish girl. She sat down suddenly before the
mirror, biting the inside of her cheek.

"I like it," she said with an effort. "I think it'll be
becoming."

Marjorie smiled.

"It looks all right. For heaven's sake, don't let it worry you!"

"I won't."

"Good night Bernice."

But as the door closed something snapped within Bernice. She
sprang dynamically to her feet, clinching her hands, then swiftly
and noiseless crossed over to her bed and from underneath it
dragged out her suitcase. Into it she tossed toilet articles and
a change of clothing, Then she turned to her trunk and quickly
dumped in two drawerfulls of lingerie and stammer dresses. She
moved quietly. but deadly efficiency, and in three-quarters of an
hour her trunk was locked and strapped and she was fully dressed
in a becoming new travelling suit that Marjorie had helped her
pick out.

Sitting down at her desk she wrote a short note to Mrs. Harvey,
in which she briefly outlined her reasons for going. She sealed
it, addressed it, and laid it on her pillow. She glanced at her
watch. The train left at one, and she knew that if she walked
down to the Marborough Hotel two blocks away she could easily get
a taxicab.

Suddenly she drew in her breath sharply and an expression flashed
into her eyes that a practiced character reader might have
connected vaguely with the set look she had worn in the barber's
chair--somehow a development of it. It was quite a new look for
Bernice--and it carried consequences.

She went stealthily to the bureau, picked up an article that lay
there, and turning out all the lights stood quietly until her
eyes became accustomed to the darkness. Softly she pushed open
the door to Marjorie's room. She heard the quiet, even breathing
of an untroubled conscience asleep.

She was by the bedside now, very deliberate and calm. She acted
swiftly. Bending over she found one of the braids of Marjorie's
hair, followed it up with her hand to the point nearest the head,
and then holding it a little slack so that the sleeper would
feel no pull, she reached down with the shears and severed it.
With the pigtail in her hand she held her breath. Marjorie had
muttered something in her sleep. Bernice deftly amputated the
other braid, paused for an instant, and then flitted swiftly and
silently back to her own room.

Down-stairs she opened the big front door, closed it carefully
behind her, and feeling oddly happy and exuberant stepped off the
porch into the moonlight, swinging her heavy grip like a
shopping-bag. After a minute's brisk walk she discovered that her
left hand still held the two blond braids. She laughed
unexpectedly--had to shut her mouth hard to keep from emitting an
absolute peal. She was passing Warren's house now, and on the
impulse she set down her baggage, and swinging the braids like
piece of rope flung them at the wooden porch, where they landed
with a slight thud. She laughed again, no longer restraining
herself.

"Huh," she giggled wildly. "Scalp the selfish thing!"

Then picking up her staircase she set off at a half-run down the
moonlit street.





Benediction




The Baltimore Station was hot and crowded, so Lois was forced to
stand by the telegraph desk for interminable, sticky seconds
while a clerk with big front teeth counted and recounted a large
lady's day message, to determine whether it contained the
innocuous forty-nine words or the fatal fifty-one.

Lois, waiting, decided she wasn't quite sure of the address, so
she took the letter out of her bag and ran over it again.

"Darling," IT BEGAN--"I understand and I'm happier than life ever
meant me to be. If I could give you the things you've always
been in tune with--but I can't Lois; we can't marry and we can't
lose each other and let all this glorious love end in nothing.

"Until your letter came, dear, I'd been sitting here in the half
dark and thinking where I could go and ever forget you; abroad,
perhaps, to drift through Italy or Spain and dream away the pain
of having lost you where the crumbling ruins of older, mellower
civilizations would mirror only the desolation of my heart--and
then your letter came.

"Sweetest, bravest girl, if you'll wire me I'll meet you in
Wilmington--till then I'll be here just waiting and hoping for
every long dream of you to come true.
                                           "Howard."

She had read the letter so many times that she knew it word by
word, yet it still startled her. In it she found many faint
reflections of the man who wrote it--the mingled sweetness and
sadness in his dark eyes, the furtive, restless excitement she
felt sometimes when he talked to her, his dreamy sensuousness
that lulled her mind to sleep. Lois was nineteen and very
romantic and curious and courageous.

The large lady and the clerk having compromised on fifty words,
Lois took a blank and wrote her telegram. And there were no
overtones to the finality of her decision.

It's just destiny--she thought--it's just the way things work
out in this damn world. If cowardice is all that's been holding
me back there won't be any more holding back. So we'll just let
things take their course and never be sorry.

The clerk scanned her telegram:

"Arrived Baltimore today spend day with my brother meet me
Wilmington three P.M. Wednesday
Love

                                      "Lois."

"Fifty-four cents," said the clerk admiringly.

And never be sorry--thought Lois--and never be sorry---



II


Trees filtering light onto dapple grass. Trees like tall, languid
ladies with feather fans coquetting airily with the ugly roof of
the monastery. Trees like butlers, bending courteously over
placid walks and paths. Trees, trees over the hills on either
side and scattering out in clumps and lines and woods all through
eastern Maryland, delicate lace on the hems of many yellow
fields, dark opaque backgrounds for flowered bushes or wild
climbing garden.

Some of the trees were very gay and young, but the monastery
trees were older than the monastery which, by true monastic
standards, wasn't very old at all. And, as a matter of fact, it
wasn't technically called a monastery, but only a seminary;
nevertheless it shall be a monastery here despite its Victorian
architecture or its Edward VII additions, or even its Woodrow
Wilsonian, patented, last-a-century roofing.

Out behind was the farm where half a dozen lay brothers were
sweating lustily as they moved with deadly efficiency around the
vegetable-gardens. To the left, behind a row of elms, was an
informal baseball diamond where three novices were being batted
out by a fourth, amid great chasings and puffings and blowings.
And in front as a great mellow bell boomed the half-hour a swarm
of black, human leaves were blown over the checker-board of paths
under the courteous trees.

Some of these black leaves were very old with cheeks furrowed
like the first ripples of a splashed pool. Then there was a
scattering of middle-aged leaves whose forms when viewed in
profile in their revealing gowns were beginning to be faintly
unsymmetrical. These carried thick volumes of Thomas Aquinas and
Henry James and Cardinal Mercier and Immanuel Kant and many
bulging note-books filled with lecture data.

But most numerous were the young leaves; blond boys of nineteen
with very stern, conscientious expressions; men in the late
twenties with a keen self-assurance from having taught out in the
world for five years--several hundreds of them, from city and
town and country in Maryland and Pennsylvania and Virginia and
West Virginia and Delaware.

There were many Americans and some Irish and some tough Irish and
a few French, and several Italians and Poles, and they walked
informally arm in arm with each other in twos and threes or in
long rows, almost universally distinguished by the straight mouth
and the considerable chin--for this was the Society of Jesus,
founded in Spain five hundred years before by a tough-minded
soldier who trained men to hold a breach or a salon, preach a
sermon or write a treaty, and do it and not argue . . .

Lois got out of a bus into the sunshine down by the outer gate.
She was nineteen with yellow hair and eyes that people were
tactful enough not to call green. When men of talent saw her in a
street-car they often furtively produced little stub-pencils and
backs of envelopes and tried to sum up that profile or the thing
that the eyebrows did to her eyes. Later they looked at their
results and usually tore them up with wondering sighs.

Though Lois was very jauntily attired in an expensively
appropriate travelling affair, she did not linger to pat out the
dust which covered her clothes, but started up the central walk
with curious glances at either side. Her face was very eager and
expectant, yet she hadn't at all that glorified expression that
girls wear when they arrive for a Senior Prom at Princeton or New
Haven; still, as there were no senior proms here, perhaps it
didn't matter.

She was wondering what he would look like, whether she'd possibly
know him from his picture. In the picture, which hung over her
mother's bureau at home, he seemed very young and hollow-cheeked
and rather pitiful, with only a well-developed mouth and all
ill-fitting probationer's gown to show that he had already made a
momentous decision about his life. Of course he had been only
nineteen then and now he was thirty-six--didn't look like that at
all; in recent snap-shots he was much broader and his hair had
grown a little thin--but the impression of her brother she had
always retained was that of the big picture. And so she had
always been a little sorry for him. What a life for a man!
Seventeen years of preparation and he wasn't even a priest
yet--wouldn't be for another year.

Lois had an idea that this was all going to be rather solemn if
she let it be. But she was going to give her very best imitation
of undiluted sunshine, the imitation she could give even when her
head was splitting or when her mother had a nervous breakdown or
when she was particularly romantic and curious and courageous.
This brother of hers undoubtedly needed cheering up, and he was
going to be cheered up, whether he liked it or not.

As she drew near the great, homely front door she saw a man break
suddenly away from a group and, pulling up the skirts of his
gown, run toward her. He was smiling, she noticed, and he looked
very big and--and reliable. She stopped and waited, knew that her
heart was beating unusually fast.

"Lois!" he cried, and in a second she was in his arms. She was
suddenly trembling.

"Lois!" he cried again, "why, this is wonderful! I can't tell
you, Lois, how MUCH I've looked forward to this. Why, Lois,
you're beautiful!"

Lois gasped.

His voice, though restrained, was vibrant with energy and that
odd sort of enveloping personality she had thought that she only
of the family possessed.

"I'm mighty glad, too--Kieth."

She flushed, but not unhappily, at this first use of his name.

"Lois--Lois--Lois," he repeated in wonder. "Child, we'll go in
here a minute, because I want you to meet the rector, and then
we'll walk around. I have a thousand things to talk to you
about."

His voice became graver. "How's mother?"

She looked at him for a moment and then said something that she
had not intended to say at all, the very sort of thing she had
resolved to avoid.

"Oh, Kieth--she's--she's getting worse all the time, every way."

He nodded slowly as if he understood.

"Nervous, well--you can tell me about that later. Now---"

She was in a small study with a large desk, saying something to a
little, jovial, white-haired priest who retained her hand for
some seconds.

"So this is Lois!"

He said it as if he had heard of her for years.

He entreated her to sit down.

Two other priests arrived enthusiastically and shook hands with
her and addressed her as "Kieth's little sister," which she found
she didn't mind a bit.

How assured they seemed; she had expected a certain shyness,
reserve at least. There were several jokes unintelligible to her,
which seemed to delight every one, and the little Father Rector
referred to the trio of them as "dim old monks," which she
appreciated, because of course they weren't monks at all. She had
a lightning impression that they were especially fond of
Kieth--the Father Rector had called him "Kieth" and one of the
others had kept a hand on his shoulder all through the
conversation. Then she was shaking hands again and promising to
come back a little later for some ice-cream, and smiling and
smiling and being rather absurdly happy . . . she told herself
that it was because Kieth was so delighted in showing her off.

Then she and Kieth were strolling along a path, arm in arm, and
he was informing her what an absolute jewel the Father Rector
was.

"Lois," he broken off suddenly, "I want to tell you before we go
any farther how much it means to me to have you come up here. I
think it was--mighty sweet of you. I know what a gay time you've
been having."

Lois gasped. She was not prepared for this. At first when she had
conceived the plan of taking the hot journey down to Baltimore
staying the night with a friend and then coming out to see her
brother, she had felt rather consciously virtuous, hoped he
wouldn't be priggish or resentful about her not having come
before--but walking here with him under the trees seemed such a
little thing, and surprisingly a happy thing.

"Why, Kieth," she said quickly, "you know I couldn't have waited
a day longer. I saw you when I was five, but of course I didn't
remember, and how could I have gone on without practically ever
having seen my only brother?"

"It was mighty sweet of you, Lois," he repeated.

Lois blushed--he DID have personality.

"I want you to tell me all about yourself," he said after a
pause. "Of course I have a general idea what you and mother did
in Europe those fourteen years, and then we were all so worried,
Lois, when you had pneumonia and couldn't come down with
mother--let's see that was two years ago--and then, well, I've
seen your name in the papers, but it's all been so
unsatisfactory. I haven't known you, Lois."

She found herself analyzing his personality as she analyzed the
personality of every man she met. She wondered if the effect
of--of intimacy that he gave was bred by his constant repetition
of her name. He said it as if he loved the word, as if it had an
inherent meaning to him.

"Then you were at school," he continued.

"Yes, at Farmington. Mother wanted me to go to a convent--but I
didn't want to."

She cast a side glance at him to see if he would resent this.

But he only nodded slowly.

"Had enough convents abroad, eh?"

"Yes--and Kieth, convents are different there anyway. Here even
in the nicest ones there are so many COMMON girls."

He nodded again.

"Yes," he agreed, "I suppose there are, and I know how you feel
about it. It grated on me here, at first, Lois, though I wouldn't
say that to any one but you; we're rather sensitive, you and I,
to things like this."

"You mean the men here?"

"Yes, some of them of course were fine, the sort of men I'd
always been thrown with, but there were others; a man named
Regan, for instance--I hated the fellow, and now he's about the
best friend I have. A wonderful character, Lois; you'll meet him
later. Sort of man you'd like to have with you in a fight."

Lois was thinking that Kieth was the sort of man she'd like to
have with HER in a fight.

"How did you--how did you first happen to do it?" she asked,
rather shyly, "to come here, I mean. Of course mother told me the
story about the Pullman car."

"Oh, that---" He looked rather annoyed.

"Tell me that. I'd like to hear you tell it."

"Oh, it's nothing except what you probably know. It was evening
and I'd been riding all day and thinking about--about a hundred
things, Lois, and then suddenly I had a sense that some one was
sitting across from me, felt that he'd been there for some time,
and had a vague idea that he was another traveller. All at once
he leaned over toward me and I heard a voice say: 'I want you to
be a priest, that's what I want.' Well I jumped up and cried out,
'Oh, my God, not that!'--made an idiot of myself before about
twenty people; you see there wasn't any one sitting there at all.
A week after that I went to the Jesuit College in Philadelphia
and crawled up the last flight of stairs to the rector's office
on my hands and knees."

There was another silence and Lois saw that her brother's eyes
wore a far-away look, that he was staring unseeingly out over the
sunny fields. She was stirred by the modulations of his voice
and the sudden silence that seemed to flow about him when he
finished speaking.

She noticed now that his eyes were of the same fibre as hers,
with the green left out, and that his mouth was much gentler,
really, than in the picture --or was it that the face had grown
up to it lately? He was getting a little bald just on top of his
head. She wondered if that was from wearing a hat so much. It
seemed awful for a man to grow bald and no one to care about it.

"Were you--pious when you were young, Kieth?" she asked. "You
know what I mean. Were you religious? If you don't mind these
personal questions."

"Yes," he said with his eyes still far away--and she felt that
his intense abstraction was as much a part of his personality as
his attention. "Yes, I suppose I was, when I was--sober."

Lois thrilled slightly.

"Did you drink?"

He nodded.

"I was on the way to making a bad hash of things." He smiled and,
turning his gray eyes on her, changed the subject.

"Child, tell me about mother. I know it's been awfully hard for
you there, lately. I know you've had to sacrifice a lot and put
up with a great deal and I want you to know how fine of you I
think it is. I feel, Lois, that you're sort of taking the place
of both of us there."

Lois thought quickly how little she had sacrificed; how lately
she had constantly avoided her nervous, half-invalid mother.

"Youth shouldn't be sacrificed to age, Kieth," she said steadily.

"I know," he sighed, "and you oughtn't to have the weight on
your shoulders, child. I wish I were there to help you."

She saw how quickly he had turned her remark and instantly she
knew what this quality was that he gave off. He was SWEET. Her
thoughts went of on a side-track and then she broke the silence
with an odd remark.

"Sweetness is hard," she said suddenly.

"What?"

"Nothing," she denied in confusion. "I didn't mean to speak
aloud. I was thinking of something --of a conversation with a man
named Freddy Kebble."

"Maury Kebble's brother?"

"Yes," she said rather surprised to think of him having known
Maury Kebble. Still there was nothing strange about it. "Well, he
and I were talking about sweetness a few weeks ago. Oh, I don't
know--I said that a man named Howard--that a man I knew was
sweet, and he didn't agree with me, and we began talking about
what sweetness in a man was: He kept telling me I meant a sort of
soppy softness, but I knew I didn't--yet I didn't know exactly
how to put it. I see now. I meant just the opposite. I suppose
real sweetness is a sort of hardness--and strength."

Kieth nodded.

"I see what you mean. I've known old priests who had it."

"I'm talking about young men," she said rather defiantly.

They had reached the now deserted baseball diamond and, pointing
her to a wooden bench, he sprawled full length on the grass.

"Are these YOUNG men happy here, Kieth?"

"Don't they look happy, Lois?"

"I suppose so, but those YOUNG ones, those two we just
passed--have they--are they---?

"Are they signed up?" he laughed. "No, but they will be next
month."

"Permanently?"

"Yes--unless they break down mentally or physically. Of course in
a discipline like ours a lot drop out."

"But those BOYS. Are they giving up fine chances outside--like
you did?"

He nodded.

"Some of them."

"But Kieth, they don't know what they're doing. They haven't had
any experience of what they're missing."

"No, I suppose not."

"It doesn't seem fair. Life has just sort of scared them at
first. Do they all come in so YOUNG?"

"No, some of them have knocked around, led pretty wild
lives--Regan, for instance."

"I should think that sort would be better," she said
meditatively, "men that had SEEN life."

"No," said Kieth earnestly, "I'm not sure that knocking about
gives a man the sort of experience he can communicate to others.
Some of the broadest men I've known have been absolutely rigid
about themselves. And reformed libertines are a notoriously
intolerant class. Don't you thank so, Lois?"

She nodded, still meditative, and he continued:

"It seems to me that when one weak reason goes to another, it
isn't help they want; it's a sort of companionship in guilt,
Lois. After you were born, when mother began to get nervous she
used to go and weep with a certain Mrs. Comstock. Lord, it used
to make me shiver. She said it comforted her, poor old mother.
No, I don't think that to help others you've got to show yourself
at all. Real help comes from a stronger person whom you respect.
And their sympathy is all the bigger because it's impersonal."

"But people want human sympathy," objected Lois. "They want to
feel the other person's been tempted."

"Lois, in their hearts they want to feel that the other person's
been weak. That's what they mean by human.

"Here in this old monkery, Lois," he continued with a smile, "they
try to get all that self-pity and pride in our own wills out of
us right at the first. They put us to scrubbing floors--and other
things. It's like that idea of saving your life by losing it.
You see we sort of feel that the less human a man is, in your
sense of human, the better servant he can be to humanity. We
carry it out to the end, too. When one of us dies his family
can't even have him then. He's buried here under plain wooden
cross with a thousand others."

His tone changed suddenly and he looked at her with a great
brightness in his gray eyes.

"But way back in a man's heart there are some things he can't get
rid of--an one of them is that I'm awfully in love with my
little sister."

With a sudden impulse she knelt beside him in the grass and,
Leaning over, kissed his forehead.

"You're hard, Kieth," she said, "and I love you for it--and
you're sweet."



III


Back in the reception-room Lois met a half-dozen more of Kieth's
particular friends; there was a young man named Jarvis, rather
pale and delicate-looking, who, she knew, must be a grandson of
old Mrs. Jarvis at home, and she mentally compared this ascetic
with a brace of his riotous uncles.

And there was Regan with a scarred face and piercing intent eyes
that followed her about the room and often rested on Kieth with
something very like worship.  She knew then what Kieth had meant
about "a good man to have with you in a fight."

He's the missionary type--she thought vaguely--China or something.

"I want Kieth's sister to show us what the shimmy is," demanded
one young man with a broad grin.

Lois laughed.

"I'm afraid the Father Rector would send me shimmying out the
gate. Besides, I'm not an expert."

"I'm sure it wouldn't be best for Jimmy's soul anyway," said
Kieth solemnly. "He's inclined to brood about things like
shimmys. They were just starting to do the--maxixe, wasn't it,
Jimmy?--when he became a monk, and it haunted him his whole first
year. You'd see him when he was peeling potatoes, putting his
arm around the bucket and making irreligious motions with his
feet."

There was a general laugh in which Lois joined.

"An old lady who comes here to Mass sent Kieth this ice-cream,"
whispered Jarvis under cover of the laugh, "because she'd heard
you were coming. It's pretty good, isn't it?"

There were tears trembling in Lois' eyes.



IV


Then half an hour later over in the chapel things suddenly went
all wrong. It was several years since Lois had been at
Benediction and at first she was thrilled by the gleaming
monstrance with its central spot of white, the air rich and heavy
with incense, and the sun shining through the stained-glass
window of St. Francis Xavier overhead and falling in warm red
tracery on the cassock of the man in front of her, but at the
first notes of the "O SALUTARIS HOSTIA" a heavy weight seemed to
descend upon her soul. Kieth was on her right and young Jarvis on
her left, and she stole uneasy glance at both of them.

What's the matter with me? she thought impatiently.

She looked again. Was there a certain coldness in both their
profiles, that she had not noticed before--a pallor about the
mouth and a curious set expression in their eyes? She shivered
slightly: they were like dead men.

She felt her soul recede suddenly from Kieth's. This was her
brother--this, this unnatural person. She caught herself in the
act of a little laugh.

"What is the matter with me?"

She passed her hand over her eyes and the weight increased. The
incense sickened her and a stray, ragged note from one of the
tenors in the choir grated on her ear like the shriek of a
slate-pencil. She fidgeted, and raising her hand to her hair
touched her forehead, found moisture on it.

"It's hot in here, hot as the deuce."

Again she repressed a faint laugh and, then in an instant the
weight on her heart suddenly diffused into cold fear. . . . It
was that candle on the altar. It was all wrong--wrong. Why didn't
somebody see it? There was something IN it. There was something
coming out of it, taking form and shape above it.

She tried to fight down her rising panic, told herself it was the
wick. If the wick wasn't straight, candles did something--but
they didn't do this! With incalculable rapidity a force was
gathering within her, a tremendous, assimilative force, drawing
from every sense, every corner of her brain, and as it surged up
inside her she felt an enormous terrified repulsion. She drew her
arms in close to her side away from Kieth and Jarvis.

Something in that candle . . . she was leaning forward--in
another moment she felt she would go forward toward it--didn't
any one see it? . . . anyone?

"Ugh!"

She felt a space beside her and something told her that Jarvis
had gasped and sat down very suddenly . . . then she was kneeling
and as the flaming monstrance slowly left the altar in the hands
of the priest, she heard a great rushing noise in her ears--the
crash of the bells was like hammer-blows . . . and then in a
moment that seemed eternal a great torrent rolled over her
heart--there was a shouting there and a lashing as of waves . . .

. . . She was calling, felt herself calling for Kieth, her lips
mouthing the words that would not come:

"Kieth! Oh, my God! KIETH!"

Suddenly she became aware of a new presence, something external,
in front of her, consummated and expressed in warm red tracery.
Then she knew. It was the window of St. Francis Xavier. Her mind
gripped at it, clung to it finally, and she felt herself calling
again endlessly, impotently--Kieth--Kieth!

Then out of a great stillness came a voice:

"BLESSED BE GOD."

With a gradual rumble sounded the response rolling heavily
through the chapel:

"Blessed be God."

The words sang instantly in her heart; the incense lay mystically
and sweetly peaceful upon the air, and THE CANDLE ON THE ALTAR
WENT OUT.

"Blessed be His Holy Name."

"Blessed be His Holy Name."

Everything blurred into a swinging mist. With a sound half-gasp,
half-cry she rocked on her feet and reeled backward into Kieth's
suddenly outstretched arms.




V


"Lie still, child."

She closed her eyes again. She was on the grass outside, pillowed
on Kieth's arm, and Regan was dabbing her head with a cold towel.

"I'm all right," she said quietly.

"I know, but just lie still a minute longer. It was too hot in
there. Jarvis felt it, too."

She laughed as Regan again touched her gingerly with the towel.

"I'm all right," she repeated.

But though a warm peace was falling her mind and heart she felt
oddly broken and chastened, as if some one had held her stripped
soul up and laughed.



VI


Half an hour later she walked leaning on Kieth's arm down the
long central path toward the gate.

"It's been such a short afternoon," he sighed, "and I'm so sorry
you were sick, Lois."

"Kieth, I'm feeling fine now, really; I wish you wouldn't worry."

"Poor old child. I didn't realize that Benediction'd be a long
service for you after your hot trip out here and all."

She laughed cheerfully.

"I guess the truth is I'm not much used to Benediction. Mass is
the limit of my religious exertions."

She paused and then continued quickly:

"I don't want to shock you, Kieth, but I can't tell you how--how
INCONVENIENT being a Catholic is. It really doesn't seem to apply
any more. As far as morals go, some of the wildest boys I know
are Catholics. And the brightest boys--I mean the ones who think
and read a lot, don't seem to believe in much of anything any
more."

"Tell me about it. The bus won't be here for another half-hour."

They sat down on a bench by the path.

"For instance, Gerald Carter, he's published a novel. He
absolutely roars when people mention immortality. And then
Howa--well, another man I've known well, lately, who was Phi Beta
Kappa at Harvard says that no intelligent person can believe in
Supernatural Christianity. He says Christ was a great socialist,
though. Am I shocking you?"

She broke off suddenly.

Kieth smiled.

"You can't shock a monk. He's a professional shock-absorber."

"Well," she continued, "that's about all. It seems so--so NARROW.
Church schools, for instance. There's more freedom about things
that Catholic people can't see--like birth control."

Kieth winced, almost imperceptibly, but Lois saw it.

"Oh," she said quickly, "everybody talks about everything now."

"It's probably better that way."

"Oh, yes, much better. Well, that's all, Kieth. I just wanted to
tell you why I'm a little--luke-warm, at present."

"I'm not shocked, Lois. I understand better than you think. We
all go through those times. But I know it'll come out all right,
child. There's that gift of faith that we have, you and I,
that'll carry us past the bad spots."

He rose as he spoke and they started again down the path.

"I want you to pray for me sometimes, Lois. I think your prayers
would be about what I need. Because we've come very close in
these few hours, I think."

Her eyes were suddenly shining.

"Oh we have, we have!" she cried. "I feel closer to you now than
to any one in the world."

He stopped suddenly and indicated the side of the path.

"We might--just a minute---"

It was a pieta, a life-size statue of the Blessed Virgin set
within a semicircle of rocks.

Feeling a little self-conscious she dropped on her knees beside
him and made an unsuccessful attempt at prayer.

She was only half through when he rose. He took her arm again.

"I wanted to thank Her for letting as have this day together," he
said simply.

Lois felt a sudden lump in her throat and she wanted to say
something that would tell him how much it had meant to her, too.
But she found no words.

"I'll always remember this," he continued, his voice trembling a
little---"this summer day with you. It's been just what I
expected. You're just what I expected, Lois."

"I'm awfully glad, Keith."

"You see, when you were little they kept sending me snap-shots of
you, first as a baby and then as a child in socks playing on the
beach with a pail and shovel, and then suddenly as a wistful
little girl with wondering, pure eyes--and I used to build dreams
about you. A man has to have something living to cling to. I
think, Lois, it was your little white soul I tried to keep near
me--even when life was at its loudest and every intellectual idea
of God seemed the sheerest mockery, and desire and love and a
million things came up to me and said: 'Look here at me! See, I'm
Life. You're turning your back on it!' All the way through that
shadow, Lois, I could always see your baby soul flitting on ahead
of me, very frail and clear and wonderful."

Lois was crying softly. They had reached the gate and she rested
her elbow on it and dabbed furiously at her eyes.

"And then later, child, when you were sick I knelt all one night
and asked God to spare you for me--for I knew then that I wanted
more; He had taught me to want more. I wanted to know you moved
and breathed in the same world with me. I saw you growing up,
that white innocence of yours changing to a flame and burning to
give light to other weaker souls. And then I wanted some day to
take your children on my knee and hear them call the crabbed old
monk Uncle Kieth."

He seemed to be laughing now as he talked.

"Oh, Lois, Lois, I was asking God for more then. I wanted the
letters you'd write me and the place I'd have at your table. I
wanted an awful lot, Lois, dear."

"You've got me, Kieth," she sobbed "you know it, say you know it.
Oh, I'm acting like a baby but I didn't think you'd be this way,
and I--oh, Kieth--Kieth---"

He took her hand and patted it softly.

"Here's the bus. You'll come again won't you?"

She put her hands on his cheeks, add drawing his head down,
pressed her tear-wet face against his.

"Oh, Kieth, brother, some day I'll tell you something."

He helped her in, saw her take down her handkerchief and smile
bravely at him, as the driver kicked his whip and the bus rolled
off. Then a thick cloud of dust rose around it and she was gone.

For a few minutes he stood there on the road his hand on the
gate-post, his lips half parted in a smile.

"Lois," he said aloud in a sort of wonder, "Lois, Lois."

Later, some probationers passing noticed him kneeling before the
pieta, and coming back after a time found him still there. And he
was there until twilight came down and the courteous trees grew
garrulous overhead and the crickets took up their burden of song
in the dusky grass.



VII


The first clerk in the telegraph booth in the Baltimore Station
whistled through his buck teeth at the second clerk:

"S'matter?"

"See that girl--no, the pretty one with the big black dots on her
veil. Too late--she's gone. You missed somep'n."

"What about her?"

"Nothing. 'Cept she's damn good-looking. Came in here yesterday
and sent a wire to some guy to meet her somewhere. Then a minute
ago she came in with a telegram all written out and was standin'
there goin' to give it to me when she changed her mind or somep'n
and all of a sudden tore it up."

"Hm."

The first clerk came around tile counter and picking up the two
pieces of paper from the floor put them together idly. The second
clerk read them over his shoulder and subconsciously counted the
words as he read. There were just thirteen.

"This is in the way of a permanent goodbye. I should suggest
Italy.

                                                      "Lois."

"Tore it up, eh?" said the second clerk.





Dalyrimple Goes Wrong




In the millennium an educational genius will write a book to be
given to every young man on the date of his disillusion. This
work will have the flavor of Montaigne's essays and Samuel
Butler's note-books--and a little of Tolstoi and Marcus
Aurelius. It will be neither cheerful nor pleasant but will
contain numerous passages of striking humor. Since first-class
minds never believe anything very strongly until they've
experienced it, its value will be purely relative . . . all
people over thirty will refer to it as "depressing."

This prelude belongs to the story of a young man
who lived, as you and I do, before the book.



II


The generation which numbered Bryan Dalyrimple drifted out of
adolescence to a mighty fan-fare of trumpets. Bryan played the
star in an affair which included a Lewis gun and a nine-day romp
behind the retreating German lines, so luck triumphant or
sentiment rampant awarded him a row of medals and on his arrival
in the States he was told that he was second in importance only
to General Pershing and Sergeant York. This was a lot of fun.
The governor of his State, a stray congressman, and a citizens'
committee gave him enormous smiles and "By God, Sirs" on the
dock at Hoboken; there were newspaper reporters and
photographers who said "would you mind" and "if you could just";
and back in his home town there were old ladies, the rims of
whose eyes grew red as they talked to him, and girls who hadn't
remembered him so well since his father's business went blah! in
nineteen-twelve.

But when the shouting died he realized that for a month he had
been the house guest of the mayor, that he had only fourteen
dollars in the world and that "the name that will live forever
in the annals and legends of this State" was already living
there very quietly and obscurely.

One morning he lay late in bed and just outside his door he
heard the up-stairs maid talking to the cook. The up-stairs maid
said that Mrs. Hawkins, the mayor's wife, had been trying for a
week to hint Dalyrimple out of the house. He left at eleven
o'clock in intolerable confusion, asking that his trunk be sent
to Mrs. Beebe's boarding-house.

Dalyrimple was twenty-three and he had never worked. His father
had given him two years at the State University and passed away
about the time of his son's nine-day romp, leaving behind him
some mid-Victorian furniture and a thin packet of folded paper
that turned out to be grocery bills. Young Dalyrimple had very
keen gray eyes, a mind that delighted the army psychological
examiners, a trick of having read it--whatever it was--some time
before, and a cool hand in a hot situation. But these things did
not save him a final, unresigned sigh when he realized that he
had to go to work--right away.

It was early afternoon when he walked into the office of Theron
G. Macy, who owned the largest wholesale grocery house in town.
Plump, prosperous, wearing a pleasant but quite unhumorous
smile, Theron G. Macy greeted him warmly.

"Well--how do, Bryan? What's on your mind?"

To Dalyrimple, straining with his admission, his own words, when
they came, sounded like an Arab beggar's whine for alms.

"Why--this question of a job." ("This question of a job" seemed
somehow more clothed than just "a job.")

"A job?" An almost imperceptible breeze blew across Mr. Macy's
expression.

"You see, Mr. Macy," continued Dalyrimple, "I feel I'm wasting
time. I want to get started at something. I had several chances
about a month ago but they all seem to have--gone---"

"Let's see," interrupted Mr. Macy. "What were they?"

"Well, just at the first the governor said something about a
vacancy on his staff. I was sort of counting on that for a
while, but I hear he's given it to Allen Gregg, you know, son of
G. P. Gregg. He sort of forgot what he said to me--just talking,
I guess."

"You ought to push those things."

"Then there was that engineering expedition, but they decided
they'd have to have a man who knew hydraulics, so they couldn't
use me unless I paid my own way."

"You had just a year at the university?"

"Two. But I didn't take any science or mathematics. Well, the
day the battalion paraded, Mr. Peter Jordan said something about
a vacancy in his store. I went around there to-day and I found
he meant a sort of floor-walker--and then you said something one
day"--he paused and waited for the older man to take him up, but
noting only a minute wince continued--"about a position, so I
thought I'd come and see you."

"There was a position," confessed Mr. Macy reluctantly, "but
since then we've filled it." He cleared his throat again.
"You've waited quite a while."

"Yes, I suppose I did. Everybody told me there was no hurry--and
I'd had these various offers."

Mr. Macy delivered a paragraph on present-day opportunities
which Dalyrimple's mind completely skipped.

"Have you had any business experience?"

"I worked on a ranch two summers as a rider."

"Oh, well," Mr. Macy disparaged this neatly, and then continued:
"What do you think you're worth?"

"I don't know."

"Well, Bryan, I tell you, I'm willing to strain a point and give
you a chance."

Dalyrimple nodded.

"Your salary won't be much. You'll start by learning the stock.
Then you'll come in the office for a while. Then you'll go on
the road. When could you begin?"

"How about to-morrow?"

"All right. Report to Mr. Hanson in the stock-room. He'll start
you off."

He continued to regard Dalyrimple steadily until the latter,
realizing that the interview was over, rose awkwardly.

"Well, Mr. Macy, I'm certainly much obliged."

"That's all right. Glad to help you, Bryan."

After an irresolute moment, Dalyrimple found himself in the
hall. His forehead was covered with perspiration, and the room
had not been hot.

"Why the devil did I thank the son of a gun?" he muttered.



III


Next morning Mr. Hanson informed him coldly of the necessity of
punching the time-clock at seven every morning, and delivered
him for instruction into the hands of a fellow worker, one
Charley Moore.

Charley was twenty-six, with that faint musk of weakness hanging
about him that is often mistaken for the scent of evil. It took
no psychological examiner to decide that he had drifted into
indulgence and laziness as casually as he had drifted into life,
and was to drift out. He was pale and his clothes stank of
smoke; he enjoyed burlesque shows, billiards, and Robert
Service, and was always looking back upon his last intrigue or
forward to his next one. In his youth his taste had run to loud
ties, but now it seemed to have faded, like his vitality, and
was expressed in pale-lilac four-in-hands and indeterminate
gray collars. Charley was listlessly struggling that losing
struggle against mental, moral, and physical anaemia that takes
place ceaselessly on the lower fringe of the middle classes.

The first morning he stretched himself on a row of cereal
cartons and carefully went over the limitations of the Theron
G. Macy Company.

"It's a piker organization. My Gosh! Lookit what they give me.
I'm quittin' in a coupla months. Hell! Me stay with this bunch!"

The Charley Moores are always going to change jobs next month.
They do, once or twice in their careers, after which they sit
around comparing their last job with the present one, to the
infinite disparagement of the latter.

"What do you get?" asked Dalyrimple curiously.

"Me? I get sixty." This rather defiantly.

"Did you start at sixty?"

"Me? No, I started at thirty-five. He told me he'd put me on the
road after I learned the stock. That's what he tells 'em all."

"How long've you been here?" asked Dalyrimple with a sinking
sensation.

"Me? Four years. My last year, too, you bet your boots."

Dalyrimple rather resented the presence of the store detective
as he resented the time-clock, and he came into contact with him
almost immediately through the rule against smoking. This rule
was a thorn in his side. He was accustomed to his three or four
cigarettes in a morning, and after three days without it he
followed Charley Moore by a circuitous route up a flight of back
stairs to a little balcony where they indulged in peace. But
this was not for long. One day in his second week the detective
met him in a nook of the stairs, on his descent, and told him
sternly that next time he'd be reported to Mr. Macy. Dalyrimple
felt like an errant schoolboy.

Unpleasant facts came to his knowledge. There were "cave-
dwellers" in the basement who had worked there for ten or
fifteen years at sixty dollars a month, rolling barrels and
carrying boxes through damp, cement-walled corridors, lost in
that echoing half-darkness between seven and five-thirty and,
like himself, compelled several times a month to work until nine
at night.

At the end of a month he stood in line and received forty
dollars. He pawned a cigarette-case and a pair of field-glasses
and managed to live--to eat, sleep, and smoke. It was, however,
a narrow scrape; as the ways and means of economy were a closed
book to him and the second month brought no increase, he voiced
his alarm.

"If you've got a drag with old Macy, maybe he'll raise you," was
Charley's disheartening reply. "But he didn't raise ME till I'd
been here nearly two years."

"I've got to live," said Dalyrimple simply. "I could get more
pay as a laborer on the railroad but, Golly, I want to feel I'm
where there's a chance to get ahead."

Charles shook his head sceptically and Mr. Macy's answer next
day was equally unsatisfactory.

Dalyrimple had gone to the office just before closing time.

"Mr. Macy, I'd like to speak to you."

"Why--yes." The unhumorous smile appeared. The voice vas faintly
resentful.

"I want to speak to you in regard to more salary."

Mr. Macy nodded.

"Well," he said doubtfully, "I don't know exactly what you're
doing. I'll speak to Mr. Hanson."

He knew exactly what Dalyrimple was doing, and Dalyrimple knew
he knew.

"I'm in the stock-room--and, sir, while I'm here I'd like to
ask you how much longer I'll have to stay there."

"Why--I'm not sure exactly. Of course it takes some time to
learn the stock."

"You told me two months when I started."

"Yes. Well, I'll speak to Mr. Hanson."

Dalyrimple paused irresolute.

"Thank you, sir."

Two days later he again appeared in the office with the result
of a count that had been asked for by Mr. Hesse, the bookkeeper.
Mr. Hesse was engaged and Dalyrimple, waiting, began idly
fingering in a ledger on the stenographer's desk.

Half unconsciously he turned a page--he caught sight of his name
--it was a salary list:

     Dalyrimple
     Demming
     Donahoe
     Everett

His eyes stopped--

     Everett.........................$60

So Tom Everett, Macy's weak-chinned nephew, had started at sixty
--and in three weeks he had been out of the packing-room and
into the office.

So that was it! He was to sit and see man after man pushed over
him: sons, cousins, sons of friends, irrespective of their
capabilities, while HE was cast for a pawn, with "going on the
road" dangled before his eyes--put of with the stock remark:
I'll see; I'll look into it." At forty, perhaps, he would be a
bookkeeper like old Hesse, tired, listless Hesse with a dull
routine for his stint and a dull background of boarding-house
conversation.

This was a moment when a genii should have pressed into his
hand the book for disillusioned young men. But the book has
not been written.

A great protest swelling into revolt surged up in him. Ideas
half forgotten, chaoticly perceived and assimilated, filled his
mind. Get on--that was the rule of life--and that was all. How
he did it, didn't matter--but to be Hesse or Charley Moore.

"I won't!" he cried aloud.

The bookkeeper and the stenographers looked up in surprise.

"What?"

For a second Dalyrimple stared--then walked up to the desk.

"Here's that data," he said brusquely. "I can't wait any longer."

Mr. Hesse's face expressed surprise.

It didn't matter what he did--just so he got out
of this rut. In a dream he stepped from the elevator into the
stock-room, and walking to an unused aisle, sat down on a box,
covering his face with his hands.

His brain was whirring with the frightful jar of discovering a
platitude for himself.

"I've got to get out of this," he said aloud and then repeated,
"I've got to get out"--and he didn't mean only out of Macy's
wholesale house.

When he left at five-thirty it was pouring rain, but he struck
off in the opposite direction from his boarding-house, feeling,
in the first cool moisture that oozed soggily through his old
suit, an odd exultation and freshness. He wanted a world that
was like walking through rain, even though he could not see far
ahead of him, but fate had put him in the world of Mr. Macy's
fetid storerooms and corridors. At first merely the overwhelming
need of change took him, then half-plans began to formulate in
his imagination.

"I'll go East--to a big city--meet people--bigger people--people
who'll help me. Interesting work somewhere. My God, there MUST
be."

With sickening truth it occurred to him that his facility for
meeting people was limited. Of all places it was here in his own
town that he should be known, was known--famous--before the water
of oblivion had rolled over him.

You had to cut corners, that was all. Pull--relationship--wealthy
marriages---

For several miles the continued reiteration of this preoccupied
him and then he perceived that the rain had become thicker and
more opaque in the heavy gray of twilight and that the houses
were falling away. The district of full blocks, then of big
houses, then of scattering little ones, passed and great sweeps
of misty country opened out on both sides. It was hard walking
here. The sidewalk had given place to a dirt road, streaked with
furious brown rivulets that splashed and squashed around his
shoes.

Cutting corners--the words began to fall apart, forming curious
phrasings--little illuminated pieces of themselves. They
resolved into sentences, each of which had a strangely familiar
ring.

Cutting corners meant rejecting the old childhood principles
that success came from faithfulness to duty, that evil was
necessarily punished or virtue necessarily rewarded--that honest
poverty was happier than corrupt riches.

It meant being hard.

This phrase appealed to him and he repeated it over and over.
It had to do somehow with Mr. Macy and Charley Moore--the
attitudes, the methods of each of them.

He stopped and felt his clothes. He was drenched to the skin. He
looked about him and, selecting a place in the fence where a
tree sheltered it, perched himself there.

In my credulous years--he thought--they told me that evil was a
sort of dirty hue, just as definite as a soiled collar, but it
seems to me that evil is only a manner of hard luck, or
heredity-and-environment, or "being found out." It hides in the
vacillations of dubs like Charley Moore as certainly as it does
in the intolerance of Macy, and if it ever gets much more
tangible it becomes merely an arbitrary label to paste on the
unpleasant things in other people's lives.

In fact--he concluded--it isn't worth worrying over what's evil
and what isn't. Good and evil aren't any standard to me--and
they can be a devil of a bad hindrance when I want something.
When I want something bad enough, common sense tells me to go
and take it--and not get caught.

And then suddenly Dalyrimple knew what he wanted first. He
wanted fifteen dollars to pay his overdue board bill.

With a furious energy he jumped from the fence, whipped off his
coat, and from its black lining cut with his knife a piece about
five inches square. He made two holes near its edge and then
fixed it on his face, pulling his hat down to hold it in place.
It flapped grotesquely and then dampened and clung clung to his
forehead and cheeks.

Now . . . The twilight had merged to dripping dusk . . . black
as pitch. He began to walk quickly back toward town, not waiting
to remove the mask but watching the road with difficulty through
the jagged eye-holes. He was not conscious of any nervousness
. . . the only tension was caused by a desire to do the thing as
soon as possible.

He reached the first sidewalk, continued on until he saw a hedge
far from any lamp-post, and turned in behind it. Within a minute
he heard several series of footsteps--he waited--it was a woman
and he held his breath until she passed . . . and then a man,
a laborer. The next passer, he felt, would be what he wanted
. . . the laborer's footfalls died far up the drenched street
. . . other steps grew nears grew suddenly louder.

Dalyrimple braced himself.

"Put up your hands!"

The man stopped, uttered an absurd little grunt, and thrust
pudgy arms skyward.

Dalyrimple went through the waistcoat.

"Now, you shrimp," he said, setting his hand suggestively to
his own hip pocket, "you run, and stamp--loud! If I hear your
feet stop I'll put a shot after you!"

Then he stood there in sudden uncontrollable laughter as
audibly frightened footsteps scurried away into the night.

After a moment he thrust the roll of bills into his pocket,
snatched of his mask, and running quickly across the street,
darted down an alley.



IV


Yet, however Dalyrimple justified himself intellectually, he had
many bad moments in the weeks immediately following his decision.
The tremendous pressure of sentiment and inherited ambition kept
raising riot with his attitude. He felt morally lonely.

The noon after his first venture he ate in a little lunch-room
with Charley Moore and, watching him unspread the paper, waited
for a remark about the hold-up of the day before. But either the
hold-up was not mentioned or Charley wasn't interested. He
turned listlessly to the sporting sheet, read Doctor Crane's
crop of seasoned bromides, took in an editorial on ambition with
his mouth slightly ajar, and then skipped to Mutt and Jeff.

Poor Charley--with his faint aura of evil and his mind that
refused to focus, playing a lifeless solitaire with cast-off
mischief.

Yet Charley belonged on the other side of the fence. In him
could be stirred up all the flamings and denunciations of
righteousness; he would weep at a stage heroine's lost virtue,
he could become lofty and contemptuous at the idea of dishonor.

On my side, thought Dalyrimple, there aren't any resting-places;
a man who's a strong criminal is after the weak criminals as
well, so it's all guerilla warfare over here.

What will it all do to me? he thoughts with a persistent
weariness. Will it take the color out of life with the honor?
Will it scatter my courage and dull my mind?--despiritualize me
completely--does it mean eventual barrenness, eventual remorse,
failure?

With a great surge of anger, he would fling his mind upon the
barrier--and stand there with the flashing bayonet of his pride.
Other men who broke the laws of justice and charity lied to all
the world. He at any rate would not lie to himself. He was more
than Byronic now: not the spiritual rebel, Don Juan; not the
philosophical rebel, Faust; but a new psychological rebel of his
own century--defying the sentimental a priori forms of his own
mind---

Happiness was what he wanted--a slowly rising scale of
gratifications of the normal appetites--and he had a strong
conviction that the materials, if not the inspiration of
happiness, could be bought with money.



V


The night came that drew him out upon his second venture, and
as he walked the dark street he felt in himself a great
resemblance to a cat--a certain supple, swinging litheness. His
muscles were rippling smoothly and sleekly under his spare,
healthy flesh--he had an absurd desire to bound along the
street, to run dodging among trees, to tarn "cart-wheels" over
soft grass.

It was not crisp, but in the air lay a faint suggestion of
acerbity, inspirational rather than chilling.

"The moon is down--I have not heard the clock!"

He laughed in delight at the line which an early memory had
endowed with a hushed awesome beauty.

He passed a man and then another a quarter of mile afterward.

He was on Philmore Street now and it was very dark. He blessed
the city council for not having put in new lamp-posts as a
recent budget had recommended. Here was the red-brick Sterner
residence which marked the beginning of the avenue; here was the
Jordon house, the Eisenhaurs', the Dents', the Markhams', the
Frasers'; the Hawkins', where he had been a guest; the
Willoughbys', the Everett's, colonial and ornate; the little
cottage where lived the Watts old maids between the imposing
fronts of the Macys' and the Krupstadts'; the Craigs--

Ah . . . THERE! He paused, wavered violently--far up the street
was a blot, a man walking, possibly a policeman. After an
eternal second be found himself following the vague, ragged
shadow of a lamp-post across a lawn, running bent very low.
Then he was standing tense, without breath or need of it, in the
shadow of his limestone prey.

Interminably he listened--a mile off a cat howled, a hundred
yards away another took up the hymn in a demoniacal snarl, and
he felt his heart dip and swoop, acting as shock-absorber for
his mind. There were other sounds; the faintest fragment of song
far away; strident, gossiping laughter from a back porch
diagonally across the alley; and crickets, crickets singing in
the patched, patterned, moonlit grass of the yard. Within the
house there seemed to lie an ominous silence. He was glad he did
not know who lived here.

His slight shiver hardened to steel; the steel softened and his
nerves became pliable as leather; gripping his hands he
gratefully found them supple, and taking out knife and pliers he
went to work on the screen.

So sure was he that he was unobserved that, from the dining-room
where in a minute he found himself, he leaned out and carefully
pulled the screen up into position, balancing it so it would
neither fall by chance nor be a serious obstacle to a sudden
exit.

Then he put the open knife in his coat pocket, took out his
pocket-flash, and tiptoed around the room.

There was nothing here he could use--the dining-room had never
been included in his plans for the town was too small to permit
disposing of silver.

As a matter of fact his plans were of the vaguest. He had found
that with a mind like his, lucrative in intelligence, intuition,
and lightning decision, it was best to have but the skeleton of
a campaign. The machine-gun episode had taught him that. And he
was afraid that a method preconceived would give him two points
of view in a crisis--and two points of view meant wavering.

He stumbled slightly on a chair, held his breath, listened, went
on, found the hall, found the stairs, started up; the seventh
stair creaked at his step, the ninth, the fourteenth. He was
counting them automatically. At the third creak he paused again
for over a minute--and in that minute he felt more alone than he
had ever felt before. Between the lines on patrol, even when
alone, he had had behind him the moral support of half a billion
people; now he was alone, pitted against that same moral
pressure--a bandit. He had never felt this fear, yet he had
never felt this exultation.

The stairs came to an end, a doorway approached; he went in and
listened to regular breathing. His feet were economical of steps
and his body swayed sometimes at stretching as he felt over the
bureau, pocketing all articles which held promise--he could not
have enumerated them ten seconds afterward. He felt on a chair
for possible trousers, found soft garments, women's lingerie.
The corners of his mouth smiled mechanically.

Another room . . . the same breathing, enlivened by one ghastly
snort that sent his heart again on its tour of his breast. Round
object--watch; chain; roll of bills; stick-pins; two rings--he
remembered that he had got rings from the other bureau. He
started out winced as a faint glow flashed in front of him,
facing him. God!--it was the glow of his own wrist-watch on his
outstretched arm.

Down the stairs. He skipped two crumbing steps but found
another. He was all right now, practically safe; as he neared
the bottom he felt a slight boredom. He reached the dining-room
--considered the silver--again decided against it.

Back in his room at the boarding-house he examined the additions
to his personal property:

Sixty-five dollars in bills.

A platinum ring with three medium diamonds, worth, probably,
about seven hundred dollars. Diamonds were going up.

A cheap gold-plated ring with the initials O. S. and the date
inside--'03--probably a class-ring from school. Worth a few
dollars. Unsalable.

A red-cloth case containing a set of false teeth.

A silver watch.

A gold chain worth more than the watch.

An empty ring-box.

A little ivory Chinese god--probably a desk ornament.

A dollar and sixty-two cents an small change.

He put the money under his pillow and the other things in the
toe of an infantry boot, stuffing a stocking in on top of them.
Then for two hours his mind raced like a high-power engine here
and there through his life, past and future, through fear and
laughter. With a vague, inopportune wish that he were married,
he fell into a deep sleep about half past five.



VI


Though the newspaper account of the burglary failed to mention
the false teeth, they worried him considerably.  The picture of
a human waking in the cool dawn and groping for them in vain,
of a soft, toothless breakfast, of a strange, hollow, lisping
voice calling the police station, of weary, dispirited visits
to the dentist, roused a great fatherly pity in him.

Trying to ascertain whether they belonged to a man or a woman,
he took them carefully out of the case and held them up near
his mouth. He moved his own jaws experimentally; he measured
with his fingers; but he failed to decide: they might belong
either to a large-mouthed woman or a small-mouthed man.

On a warm impulse he wrapped them in brown paper from the
bottom of his army trunk, and printed FALSE TEETH on the
package in clumsy pencil letters. Then, the next night, he
walked down Philmore Street, and shied the package onto the
lawn so that it would be near the door. Next day the paper
announced that the police had a clew--they knew that the
burglar was in town. However, they didn't mention what the
clew was.



VII


At the end of a month "Burglar Bill of the Silver District
was the nurse-girl's standby for frightening children. Five
burglaries were attributed to him, but though Dalyrimple had
only committed three, he considered that majority had it and
appropriated the title to himself. He had once been seen--"a
large bloated creature with the meanest face you ever laid eyes
on." Mrs. Henry Coleman, awaking at two o'clock at the beam of
an electric torch flashed in her eye, could not have been
expected to recognize Bryan Dalyrimple at whom she had waved
flags last Fourth of July, and whom she had described as "not
at all the daredevil type, do you think?"

When Dalyrimple kept his imagination at white heat he managed to
glorify his own attitude, his emancipation from petty scruples
and remorses--but let him once allow his thought to rove
unarmored, great unexpected horrors and depressions would
overtake him. Then for reassurance he had to go back to think
out the whole thing over again. He found that it was on the
whole better to give up considering himself as a rebel. It was
more consoling to think of every one else as a fool.

His attitude toward Mr. Macy underwent a change. He no longer
felt a dim animosity and inferiority in his presence. As his
fourth month in the store ended he found himself regarding his
employer in a manner that was almost fraternal.  He had a vague
but very assured conviction that Mr. Macy's innermost soul would
have abetted and approved. He no longer worried about his
future. He had the intention of accumulating several thousand
dollars and then clearing out--going east, back to France, down
to South America. Half a dozen times in the last two months he
had been about to stop work, but a fear of attracting attention
to his being in funds prevented him. So he worked on, no longer
in listlessness, but with contemptuous amusement.



VIII


Then with astounding suddenness something happened that changed
his plans and put an end to his burglaries.

Mr. Macy sent for him one afternoon and with a great show of
jovial mystery asked him if he had an engagement that night. If
he hadn't, would he please call on Mr. Alfred J. Fraser at eight
o'clock. Dalyrimple's wonder was mingled with uncertainty. He
debated with himself whether it were not his cue to take the
first train out of town. But an hour's consideration decided him
that his fears were unfounded and at eight o'clock he arrived at
the big Fraser house in Philmore Avenue.

Mr. Fraser was commonly supposed to be the biggest political
influence in the city. His brother was Senator Fraser, his son-
in-law was Congressman Demming, and his influence, though not
wielded in such a way as to make him an objectionable boss, was
strong nevertheless.

He had a great, huge face, deep-set eyes, and a barn-door of an
upper lip, the melange approaching a worthy climax if a long
professional jaw.

During his conversation with Dalyrimple his expression kept
starting toward a smile, reached a cheerful optimism, and then
receded back to imperturbability.

"How do you do, sir?" he laid, holding out his hand. "Sit down.
I suppose you're wondering why I wanted you. Sit down."

Dalyrimple sat down.

"Mr. Dalyrimple, how old are you?"

"I'm twenty-three."

"You're young. But that doesn't mean you're foolish. Mr.
Dalyrimple, what I've got to say won't take long. I'm going to
make you a proposition. To begin at the beginning, I've been
watching you ever since last Fourth of July when you made that
speech in response to the loving-cup."

Dalyrimple murmured disparagingly, but Fraser waved him to
silence.

"It was a speech I've remembered. It was a brainy speech,
straight from the shoulder, and it got to everybody in that
crowd. I know. I've watched crowds for years." He cleared his
throat as if tempted to digress on his knowledge of crowds--then
continued. "But, Mr. Dalyrimple, I've seen too many young men
who promised brilliantly go to pieces, fail through want of
steadiness, too many high-power ideas, and not enough
willingness to work. So I waited. I wanted to see what you'd
do. I wanted to see if you'd go to work, and if you'd stick to
what you started."

Dalyrimple felt a glow settle over him.

"So," continued Fraser, "when Theron Macy told me you'd started
down at his place, I kept watching you, and I followed your
record through him.  The first month I was afraid for awhile.
He told me you were getting restless, too good for your job,
hinting around for a raise---"

Dalyrimple started.

"---But he said after that you evidently made up your mind to
shut up and stick to it. That's the stuff I like in a young man!
That's the stuff that wins out. And don't think I don't
understand. I know how much harder it was for you after all that
silly flattery a lot of old women had been giving you. I know
what a fight it must have been---"

Dalyrimple's face was burning brightly. It felt young and
strangely ingenuous.

"Dalyrimple, you've got brains and you've got the stuff in you--
and that's what I want. I'm going to put you into the State
Senate."

"The WHAT?"

"The State Senate. We want a young man who has got brains, but
is solid and not a loafer. And when I say State Senate I don't
stop there. We're up against it here, Dalyrimple. We've got to
get some young men into politics--you know the old blood that's
been running on the party ticket year in and year out."

Dalyrimple licked his lips.

"You'll run me for the State Senate?"

"I'll PUT you in the State Senate."

Mr. Fraser's expression had now reached the
point nearest a smile and Dalyrimple in a happy frivolity felt
himself urging it mentally on--but it stopped, locked, and slid
from him. The barn-door and the jaw were separated by a line
strait as a nail.  Dalyrimple remembered with an effort that it
was a mouth, and talked to it.

"But I'm through," he said.  "My notoriety's dead.  People are
fed up with me."

"Those things," answered Mr. Fraser, "are mechanical.  Linotype
is a resuscitator of reputations.  Wait till you see the HERALD,
beginning next week--that is if you're with us--that is," and
his voice hardened slightly, "if you haven't got too many ideas
yourself about how things ought to be run."

"No," said Dalyrimple, looking him frankly in the eye.  "You'll
have to give me a lot of advice at first."

"Very well.  I'll take care of your reputation then.  Just keep
yourself on the right side of the fence."

Dalyrimple started at this repetition of a phrase he had thought
of so much lately.  There was a sudden ring at the door-bell.

"That's Macy now," observed Fraser, rising.  "I'll go let him in.
The servants have gone to bed."

He left Dalyrimple there in a dream.  The world was opening up
suddenly--- The State Senate, the United States Senate--so life
was this after all--cutting corners--common sense, that was the
rule.  No more foolish risks now unless necessity called--but it
was being hard that counted-- Never to let remorse or self-
reproach lose him a night's sleep--let his life be a sword of
courage--there was no payment--all that was drivel--drivel.

He sprang to his feet with clinched hands in a sort of triumph.

"Well, Bryan," said Mr. Macy stepping through the portieres.

The two older men smiled their half-smiles at him.

"Well Bryan," said Mr. Macy again.

Dalyrimple smiled also.

"How do, Mr. Macy?"

He wondered if some telepathy between them had made this new
appreciation possible--some invisible realization. . . .

Mr. Macy held out his hand.

"I'm glad we're to be associated in this scheme--I've been for
you all along--especially lately. I'm glad we're to be on the
same side of the fence."

"I want to thank you, sir," said Dalyrimple simply. He felt a
whimsical moisture gathering back of his eyes.





The Four Fists




At the present time no one I know has the slightest desire to
hit Samuel Meredith; possibly this is because a man over fifty
is liable to be rather severely cracked at the impact of a
hostile fist, but, for my part, I am inclined to think that all
his hitable qualities have quite vanished. But it is certain
that at various times in his life hitable qualities were in his
face, as surely as kissable qualities have ever lurked in a
girl's lips.

I'm sure every one has met a man like that, been casually
introduced, even made a friend of him, yet felt he was the sort
who aroused passionate dislike--expressed by some in the
involuntary clinching of fists, and in others by mutterings
about "takin' a poke" and "landin' a swift smash in ee eye." In
the juxtaposition of Samuel Meredith's features this quality was
so strong that it influenced his entire life.

What was it? Not the shape, certainly, for he was a pleasant-
looking man from earliest youth: broad-bowed with gray eyes that
were frank and friendly. Yet I've heard him tell a room full of
reporters angling for a "success" story that he'd be ashamed to
tell them the truth that they wouldn't believe it, that it
wasn't one story but four, that the public would not want to
read about a man who had been walloped into prominence.

It all started at Phillips Andover Academy when he was fourteen.
He had been brought up on a diet of caviar and bell-boys' legs
in half the capitals of Europe, and it was pure luck that his
mother had nervous prostration and had to delegate his education
to less tender, less biassed hands.

At Andover he was given a roommate named Gilly Hood. Gilly was
thirteen, undersized, and rather the school pet. From the
September day when Mr. Meredith's valet stowed Samuel's clothing
in the best bureau and asked, on departing, "hif there was
hanything helse, Master Samuel?" Gilly cried out that the
faculty had played him false. He felt like an irate frog in
whose bowl has been put goldfish.

"Good gosh!" he complained to his sympathetic contemporaries,
"he's a damn stuck-up Willie. He said, 'Are the crowd here
gentlemen?' and I said, 'No, they're boys,' and he said age
didn't matter, and I said, 'Who said it did?' Let him get fresh
with me, the ole pieface!"

For three weeks Gilly endured in silence young Samuel's comments
on the clothes and habits of Gilly's personal friends, endured
French phrases in conversation, endured a hundred half-feminine
meannesses that show what a nervous mother can do to a boy, if
she keeps close enough to him--then a storm broke in the aquarium.

Samuel was out. A crowd had gathered to hear Gilly be wrathful
about his roommate's latest sins.

"He said, 'Oh, I don't like the windows open at night,' he said,
'except only a little bit,'" complained Gilly.

"Don't let him boss you."

"Boss me?  You bet he won't.  I open those windows, I guess, but
the darn fool won't take turns shuttin' 'em in the morning."

"Make him, Gilly, why don't you?"

"I'm going to."  Gilly nodded his head in fierce agreement.
"Don't you worry.  He needn't think I'm any ole butler."

"Le's see you make him."

At this point the darn fool entered in person and included the
crowd in one of his irritating smiles.  Two boys said, "'Lo,
Mer'dith"; the others gave him a chilly glance and went on talking
to Gilly.  But Samuel seemed unsatisfied.

"Would you mind not sitting on my bed?" he suggested politely to
two of Gilly's particulars who were perched very much at ease.

"Huh?"

"My bed.  Can't you understand English?"

This was adding insult to injury.  There were several comments on
the bed's sanitary condition and the evidence within it of animal
life.

"S'matter with your old bed?" demanded Gilly truculently.

"The bed's all right, but---"

Gilly interrupted this sentence by rising and walking up to
Samuel. He paused several inches away and eyed him fiercely.

"You an' your crazy ole bed," he began. "You an' your crazy---"

"Go to it, Gilly," murmured some one.

"Show the darn fool---"

Samuel returned the gaze coolly.

"Well," he said finally, "it's my bed--- "

He got no further, for Gilly hauled of and hit him succinctly in
the nose.

"Yea! Gilly!"

"Show the big bully!"

Just let him touch you--he'll see!"

The group closed in on them and for the first time in his life
Samuel realized the insuperable inconvenience of being
passionately detested. He gazed around helplessly at the
glowering, violently hostile faces. He towered a head taller
than his roommate, so if he hit back he'd be called a bully and
have half a dozen more fights on his hands within five minutes;
yet if he didn't he was a coward. For a moment he stood there
facing Gilly's blazing eyes, and then, with a sudden choking
sound, he forced his way through the ring and rushed from the
room.

The month following bracketed the thirty most miserable days of
his life. Every waking moment he was under the lashing tongues
of his contemporaries; his habits and mannerisms became butts
for intolerable witticisms and, of course, the sensitiveness of
adolescence was a further thorn. He considered that he was a
natural pariah; that the unpopularity at school would follow him
through life. When he went home for the Christmas holidays he
was so despondent that his father sent him to a nerve
specialist. When he returned to Andover he arranged to arrive
late so that he could be alone in the bus during the drive from
station to school.

Of course when he had learned to keep his mouth shut every one
promptly forgot all about him. The next autumn, with his
realization that consideration for others was the discreet
attitude, he made good use of the clean start given him by the
shortness of boyhood memory. By the beginning of his senior year
Samuel Meredith was one of the best-liked boys of his class--and
no one was any stronger for him than his first friend and
constant companion, Gilly Hood.



II


Samuel became the sort of college student who in the early
nineties drove tandems and coaches and tallyhos between
Princeton and Yale and New York City to show that they
appreciated the social importance of football games. He believed
passionately in good form--his choosing of gloves, his tying of
ties, his holding of reins were imitated by impressionable
freshmen. Outside of his own set he was considered rather a
snob, but as his set was THE set, it never worried him. He
played football in the autumn, drank high-balls in the winter,
and rowed in the spring. Samuel despised all those who were
merely sportsmen without being gentlemen or merely gentlemen
without being sportsmen.

He live in New York and often brought home several of his
friends for the week-end. Those were the days of the horse-car
and in case of a crush it was, of course, the proper thing for
any one of Samuel's set to rise and deliver his seat to a
standing lady with a formal bow. One night in Samuel's junior
year he boarded a car with two of his intimates. There were
three vacant seats. When Samuel sat down he noticed a heavy-eyed
laboring man sitting next to him who smelt objectionably of
garlic, sagged slightly against Samuel and, spreading a little
as a tired man will, took up quite too much room.

The car had gone several blocks when it stopped for a quartet of
young girls, and, of course, the three men of the world sprang
to their feet and proffered their seats with due observance of
form. Unfortunately, the laborer, being unacquainted with the
code of neckties and tallyhos, failed to follow their example,
and one young lady was left at an embarrassed stance. Fourteen
eyes glared reproachfully at the barbarian; seven lips curled
slightly; but the object of scorn stared stolidly into the
foreground in sturdy unconsciousness of his despicable conduct.
Samuel was the most violently affected. He was humiliated that
any male should so conduct himself. He spoke aloud.

"There's a lady standing," he said sternly.

That should have been quite enough, but the object of scorn only
looked up blankly. The standing girl tittered and exchanged
nervous glances with her companions. But Samuel was aroused.

"There's a lady standing," he repeated, rather raspingly. The
man seemed to comprehend.

"I pay my fare," he said quietly.

Samuel turned red and his hands clinched, but the conductor was
looking their way, so at a warning nod from his friends he
subsided into sullen gloom.

They reached their destination and left the car, but so did the
laborer, who followed them, swinging his little pail. Seeing his
chance, Samuel no longer resisted his aristocratic inclination.
He turned around and, launching a full-featured, dime-novel
sneer, made a loud remark about the right of the lower animals
to ride with human beings.

In a half-second the workman had dropped his pail and let fly at
him. Unprepared, Samuel took the blow neatly on the jaw and
sprawled full length into the cobblestone gutter.

"Don't laugh at me!" cried his assailant. "I been workin' all
day. I'm tired as hell!"

As he spoke the sudden anger died out of his eyes and the mask
of weariness dropped again over his face. He turned and picked
up his pail. Samuel's friends took a quick step in his direction.

"Wait!" Samuel had risen slowly and was motioning back. Some
time, somewhere, he had been struck like that before. Then he
remembered--Gilly Hood. In the silence, as he dusted himself
off, the whole scene in the room at Andover was before his eyes--
and he knew intuitively that he had been wrong again.  This
man's strength, his rest, was the protection of his family. He
had more use for his seat in the street-car than any young girl.

"It's all right," said Samuel gruffly. "Don't touch 'him. I've
been a damn fool."

Of course it took more than an hour, or a week, for Samuel to
rearrange his ideas on the essential importance of good form. At
first he simply admitted that his wrongness had made him
powerless--as it had made him powerless against Gilly--but
eventually his mistake about the workman influenced his entire
attitude. Snobbishness is, after all, merely good breeding grown
dictatorial; so Samuel's code remained but the necessity of
imposing it upon others had faded out in a certain gutter.
Within that year his class had somehow stopped referring to him
as a snob.



III


After a few years Samuel's university decided that it had shone
long enough in the reflected glory of his neckties, so they
declaimed to him in Latin, charged him ten dollars for the paper
which proved him irretrievably educated, and sent him into the
turmoil with much self-confidence, a few friends, and the proper
assortment of harmless bad habits.

His family had by that time started back to shirt-sleeves,
through a sudden decline in the sugar-market, and it had already
unbuttoned its vest, so to speak, when Samuel went to work. His
mind was that exquisite TABULA RASA that a university education
sometimes leaves, but he had both energy and influence, so he
used his former ability as a dodging half-back in twisting
through Wall Street crowds as runner for a bank.

His diversion was--women. There were half a dozen: two or three
debutantes, an actress (in a minor way), a grass-widow, and one
sentimental little brunette who was married and lived in a
little house in Jersey City.

They had met on a ferry-boat. Samuel was crossing from New York
on business (he bad been working several years by this time) and
he helped her look for a package that she had dropped in the crush.

"Do you come over often?" he inquired casually.

"Just to shop," she said shyly. She had great brown eyes and the
pathetic kind of little mouth. "I've only been married three
months, and we find it cheaper to live over here."

"Does he--does your husband like your being alone like this?"

She laughed, a cheery young laugh.

"Oh, dear me, no. We were to meet for dinner but I must have
misunderstood the place. He'll be awfully worried."

"Well," said Samuel disapprovingly, "he ought to be. If you'll
allow me I'll see you home."

She accepted his offer thankfully, so they took the cable-car
together. When they walked up the path to her little house they
saw a light there; her husband had arrived before her.

"He's frightfully jealous," she announced, laughingly apologetic.

"Very well," answered Samuel, rather stiffly. "I'd better leave
you here."

She thanked him and, waving a good night, he left her.

That would have been quite all if they hadn't met on Fifth
Avenue one morning a week later. She started and blushed and
seemed so glad to see him that they chatted like old friends.
She was going to her dressmaker's, eat lunch alone at Taine's,
shop all afternoon, and meet her husband on the ferry at five.
Samuel told her that her husband was a very lucky man. She
blushed again and scurried off.

Samuel whistled all the way back to his office, but about twelve
o'clock he began to see that pathetic, appealing little mouth
everywhere--and those brown eyes. He fidgeted when he looked at
the clock; he thought of the grill down-stairs where he lunched
and the heavy male conversation thereof, and opposed to that
picture appeared another; a little table at Taine's with the
brown eyes and the mouth a few feet away. A few minutes before
twelve-thirty he dashed on his hat and rushed for the cable-car.

She was quite surprised to see him.

"Why--hello," she said. Samuel could tell that she was just
pleasantly frightened.

"I thought we might lunch together. It's so dull eating with a
lot of men."

She hesitated.

"Why, I suppose there's no harm in it. How could there be!"

It occurred to her that her husband should have taken lunch with
her--but he was generally so hurried at noon. She told Samuel
all about him: he was a little smaller than Samuel, but, oh,
MUCH better-looking. He was a book-keeper and not making a lot
of money, but they were very happy and expected to be rich
within three or four years.

Samuel's grass-widow had been in a quarrelsome mood for three or
four weeks, and through contrast, he took an accentuated
pleasure in this meeting; so fresh was she, and earnest, and
faintly adventurous. Her name was Marjorie.

They made another engagement; in fact, for a month they lunched
together two or three times a week. When she was sure that her
husband would work late Samuel took her over to New Jersey on
the ferry, leaving her always on the tiny front porch, after
she had gone in and lit the gas to use the security of his
masculine presence outside. This grew to be a ceremony--and it
annoyed him. Whenever the comfortable glow fell out through the
front windows, that was his CONGE; yet he never suggested coming
in and Marjorie didn't invite him.

Then, when Samuel and Marjorie had reached a stage in which they
sometimes touched each other's arms gently, just to show that
they were very good friends, Marjorie and her husband had one of
those ultrasensitive, supercritical quarrels that couples never
indulge in unless they care a great deal about each other. It
started with a cold mutton-chop or a leak in the gas-jet--and
one day Samuel found her in Taine's, with dark shadows under her
brown eyes and a terrifying pout.

By this time Samuel thought he was in love with Marjorie--so he
played up the quarrel for all it was worth. He was her best
friend and patted her hand--and leaned down close to her brown
curls while she whispered in little sobs what her husband had
said that morning; and he was a little more than her best friend
when he took her over to the ferry in a hansom.

"Marjorie," he said gently, when he left her, as usual, on the
porch, "if at any time you want to call on me, remember that I
am always waiting, always waiting."

She nodded gravely and put both her hands in his. "I know," she
said. "I know you're my friend, my best friend."

Then she ran into the house and he watched there until the gas
went on.

For the next week Samuel was in a nervous turmoil. Some
persistently rational strain warned him that at bottom he and
Marjorie had little in common, but in such cases there is
usually so much mud in the water that one can seldom see to the
bottom. Every dream and desire told him that he loved Marjorie,
wanted her, had to have her.

The quarrel developed. Marjorie's husband took to staying in New
York until late at night came home several times disagreeably
overstimulated, and made her generally miserable. They must have
had too much pride to talk it out--for Marjorie's husband was,
after all, pretty decent--so it drifted on from one
misunderstanding to another. Marjorie kept coming more and more
to Samuel; when a woman can accept masculine sympathy at is much
more satisfactory to her than crying to another girl. But
Marjorie didn't realize how much she had begun to rely on him,
how much he was part of her little cosmos.

One night, instead of turning away when Marjorie went in and lit
the gas, Samuel went in, too, and they sat together on the sofa
in the little parlor. He was very happy. He envied their home,
and he felt that the man who neglected such a possession out of
stubborn pride was a fool and unworthy of his wife. But when he
kissed Marjorie for the first time she cried softly and told him
to go. He sailed home on the wings of desperate excitement,
quite resolved to fan this spark of romance, no matter how big
the blaze or who was burned. At the time he considered that his
thoughts were unselfishly of her; in a later perspective he knew
that she had meant no more than the white screen in a motion
picture: it was just Samuel--blind, desirous.

Next day at Taine's, when they met for lunch, Samuel dropped all
pretense and made frank love to her. He had no plans, no
definite intentions, except to kiss her lips again, to hold her
in his arms and feel that she was very little and pathetic and
lovable. . . . He took her home, and this time they kissed until
both their hearts beat high--words and phrases formed on his lips.

And then suddenly there were steps on the porch--a hand tried
the outside door. Marjorie turned dead-white.

"Wait!" she whispered to Samuel, in a frightened voice, but in
angry impatience at the interruption he walked to the front door
and threw it open.

Every one has seen such scenes on the stage--seen them so often
that when they actually happen people behave very much like
actors. Samuel felt that he was playing a part and the lines
came quite naturally: he announced that all had a right to lead
their own lives and looked at Marjorie's husband menacingly, as
if daring him to doubt it. Marjorie's husband spoke of the
sanctity of the home, forgetting that it hadn't seemed very holy
to him lately; Samuel continued along the line of "the right to
happiness"; Marjorie's husband mentioned firearms and the
divorce court. Then suddenly he stopped and scrutinized both of
them--Marjorie in pitiful collapse on the sofa, Samuel
haranguing the furniture in a consciously heroic pose.

"Go up-stairs, Marjorie," he said, in a different tone.

"Stay where you are!" Samuel countered quickly.

Marjorie rose, wavered, and sat down, rose again and moved
hesitatingly toward the stairs.

"Come outside," said her husband to Samuel. "I want to talk to
you."

Samuel glanced at Marjorie, tried to get some message from her
eyes; then he shut his lips and went out.

There was a bright moon and when Marjorie's husband came down
the steps Samuel could see plainly that he was suffering--but
he felt no pity for him.

They stood and looked at each other, a few feet apart, and the
husband cleared his throat as though it were a bit husky.

"That's my wife," he said quietly, and then a wild anger surged
up inside him.  "Damn you!" he cried--and hit Samuel in the
face with all his strength.

In that second, as Samuel slumped to the ground, it flashed to
him that he had been hit like that twice before, and
simultaneously the incident altered like a dream--he felt
suddenly awake.  Mechanically he sprang to his feet and squared
off.  The other man was waiting, fists up, a yard away, but
Samuel knew that though physically he had him by several inches
and many pounds, he wouldn't hit him. The situation had
miraculously and entirely changed--a moment before Samuel had
seemed to himself heroic; now he seemed the cad, the outsider,
and Marjorie's husband, silhouetted against the lights of the
little house, the eternal heroic figure, the defender of his home.

There was a pause and then Samuel turned quickly away and went
down the path for the last time.



IV


Of course, after the third blow Samuel put in several weeks at
conscientious introspection. The blow years before at Andover
had landed on his personal unpleasantness; the workman of his
college days had jarred the snobbishness out of his system, and
Marjorie's husband had given a severe jolt to his greedy
selfishness. It threw women out of his ken until a year later,
when he met his future wife; for the only sort of woman worth
while seemed to be the one who could be protected as Marjorie's
husband had protected her. Samuel could not imagine his grass-
widow, Mrs. De Ferriac, causing any very righteous blows on her
own account.

His early thirties found him well on his feet. He was associated
with old Peter Carhart, who was in those days a national figure.
Carhart's physique was like a rough model for a statue of
Hercules, and his record was just as solid--a pile made for the
pure joy of it, without cheap extortion or shady scandal. He had
been a great friend of Samuel's father, but he watched the son
for six years before taking him into his own office. Heaven
knows how many things he controlled at that time--mines,
railroads, banks, whole cities. Samuel was very close to him,
knew his likes and dislikes, his prejudices, weaknesses and
many strengths.

One day Carhart sent for Samuel and, closing the door of his
inner office, offered him a chair and a cigar.

"Everything 0. K., Samuel?" he asked.

"Why, yes."

"I've been afraid you're getting a bit stale."

"Stale?" Samuel was puzzled.

"You've done no work outside the office for nearly ten years?"

"But I've had vacations, in the Adiron---"

Carhart waved this aside.

"I mean outside work. Seeing the things move that we've always
pulled the strings of here."

"No " admitted Samuel; "I haven't."

"So," he said abruptly "I'm going to give you an outside job
that'll take about a month."

Samuel didn't argue. He rather liked the idea and he made up his
mind that, whatever it was, he would put it through just as
Carhart wanted it. That was his employer's greatest hobby, and
the men around him were as dumb under direct orders as infantry
subalterns.

"You'll go to San Antonio and see Hamil," continued Carhart.
"He's got a job on hand and he wants a man to take charge."

Hamil was in charge of the Carhart interests in the Southwest, a
man who had grown up in the shadow of his employer, and with
whom, though they had never met, Samuel had had much official
correspondence.

"When do I leave?"

"You'd better go to-morrow," answered Carhart, glancing at the
calendar. "That's the 1st of May. I'll expect your report here on
the 1st of June."

Next morning Samuel left for Chicago, and two days later he was
facing Hamil across a table in the office of the Merchants'
Trust in San Antonio. It didn't take long to get the gist of the
thing. It was a big deal in oil which concerned the buying up of
seventeen huge adjoining ranches. This buying up had to be done
in one week, and it was a pure squeeze. Forces had been set in
motion that put the seventeen owners between the devil and the
deep sea, and Samuel's part was simply to "handle" the matter
from a little village near Pueblo. With tact and efficiency the
right man could bring it off without any friction, for it was
merely a question of sitting at the wheel and keeping a firm
hold. Hamil, with an astuteness many times valuable to his
chief, had arranged a situation that would give a much greater
clear gain than any dealing in the open market. Samuel shook
hands with Hamil, arranged to return in two weeks, and left for
San Felipe, New Mexico.

It occurred to him, of course, that Carhart was trying him out.
Hamil's report on his handling of this might be a factor in
something big for him, but even without that he would have done
his best to put the thing through. Ten years in New York hadn't
made him sentimental and he was quite accustomed to finish
everything he began--and a little bit more.

All went well at first. There was no enthusiasm, but each one of
the seventeen ranchers concerned knew Samuel's business, knew
what he had behind him, and that they had as little chance of
holding out as flies on a window-pane. Some of them were
resigned--some of them cared like the devil, but they'd talked
it over, argued it with lawyers and couldn't see any possible
loophole. Five of the ranches had oil, the other twelve were
part of the chance, but quite as necessary to Hamil's purpose,
in any event.

Samuel soon saw that the real leader was an early settler named
McIntyre, a man of perhaps fifty, gray-haired, clean-shaven,
bronzed by forty New Mexico summers, and with those clear steady
eye that Texas and New Mexico weather are apt to give. His ranch
had not as yet shown oil, but it was in the pool, and if any man
hated to lose his land McIntyre did. Every one had rather looked
to him at first to avert the big calamity, and he had hunted all
over the territory for the legal means with which to do it, but
he had failed, and he knew it. He avoided Samuel assiduously,
but Samuel was sure that when the day came for the signatures he
would appear.

It came--a baking May day, with hot wave rising off the parched
land as far as eyes could see, and as Samuel sat stewing in his
little improvised office--a few chairs, a bench, and a wooden
table--he was glad the thing was almost over.  He wanted to get
back East the worst way, and join his wife and children for a
week at the seashore.

The meeting was set for four o'clock, and he was rather
surprised at three-thirty when the door opened and McIntyre came
in. Samuel could not help respecting the man's attitude, and
feeling a bit sorry for him. McIntyre seemed closely related to
the prairies, and Samuel had the little flicker of envy that
city people feel toward men who live in the open.

"Afternoon," said McIntyre, standing in the open doorway, with
his feet apart and his hands on his hips.

"Hello, Mr. McIntyre." Samuel rose, but omitted the formality of
offering his hand. He imagined the rancher cordially loathed
him, and he hardly blamed him. McIntyre came in and sat down
leisurely.

"You got us," he said suddenly.

This didn't seem to require any answer.

"When I heard Carhart was back of this," he continued, "I gave up."

"Mr. Carhart is---" began Samuel, but McIntyre waved him silent.

"Don't talk about the dirty sneak-thief!"

"Mr. McIntyre," said Samuel briskly, "if this half-hour is to be
devoted to that sort of talk---"

"Oh, dry up, young man," McIntyre interrupted, "you can't abuse
a man who'd do a thing like this."

Samuel made no answer.

"It's simply a dirty filch. There just ARE skunks like him too
big to handle."

"You're being paid liberally," offered Samuel.

"Shut up!" roared McIntyre suddenly. "I want the privilege of
talking." He walked to the door and looked out across the land,
the sunny, steaming pasturage that began almost at his feet and
ended with the gray-green of the distant mountains. When he
turned around his mouth was trembling.

"Do you fellows love Wall Street?" he said hoarsely, "or
wherever you do your dirty scheming---" He paused. "I suppose you
do. No critter gets so low that he doesn't sort of love the
place he's worked, where he's sweated out the best he's had in
him."

Samuel watched him awkwardly. McIntyre wiped his forehead with a
huge blue handkerchief, and continued:

"I reckon this rotten old devil had to have another million. I
reckon we're just a few of the poor he's blotted out to buy a
couple more carriages or something." He waved his hand toward
the door. "I built a house out there when I was seventeen, with
these two hands. I took a wife there at twenty-one, added two
wings, and with four mangy steers I started out. Forty summers
I've saw the sun come up over those mountains and drop down red
as blood in the evening, before the heat drifted off and the
stars came out. I been happy in that house. My boy was born
there and he died there, late one spring, in the hottest part of
an afternoon like this. Then the wife and I lived there alone
like we'd lived before, and sort of tried to have a home, after
all, not a real home but nigh it--cause the boy always seemed
around close, somehow, and we expected a lot of nights to see
him runnin' up the path to supper." His voice was shaking so he
could hardly speak and he turned again to the door, his gray
eyes contracted.

"That's my land out there," he said, stretching out his arm, "my
land, by God--- It's all I got in the world--and ever wanted." He
dashed his sleeve across his face, and his tone changed as he
turned slowly and faced Samuel. "But I suppose it's got to go
when they want it--it's got to go."

Samuel had to talk. He felt that in a minute more he would lose
his head. So he began, as level-voiced as he could--in the sort
of tone he saved for disagreeable duties.

"It's business, Mr. McIntyre," he said. "It's inside the law.
Perhaps we couldn't have bought out two or three of you at any
price, but most of you did have a price. Progress demands some
things---"

Never had he felt so inadequate, and it was with the greatest
relief that he heard hoof-beats a few hundred yards away.

But at his words the grief in McIntyre's eyes had changed to fury.

"You and your dirty gang of crooks!" be cried. "Not one of you
has got an honest love for anything on God's earth! You're a
herd of money-swine!"

Samuel rose and McIntyre took a step toward him.

"You long-winded dude. You got our land--take that for Peter
Carhart!"

He swung from the shoulder quick as lightning and down went
Samuel in a heap. Dimly he heard steps in the doorway and knew
that some one was holding McIntyre, but there was no need. The
rancher had sunk down in his chair, and dropped his head in his
hands.

Samuel's brain was whirring. He realized that the fourth fist
had hit him, and a great flood of emotion cried out that the law
that had inexorably ruled his life was in motion again. In a
half-daze he got up and strode from the room.

The next ten minutes were perhaps the hardest of his life. People
talk of the courage of convictions, but in actual life a man's
duty to his family may make a rigid corpse seem a selfish
indulgence of his own righteousness. Samuel thought mostly of
his family, yet he never really wavered. That jolt had brought him
to.

When he came back in the room there were a log of worried faces
waiting for him, but he didn't waste any time explaining.

"Gentlemen," he said, "Mr. McIntyre has been kind enough to
convince me that in this matter you are absolutely right and the
Peter Carhart interests absolutely wrong. As far as I am
concerned you can keep your ranches to the rest of your days."

He pushed his way through an astounded gathering, and within a
half-hour he had sent two telegrams that staggered the operator
into complete unfitness for business; one was to Hamil in San
Antonio; one was to Peter Carhart in New York.

Samuel didn't sleep much that night. He knew that for the first
time in his business career he had made a dismal, miserable
failure. But some instinct in him, stronger than will, deeper
than training, had forced him to do what would probably end his
ambitions and his happiness. But it was done and it never
occurred to him that he could have acted otherwise.

Next morning two telegrams were waiting for him. The first was
from Hamil. It contained three words:

"You blamed idiot!"

The second was from New York:

"Deal off come to New York immediately Carhart."

Within a week things had happened. Hamil quarrelled furiously
and violently defended his scheme. He was summoned to New York
and spent a bad half-hour on the carpet in Peter Carhart's
office. He broke with the Carhart interests in July, and in
August Samuel Meredith, at thirty-five years old, was, to all
intents, made Carhart's partner. The fourth fist had done its
work.

I suppose that there's a caddish streak in every man that runs
crosswise across his character and disposition and general
outlook. With some men it's secret and we never know it's there
until they strike us in the dark one night. But Samuel's showed
when it was in action, and the sight of it made people see red.
He was rather lucky in that, because every time his little devil
came up it met a reception that sent it scurrying down below in
a sickly, feeble condition. It was the same devil, the same
streak that made him order Gilly's friends off the bed, that
made him go inside Marjorie's house.

If you could run your hand along Samuel Meredith's jaw you'd
feel a lump. He admits he's never been sure which fist left it
there, but he wouldn't lose it for anything. He says there's no
cad like an old cad, and that sometimes just before making a
decision, it's a great help to stroke his chin. The reporters
call it a nervous characteristic, but it's not that. It's so he
can feel again the gorgeous clarity, the lightning sanity of
those four fists.













Typed by Brett Fishburne (william.fishburne@verizon.net) Proofed
by Jenny Francisco (seattle717@yahoo.com)





Famous Men of the Middle Ages

By John H. Haaren, LL.D., District Superintendent of Schools The
City of New York, and A. B. Poland, Ph.D. Superintendent of Schools
Newark N.J.





Preface




The study of history, like the study of a landscape, should begin
with the most conspicuous features.  Not until these have been
fixed in memory will the lesser features fall into their appropriate
places and assume their right proportions.

The famous men of ancient and modern times are the mountain peaks
of history.  It is logical then that the study of history should
begin with the biographies of these men.

Not only is it logical; it is also pedagogical.  Experience has
proven that in order to attract and hold the child's attention
each conspicuous feature of history presented to him should have
an individual for its center.  The child identifies himself with
the personage presented.  It is not Romulus or Hercules or Cesar
or Alexander that the child has in mind when he reads, but himself,
acting under similar conditions.

Prominent educators, appreciating these truths, have long recognized
the value of biography as a preparation for the study of history
and have given it an important place in their scheme of studies.

The former practice in many elementary schools of beginning the
detailed study of American history without any previous knowledge
of general history limited the pupil's range of vision, restricted
his sympathies, and left him without material for comparisons.
Moreover, it denied to him a knowledge of his inheritance from
the Greek philosopher, the Roman lawgiver, the Teutonic lover of
freedom.  Hence the recommendation so strongly urged in the report
of the Committee of Ten--and emphasized, also, in the report of the
Committee of Fifteen--that the study of Greek, Roman and modern
European history in the form of biography should precede the
study of detailed American history in our elementary schools.  The
Committee of Ten recommends an eight years' course in history,
beginning with the fifth year in school and continuing to the end
of the high school course.  The first two years of this course are
given wholly to the study of biography and mythology.  The Committee
of fifteen recommends that history be taught in all the grades of
the elementary school and emphasizes the value of biography and of
general history.

The series of historical stories to which this volume belongs was
prepared in conformity with the foregoing recommendations and with
the best practice of leading schools.  It has been the aim of the
authors to make an interesting story of each man's life and to tell
these stories in a style so simple that pupils in the lower grades
will read them with pleasure, and so dignified that they may be
used with profit as text-books for reading.

Teachers who find it impracticable to give to the study of mythology
and biography a place of its own in an already overcrowded curriculum
usually prefer to correlate history with reading and for this
purpose the volumes of this series will be found most desirable.

The value of the illustrations can scarcely be over-estimated.
They will be found to surpass in number and excellence anything
heretofore offered in a school-book.  For the most part they are
reproductions of world-famous pictures, and for that reason the
artists' names are generally affixed.





Contents




Introduction                                    Page        The
Gods of the Teutons . . . . . . . . .   7        The Nibelungs .
. . . . . . . . . . . . .  16

Chapter      I Alaric the Visigoth (394-410 A.D.)  . . .  27     II
Attila the Hun (433-453 A.D.) . . . . . .  36    III Genseric the
Vandal (427-477 A.D.). . . .  46     IV Theodoric the Ostrogoth
(475-526 A.D.)  .  55      V Clovis (481-511 A.D.) . . . . . . . .
. .  61     VI Justinian (527-565 A.D.)  . . . . . . . .  71    VII
Mohammed (570-632 A.D.) . . . . . . . . .  80   VIII Charles Martle
and Pepin (714-768 A.D.) .  93     IX Charlemagne (768-809 A.D.)
. . . . . . . 101      X Harun-al-Raschid (786-809 A.D.) . . . .
. 112     XI Egbert the Saxon (802-837 A.D.) . . . . . 119    XII
Rollo the Viking (Died 931 A.D.)  . . . . 126   XIII Alfred the
Great (871-901 A.D.) . . . . . 135    XIV Henry the Fowler (919-936
A.D.) . . . . . 143     XV Canute the Great (1014-1035)  . . . . .
. 149    XVI The Cid (1040-1099) . . . . . . . . . . . 155   XVII
Edward the Confessor (1042-1066)  . . . . 163  XVIII William the
Conqueror (1066-1087) . . . . 167    XIX Peter the Hermit (1050-1115)
. . . . . . 173     XX Frederick Barbarossa (1152-1190)  . . .
. 180    XXI Henry the Second and His Sons (1154-1216) 185   XXII
Louis IX (1226-1270)  . . . . . . . . . . 198  XXIII Robert Bruce
(1306-1329)  . . . . . . . . 206   XXIV Marco Polo (1254-1324)  .
. . . . . . . . 213    XXV Edward the Black Prince (1330-1376) . .
. 219   XXVI William Tell and Arnold von Winkelried         (1300-1386)
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . 226  XXVII Tamerlane (1333-1405) . .
. . . . . . . . 234 XXVIII Henry V (1413-1422) . . . . . . . . . .
. 239   XXIX Joan of Arc (1412-1431) . . . . . . . . . 247    XXX
Gutenberg (1400-1468) . . . . . . . . . . 257   XXXI Warwick the
King-Maker (1428-1471)  . . . 263





Introduction




The Gods of the Teutons In the little volume called The Famous
Men of Rome you have read about the great empire which the Romans
established.  Now we come to a time when the power of Rome was
broken and tribes of barbarians who lived north of the Danube and
the Rhine took possession of lands that had been part of the Roman
Empire.  These tribes were the Goths, Vandals, Huns, Franks and
Anglo-Saxons.  From them have come the greatest nations of modern
times.  All except the Huns belonged to the same race and are known
as Teutons.  They were war-like, savage and cruel.  They spoke the
same language--though in different dialects--and worshiped the same
gods.  Like the old Greeks and Romans they had many gods.

Woden, who was also called Odin, was the greatest of all.  His name
means "mighty warrior," and he was king of all the gods.  He rode
through the air mounted on Sleipnir, an eightfooted horse fleeter
than the eagle.  When the tempest roared the Teutons said it was
the snorting of Sleipnir.  When their ships came safely into port
they said it was Woden's breath that had filled their sails and
wafted their vessels over the blue waters.

Thor, a son of Woden, ranked next to him among the gods.  He rode
through the air in a chariot drawn by goats.  The Germans called him
Donar and Thunar, words which are like our word thunder.  From this
we can see that he was the thunder god.  In his hand he carried a
wonderful hammer which always came back to his hand when he threw
it.  Its head was so bright that as it flew through the air it made
the lightning.  When it struck the vast ice mountains they reeled
and splintered into fragments, and thus Thor's hammer made thunder.

Another great god of our ancestors was Tiew.  He was a son of
Woden and was the god of battle.  He was armed with a sword which
flashed like lightning when he brandished it.  A savage chief
named Attila routed the armies of the Romans and so terrified all
the world that he was called "The Scourge of God."  His people
believed that he gained his victories because he had the sword of
Tiew, which a herdsman chanced to find where the god had allowed
it to fall.  The Teutons prayed to Tiew when they went into battle.

Frija (free' ya) was the wife of Woden and the queen of the gods.
She ruled the bright clouds that gleam in the summer sky, and caused
them to pour their showers on meadow and forest and mountain.

Four of the days of the week are named after these gods.  Tuesday
means the day of Tiew; Wednesday, the day of Woden; Thursday, the
day of Thor; and Friday, the day of Frija.

Frija's son was Baldur; who was the favorite of all the gods.  Only
Loki, the spirit of evil, hated him.  Baldur's face was as bright
as sunshine.  His hair gleamed like burnished gold.  Wherever he
went night was turned into day.

One morning when he looked toward earth from his father Woden's
palace black clouds covered the sky, but he saw a splendid rainbow
reaching down from the clouds to the earth.  Baldur walked upon
this rainbow from the home of the gods to the dwellings of men.
The rainbow was a bridge upon which the gods used to come to earth.

When Baldur stepped from the rainbow-bridge to the earth he saw a
king's daughter so beautiful that he fell in love with her.

But an earthly prince had also fallen in love with her.  So he and
Baldur fought for her hand.  Baldur was a god and hence was very
much stronger than the prince.  But some of Baldur's magic food
was given to the prince and it made him as strong as Baldur.

Frija heard about this and feared that Baldur was doomed to be
killed.  So she went to every beast on the land and every fish of
the sea and every bird of the air and to every tree of the wood and
every plant of the field and made each promise not to hurt Baldur.

But she forgot the mistletoe.  So Loki, who always tried to do
mischief, made an arrow of mistletoe, and gave it to the prince
who shot and killed Baldur with it.

Then all the gods wept, the summer breeze wailed, the leaves fell
from the sorrowing trees, the flowers faded and died from grief, and
the earth grew stiff and cold.  Bruin, the bear, and his neighbors,
the hedgehogs and squirrels, crept into holes and refused to eat
for weeks and weeks.

The pleasure of all living things in Baldur's presence means the
happiness that the sunlight brings.  The sorrow of all living things
at his death means the gloom of northern countries when winter
comes.

The Valkyries were beautiful female warriors.  They had some
of Woden's own strength and were armed with helmet and shield and
spear.  Like Woden, they rode unseen through the air and their
horses were almost as swift as Sleipnir himself.  They swiftly
carried Woden's favorite warriors to Valhalla, the hall of the
slain.  The walls of Valhalla were hung with shields; its ceiling
glittered with polished spearheads.  From its five hundred and
forty gates, each wide enough for eight hundred men abreast to march
through, the warriors rushed every morning to fight a battle that
lasted till nightfall and began again at the break of each day.
When the heroes returned to Valhalla the Valkyries served them with
goblets of mead such as Woden drank himself.

The Teutons believed that before there were any gods or any world
there was a great empty space where the world now is.  It was called
by the curious name Ginnungagap, which means a yawning abyss.

To the north of Ginnungagap it was bitterly cold.  Nothing was
there but fields of snow and mountains of ice.  To the south of
Ginnungagap was a region where frost and snow were never seen.  It
was always bright, and was the home of light and heat.  The sunshine
from the South melted the ice mountains of the North so that they
toppled over and fell into Ginnungagap.  There they were changed
into a frost giant whose name was Ymir (e'mir).  He had three sons.
They and their father were so strong that the gods were afraid of
them.

So Woden and his brothers killed Ymir.  They broke his body in pieces
and made the world of them.  His bones and teeth became mountains
and rocks; his hair became leaves for trees and plants; out of his
skull was made the sky.

But Ymir was colder than ice, and the earth that was made of his
body was so cold that nothing could live or grow upon it.  So the
gods took sparks from the home of light and set them in the sky.
Two big ones were the sun and moon and the little ones were the
stars.  Then the earth became warm.  Trees grew and flowers bloomed,
so that the world was a beautiful home for men.

Of all the trees the most wonderful was a great ash tree, sometimes
called the "world tree."  Its branches covered the earth and reached
beyond the sky till they almost touched the stars.  Its roots ran
in three directions, to heaven, to the frost giants' home and to
the under-world, beneath the earth.

Near the roots in the dark under-world sat the Norns, or fates.
Each held a bowl with which she dipped water out of a sacred spring
and poured it upon the roots of the ash tree.  This was the reason
why this wonderful tree was always growing, and why it grew as high
as the sky.

When Woden killed Ymir he tried to kill all Ymir's children too;
but one escaped, and ever after he and his family, the frost giants,
tried to do mischief, and fought against gods and men.

According to the belief of the Teutons these wicked giants will
some day destroy the beautiful world.  Even the gods themselves
will be killed in a dreadful battle with them.  First of all will
come three terrible winters without any spring or summer.  The sun
and moon will cease to shine and the bright stars will fall from the
sky.  The earth will be shaken as when there is a great earthquake;
the waves of the sea will roar and the highest mountains will
totter and fall.  The trees will be torn up by the roots, and even
the "world tree" will tremble from its roots to its topmost boughs.
At last the quivering earth will sink beneath the waters of the
sea.

Then Loki, the spirit of evil, will break loose from the fetters
with which the gods have bound him.  The frost giants will join him.
They will try to make a secret attack on the gods.  But Heimdall,
the sentry of heaven, will be on guard at the end of the rainbow-bridge.
He needs no more sleep than a bird and can see for a hundred miles
either by day or night.  He only can sound the horn whose blast
can be heard through heaven and earth and the under-world.  Loki
and his army will be seen by him.  His loud alarm will sound and
bring the gods together.  They will rush to meet the giants.  Woden
will wield his spear--Tiew his glittering sword--Thor his terrible
hammer.  These will all be in vain.  The gods must die.  But so
must the giants and Loki.

And then a new earth will rise from the sea.  The leaves of its
forests will never fall; its fields will yield harvests unsown.
And in a hall far brighter than Woden's Valhalla the brave and good
will be gathered forever.


The Nibelungs


I


The time came when the people of Western Europe learned to believe
in one God and were converted to Christianity, but the old stories
about the gods and Valkyries and giants and heroes, who were half
gods and half men, were not forgotten.

These stories were repeated from father to son for generations,
and in the twelfth century a poet, whose name we do not know, wrote
them in verse.  He called his poem the Nibelungenlied (song of the
Nibelungs).  It is the great national poem of the Germans.  The
legends told in it are the basis of Wagner's operas.

"Nibelungs" was the name given to some northern dwarfs whose king
had once possessed a great treasure of gold and precious stones but
had lost it.  Whoever got possession of this treasure was followed
by a curse.  The Nibelungenlied tells the adventures of those who
possessed the treasure.


II


In the grand old city of Worms, in Burgundy, there lived long ago
the princess Kriemhilda.  Her eldest brother Gunther was king of
Burgundy.

And in the far-away Netherlands, where the Rhine pours its waters
into the sea, dwelt a prince named Siegfried, son of Siegmund, the
king.

Ere long Sir Siegfried heard of the beauty of fair Kriemhilda.
He said to his father, "Give me twelve knights and I will ride to
King Gunther's land.  I must win the heart of Kriemhilda."

After seven days' journey the prince and his company drew near to
the gates of Worms.  All wondered who the strangers were and whence
they came.  Hagen, Kriemhilda's uncle, guessed.  He said, "I never
have seen the famed hero of Netherlands, yet I am sure that yonder
knight is none but Sir Siegfried."

"And who," asked the wondering people, "may Siegfried be?"

"Siegfried," answered Sir Hagen, "is a truly wonderful knight.
Once when riding all alone, he came to a mountain where lay the
treasure of the king of the Nibelungs.  The king's two sons had
brought it out from the cave in which it had been hidden, to divide
it between them.  But they did not agree about the division.  So
when Seigfied drew near both princes said, 'Divide for us, Sir
Siegfried, our father's hoard.'  There were so many jewels that
one hundred wagons could not carry them, and of ruddy gold there
was even more.  Seigfied made the fairest division he could, and as
a reward the princes gave him their father's sword called Balmung.
But although Siegfried had done his best to satisfy them with his
division, they soon fell to quarreling and fighting, and when he
tried to separate them they made an attack on him.  To save his own
life he slew them both.  Alberich, a mountain dwarf, who had long
been guardian of the Nibelung hoard, rushed to avenge his masters;
but Siegfried vanquished him and took from him his cap of darkness
which made its wearer invisible and gave him the strength of twelve
men.  The hero then ordered Alberich to place the treasure again
in the mountain cave and guard it for him."

Hagen then told another story of Siegfried:

"Once he slew a fierce dragon and bathed himself in its blood, and
this turned the hero's skin to horn, so that no sword or spear can
wound him."

When Hagen had told these tales he advised King Gunther and the
people of Burgundy to receive Siegfried with all honor.

So, as the fashion was in those times, games were held in
the courtyard of the palace in honor of Siegfried, and Kriemhilda
watched the sport from her window.

For a full year Siegfried stayed at the court of King Gunther,
but never in all that time told why he had come and never once saw
Kriemhilda.

At the end of the year sudden tidings came that the Saxons and
Danes, as was their habit, were pillaging the lands of Burgundy.
At the head of a thousand Burgundian knights Siegfried conquered
both Saxons and Danes.  The king of the Danes was taken prisoner
and the Saxon king surrendered.

The victorious warriors returned to Worms and the air was filled with
glad shouts of welcome.  King Gunther asked Kriemhilda to welcome
Siegfried and offer him the thanks of all the land of Burgundy.

Siegfried stood before her, and she said, "Welcome, Sir Siegfried,
welcome; we thank you one and all."  He bent before her and she
kissed him.


III


Far over the sea from sunny Burgundy lived Brunhilda, queen of
Iceland.  Fair was she of face and strong beyond compare.  If a
knight would woo and win her he must surpass her in three contests:
leaping, hurling the spear and pitching the stone.  If he failed
in even one, he must forfeit his life.

King Gunther resolved to wed this strange princess and Siegfried
promised to help him.  "But," said Siegfried, "if we succeed, I must
have as my wife thy sister Kriemhilda."  To this Gunther agreed,
and the voyage to Iceland began.

When Gunther and his companions neared Brunhilda's palace the gates
were opened and the strangers were welcomed.

Siegfried thanked the queen for her kindness and told how Gunther
had come to Iceland in hope of winning her hand.

"If in three contests he gain the mastery," she said, "I will become
his wife.  If not, both he and you who are with him must lose your
lives."

Brunhilda prepared for the contests.  Her shield was so thick and
heavy that four strong men were needed to bear it.  Three could
scarcely carry her spear and the stone that she hurled could just
be lifted by twelve.

Siegfried now helped Gunther in a wonderful way.  He put on his
cap of darkness, so that no one could see him.  Then he stood by
Gunther's side and did the fighting.  Brunhilda threw her spear
against the kings bright shield and sparks flew from the steel.
But the unseen knight dealt Brunhilda such blows that she confessed
herself conquered.

In the second and third contests she fared no better, and so
she had to become King Gunther's bride.  But she said that before
she would leave Iceland she must tell all her kinsmen.  Daily her
kinsfolk came riding to the castle, and soon an army had assembled.

Then Gunther and his friends feared unfair play.  So Siegfried
put on his cap of darkness, stepped into a boat, and went to the
Nibelung land where Alberich the dwarf was guarding the wonderful
Nibelung treasure.

"Bring me here," he cried to the dwarf, "a thousand Nibelung
knights."  At the call of the dwarf the warriors gathered around
Sir Siegfried.  Then they sailed with him to Brunhilda's isle and
the queen and her kinsmen, fearing such warriors, welcomed them
instead of fighting.  Soon after their arrival King Gunther and
his men, Siegfried and his Nibelungs, and Queen Brunhilda, with
two thousand of her kinsmen set sail for King Gunther's land.

As soon as they reached Worms the marriage of Gunther and Brunhilda
took place.  Siegfried and Kriemhilda also were married, and after
their marriage went to Siegfried's Netherlands castle.  There they
lived more happily than I can tell.


IV


Now comes the sad part of the Nibelung tale.

Brunhilda and Gunther invited Siegfried and Kriemhilda to visit them
at Worms.  During the visit the two queens quarreled and Brunhilda
made Gunther angry with Siegfried.  Hagen, too, began to hate
Siegfried and wished to kill him.

But Siegfried could not be wounded except in one spot on which
a falling leaf had rested when he bathed himself in the dragon's
blood.  Only Kriemhilda knew where this spot was.  Hagen told her
to sew a little silk cross upon Siegfried's dress to mark the spot,
so that he might defend Siegfried in a fight.

No battle was fought, but Siegfried went hunting with Gunther and
Hagen one day and they challenged him to race with them.  He easily
won, but after running he was hot and thirsty and knelt to drink
at a spring.  Then Hagen seized a spear and plunged it through the
cross into the hero's body.  Thus the treasure of the Nibelungs
brought disaster to Siegfried.

Gunther and Hagen told Kriemhilda that robbers in the wood had
slain her husband, but she could not be deceived.

Kriemhilda determined to take vengeance on the murderers of Siegfried,
and so she would not leave Worms.  There, too, stayed one thousand
knights who had followed Siegfried from the Nibelung land.

Soon after Siegfried's death Kriemhilda begged her younger brother
to bring the Nibelung treasure from the mountain cave to Worms.

When it arrived Kriemhilda gave gold and jewels to rich and poor
in Burgundy, and Hagen feared that soon she would win the love of
all the people and turn them against him.  So, one day, he took
the treasure and hid it in the Rhine.  He hoped some day to enjoy
it himself.

As Hagen now possessed the Nibelung treasure the name "Nibelungs"
was given to him and his companions.


V


Etzel, or as we call him, Attila, king of the Huns, heard of the
beauty of Kriemhilda and sent one of his knights to ask the queen
to become his wife.

At first she refused.  However, when she remembered that Etzel
carried the sword of Tiew, she changed her mind, because, if she
became his wife, she might persuade him to take vengeance upon
Gunther and Hagen.

And so it came to pass.

Shortly after their marriage Etzel and Kriemhilda invited Gunther
and all his court to a grand midsummer festival in the land of the
Huns.

Hagen was afraid to go, for he felt sure that Kriemhilda had not
forgiven the murder of Siegfried.  However, it was decided that
the invitation should be accepted, but that ten thousand knights
should go with Gunther as a body-guard.

Shortly after Gunther and his followers arrived at Attila's court
a banquet was prepared.  Nine thousand Burgundians were seated at
the board when Attila's brother came into the banquet hall with a
thousand well-armed knights.  A quarrel arose and a fight followed.

Thousands of the Burgundians were slain.  The struggle continued
for days.  At last, of all the knights of Burgundy, Gunther and
Hagen alone were left alive.  Then one of Kriemhilda's friends fought
with them and overpowered both.  He bound them and delivered them
to Kriemhilda.

The queen ordered one of her knights to cut off Gunther's head, and
she herself cut off the head of Hagen with "Balmung," Siegfried's
wonderful sword.  A friend of Hagen then avenged his death by
killing Kriemhilda herself.

Of all the Nibelungs who entered the land of the Huns one only ever
returned to Burgundy.





Alaric the Visigoth




King from 394-410 A.D.


I


Long before the beginning of the period known as the Middle Ages
a tribe of barbarians called the Goths lived north of the River
Danube in the country which is now known as Roumania.  It was
then a part of the great Roman Empire, which at that time had two
capitals, Constantinople--the new city of Constantine--and Rome.
The Goths had come from the shores of the Baltic Sea and settled
on this Roman territory, and the Romans had not driven them back.

During the reign of the Roman Emperor Valens some of the Goths
joined a conspiracy against him.  Valens punished them for this by
crossing the Danube and laying waste their country.  At last the
Goths had to beg for mercy.  The Gothic chief was afraid to set foot
on Roman soil, so he and Valens met on their boats in the middle
of the Danube and made a treaty of peace.

For a long time the Goths were at war with another tribe of barbarians
called Huns.  Sometimes the Huns defeated the Goths and drove them
to their camps in the mountains.  Sometimes the Goths came down to
the plains again and defeated the Huns.

At last the Goths grew tired of such constant fighting and thought
they would look for new settlements.  They sent some of their
leading men to the Emperor Valens to ask permission to settle in
some country belonging to Rome.  The messengers said to the emperor:

"If you will allow us to make homes in the country south of the
Danube we will be friends of Rome and fight for her when she needs
our help."

The emperor at once granted this request.  He said to the Gothic
chiefs:

"Rome always needs good soldiers.  Your people may cross the Danube
and settle on our land.  As long as you remain true to Rome we will
protect you against your enemies."

These Goths were known as Visigoths, or Western Goths.  Other
tribes of Goths who had settled in southern Russia, were called
Ostrogoths, or Eastern Goths.

After getting permission from the Emperor Valens a large number
of the Visigoths crossed the Danube with their families and their
cattle and settled in the country now called Bulgaria.

In course of time they became a very powerful nation, and in the
year 394 they chose as their king one of the chiefs named Alaric.
He was a brave man and a great soldier.  Even when a child he took
delight in war, and at the age of sixteen he fought as bravely as
the older soldiers.

One night, not long after he became king, Alaric had a very strange
dream.  He thought he was driving in a golden chariot through the
streets of Rome amid the shouts of the people, who hailed him as
emperor.  This dream made a deep impression on his mind.  He was
always thinking of it, and at last he began to have the idea that
he could make the dream come true.

"To be master of the Roman Empire," he said to himself, "that is
indeed worth trying for; and why should I not try?  With my brave
soldiers I can conquer Rome, and I shall make the attempt."

So Alaric called his chiefs together and told them what he had made
up his mind to do.

The chiefs gave a cry of delight for they approved of the king's
proposal.  In those days fighting was almost the only business of
chiefs, and they were always glad to be at war, especially when
there was hope of getting rich spoils.  And so the Visigoth chiefs
rejoiced at the idea of war against Rome, for they knew that if they
were victorious they would have the wealth of the richest city of
the world to divide among themselves.

Soon they got ready a great army.  With Alaric in command,
they marched through Thrace and Macedonia and before long reached
Athens.  There were now no great warriors in Athens, and the city
surrendered to Alaric.  The Goths plundered the homes and temples
of the Athenians and then marched to the state of Elis, in the
southwestern part of Greece.  Here a famous Roman general named
Stilicho besieged them in their camp.  Alaric managed to force his
way through the lines of the Romans and escaped.  He marched to
Epirus.  This was a province of Greece that lay on the east side
of the Ionian Sea.  Arcadius, the Emperor of the East, now made
Alaric governor of this district and a large region lying near it.
The whole territory was called Eastern Illyricum and formed part
of the Eastern Empire.


II


Alaric now set out to make an attack on Rome, the capital of the
Western Empire.  As soon as Honorius, Emperor of the West, learned
that Alaric was approaching, he fled to a strong fortress among
the mountains of North Italy.  His great general Stilicho came to
his rescue and defeated Alaric near Verona.  But even after this
Honorius was so afraid of Alaric that he made him governor of a
part of his empire called Western Illyricum and gave him a large
yearly income.

Honorius, however, did not keep certain of his promises to Alaric,
who consequently, in the year 408, marched to Rome and besieged
it.  The cowardly emperor fled to Ravenna, leaving his generals to
make terms with Alaric.  It was agreed that Alaric should withdraw
from Rome upon the payment of 5,000 pounds of gold and 30,000 pounds
of silver.

When Honorius read the treaty he refused to sign it.  Alaric then
demanded that the city be surrendered to him, and the people,
terrified, opened their gates and even agreed that Alaric should
appoint another emperor in place of Honorius.

This new emperor, however, ruled so badly that Alaric thought it
best to restore Honorius.  Then Honorius, when just about to be
treated so honorably, allowed a barbarian chief who was an ally of
his to make an attack upon Alaric.  The attack was unsuccessful,
and Alaric immediately laid siege to Rome for the third time.  The
city was taken and Alaric's dream came true.  In a grand procession
he rode at the head of his army through the streets of the great
capital.

Then began the work of destruction.  The Goths ran in crowds through
the city, wrecked private houses and public buildings and seized
everything of value they could find.  Alaric gave orders that no
injury should be done to the Christian churches, but other splendid
buildings of the great city were stripped of the beautiful and
costly articles that they contained, and all the gold and silver
was carried away from the public treasury.

In the midst of the pillage Alaric dressed himself in splendid
robes and sat upon the throne of the emperor, with a golden crown
upon his head.

While Alaric was sitting on the throne thousands of Romans were
compelled to kneel down on the ground before him and shout out his
name as conqueror and emperor.  Then the theaters and circuses were
opened, and Roman athletes and gladiators had to give performances
for the amusement of the conquerors.  After six days of pillage and
pleasure Alaric and his army marched through the gates, carrying
with them the riches of Rome.

Alaric died on his way to Sicily, which he had thought to conquer
also.  He felt his death coming and ordered his men to bury him in
the bed of the river Busento and to put into his grave the richest
treasures that he had taken from Rome.

This order was carried out.  A large number of Roman slaves were
set to work to dig a channel and turn the water of the Busento into
it.  They made the grave in the bed of the river, put Alaric's body
into and closed it up.  Then the river was turned back to its old
channel.  As soon as the grave was covered up, and the water flowed
over it, the slaves who had done the work were put to death by the
Visigoth chiefs.





Attila the Hun




King from 434-453 A.D.


I


The fierce and warlike tribe, called the Huns, who had driven the
Goths to seek new homes, came from Asia into Southeastern Europe
and took possession of a large territory lying north of the River
Danube.

During the first half of the fifth century the Huns had a famous
king named Attila.  He was only twenty-one years old when he
became their king.  But although he was young, he was very brave
and ambitious, and he wanted to be a great and powerful king.

Not far from Attila's palace there was a great rocky cave in the
mountains.  In this cave lived a strange man called the "Hermit
of the Rocks."  No one knew his real name, or from what country he
had come.  He was very old, with wrinkled face and long gray hair
and beard.

Many persons believed that he was a fortune-teller, so people
often went to him to inquire what was to happen to them.  One day,
shortly after he became king, Attila went to the cave to get his
fortune told.

"Wise man," said he, "look into the future and tell me what is
before me in the path of life."

The hermit thought for a few moments, and then said, "O King,
I see you a famous conqueror, the master of many nations.  I see
you going from country to country, defeating armies and destroying
cities until men call you the 'Fear of the World.'  You heap up
vast riches, but just after you have married the woman you love
grim death strikes you down."

With a cry of horror Attila fled from the cave.  For a time he
thought of giving up his idea of becoming a great man.  But he was
young and full of spirit, and very soon he remembered only what had
been said to him about his becoming a great and famous conqueror
and began to prepare for war.  He gathered together the best men
from the various tribes of his people and trained them into a great
army of good soldiers.


II


About this time one of the king's shepherds, while taking care of
cattle in the fields, noticed blood dripping from the foot of one
of the oxen.  The shepherd followed the streak of blood through the
grass and at last found the sharp point of a sword sticking out of
the earth.  He dug out the weapon, carried it to the palace, and
gave it to King Attila.  The king declared it was the sword of
Tiew, the god of war.  He then strapped it to his side and said he
would always wear it.

"I shall never be defeated in battle," he cried, "as long as I
fight with the sword of Tiew."

As soon as his army was ready he marched with it into countries
which belonged to Rome.  He defeated the Romans in several great
battles and captured many of their cities.  The Roman Emperor
Theodosius had to ask for terms of peace.  Attila agreed that there
should be peace, but soon afterwards he found out that Theodosius
had formed a plot to murder him.  He was so enraged at this that
he again began war.  He plundered and burned cities wherever he
went, and at last the emperor had to give him a large sum of money
and a portion of country south of the Danube.

This made peace, but the peace did not last long.  In a few years
Attila appeared at the head of an army of 700,000 men.  With this
great force he marched across Germany and into Gaul.  He rode on a
beautiful black horse, and carried at his side the sword of Tiew.
He attacked and destroyed towns and killed the inhabitants without
mercy.  The people had such dread of him that he was called the
"Scourge of God" and the "Fear of the World."


III


Attila and his terrible Huns marched through Gaul until they came
to the city of Orleans.  Here the people bravely resisted the
invaders.  They shut their gates and defended themselves in every
way they could.  In those times all towns of any great size were
surrounded by strong walls.  There was war constantly going on
nearly everywhere, and there were a great many fierce tribes and
chiefs who lived by robbing their neighbors.  So the towns and
castles in which there was much money or other valuable property
were not safe without high and strong walls.

Attila tried to take Orleans, but soon after he began to attack the
walls he saw a great army at a distance coming towards the city.
He quickly gathered his forces together, marched to the neighboring
plain of Champagne and halted at the place where the city of Chalons
(shah-lon') now stands.

The army which Attila saw was an army of 300,000 Romans and
Visigoths.  It was led by a Roman general name Aetius (A-e'-ti-us)
and the Visigoth king Theodoric (The-od'-o-ric).  The Visigoths
after the death of Alaric had settled in parts of Gaul, and their
king had now agreed to join the Romans against the common enemy--the
terrible Huns.  So the great army of the Romans and Visigoths marched
up and attacked the Huns at Chalons.  It was a fierce battle.  Both
sides fought with the greatest bravery.  At first the Huns seemed
to be winning.  They drove back the Romans and Visigoths from the
field, and in the fight Theodoric was killed.

Aetius now began to fear that he would be beaten, but just at that
moment Thorismond (Thor'-is-mond), the son of Theodoric, made another
charge against the Huns.  He had taken command of the Visigoths
when his father was killed, and now he led them on to fight.  They
were all eager to have revenge for the death of their king, so they
fought like lions and swept across the plain with great fury.  The
Huns were soon beaten on every side, and Attila himself fled to his
camp.  It was the first time he had ever been defeated.  Thorismond,
the conqueror, was lifted upon his shield on the battle-field and
hailed as king of the Visigoths.

When Attila reached his camp he had all his baggage and wagons
gathered in a great heap.  He intended to set fire to it and jump
into the flames if the Romans should come there to attack him.

"Here I will perish in the flames," he cried, "rather than surrender
to my enemies."

But the Romans did not come to attack him, and in a few days he
marched back to his own country.

Very soon, however, he was again on the war path.  This time
he invaded Italy.  He attacked and plundered the town of Aquileia
(Aq'-ui-le'-i-a), and the terrified inhabitants fled for their
lives to the hills and mountains.  Some of them took refuge in the
islands and marshes of the Adriatic Sea.  Here they founded Venice.

The people of Rome and the Emperor Valentinian were greatly alarmed
at the approach of the dreaded Attila.  He was now near the city,
and they had no army strong enough to send against him.  Rome
would have been again destroyed if it had not been for Pope Leo I
who went to the camp of Attila and persuaded him not to attack the
city.  It is said that the barbarian king was awed by the majestic
aspect and priestly robes of Leo.  It is also told that the apostles
Peter and Paul appeared to Attila in his camp and threatened him
with death if he should attack Rome.  He did not go away, however,
without getting a large sum of money as ransom.


IV


Shortly after leaving Italy Attila suddenly died.  Only the day
before his death he had married a beautiful woman whom he loved
very much.

The Huns mourned their king in a barbarous way.  They shaved their
heads and cut themselves on their faces with knives, so that their
blood, instead of their tears, flowed for the loss of their great
leader.  They enclosed his body in three coffins--one of gold,
one of silver, and one of iron--and they buried him at night, in
a secret spot in the mountains.  When the funeral was over, they
killed the slaves who had dug the grave, as the Visigoths had done
after the burial of Alaric.

After the death of Attila we hear little more of the Huns.





Genseric the Vandal




King from 427-477 A.D.


I


The Vandals were another wild and fierce tribe that came from the
shores of the Baltic and invaded central and southern Europe in
the later times of the Roman Empire.

In the fifth century some of these people occupied a region in
the south of Spain.  One of their most celebrated kings was name
Genseric (Gen'-ser-ic).  He became king in 427, when he was but
twenty-one years of age.  He was lame in one leg and looked as if
he were a very ordinary person.

Like most of the Vandals, he was a cruel and cunning man, but he
had great ability in many ways.  He fought in battles even when
a boy and was known far and wide for his bravery and skill as a
leader.

About the time that Genseric became king, the governor of the Roman
province in the north of Africa, on the Mediterranean coast, was
a man called Count Boniface.  This Count Boniface had been a good
and loyal officer of Rome; but a plot was formed against him by
Aetius, the general who had fought Attila at Chalons.  The Roman
emperor at the time of the plot was Valentinian III.  He was then
too young to act as ruler, so the affairs of government were managed
by his mother Placidia (Pla-cid'-i-a).

Aetius advised Placidia to dismiss Boniface and call him home from
Africa.  He said the count was a traitor, and that he was going
to make war against Rome.  At the same time he wrote secretly to
Count Boniface and told him that if he came to Rome the empress
would put him to death.

Boniface believed this story, and he refused to return to Rome.
He also sent a letter to Genseric, inviting him to come to Africa
with an army.

Genseric was greatly delighted to receive the invitation from
Boniface.  He had long wanted to attack Rome and take from her some
of the rich countries she had conquered, and now a good opportunity
offered.  So he got ready a great army of his brave Vandals, and
they sailed across the Strait of Gibraltar to Africa.

They soon gained possession of that part of the African coast on
which they had landed, and marched into other parts of the coast
and captured towns and cities.  By this time Boniface had learned
all about the wicked plot of Aetius.  He now regretted having
invited the Vandals to Africa and tried to induce them to return
to Spain, but Genseric sternly refused.

"Never," he said, "shall I go back to Spain until I am master of
Africa."

"Then," cried Boniface, "I will drive you back."

Soon afterwards there was a battle between the Romans and Vandals,
and the Romans were defeated.  They were also defeated in several
other battles.  At last they had to flee for safety to two or three
towns which the Vandals had not yet taken.  One of these towns was
Hippo.

Genseric captured this town after a siege of thirteen months.  Then
he burned the churches and other buildings, and laid waste the
neighboring country.  This was what the Vandals did whenever they
took a town, and so the word VANDAL came to mean a person who
needlessly or wantonly destroys valuable property.

A great many of the natives of Africa joined the army of Genseric.
They had for a long time been ill-treated by the Romans and were
glad to see them defeated.  Genseric continued his work of conquest
until he took the city of Carthage, which he made the capital of
his new kingdom in Africa.

But he was not content with conquering merely on land.  He built
great fleets and sailed over the Mediterranean, capturing trading
vessels.  For many years he plundered towns along the coasts, so
that the name of Genseric became a terror to the people of all the
countries bordering the Mediterranean.


II


One day a Roman ship came to Carthage with a messenger from the
Empress Eudoxia to Genseric.  Eudoxia was the widow of Valentinian
III.  After ruling several years, Valentinian had just been murdered
by a Roman noble named Maximus, who had at once made himself emperor.

When the messenger entered the room where Genseric was, he said:

"Great king, I bring you a message from the Empress Eudoxia.  She
begs your help.  She and her two beautiful daughters are in danger
in Rome.  She wishes you to protect them against Maximus.  She
invites you to come with an army to Rome and take the city.  She
and her friends will help you as much as they can."

With a cry of joy Genseric sprang to his feet and exclaimed:

"Tell the empress that I accept her invitation.  I shall set out
for Rome immediately.  I shall set out for Rome immediately.  I
shall protect Eudoxia and her friends."

Genseric then got ready a fleet and a great army, and sailed across
the Mediterranean to the mouth of the Tiber.  When the Emperor
Maximus heard that the Vandals were coming he prepared to flee from
the city, and he advised the Senate to do the same.  The people
were so angry at this that they put him to death and threw his body
into the river.

Three days later Genseric and his army were at the gates of Rome.
There was no one to oppose them, and they marched in and took
possession of the city.  It was only forty-five years since Alaric
had been there and carried off all the valuable things he could
find.  But since then Rome had become again grand and wealthy, so
there was plenty for Genseric and his Vandals to carry away.  They
spent fourteen days in the work of plunder.  They sacked the temples
and public buildings and private houses and the emperor's palace,
and they took off to their ships immense quantities of gold and
silver and jewels and furniture, and destroyed hundreds of beautiful
and priceless works of art.

The Vandal king also put to death a number of Roman citizens and
carried away many more as slaves.  He took Eudoxia and her daughters
with him to Carthage.  One of the daughters was soon afterwards
married to Genseric's eldest son, Hunneric.


III


Some years after the capture of Rome by Genseric, there was a
Roman emperor named Majorian (Ma-jo'-ri-an).  He was a good ruler
and a brave man.  The Vandals still continued to attack and plunder
cities in Italy and other countries belonging to Rome, and Majorian
resolved to punish them.  So he got together a great army and built
a fleet of three hundred ships to carry his troops to Carthage.

But he first marched his men across the Alps, through Gaul, and
down to the seaport of Carthagena in Spain, where his fleet was
stationed.  He took this route because he expected to add to his
forces as he went along.  Before sailing with his army for Carthage
he wished very much to see with his own eyes what sort of people
the Vandals were and whether they were so powerful at home as was
generally believed.

So he dyed his hair and disguised himself in other ways and went
to Carthage, pretending that he was a messenger or ambassador from
the Roman emperor, coming to talk about peace.  Genseric received
him with respect and entertained him hospitably, not knowing that
he was the Emperor Majorian.  Of course peace was not made.  The
emperor left Carthage after having got as much information as he
could.

But Genseric did not wait for the Roman fleet to come to attack
him in his capital.  When he got word that it was in the Bay of
Carthagena, he sailed there with a fleet of his own and in a single
day burned or sank nearly all the Roman ships.

After this the Vandals became more than ever the terror of
the Mediterranean and all the countries bordering upon it.  Every
year their ships went round the coasts from Asia Minor to Spain,
attacking and plundering cities on their way and carrying off
prisoners.

All the efforts of the Romans failed to put a stop to these ravages.
The Emperor Leo, who ruled over the eastern division of the Empire,
fitted out a great fleet at Constantinople to make another attempt
to suppress the pirates.  There were more than a thousand ships in
this fleet and they carried a hundred thousand men.  The command of
the expedition was given to Basilicus (Bas-il'-i-cus), the brother
of Emperor Leo's wife.

Basilicus sailed with his ships to Africa and landed the army
not far from Carthage.  Genseric asked for a truce for five days
to consider terms of peace, and the truce was granted.  But the
cunning Vandal was not thinking of peace.  He only wanted time to
carry out a plan he had made to destroy the Roman fleet.

One dark night, during the truce, he filled the largest of his ships
with some of the bravest of his soldiers, and they sailed silently
and cautiously in among the Roman ships, towing behind them large
boats filled with material that would easily burn.

These boats were set on fire and floated against the Roman vessels,
which also were soon on fire.  The flames quickly spread, and in
a very short time a great part of the Roman fleet was destroyed.
Basilicus fled with as many ships as he could save, and returned
to Constantinople.

This was the last attempt of the Romans to conquer the Vandals.
Genseric lived to a good old age, and when he died, in 477, all the
countries he had conquered during his life still remained parts of
the Vandal dominions.





Theodoric the Ostrogoth




King from 475-526 A.D.


I


The Ostrogoths, or East Goths, who had settled in Southern Russia,
at length pushed southward and westward to the mouth of the Danube.

They were continually invading countries belonging to the Romans
and their warlike raids were dreaded by the emperors of the Eastern
Roman Empire, who lived at Constantinople.  One emperor gave them
land and money, and thus stopped their invasions for a time.

The most famous of the Ostrogoth kings was Theodoric (The-od'-or-ic)
the Great.  He was the son of Theodemir (The-od'-e-mir), who was
also a king of the Ostrogoths.  When Theodoric was eight years old
he was sent to Constantinople to be held as a hostage by Leo, the
Emperor of the East.  In former times, when kings made treaties
with one another, it was customary for one to give to the other a
pledge or security that he would fulfill the conditions of the treaty.
The pledge usually given was some important person or persons,
perhaps the king's son or a number of his chief men.  Persons so
given as a security were called hostages.  When Theodoric was a boy
he was given as a hostage for his father's good faith in carrying
out a treaty with the Emperor and was sent to Constantinople to
live.  Here the youth was well treated by Leo.  He was educated
with great care and trained in all the exercises of war.

Theodemir died in 475, and then Theodoric returned to his own country
and became king of the Ostrogoths.  At this time he was eighteen
years of age.  He was handsome and brave and people loved him, for
in those days a man who was tall and strong and brave was liked by
everybody.


II


For some years after he became king Theodoric had frequent wars with
other Gothic kings and also with the Roman Emperor Zeno (Ze'-no).
He was nearly always successful in battle, and at last Zeno began
to think it would be better to try to make friends with him.  So
he gave Theodoric some rich lands and made him commander of the
Imperial Guard of Constantinople.

But the Emperor soon became tired of having the Ostrogoth king at
his court, and to get rid of him he agreed that Theodoric should
go with his army to Italy, and take that country from Odoacer
(O-do-a'-cer).  Theodoric was delighted at the proposal and began
at once to make his preparations.

Odoacer was at that time king of Italy.  Before he became king he
had been a general in the army of Romulus Augustulus, the Western
Roman Emperor.  The soldiers of the army were not satisfied with
their pay, and when they asked for more they did not get it.  Then
they drove Romulus Augustulus from the throne, and chose Odoacer
to succeed him.  But Odoacer would not take the name of emperor.
He was called the "patrician" of Italy, and he ruled the country
well.

Theodoric started for Italy, not only with a great army, but with
all the people of his country.  He meant to take Italy and be its
king and settle in it with all his Ostrogoths.  When he set out he
had with him two hundred and fifty thousand persons--men, women,
and children--with a great number of horses and wagons to carry
them and their things.  He had also an army of sixty thousand brave
soldiers.

It was a long and weary journey from the shores of the Black Sea
overland to the foot of the Alps Mountains and across the Alps
into Italy.  Here and there on the way they met savage tribes that
tried to stop them, but Theodoric defeated the savages and took a
great many of them prisoners.  He made these prisoners, women as
well as men, help carry the baggage and do other work.

The journey took months, but at last the Ostrogoths reached the
top of the Alps.  Then they could see, stretched out before them,
the beautiful land of Italy.  They were all delighted.  They shouted
and danced with joy, and Theodoric cried out:

"There is the country which shall be our home.  Let us march on.
It certainly shall be ours."

Then they passed quickly down, and soon they were in Italy.  Odoacer
had heard of their coming and he got ready an army to drive them
away.  Theodoric also got his fighting men ready.  The two armies
met, and there was a great battle near the town of Aquileia.  Odoacer
was defeated.  Then he tried to get Theodoric to leave Italy by
offering him a large sum of money.

"I will give you," said he, "thousands of pounds of gold and silver
if you agree to go back to your own country."

But Theodoric would not go.  He said he had as good a right to
be king of Italy as Odoacer, and he would remain and conquer the
country and be its king.  Soon after there was another battle, near
Verona, and Odoacer was again defeated.

Theodoric came very near being killed in battle.  He was saved only
by the courage of his mother.  She was in his camp, and at one time
she saw a number of the Ostrogoths running away from that part
of the battle-field where her son was fighting, thus leaving him
without support.  The mother rushed forward and stopped the fleeing
men.  She made them feel that it was a shame for them to desert
their leader, and they at once returned to the field and fought
beside their king until the battle was won.

After the battle of Verona, Odoacer went with his army to the city
of Ravenna, and remained there for some time.  Theodoric followed
with his Ostrogoths and tried to take the city, but there was a
very strong wall around it, and the Ostrogoths could not capture
it.  Although Theodoric was not able to take Ravenna, he did not
remain idle.  He marched off to other parts of the country, and
took possession of towns and districts wherever he went.

After a while Odoacer got together a better army than he had before,
and made another effort to defeat Theodoric.  But he again failed.
Theodoric defeated him in another great battle, which was fought
on the banks of the River Adda.  After this battle Odoacer again
fled to Ravenna.  Theodoric followed again and laid siege to the
city.  This time his army surrounded it and kept provisions from
being sent in, and at last, when there was no food in the city for
the soldiers or the people to eat, Odoacer had to surrender.

A treaty was then made between the two kings and both agreed that
they should rule together over Italy, each to have equal power.
But a few days afterwards Theodoric murdered Odoacer while sitting
at a banquet, and then made himself the sole king of Italy.  He
divided one-third of the land of the country among his own followers.
So the Ostrogoths settled in Italy, and Ostrogoths, Romans, and
Visigoths were governed by Theodoric as one people.

Theodoric died at the age of seventy-one after ruling Italy for
thirty-three years.





Clovis




King from 481-511 A.D.


I


While the power of the Roman Empire was declining there dwelt on
the banks of the River Rhine a number of savage Teuton tribes called
Franks.  The word Frank means FREE, and those tribes took pride in
being known as Franks or freemen.

The Franks occupied the east bank of the Rhine for about two hundred
years.  Then many of the tribes crossed the river in search of new
homes.  The region west of the river was at that time called Gaul.
Here the Franks established themselves and became a powerful people.
From their name the country was afterwards called FRANCE.

Each tribe of the Franks had its own king.  The greatest of all
these kings was Chlodwig, or Clovis, as we call him, who became
ruler of his tribe in the year 481, just six years after Theodoric
became king of the Ostrogoths.  Clovis was then only sixteen years
of age.  But though he was so young he proved in a very short time
that he could govern as well as older men.  He was intelligent and
brave.  No one ever knew him to be afraid of anything even when he
was but a child.  His father, who was named Childeric (chil'-der-ic),
often took him to wars which the Franks had with neighboring
tribes, and he was very proud of his son's bravery.  The young man
was also a bold and skillful horseman.  He could tame and ride the
most fiery horse.

When Clovis became king of the Franks a great part of Gaul still
belonged to Rome.  This part was then governed by a Roman general,
named Syagrius (sy-ag'-ri-us).  Clovis resolved to drive the Romans
out of the country, and he talked over the matter with the head
men of his army.

"My desire," said he, "is that the Franks shall have possession of
every part of this fair land.  I shall drive the Romans and their
friends away and make Gaul the empire of the Franks."


II


At this time the Romans had a great army in Gaul.  It was encamped
near the city of Soissons (swah-son') and was commanded by Syagrius.
Clovis resolved to attack it and led his army at once to Soissons.
When he came near the city he summoned Syagrius to surrender.
Syagrius refused and asked for an interview with the commander of
the Franks.  Clovis consented to meet him, and an arrangement was
made that the meeting should take place in the open space between
the two armies.  When Clovis stepped out in front of his own army,
accompanied by some of his savage warriors, Syagrius also came
forward.  But the moment he saw the king of the Franks he laughed
loudly and exclaimed:

"A boy!  A boy has come to fight me!  The Franks with a boy to lead
them have come to fight the Romans."

Clovis was very angry at this insulting language and shouted back:

"Ay, but this boy will conquer you."

Then both sides prepared for battle.  The Romans thought that they
would win the victory easily, but they were mistaken.  Every time
that they made a charge upon the Franks they were beaten back by
the warriors of Clovis.  The young king himself fought bravely at
the head of his men and with his own sword struck down a number
of the Romans.  He tried to find Syagrius and fight with him; but
the Roman commander was nowhere to be found.  Early in the battle
he had fled from the field, leaving his men to defend themselves
as best they could.

The Franks gained a great victory.  With their gallant boy
king leading them on they drove the Roman's before them, and when
the battle was over they took possession of the city of Soissons.
Clovis afterwards conquered all the other Frankish chiefs and made
himself king of all the Franks.


III


Not very long after Clovis became king he heard of a beautiful
young girl, the niece of Gondebaud (gon'-de-baud), king of Burgundy,
and he thought he would like to marry her.  Her name was Clotilde
(clo-tilde'), and she was an orphan, for her wicked uncle Gondebaud
had killed her father and mother.  Clovis sent one of his nobles
to Gondebaud to ask her for his wife.  At first Gondebaud thought
of refusing to let the girl go.  He feared that she might have
him punished for the murder of her parents if she became the wife
of so powerful a man as Clovis.  But he was also afraid that by
refusing he would provoke the anger of Clovis; so he permitted the
girl to be taken to the court of the king of the Franks.  Clovis
was delighted when he saw her; and they were immediately married.

Clotilde was a devout Christian, and she wished very much to
convert her husband, who, like most of his people, was a worshiper
of the heathen gods.  But Clovis was not willing to give up his
own religion.  Nevertheless Clotilde continued to do every thing
she could to persuade him to become a Christian.

Soon after his marriage Clovis had a war with a tribe called the
Alemanni.  This tribe had crossed the Rhine from Germany and taken
possession of some of the eastern provinces of Gaul.  Clovis speedily
got his warriors together and marched against them.  A battle was
fought at a place called Tolbiac, not far from the present city
of Cologne.  In this battle the Franks were nearly beaten, for the
Alemanni were fierce and brave men and skillful fighters.  When
Clovis saw his soldiers driven back several times he began to lose
hope, but at that moment he thought of his pious wife and of the
powerful God of whom she had so often spoken.  Then he raised his
hands to heaven and earnestly prayed to that God.

"O God of Clotilde," he cried, "help me in this my hour of need.
If thou wilt give me victory now I will believe in thee."

Almost immediately the course of the battle began to change in
favor of the Franks.  Clovis led his warriors forward once more,
and this time the Alemanni fled before them in terror.  The Franks
gained a great victory, and they believed it was in answer to the
prayer of their king.

When Clovis returned home he did not forget his promise.  He told
Clotilde how he had prayed to her God for help and how his prayer
had been heard, and he said he was now ready to become a Christian.
Clotilde was very happy on hearing this, and she arranged that her
husband should be baptized in the church of Rheims on the following
Christmas day.

Meanwhile Clovis issued a proclamation to his people declaring that
he was a believer in Christ, and giving orders that all the images
and temples of the heathen gods should be destroyed.  This was
immediately done, and many of the people followed his example and
became Christians.

Clovis was a very earnest and fervent convert.  One day the bishop
of Rheims, while instructing him in the doctrines of Christianity,
described the death of Christ.  As the bishop proceeded Clovis became
much excited, and at last jumped up from his seat and exclaimed:

"Had I been there with my brave Franks I would have avenged His
wrongs."

On Christmas day a great multitude assembled in the church at Rheims
to witness the baptism of the king.  A large number of his fierce
warriors were baptized at the same time.  The service was performed
with great ceremony by the bishop of Rheims, and the title of "Most
Christian King" was conferred on Clovis by the Pope.  This title
was ever afterwards borne by the kings of France.

Like most of the kings and chiefs of those rude and barbarous
times, Clovis often did cruel and wicked things.  When Rheims was
captured, before he became a Christian, a golden vase was taken by
some soldiers from the church. The bishop asked Clovis to have it
returned, and Clovis bade him wait until the division of spoils.
All the valuable things taken by soldiers in war were divided among
the whole army, each man getting his share according to rank.  Such
things were called spoils.

When the next time came for dividing spoils Clovis asked that he
might have the vase over and above his regular share, his intention
being to return it to the bishop.  But one of the soldiers objected,
saying that the king should have no more than his fair share, and
at the same time shattered the vase with his ax.  Clovis was very
angry, but at the time said nothing.  Soon afterwards, however, there
was the usual examination of the arms of the soldiers to see that
they were in proper condition for active service.  Clovis himself
took part in the examination, and when he came to the soldier who
had broken the vase he found fault with the condition of his weapons
and with one blow of his battle-ax struck the man dead.


IV


The next war that Clovis engaged in was with some tribes of the
Goths who occupied the country called Aquitaine lying south of the
River Loire.  He defeated them and added Aquitaine to the kingdom
of the Franks.

Clovis afterwards made war upon other people of Gaul and defeated
them.  At last all the provinces from the lower Rhine to the
Pyrenees Mountains were compelled to acknowledge him as king.  He
then went to reside at the city of Paris, which he made the capital
of his kingdom.  He died there A.D. 511.

The dynasty or family of kings to which he belonged is known in
history as the Merovingian dynasty.  It was so called from Meroveus
(Me-ro-ve'-us), the father of Childeric and grandfather of Clovis.





Justinian the Great




Emperor from 527-565 A.D.


I


In the time of Clovis the country now called Bulgaria was inhabited
by Goths.  One day a poor shepherd boy, about sixteen years of
age, left his mountain home in that country to go to the city of
Constantinople, which was many miles away.  The boy had no money
to pay the expenses of the journey, but he was determined to go,
even though he should have to walk every step of the road and live
on fruits that he could gather by the way.  He was a bright, clever
boy who had spent his life hitherto in a village, but was now eager
to go out into the world to seek his fortune.

Some years before, this boy's uncle, who was named Justin, had gone
to Constantinople and joined the Roman army.  He was so brave and
so good a soldier that he soon came to be commander of the imperial
guard which attended the emperor.

The poor shepherd boy had heard of the success of his uncle, and
this was the reason why he resolved to set off for the big city.  So
he started down the mountain and trudged along the valley in high
hope, feeling certain that he would reach the end of his journey
in safety.  It was a difficult and dangerous journey, and it took
him several weeks, for he had to go through dark forests and to
cross rivers and high hills; but at last one afternoon in midsummer
he walked through the main gate of Constantinople, proud and happy
that he had accomplished his purpose.

He had no trouble in finding his Uncle Justin; for everybody in
Constantinople knew the commander of the emperor's guards.  And when
the boy appeared at the great man's house and told who he was, his
uncle received him with much kindness.  He took him into his own
family, and gave him the best education that could be had in the
city.

As the boy was very talented and eager for knowledge he soon became
an excellent scholar.  He grew up a tall, good-looking man, with
black eyes and curly hair, and he was always richly dressed.  He was
well liked at the emperor's court, and was respected by everybody
on account of his learning.


II


One day a great change came for both uncle and nephew.  The emperor
died; and the people chose Justin to succeed him.  He took the
title of Justinus I (Jus-ti'-nus), and so the young scholar, who
had once been a poor shepherd boy, was now nephew of an emperor.

After some years Justinus was advised by his nobles to take the
young man, who had adopted the name of Justinian, to help him in
ruling the empire.  Justinus agreed to this proposal, for he was
now old and in feeble health, and not able himself to attend to the
important affairs of government.  He therefore called the great
lords of his court together and in their presence he placed a crown
on the head of his nephew, who thus became joint emperor with his
uncle.  The uncle died only a few months after, and then Justinian
was declared emperor.  This was in the year 527.  Justinian reigned
for nearly forty years and did so many important things that he
was afterwards called Justinian the Great.

He had many wars during his reign, but he himself did not take part
in them.  He was not experienced as a soldier, for he had spent
most of his time in study.  He was fortunate enough, however, to
have two great generals to lead his armies.  One of them was named
Belisarius and the other Narses.

Belisarius was one of the greatest soldiers that ever lived.  He
gained wonderful victories for Justinian, and conquered some of
the old Roman provinces that had been lost for many years.

The victories of these two generals largely helped to make the reign
of Justinian remarkable in history.  Many years before he ascended
the throne the Vandals, as you have read, conquered the northern
part of Africa and established a kingdom there with Carthage as
its capital.  The Vandal king in the time of Justinian was named
Gelimer (Gel'-i-mer), and he lived in Carthage.

Justinian resolved to make war on this king in order to recover
Northern Africa and make it again a part of the Empire.  So
Belisarius was sent to Africa with an army of thirty-five thousand
men and five thousand horses, that were carried on a fleet of six
hundred ships.  It took this fleet three months to make the voyage
from Constantinople to Africa.  The same voyage may now be made
in a very few days.  But in the time of Belisarius there were no
steamships, and nothing was known of the power of steam for moving
machinery.  The ships or galleys were sailing vessels; and when
there was no wind they could make no progress except by rowing.

When Belisarius reached Africa he left five men as a guard in each
vessel, and with the body of his army he marched for some days
along the coast.  The people received him in a friendly way, for
they had grown tired of the rule of the Vandals, and preferred to
be under the government of the Romans.

About ten miles from Carthage he met a large army led by the brother
of Gelimer.  A battle immediately took place, and the Vandals
were utterly defeated.  Gelimer's brother was killed, and the king
himself, who had followed with another army and joined the fight,
was also defeated and fled from the field.  Belisarius then proceeded
to Carthage and took possession of the city.

Soon afterwards Gelimer collected another army and fought the Romans
in another battle, twenty miles from Carthage; but Belisarius again
defeated him and the Vandal king again fled.  This was the end of
the Vandal king in Africa.  In a short time Gelimer gave himself
up to Belisarius, who took him to Constantinople.  Justinian set
apart an estate for him to live upon, and the conquered king passed
the rest of his life in peaceful retirement.

After conquering the Vandals Justinian resolved to conquer Italy,
which was then held by the Ostrogoths.  A large army was got
together and put under the command of Belisarius and Narses, who
immediately set out for Italy.  When they arrived there they marched
straight to Rome, and after some fighting took possession of the
city.  But in a few months, Vitiges (vit'-i-ges), king of the Goths,
appeared with an army before the gates and challenged Belisarius
and Narses to come out and fight.

The Roman generals, however, were not then ready to fight, and so
the Ostrogoth king laid siege to the city, thinking that he would
compel the Romans to surrender.

But instead of having any thought of surrender, Belisarius was
preparing his men for fight, and when they were ready he attacked
Vitiges and defeated him.  Vitiges retired to Ravenna, and
Belisarius quickly followed, and made such an assault on the city
that it was compelled to surrender.  The Ostrogoth army was captured,
and Vitiges was taken to Constantinople a prisoner.

Belisarius and Narses then went to Northern Italy, and, after a long
war, conquered all the tribes there.  Thus the power of Justinian
was established throughout the whole country, and the city of Rome
was again under the dominion of a Roman emperor.

While his brave generals were winning these victories for the Empire,
Justinian himself was busy in making improvements of various kinds
at the capital.  He erected great public buildings, which were not
only useful but ornamental to the city.  The most remarkable of
them was the very magnificent cathedral of St. Sophia (So-phi'-a),
for a long time the grandest church structure in the world.  The
great temple still exists in all its beauty and grandeur, but is
now used as a Mohammedan mosque.

But the most important thing that Justinian did--the work for
which he is most celebrated--was the improving and collecting of
the laws.  He made many excellent new laws and reformed many of
the old laws, so that he became famous as one of the greatest of
the world's legislators.  For a long time the Roman laws had been
difficult to understand.  There was a vast number of them, and
different writers differed widely as to what the laws really were
and what they meant.  Justinian employed a great lawyer, named
Tribonian (trib-o'-ni-an), to collect and simplify the principal
laws.  The collection which he made was called the CODE OF JUSTINIAN.
It still exists, and is the model according to which most of the
countries of Europe have made their laws.

Justinian also did a great deal of good by establishing a number
of manufactures in Constantinople.  It was he who first brought
silk-worms into Europe.

To the last year of his life Justinian was strong and active and
a hard worker.  He often worked or studied all day and all night
without eating or sleeping.  He died in 565 at the age of eighty-three
years.





Mohammed




Lived from 570-632 A.D.


I


A great number of people in Asia and Africa and much of those in
Turkey in Europe profess the Mohammedan (Mo-ham'-me-dan) religion.
They are called Mohammedans, Mussulmans (Mus'-sul-mans) or Moslems;
and the proper name for their religion is "Islam," which means
obedience, or submission.

The founder of this religion was a man named Mohammed (Mo-ham'-med),
or Mahomet (Ma-hom'-et).  He was born in the year 570, in Mecca, a
city of Arabia.  His parents were poor people, though, it is said,
they were descended from Arabian princes.  They died when Mohammed
was a child, and his uncle, a kind-hearted man named AbuTalib
(A'-bu-Ta-lib'), took him home and brought him up.

When the boy grew old enough he took care of his uncle's sheep and
camels.  Sometimes he went on journeys with his uncle to different
parts of Arabia, to help him in his business as a trader.  On these
journeys Mohammed used to ride on a camel, and he soon became a
skillful camel-driver.

Mohammed was very faithful and honest in all his work.  He always
spoke the truth and never broke a promise.  "I have given my
promise," he would say, "and I must keep it."  He became so well
known in Mecca for being truthful and trustworthy that people gave
him the name of El Amin, which means "the truthful."

At this time he was only sixteen years of age; but the rich traders
had so much confidence in him that they gave him important business
to attend to, and trusted him with large sums of money.  He often
went with caravans to a port on the shore of the Red Sea, sixty-five
miles from Mecca, and sold there the goods carried by the camels.
Then he guided the long line of camels back to Mecca, and faithfully
paid over to the owners of the goods the money he had received.

Mohammed had no school education.  He could neither read nor write.
But he was not ignorant.  He knew well how to do the work intrusted
to him, and was a first-rate man of business.


II


One day, when Mohammed was about twenty-five years old, he was
walking through the bazaar or market-place, of Mecca when he met the
chief camel-driver of a wealthy woman named Khadijah (Kha-di'-jah).
This woman was a widow, who was carrying on the business left her
by her husband.  As soon as the camel-driver saw Mohammed he stopped
him and said:

"My mistress wishes to see you before noon.  I think she intends
to engage you to take charge of her caravans."

Mohammed waited to hear no more.  As quickly as possible he went
to the house of Khadijah; for he was well pleased at the thought
of being employed in so important a service.  The widow received
him in a very friendly way.  She said:

"I have heard much of you among the traders.  They say that though
you are so young you are a good caravan manager and can be trusted.
Are you willing to take charge of my caravans and give your whole
time and service to me?"

Mohammed was delighted.

"I accept your offer," said he, "and I shall do all I can to serve
and please you."

Khadijah then engaged him as the manager of her business; and he
served her well and faithfully.  She thought a great deal of him,
and he was much attracted to her, and soon they came to love one
another and were married.

As he was now the husband of a rich woman he did not need to work
very hard.  He still continued to attend to his wife's business;
but he did not make so many journeys as before.  He spent much of
his time in thinking about religion.  He learned all that he could
about Judaism and Christianity; but he was not satisfied with either
of them.

At that time most of the people of Arabia worshiped idols.  Very
few of them were Christians.

Mohammed was very earnest and serious.  In a cave on Mount Hira,
near Mecca, he spent several weeks every year in prayer and religious
meditation.  He declared that, while praying in his cave, he often
had visions of God and heaven.  He said that many times the angel
Gabriel appeared to him and revealed to him the religion which he
afterwards taught his followers.  As he himself could not write,
he committed to memory all that the angel told him, and had it
written in a book.  This book is called the "Koran," which means,
like our own word Bible, the "Book."  The Koran is the Bible of
Mohammedans.


III


When Mohammed returned home after the angel had first spoken to
him, he told his wife of what he had seen and heard.  She at once
believed and so became a convert to the new religion.  She fell
upon her knees at the feet of her husband and cried out:

"There is but one God.  Mohammed is God's prophet."

Mohammed then told the story to other members of his family.  Some
of them believed and became his first followers.  Soon afterwards
he began to preach to the people.  He spoke in the market and
other public places.  Most of those who heard him laughed at what
he told them; but some poor people and a few slaves believed him
and adopted the new religion.  Others said he was a dreamer and a
fool.

Mohammed, however, paid no heed to the insults he received.  He
went on telling about the appearance of Gabriel and preaching the
doctrines which he said the angel had ordered him to teach the
people.

Often while speaking in public Mohammed had what he called a "vision
of heavenly things."  At such times his face grew pale as death,
his eyes became red and staring, he spoke in a loud voice, and his
body trembled violently.  Then he would tell what he had seen in
his vision.

After a time the number of his followers began to increase.  People
came from distant parts of Arabia and from neighboring countries
to hear him.  One day six of the chief men of Medina (Me-di'-na),
one of the largest cities of Arabia, listened earnestly to his
preaching and were converted.  When they returned home they talked
of the new religion to their fellow-citizens, and a great many of
them became believers.

But the people of Mecca, Mohammed's own home, were nearly all opposed
to him.  They would not believe what he preached, and they called
him an impostor.  The people of the tribe to which he himself
belonged were the most bitter against him.  They even threatened
to put him to death as an enemy of the gods.

About this time Mohammed's uncle and wife died, and he had
then hardly any friends in Mecca.  He therefore resolved to leave
that city and go to Medina.  Numbers of the people there believed
his doctrines and wished him to come and live among them.  So he
secretly left his native town and fled from his enemies.  With a
few faithful companions he made his escape to Medina.

It was in the year of our Lord 622 that Mohammed fled from Mecca.
This event is very important in Mohammedan history.  It is called
"the flight of the prophet," or "the Hejira (Hej'-i-ra)," a word
which means FLIGHT.  The Hejira is the beginning of the Mohammedan
era; and so in all countries where the rulers and people are
Mohammedans, the years are counted from the Hejira instead of from
the birth of Christ.

On his arrival in Medina the people received Mohammed with great
rejoicing.  He lived there the remainder of his life.  A splendid
church was built for him in Medina.  It was called a mosque, and
all Mohammedan churches, or places of worship, are called by this
name.  It means a place for prostration or prayer.


IV


Mohammed thought that it was right to spread his religion by force,
and to make war on "unbelievers", as he called all people who did
not accept his teaching.  He therefore got together an army and
fought battles and unbelievers.  He gained many victories.  He
marched against Mecca with an army of ten thousand men, and the
city surrendered with little resistance.  The people then joined
his religion and destroyed their idols.  Before very long all the
inhabitants of Arabia and many of the people of the neighboring
countries became Mohammedans.

Mohammed died in Medina in the year of our Lord 632, or year 11
of the Hejira.  He was buried in the mosque in which he had held
religious services for so many years; and Medina has ever since
been honored, because it contains the tomb of the Prophet.  It is
believed by his followers that the body still lies in the coffin
in the same state as when it was first buried.  There is also a
story that the coffin of Mohammed rests somewhere between heaven
and earth, suspended in the air.  But this fable was invented by
enemies to bring ridicule on the prophet and his religion.

The tomb of Mohammed is visited every year by people from all
Mohammedan countries.  Mecca, the birthplace of the prophet, is also
visited by vast numbers of pilgrims.  Every Mussulman is bound by
his religion to make a visit or pilgrimage to Mecca at least once
in his life.  Whenever a Mussulman prays, no matter in what part
of the world he may be, he turns his face towards Mecca, as if he
were always thinking of going there.

Good Mohammedans pray five times every day, and there is a church
officer called a muezzin (mu-ez'-zin), who gives them notice of
the hour for prayer.  This he does by going on the platform, or
balcony, of the minaret, or tower, of the mosque and chanting in
a loud voice such words as these:

"Come to prayer, come to prayer.  There is no god but God.  He
giveth life, and he dieth not.  I praise his perfection.  God is
great."

In Mecca there is a mosque called the Great Mosque.  It is a large
enclosure in the form of a quadrangle, or square, which can hold
35,000 persons.  It is enclosed by arcades with pillars of marble
and granite, and has nineteen gates, each with a minaret or pointed
tower above it.

Within this enclosure is a famous building called the "Kaaba
(Ka'-a-ba)," or cube.  It is nearly a cube in shape.  It its wall,
at one corner, is the celebrated "Black Stone."  Moslems regard
this stone with the greatest reverence.  They say that it came
down from heaven.  It is said to have been once white, but has
become dark from being wept upon and touched by so many millions
of pilgrims.  It really is reddish-brown in color.

Before the time of Mohammed the Kaaba was a pagan temple; but when
he took possession of Mecca he made the old temple the centre of
worship for his own religion.

After Mohammed died a person was appointed to be his successor as
head of the Moslem church.  He was called the caliph, a word which
means SUCCESSOR; and this title has been borne ever since by the
religious chief of the Mohammedans.  In modern times the sultans
or rulers of Turkey have been commonly regarded as the caliphs.
Arab scholars, however, say that really the sherif (she-rif'),
i.e., the governor of Mecca, is entitled by the Koran to hold this
position.





Charles Martel, 714-741 A.D. and Pepin, 741-768 A.D.




I


After the death of Mohammed the Saracens, as Mohammedans are also
called, became great warriors.  They conquered many countries and
established the Mohammedan religion in them.  In 711 the Saracens
invaded and conquered a great part of Spain and founded a powerful
kingdom there, which lasted about seven hundred years.

They intended to conquer the land of the Franks next, and then all
Europe.

They thought it would be easy to conquer the Franks, because the
Frankish king at that time was a very weak man.  He was one of a
number of kings who were called the "Do-nothings."  They reigned
from about 638 to 751.  They spent all their time in amusements and
pleasures, leaving the affairs of the government to be managed by
persons called MAYORS OF THE PALACE.

The mayors of the palace were officers who at first managed the
king's household.  Afterwards they were made guardians of kings
who came to the throne when very young.  So long as the king was
under age the mayor of the palace acted as chief officer of the
government in his name.  And as several of the young kings, even
when they were old enough to rule, gave less attention to business
than to pleasure, the mayors continued to do all the business,
until at last they did everything that the king ought to have done.
They made war, led armies in battle, raised money and spent it,
and carried on the government as they pleased, without consulting
the king.

The "Do-nothings" had the title of king, but nothing more.  In
fact, they did not desire to have any business to do.  The things
they cared for were dogs, horses and sport.

One of the most famous of the mayors was a man named Pepin (Pep'-in).
Once a year, it is said, Pepin had the king dressed in his finest
clothes and paraded through the city of Paris, where the court was
held.  A splendid throng of nobles and courtiers accompanied the
king, and did him honor as he went along the streets in a gilded
chariot drawn by a long line of beautiful horses.  The king was
cheered by the people, and he acknowledged their greetings most
graciously.

After the parade the king was escorted to the great hall of the
palace, which was filled with nobles.  Seated on a magnificent
throne, he saluted the assemblage and made a short speech.  The
speech was prepared beforehand by Pepin, and committed to memory by
the king.  At the close of the ceremony the royal "nobody" retired
to his country house and was not heard of again for a year.


II


Pepin died in 714 A.D., and his son Charles, who was twenty-five
years old at that time, succeeded him as mayor of the palace.  This
Charles is known in history as Charles Martel.  He was a brave
young man.  He had fought in many of his father's battles and so
had become a skilled soldier.  His men were devoted to him.

While he was mayor of the palace he led armies in several wars
against the enemies of the Franks.  The most important of his
wars was one with the Saracens, who came across the Pyrenees from
Spain and invaded the land of the Franks, intending to establish
Mohammedanism there.  Their army was led by Abd-er-Rahman
(Abd-er-Rah'-man), the Saracen governor of Spain.

On his march through the southern districts of the land of the
Franks Abd-er-Rahman destroyed many towns and villages, killed a
number of the people, and seized all the property he could carry
off.  He plundered the city of Bordeaux (bor-do'), and, it is said,
obtained so many valuable things that every soldier "was loaded
with golden vases and cups and emeralds and other precious stones."

But meanwhile Charles Martel was not idle.  As quickly as he could
he got together a great army of Franks and Germans and marched against
the Saracens.  The two armies met between the cities of Tours and
Poitiers (pwaw-te-ay) in October, 732.  For six days there was
nothing but an occasional skirmish between small parties from both
sides; but on the seventh day a great battle took place.

Both Christians and Mohammedans fought with terrible earnestness.
The fight went on all day, and the field was covered with the bodies
of the slain.  But towards evening, during a resolute charge made
by the Franks, Abd-er-Rahman was killed.  Then the Saracens gradually
retired to their camp.

It was not yet known, however, which side had won; and the Franks
expected that the fight would be renewed in the morning.

But when Charles Martel, with his Christian warriors, appeared on
the field at sunrise there was no enemy to fight.  The Mohammedans
had fled in the silence and darkness of the night and had left behind
them all their valuable spoils.  There was now no doubt which side
had won.

The battle of Tours, or Poitiers, as it should be called, is
regarded as one of the decisive battles of the world.  It decided
that Christians, and not Moslems, should be the ruling power in
Europe.

Charles Martel is especially celebrated as the hero of this battle.
It is said that the name MARTEL was given to him because of his
bravery during the fight.  Marteau (mar-to') is the French word for
hammer, and one of the old French historians says that as a hammer
breaks and crushes iron and steel, so Charles broke and crushed
the power of his enemies in the battle of Tours.

But though the Saracens fled from the battlefield of Tours, they
did not leave the land of the Franks; and Charles had to fight
other battles with them, before they were finally defeated.  At
last, however, he drove them across the Pyrenees, and they never
again attempted to invade Frankland.

After his defeat of the Saracens Charles Martel was looked upon as
the great champion of Christianity; and to the day of his death, in
741, he was in reality, though not in name, the king of the Franks.


III


Charles Martel had two sons, Pepin and Carloman.  For a time they
ruled together, but Carloman wished to lead a religious life, so he
went to a monastery and became a monk.  Then Pepin was sole ruler.

Pepin was quite low in stature, and therefore was called Pepin the
Short.  But he had great strength and courage.  A story is told of
him, which shows how fearless he was.

One day he went with a few of his nobles to a circus to see a fight
between a lion and a bull.  Soon after the fight began, it looked
as though the bull was getting the worst of it.  Pepin cried out
to his companions:

"Will one of you separate the beasts?"

But there was no answer.  None of them had the courage to make the
attempt.  Then Pepin jumped from his seat, rushed into the arena,
and with a thrust of his sword killed the lion.

In the early years of Pepin's rule as mayor of the palace the
throne was occupied by a king named Childeric (Chil'-der-ic) III.
Like his father and the other "do-nothing" kings, Childeric cared
more for pleasures and amusements than for affairs of government.
Pepin was the real ruler, and after a while he began to think that
he ought to have the title of king, as he had all the power and
did all the work of governing and defending the kingdom.

So he sent some friends to Rome to consult the Pope.  They said to
His Holiness:

"Holy father, who ought to be the king of France--the man who has
the title, or the man who has the power and does all the duties of
king?"

"Certainly," replied the Pope, "the man who has the power and does
the duties."

"Then, surely," said they, "Pepin ought to be the king of the
Franks; for he has all the power."

The Pope gave his consent, and Pepin was crowned king of the Franks;
and thus the reign of Childeric ended and that of Pepin began.

During nearly his whole reign Pepin was engaged in war.  Several
times he went to Italy to defend the Pope against the Lombards.
These people occupied certain parts of Italy, including the province
still called Lombardy.

Pepin conquered them and gave as a present to the Pope that part
of their possessions which extended for some distance around Rome.
This was called "Pepin's Donation."  It was the beginning of what
is known as the "temporal power" of the Popes, that is, their power
as rulers of part of Italy.

Pepin died in 768.





Charlemagne




King from 768-814 A.D.


I


Pepin had two sons Charles and Carloman.  After the death of their
father they ruled together, but in a few years Carloman died, and
then Charles became sole king.

This Charles was the most famous of the kings of the Franks.  He
did so many great and wonderful things that he is called Charlemagne
(shar-le-main'), which means Charles the Great.

He was a great soldier.  For thirty years he carried on a war
against the Saxons.  Finally he conquered them, and their great
chief, Wittekind, submitted to him.  The Saxons were a people of
Germany, who then lived near the land of the Franks.  They spoke
the same language and were of the same race as the Franks, but had
not been civilized by contact with the Romans.

They were still pagans, just as the Franks had been before Clovis
became a Christian. They actually offered human sacrifices.

After Charlemagne conquered them he made their lands part of his
kingdom.  A great number of them, among whom was Wittekind, then
became Christians and were baptized; and soon they had churches
and schools in many parts of their country.

Another of Charlemagne's wars was against the Lombards.

Pepin, as you have read, had defeated the Lombards and given to
the Pope part of the country held by them.  The Lombard king now
invaded the Pope's lands and threatened Rome itself; so the Pope
sent to Charlemagne for help.

Charlemagne quickly marched across the Alps and attacked the Lombards.
He drove them out of the Pope's lands and took possession of their
country.

After he had conquered the Lombards he carried on war, in 778,
in Spain.  A large portion of Spain was then held by the Moorish
Saracens.  But a Mohammedan leader from Damascus had invaded
their country, and the Moors invited Charlemagne to help them.  He
therefore led an army across the Pyrenees.  He succeeded in putting
his Moorish friends in possession of their lands in Spain and then
set out on his return to his own country.

On the march his army was divided into two parts.  The main body
was led by Charlemagne himself.  The rear guard was commanded by
a famous warrior named Roland.  While marching through the narrow
pass of Roncesvalles (ron-thes-val'-yes), among the Pyrenees, Roland's
division was attacked by a tribe called the Basques (basks), who
lived on the mountain slopes of the neighboring region.

High cliffs walled in the pass on either side.  From the tops of
these cliffs the Basques hurled down rocks and trunks of trees upon
the Franks, and crushed many of them to death.  Besides this, the
wild mountaineers descended into the pass and attacked them with
weapons.  Roland fought bravely; but at last he was overpowered,
and he and all his men were killed.

Roland had a friend and companion named Oliver, who was as brave
as himself.  Many stories and songs have been written telling of
the wonderful adventures they were said to have had and of their
wonderful deeds in war.

The work of Charlemagne in Spain was quickly undone; for Abd-er-Rahman,
the leader of the Mohammedans who had come from Damascus, soon
conquered almost all the territory south of the Pyrenees.

For more than forty years Charlemagne was king of the Franks; but
a still greater dignity was to come to him.  In the year 800 some
of the people in Rome rebelled against the Pope, and Charlemagne
went with an army to put down the rebellion.  He entered the city
with great pomp and soon conquered the rebels.  On Christmas day he
went to the church of St. Peter, and as he knelt before the altar
the Pope placed a crown upon his head, saying:

"Long live Charles Augustus, Emperor of the Romans."

The people assembled in the church shouted the same words; and so
Charlemagne was now emperor of the Western Roman Empire, as well
as king of the Franks [the emperors of Constantinople still called
themselves Roman Emperors, and still claimed Italy, Germany and
France as parts of their empire, though really their authority had
not been respected in these countries for more than 300 years.].

Charlemagne built a splendid palace at Aix-la-Chapelle (aks-la-shap-el'),
a town in Germany, where perhaps he was born.

Charlemagne was a tall man, with long, flowing beard, and of noble
appearance.  He dressed in very simple style; but when he went into
battle he wore armor, as was the custom for kings and nobles, and
often for ordinary soldiers in his day.

Armor was made of leather or iron, or both together.  There was a
helmet of iron for the head, and a breastplate to cover the breast,
or a coat of mail to cover the body.  The coat of mail was made
of small iron or steel rings linked together, or fastened on to a
leather shirt.  Coverings for the legs and feet were often attached
to the coat.


II


Charlemagne was a great king in may other ways besides the fighting
of battles.  He did much for the good of his people.  He made
many excellent laws and appointed judges to see that the laws were
carried out.  He established schools and placed good teachers in
charge of them.  He had a school in his palace for his own children,
and he employed as their teacher a very learned Englishman named
Alcuin (al'-kwin).

In those times few people could read or write.  There were not
many schools anywhere, and in most places there were none at all.
Even the kings had little education.  Indeed, few of them could
write their own names, and most of them did not care about sending
their children to school.  They did not think that reading or
writing was of much use; but thought that it was far better for
boys to learn to be good soldiers, and for girls to learn to spin
and weave.

Charlemagne had a very different opinion.  He was fond of learning;
and whenever he heard of a learned man, living in any foreign
country, he tried to get him to come and live in Frankland.

The fame of Charlemagne as a great warrior and a wise emperor
spread all over the world.  Many kings sent messengers to him
to ask his friendship, and bring him presents.  Harun-al-Rashid
(hah-roon'-al-rash'-eed), the famous caliph, who lived at Bagdad,
in Asia, sent him an elephant and a clock which struck the hours.

The Franks were much astonished at the sight of the elephant; for
they had never seen one before.  They also wondered much at the
clock.  In those days there were in Europe no clocks such as we
have; but water-clocks and hour-glasses were used in some places.
The water-clock was a vessel into which water was allowed to trickle.
It contained a float which pointed to a scale of hours at the side
of the vessel.  The float gradually rose as the water trickled in.

The hour-glasses measured time by the falling of fine sand from
the top to the bottom of a glass vessel made with a narrow neck in
the middle for the sand to go through.  They were like the little
glasses called egg-timers, which are used for measuring the time
for boiling eggs.

Charlemagne died in 814.  He was buried in the church which he had
built at Aix-la-Chapelle.  His body was placed in the tomb, seated
upon a grand chair, dressed in royal robes, with a crown on the
head, a sword at the side, and a Bible in the hands.

This famous emperor is known in history as Charlemagne, which is
the French word for the German name Karl der Grosse (Charles the
Great), the name by which he was called at his own court during
his life.  The German name would really be a better name for him;
for he was a German, and German was the language that he spoke.
The common name of his favorite residence, Aix-la-Chapelle, also
is French, but he knew the place as Aachen (a'-chen).

The great empire which Charlemagne built up held together only
during the life of his son.  Then it was divided among his three
grandsons.  Louis took the eastern part, Lothaire (Lo-thaire') took
the central part, with the title of emperor, and Charles took the
western part.






Harun-al-Rashid




Caliph from 786-809 A.D.


I


The most celebrated of all Mohammedan caliphs was Harun-al-Rashid,
which means, in English, Aaron the Just.  Harun is the hero
of several of the stories of the "Arabian Nights," a famous book,
which perhaps you have read.  There are many curious and wonderful
tales in it.

When Harun was only eighteen years old he showed such courage and
skill as a soldier that his father, who was then caliph, allowed
him to lead an army against the enemies of the Mohammedans; and he
won many great victories.

He afterwards commanded an army of ninety-five thousand Arabs and
Persians, sent by his father to invade the Eastern Roman Empire,
which was then ruled by the Empress Irene (i-re'-ne).  After defeating
Irene's famous general, Nicetas (ni-ce'-tas), Harun marched his
army to Chrysopolis (Chrys-op'-o-lis), now Scutari (skoo'-ta-re),
on the Asiatic coast, opposite Constantinople.  He encamped on the
heights, in full view of the Roman capital.

The Empress saw that the city would certainly by taken by the Moslems.
She therefore sent ambassadors to Harun to arrange terms; but he
sternly refused to agree to anything except immediate surrender.

Then one of the ambassadors said, "The Empress has heard much of
your ability as a general.  Though you are her enemy, she admires
you as a soldier."

These flattering words were pleasing to Harun.  He walked to and
fro in front of his tent and then spoke again to the ambassadors.

"Tell the Empress," he said, "that I will spare Constantinople if
she will pay me seventy thousand pieces of gold as a yearly tribute.
If the tribute is regularly paid Constantinople shall not be harmed
by any Moslem force."

The Empress had to agree to these terms.  She paid the first year's
tribute; and soon the great Moslem army set out on its homeward
march.

When Harun was not quite twenty-one years old he became caliph.

He began his reign by appointing very able ministers, who carried
on the work of the government so well that they greatly improved
the condition of the people.

Harun built a palace in Bagdad, far grander and more beautiful than
that of any caliph before him.  Here he established his court and
lived in great splendor, attended by hundreds of courtiers and
slaves.

He was very anxious that his people should be treated justly by
the officers of the government; and he was determined to find out
whether any had reason to complain.  So he sometimes disguised
himself at night and went about through the streets and bazaars,
listening to the talk of those whom he met and asking them questions.
In this way he learned whether the people were contented and happy,
or not.

In those times Bagdad in the east and the Mohammedan cities of Spain
in the west were famed for their schools and learned men.  Arabian
teachers first introduced into Western Europe both algebra and the
figures which we use in arithmetic.  It is for this reason that we
call these figures the "Arabic numerals."

Harun-al-Rashid gave great encouragement to learning.  He was a
scholar and poet himself and whenever he heard of learned men in
his own kingdom, or in neighboring countries, he invited them to
his court and treated them with respect.

The name of Harun, therefore, became known throughout the world.  It
is said that a correspondence took place between him and Charlemagne
and that, as you have learned, Harun sent the great emperor a
present of a clock and an elephant.

The tribute of gold that the Empress Irene agreed to pay Harun was
sent regularly for many years.  It was always received at Bagdad with
great ceremony.  The day on which it arrived was made a holiday.
The Roman soldiers who came with it entered the gates in procession.
Moslem troops also took part in the parade.

When the gold had been delivered at the palace, the Roman soldiers
were hospitably entertained, and were escorted to the main gate of
the city when they set out on their journey back to Constantinople.


II


In 802 Nicephorus (Ni-ceph'-o-rus) usurped the throne of the Eastern
Empire.  He sent ambassadors with a letter to Harun to tell him
that the tribute would no longer be paid.  The letter contained
these words:

"The weak and faint-hearted Irene submitted to pay you tribute.
She ought to have made you pay tribute to her.  Return to me all
that she paid you; else the matter must be settled by the sword."

As soon as Harun had read these words the ambassadors threw a
bundle of swords at his feet.  The caliph smiled, and drawing his
own sword, or cimeter (sim'-e-ter), he cut the Roman swords in two
with one stroke without injuring the bald, or even turning the edge
of his weapon.

Then he dictated a letter to Nicephorus, in which he said:

"Harun-al-Rashid, Commander of the Faithful to Nicephorus, the Roman
dog:  I have read thy letter.  Thou shalt not hear, thou shalt SEE
my reply."

Harun was as good as his word.  He started that day with a large
army to punish the emperor.  As soon as he reached Roman territory
he ravaged the country and took possession of everything valuable
that he found.  He laid siege to Heraclea (Her-a-cle'-a), a city on
the shores of the Black Sea, and in a week forced it to surrender.
Then he sacked the place.

Nicephorus was now forced to agree to pay the tribute.  Scarcely,
however, had the caliph reached his palace in Bagdad when the
emperor again refused to pay.

Harun, consequently, advanced into the Roman province of Phrygia,
in Asia Minor, with an army of 15,000 men.  Nicepherus marched
against him with 125,000 men.  In the battle which followed the
emperor was wounded, and 40,000 of his men were killed.

After this defeat Nicephorus again promised payment of the tribute,
but again failed to keep his promise.

Harun now vowed that he would kill the emperor if he should ever
lay hands upon him.  But as he was getting ready to march once more
into the Roman provinces a revolt broke out in one of the cities
of his own kingdom; and while on his way to suppress it the great
caliph died of an illness which had long given him trouble.





Egbert




King from 802-837 A.D.


I


Egbert the Saxon lived at the same time as did Harun-al-Rashid and
Charlemagne.  He was the first king who ruled all England as one
kingdom.  Long before his birth the people who are known to us as
Britons lived there, and they gave to the island the name Britain.

But Britain was invaded by the Romans under Julius Cesar and his
successors, and all that part of it which we now call England was
added to the Empire of Rome.  The Britons were driven into Wales
and Cornwall, the western sections of the island.

The Romans kept possession of the island for nearly four hundred
years.  They did not leave it until 410, the year that Alaric sacked
the city of Rome.  At this time the Roman legions were withdrawn
from Britain.

Some years before this the Saxons, Angles and Jutes, German tribes,
had settled near the shores of the North Sea.  They learned much
about Britain; for trading vessels, even at that early day, crossed
the Channel.  Among other things, the men from the north learned
that Britain was crossed with good Roman roads, and dotted with
houses of brick and stone; that walled cities had taken the place
of tented camps, and that the country for miles round each city was
green every spring with waving wheat, or white with orchard blossoms.

After the Roman legions had left Britain, the Jutes, led, it is
said, by two great captains named Hengist and Horsa, landed upon
the southeastern coast and made a settlement.

Britain proved a pleasant place to live in, and soon the Angles
and Saxons also left the North Sea shores and invaded the beautiful
island.

The new invaders met with brave resistance.  The Britons were headed
by King Arthur, about whom many marvelous stories are told.  His
court was held at Caerleon (car'-le-on), in North Wales, where his
hundred and fifty knights banqueted at their famous "Round Table."

The British king and his knights fought with desperate heroism.
But they could not drive back the Saxons and their companions and
were obliged to seek refuge in the western mountainous parts of the
island, just as their forefathers had done when the Romans invaded
Britain.  Thus nearly all England came into the possession of the
three invading tribes.


II


Arthur and his knights were devoted Christians.  For the Romans
had not only made good roads and built strong walls and forts in
Britain, but they had also brought the Christian religion into the
island.  And at about the time of the Saxon invasion St. Patrick
was founding churches and monasteries in Ireland, and was baptizing
whole clans of the Irish at a time.  It is said that he baptized
12,000 persons with his own hand.  Missionaries were sent out by
the Irish Church to convert the wild Picts of Scotland and at a
later day the distant barbarians of Germany and Switzerland.

The Saxons, Angles, and Jutes believed in the old Norse gods, and
Tiew and Woden, Thor and Friga, or Frija, were worshiped on the
soil of Britain for more than a hundred years.

The Britons tried to convert their conquerors, but the invaders did
not care to be taught religion by those whom they had conquered; so
the British missionaries found the work unusually hard.  Aid came
to them in a singular way.  At some time near the year 575 A.D.,
the Saxons quarreled and fought with their friends, the Angles.
They took some Angles prisoners and carried them to Rome to be sold
in the great slave-market there.  A monk named Gregory passed one
day through the market and saw these captives.  He asked the dealer
who they were.  "Angles," was the answer.

"Oh," said the monk, "they would be ANGELS instead of ANGLES if they
were only Christians; for they certainly have the faces of angels."

Years after, when that monk was the Pope of Rome, he remembered this
conversation and sent the monk Augustine (Au-gus'-tine) to England
to teach the Christian religion to the savage but angel-faced Angles.
Augustine and the British missionaries converted the Anglo-Saxons
two hundred years before the German Saxons were converted.

Still, though both Angles and Saxons called themselves Christians,
they were seldom at peace; and for more than two hundred years they
frequently fought.  Various chiefs tried to make themselves kings;
and at length there came to be no less than seven small kingdoms
in South Britain.

In 784 Egbert claimed to be heir of the kingdom called Wessex;
but the people elected another man and Egbert had to flee for his
life.  He went to the court of Charlemagne, and was with the great
king of the Franks in Rome on Christmas Day, 800, when the Pope
placed the crown on Charles' head and proclaimed him emperor.

Soon after this a welcome message came to Egbert.  The mind of the
people in Wessex had changed and they had elected him king.  So
bidding farewell to Charlemagne, he hurried to England.

Egbert had seen how Charlemagne had compelled the different quarreling
tribes of Germany to yield allegiance to him and how after uniting
his empire he had ruled it well.

Egbert did in England what Charlemagne had done in Germany.
He either persuaded the various petty kingdoms of the Angles, the
Saxons and the Jutes to recognize him as their ruler, or forced them
to do so; and thus under him all England became one united kingdom.

But Egbert did even better than this.  He did much to harmonize
the different tribes by his wise conciliation.  The name "England"
is a memorial of this; for though Egbert himself was a Saxon,
he advised that to please the Angles the country should be called
Anglia (An'-gli-a), that is, Angleland or England, the land of the
Angles, instead of Saxonia (Sax-on-i'-a), or Saxonland.





Rollo the Viking




Died 931 A.D.


I


For more than two hundred years during the Middle Ages the Christian
countries of Europe were attacked on the southwest by the Saracens
of Spain, and on the northwest by the Norsemen, or Northmen.  The
Northmen were so called because they came into Middle Europe from
the north.  Sometimes they were called Vikings (Vi'-kings), or
pirates, because they were adventurous sea-robbers who plundered
all countries which they could reach by sea.

Their ships were long and swift.  In the center was placed a single
mast, which carried one large sail.  For the most part, however,
the Norsemen depended on rowing, not on the wind, and sometimes
there were twenty rowers in one vessel.

The Vikings were a terror to all their neighbors; but the two
regions that suffered most from their attacks were the Island of
Britain and that part of Charlemagne's empire in which the Franks
were settled.

Nearly fifty times in two hundred years the lands of the Franks
were invaded.  The Vikings sailed up the large rivers into the heart
of the region which we now call France and captured and pillaged
cities and towns.  Some years after Charlemagne's death they went
as far as his capital, Aix (aks), took the place, and stabled their
horses in the cathedral which the great emperor had built.

In the year 860 they discovered Iceland and made a settlement upon
its shores.  A few years later they sailed as far as Greenland,
and there established settlements which existed for about a century.

These Vikings were the first discoverers of the continent on which
we live.  Ancient books found in Iceland tell the story of the
discovery.  It is related that a Viking ship was driven during a
storm to a strange coast, which is thought to have been that part
of America now known as Labrador.

When the captain of the ship returned home he told what he had
seen.  His tale so excited the curiosity of a young Viking prince,
called Leif the Lucky, that he sailed to the newly discovered coast.

Going ashore, he found that the country abounded in wild grapes;
and so he called it Vinland, or the land of Vines.  Vinland is
thought to have been a part of what is now the Rhode Island coast.

The Vikings were not aware that they had found a great unknown
continent.  No one in the more civilized parts of Europe knew anything
about their discovery; and after a while the story of the Vinland
voyages seems to have been forgotten, even among the Vikings
themselves.

So it is not to them that we owe the discovery of America, but to
Columbus; because his discovery, though nearly five hundred years
later than that of the Norsemen, actually made known to all Europe,
for all time, the existence of the New World.


II


The Vikings had many able chieftains.  One of the most famous was
Rollo the Walker, so called because he was such a giant that no
horse strong enough to carry him could be found, and therefore he
always had to walk.  However, he did on foot what few could do on
horseback.

In 885 seven hundred ships, commanded by Rollo and other Viking
chiefs, left the harbors of Norway, sailed to the mouth of the
Seine (San), and started up the river to capture the city of Paris.

Rollo and his men stopped on the way at Rouen (ro-on'), which also
was on the Seine, but nearer its mouth.  The citizens had heard of
the giant, and when they saw the river covered by his fleet they
were dismayed.  However, the bishop of Rouen told them that Rollo
could be as noble and generous as he was fierce; and he advised
them to open their gates and trust to the mercy of the Viking chief.
This was done, and Rollo marched into Rouen and took possession of
it.  The bishop had given good advice, for Rollo treated the people
very kindly.

Soon after capturing Rouen he left the place, sailed up the river
to Paris, and joined the other Viking chiefs.  And now for six long
miles the beautiful Seine was covered with Viking vessels, which
carried an army of thirty thousand men.

A noted warrior named Eudes (Ude) was Count of Paris, and he had
advised the Parisians to fortify the city.  So not long before the
arrival of Rollo and his companions, two walls with strong gates
had been built round Paris.

It was no easy task for even Vikings to capture a strongly walled
city.  We are told that Rollo and his men built a high tower and
rolled it on wheels up to the walls.  At its top was a floor well
manned with soldiers.  But the people within the city shot hundreds
of arrows at the besiegers, and threw down rocks, or poured boiling
oil and pitch upon them.

The Vikings thought to starve the Parisians, and for thirteen months
they encamped round the city.  At length food became very scarce,
and Count Eudes determined to go for help.  He went out through one
of the gates on a dark, stormy night, and rode post-haste to the
king.  He told him that something must be done to save the people
of Paris.

So the king gathered an army and marched to the city.  No battle
was fought--the Vikings seemed to have been afraid to risk one.
They gave up the siege, and Paris was relieved.

Rollo and his men went to the Duchy of Burgundy, where, as now,
the finest crops were raised and the best of wines were made.


III


Perhaps after a time Rollo and his Vikings went home; but we do not
know what he did for about twenty-five years.  We do know that he
abandoned his old home in Norway in 911.  Then he and his people
sailed from the icy shore of Norway and again went up the Seine in
hundreds of Viking vessels.

Of course, on arriving in the land of the Franks, Rollo at once
began to plunder towns and farms.

Charles, then king of the Franks, although his people called him
the Simple, or Senseless, had sense enough to see that this must
be stopped.

So he sent a message to Rollo and proposed that they should have
a talk about peace.  Rollo agreed and accordingly they met.  The
king and his troops stood on one side of a little river, and Rollo
with his Vikings stood on the other.  Messages passed between them.
The king asked Rollo what he wanted.

"Let me and my people live in the land of the Franks; let us make
ourselves home here, and I and my Vikings will become your vassals,"
answered Rollo.  He asked for Rouen and the neighboring land.  So
the king gave him that part of Francia; and ever since it has been
called Normandy, the land of the Northmen.

When it was decided that the Vikings should settle in Francia and
be subjects of the Frankish king, Rollo was told that he must kiss
the foot of Charles in token that he would be the king's vassal.
The haughty Viking refused.  "Never," said he, "will I bend my
knee before any man, and no man's foot will I kiss."  After some
persuasion, however, he ordered one of his men to perform the act
of homage for him.  The king was on horseback and the Norseman,
standing by the side of the horse, suddenly seized the king's foot
and drew it up to his lips.  This almost made the king fall from
his horse, to the great amusement of the Norsemen.

Becoming a vassal to the king meant that if the king went to war
Rollo would be obliged to join his army and bring a certain number
of armed men--one thousand or more.

Rollo now granted parts of Normandy to his leading men on condition
that they would bring soldiers to his army and fight under him.
They became his vassals, as he was the king's vassal.

The lands granted to vassals in this way were called feuds, and
this plan of holding lands was called the Feudal System.

It was established in every country of Europe during the Middle
Ages.

The poorest people were called serfs.  They were almost slaves and
were never permitted to leave the estate to which they belonged.
They did all the work.  They worked chiefly for the landlords, but
partly for themselves.

Having been a robber himself, Rollo knew what a shocking thing it
was to ravage and plunder, and he determined to change his people's
habits.  He made strict laws and hanged robbers.  His duchy thus
became one of the safest parts of Europe.

The Northmen learned the language of the Franks and adopted their
religion.

The story of Rollo is especially interesting to us, because Rollo
was the forefather of that famous Duke of Normandy who, less than a
hundred and fifty years later, conquered England and brought into
that country the Norman nobles with their French language and
customs.





Alfred the Great




King from 871-901 A.D.


I


The Danes were neighbors of the Norwegian Vikings, and like them
were fond of the sea and piracy.  They plundered the English coasts
for more than a century; and most of northern and eastern England
became for a time a Danish country with Danish kings.

What saved the rest of the country to the Saxons was the courage
of the great Saxon king, Alfred.

Alfred was the son of Ethelwulf, king of the West Saxons.  He had
a loving mother who brought him up with great care.  Up to the age
of twelve, it is said, he was not able to read well, in spite of
the efforts of his mother and others to teach him.

When Alfred was a boy there were no printed books.  The wonderful
art of printing was not invented until about the year 1440--nearly
six hundred years later than Alfred's time.  Moreover, the art of
making paper had not yet been invented.  Consequently the few books
in use in Alfred's time were written by skillful penmen, who wrote
generally on leaves of parchment, which was sheepskin carefully
prepared so that it might retain ink.

One day Alfred's mother showed him and his elder brothers a beautiful
volume which contained a number of the best Saxon ballads.  Some
of the words in this book were written in brightly colored letters,
and upon many of the leaves were painted pictures of gaily-dressed
knights and ladies.

"Oh, what a lovely book!" exclaimed the boys.

"Yes, it is lovely," replied the mother.  "I will give it to
whichever of you children can read it the best in a week."

Alfred began at once to take lessons in reading, and studied hard
day after day.  His brothers passed their time in amusements and
made fun of Alfred's efforts.  They thought he could not learn to
read as well as they could, no matter how hard he should try.

At the end of the week the boys read the book to their mother,
one after the other.  Much to the surprise of his brothers, Alfred
proved to be the best reader and his mother gave him the book.

While still very young Alfred was sent by his father to Rome to
be anointed by His Holiness, the Pope.  It was a long and tiresome
journey, made mostly on horseback.

With imposing, solemn ceremony he was anointed by the Holy Father.
Afterwards he spent a year in Rome receiving religious instruction.


II


In the year 871, when Alfred was twenty-two years old, the Danes
invaded various parts of England.  Some great battles were fought,
and Alfred's elder brother Ethelred, king of the West Saxons, was
killed.  Thus Alfred became king.

The Danes still continued to fight the Saxons, and defeated Alfred
in a long and severe struggle.  They took for themselves the northern
and eastern parts of England.

Moreover, Danes from Denmark continued to cross the sea and ravage
the coast of Saxon England.  They kept the people in constant
alarm.  Alfred therefore determined to meet the pirates on their
own element, the sea.  So he built and equipped the first English
navy, and in 875 gained the first naval victory ever won by the
English.

A few years after this, however, great numbers of Danes from the
northern part of England came pouring into the Saxon lands.  Alfred
himself was obliged to flee for his life.

For many months he wandered through forests and over hills to avoid
being taken by the Danes.  He sometimes made his home in caves and
in the huts of shepherds and cowherds.  Often he tended the cattle
and sheep and was glad to get a part of the farmer's dinner in pay
for his services.

Once, when very hungry, he went into the house of a cowherd and
asked for something to eat.  The cowherd's wife was baking cakes
and she said she would give him some when they were done.

"Watch the cakes and do not let them burn, while I go across the
field to look after the cows," said the woman, as she hurried away.
Alfred took his seat on the chimney-corner to do as he was told.
But soon his thoughts turned to his troubles and he forgot about
the cakes.

When the woman came back she cried out with vexation, for the
cakes were burned and spoiled.  "You lazy, good-for-nothing man!"
she said, "I warrant you can eat cakes fast enough; but you are
too lazy to help me bake them."

With that she drove the poor hungry Alfred out of her house.  In
his ragged dress he certainly did not look like a king, and she
had no idea that he was anything but a poor beggar.


III


Some of Alfred's friends discovered where he was hiding and joined
him.  In a little time a body of soldiers came to him and a strong
fort was built by them.  From this fort Alfred and his men went
out now and then and gave battle to small parties of the Danes.
Alfred was successful and his army grew larger and larger.

One day he disguised himself as a wandering minstrel and went into
the camp of the Danes.  He strolled here and there, playing on a
harp and singing Saxon ballads.  At last, Guthrum (Guth'-rum), the
commander of the Danes, ordered the minstrel to be brought to his
tent.

Alfred went.  "Sing to me some of your charming songs," said Guthrum.
"I never heard more beautiful music."  So the kingly harper played
and sang for the Dane, and went away with handsome presents.  But
better than that, he had gained information that was of the greatest
value.

In a week he attacked the Danish forces and defeated them with
great slaughter in a battle which lasted all day and far into the
night.  Guthrum was taken prisoner and brought before Alfred.

Taking his harp in his hands, Alfred played and sang one of the
ballads with which he had entertained Guthrum in the camp.  The
Dane started in amazement and exclaimed:

"You, then, King Alfred, were the wandering minstrel?"

"Yes," replied Alfred, "I was the musician whom you received so
kindly.  Your life is now in my hands; but I will give you your
liberty if you will become a Christian and never again make war on
my people."

"King Alfred," said Guthrum, "I will become a Christian, and so
will all my men if you will grant liberty to them as to me; and
henceforth, we will be your friends."

Alfred then released the Danes, and they were baptized as Christians.

An old road running across England from London to Chester was then
agreed upon as the boundary between the Danish and Saxon kingdoms;
and the Danes settled in East Anglia, as the eastern part of England
was called.

Years of peace and prosperity followed for Alfred's kingdom.  During
these years the king rebuilt the towns that had been destroyed by
the Danes, erected new forts, and greatly strengthened his army
and navy.

He also encouraged trade; and he founded a school like that
established by Charlemagne.  He himself translated a number of Latin
books into Saxon, and probably did more for the cause of education
than any other king that ever wore the English crown.





Henry the Fowler




King from 919-936 A.D.


I


About a hundred years had passed since the death of Charlemagne,
and his great empire had fallen to pieces.  Seven kings ruled where
he had once been sole emperor.

West of the Rhine, where the Germans lived, the last descendant of
Charlemagne died when he was a mere boy.  The German nobles were
not willing for any foreign prince to govern them, and yet they saw
that they must unite to defend their country against the invasions
of the barbarians called Magyars (ma-jarz').  So they met and
elected Conrad, duke of Franconia, to be their king.

However, although he became king in name, Conrad never had much
power over his nobles.  Some of them refused to recognize him as
king and his reign was disturbed by quarrels and wars.  He died in
919, and on his death-bed he said to his brother, "Henry, Duke of
Saxony, is the ablest ruler in the empire.  Elect him king, and
Germany will have peace."

A few months after Conrad's death, the nobles met at Aix-la-Chapelle
and elected Henry to be their king.

At this time it was the custom in Europe to hunt various birds,
such as the wild duck and partridge, with falcons.  The falcons were
long-winged birds of prey, resembling hawks.  They were trained to
perch on their master's wrist and wait patiently until they were
told to fly.  Then they would swiftly dart at their prey and bear
it to the ground.  Henry was very fond of falconry and hence was
known as Henry the Fowler, or Falconer.

As soon as the other dukes had elected him king a messenger was
sent to Saxony to inform him of the honor done him.  After a search
of some days he was at last found, far up in the Hartz Mountains,
hunting with his falcons.  Kneeling at his feet, the messenger
said:

"God save you, Henry of Saxony.  I come to announce the death of
King Conrad and to tell you that the nobles have elected you to
succeed him as king of the Germans."

For a moment the duke was speechless with amazement.  Then he
exclaimed:

"Elected me king?  I cannot believe it.  I am a Saxon, and King
Conrad was a Frank and a bitter enemy to me."

"It is true," replied the messenger.  "Conrad, when dying, advised
that the nobles should choose you as his successor."

Henry was silent for while and then he said, "King Conrad was a
good man.  I know it now; and I am sorry that I did not understand
him better when he was alive.  I accept the position offered to me
and I pray that I may be guided by Heaven in ruling his people."

So Henry the Fowler left the chase to take up his duties as king
of the Germans.


II


In proper time Henry was proclaimed king of Germany; but he was hardly
seated on the throne when the country was invaded by thousands of
Magyars, from the land which we now know as Hungary.

As soon as possible Henry gathered an army and marched to meet the
barbarians.  He came upon a small force under the command of the
son of the Magyar king.  The Germans easily routed the Magyars and
took the king's son prisoner.

This proved to be a very fortunate thing, because it stopped the
war for a long term of years.  When the Magyar king learned that
his son was a prisoner in the hands of King Henry he was overwhelmed
with grief.  He mourned for his son day and night and at last sent
to the German camp a Magyar chief with a flag of truce, to bet that
the prince might be given up.

"Our king says that he will give whatever you demand for the release
of his son," said the chief to the German monarch.

"I will give up the prince on this condition only," was the reply,
"the Magyars must leave the soil of Germany immediately and promise
not to war on us for nine years.  During those years I will pay to
the king yearly five thousand pieces of gold."

"I accept the terms in the king's name," responded the chief.  The
prince was, therefore, given up and the Magyars withdrew.

During the nine years of truce King Henry paid great attention to
the organization of an army.  Before this the German soldiers had
fought chiefly on foot, not, as the Magyars did, on horseback.
For this reason they were at a great disadvantage in battle.  The
king now raised a strong force of horsemen and had them drilled so
thoroughly that they became almost invincible.  The infantry also
were carefully drilled.

Besides this, Henry built a number of forts in different parts of
his kingdom and had all the fortified cities made stronger.

The following year the Magyar chief appeared at the German court
and demanded a tenth payment.

"Not a piece of gold will be given you," replied King Henry.  "Our
truce is ended."

In less than a week a vast body of Magyars entered Germany to
renew the war.  Henry held his army in waiting until lack of food
compelled the barbarians to divide their forces into two separate
bodies.  One division was sent to one part of the country, the
other to another part.

Henry completely routed both divisions, and the power of the Magyars
in Germany was broken.

The Danes also invaded Henry's kingdom, but he defeated them and
drove them back.

Henry reigned for eighteen years; and when he died all Germany was
peaceful and prosperous.  His son Otto succeeded him.  He assumed
the title of "Emperor," which Charlemagne had borne more than a
hundred years before.

From that time on, for nearly one thousand years, all the German
emperors claimed to be the successors of Charlemagne.  They called
their domain "the Holy Roman Empire," and took the title "Emperor"
or "Emperor of the Romans," until the year 1806, when Francis II
resigned it.





Canute the Great




King from 1014-1035


I


The Danes, you remember, had the eastern and northern parts
of England in the time of Alfred.  Alfred's successors drove them
farther and farther north, and at length the Danish kingdom in
England came to an end for a time.

But the Danes in Denmark did not forget that there had been such
a kingdom and in the year 1013 Sweyn (swane), King of Denmark,
invaded England and defeated the Anglo-Saxons.  Ethelred, their
king, fled to Normandy.

Sweyn now called himself the king of England; but in a short time
he died and his son Canute succeeded to his throne.  Canute was
nineteen years old.  He had been his father's companion during the
war with the Anglo-Saxons, and thus had had a good deal of experience
as a soldier.

After the death of Sweyn some of the Anglo-Saxons recalled King
Ethelred and revolted against the Danes.

Canute, however, went to Denmark and there raised one of the largest
armies of Danes that had ever been assembled.  With this powerful
force he sailed to England.  When he landed Northumberland and
Wessex acknowledged him as king.  Shortly after this Ethelred died.

Canute now thought he would find it easy to get possession of all
England.  This was a mistake.

Ethelred left a son named Edmund Ironside who was a very brave
soldier.  He became, by his father's death, the king of Saxon
England and at once raised an army to defend his kingdom.  A battle
was fought and Edmund was victorious.  This was the first of five
battles that were fought in one year.  In none of them could the
Danes do more than gain a slight advantage now and then.

However, the Saxons were at last defeated in a sixth battle through
the act of a traitor.  Edric, a Saxon noble, took his men out of
the fight and his treachery so weakened the Saxon army that Edmund
Ironside had to surrender to Canute.

But the young Dane had greatly admired Edmund for the way in which
he had fought against heavy odds, so he now treated him most generously.
Canute took certain portions of England and the remainder was given
to Edmund Ironside.

Thus for a short time the Anglo-Saxon people had at once a Danish
and a Saxon monarch.


II


Edmund died in 1016 and after his death Canute became sole ruler.

He ruled wisely.  He determined to make his Anglo-Saxon subjects
forget that he was a foreign conqueror.  To show his confidence in
them he sent back to Denmark the army he had brought over the sea,
keeping on a part of his fleet and a small body of soldiers to act
as guards at his palace.

He now depended on the support of his Anglo-Saxon subjects and he
won their love.

Although a king--and it is generally believed that kings like
flattery--Canute is said to have rebuked his courtiers when they
flattered him.  On one occasion, when they were talking about his
achievements, one of them said to him:

"Most noble king, I believe you can do anything."

Canute sternly rebuked the courtier for these words and then said:

"Come with me, gentlemen."

He led them from the palace grounds to the sea-shore where the tide
was rising, and had his chair placed at the edge of the water.

"You say I can do anything," he said to the courtiers.  "Very well,
I who am king and the lord of the ocean now command these rising
waters to go back and not dare wet my feet."

But the tide was disobedient and steadily rose and rose, until
the feet of the king were in the water.  Turning to his courtiers,
Canute said:

"Learn how feeble is the power of earthly kings.  None is worthy
the name of king but He whom heaven and earth and sea obey."

During Canute's reign England had peace and prosperity and the
English people have ever held his memory dear.





The Cid




Late one sunny afternoon one and twenty knights were riding along
the highway in the northern part of Spain.  As they were passing a
deep mire they heard cries for help, and turning, saw a poor leper
who was sinking in the mud.  One of the knights, a handsome young
man, was touched by the cries.  He dismounted, rescued the poor
fellow, took him upon his own horse, and thus the two rode to the
inn.  The other knights wondered at this.

When they reached the inn where they were to stop for the night,
they wondered still more, for their companion gave the leper a
seat next to himself at the table.  After supper the knight shared
his own bed with the leper.  If the knight had not done this, the
leper would have been driven out of the town, with nothing to eat
and no place in which to sleep.  At midnight, while the young man
was fast asleep, the leper breathed upon his back.  This awakened
the knight, who turned quickly in his bed and found that the leper
was gone.

The knight called for a light and searched, but in vain.  While he
was wondering about what had happened, a man in shining garments
appeared before him and said, "Rodrigo, art thou asleep or awake?"
The knight answered, "I am awake, but who art thou that bringest
such brightness?"  The vision replied, "I am St. Lazarus, the leper
to whom thou wast so kind.  Because I have breathed upon thee
thou shalt accomplish whatever thou shalt undertake in peace or in
battle.  All shall honor thee.  Therefore, go on and evermore do
good."

With that the vision vanished.

The promise of St. Lazarus was fulfilled.  In time young Rodrigo
became the great hero of Spain.  The Spaniards called him Campeador
(cam-pe-a-dor'), or Champion.  The Saracens called him "The Cid,"
or Lord.  His real name was Rodrigo Diaz de Bivar, but he is usually
spoken of as "The Cid."

The Goths, after the death of Alaric, had taken Spain away from the
Romans.  The Saracens, or, as they were usually called, the Moors,
had crossed the sea from Africa and in turn had taken Spain from
the Goths.  In the time of Charles Martel the Goths had lost all
Spain except the small mountain district in the northern part.  In
the time of the Cid the Goths, now called Spaniards, had driven the
Moors down to about the middle of Spain.  War went on all the time
between the two races, and many men spent their lives in fighting.
The Spanish part of the country then comprised the kingdoms of
Castile, Leon, Aragon and others.

The Cid was a subject of Fernando of Castile.  Fernando had a
dispute with the king of Aragon about a city which each claimed.
They agreed to decide the matter by a combat.  Each was to choose
a champion.  The champions were to fight, and the king whose champion
won was to have the city.  Fernando chose the Cid, and though the
other champion was called the bravest knight in Spain, the youthful
warrior vanquished him.

When Alfonzo, a son of Fernando, succeeded to the throne, he
became angry with the Cid without just cause and banished him from
Christian Spain.

The Cid was in need of some money, so he filled two chests with
sand and sent word to two wealthy money lenders that he wished to
borrow six hundred Spanish marks (about $2,000 [as of 1904]), and
would put into their hands his treasures of silver and gold which
were packed in two chests, but the money lenders must solemnly swear
not to open the chests until a full year had passed.  To this they
gladly agreed.  They took the chests and loaned him six hundred
marks.

The Cid was now ready for his journey.  Three hundred of his
knights went into banishment with him.  They crossed the mountains
and entered the land of the Moors.  Soon they reached the town of
Alcocer, and after a siege captured it and lived in it.

Then the Moorish king of Valencia ordered two chiefs to take three
thousand horsemen, recapture the town and bring the Cid alive to
him.

So the Cid and his men were shut up in Alcocer and besieged.  Famine
threatened them and they determined to cut their way through the
army of the Moors.  Suddenly and swiftly they poured from the gate
of Alcocer, and a terrible battle was fought.  The two Moorish
chiefs were taken prisoners and thirteen hundred of their men were
killed in the battle.  The Cid then became a vassal of the Moorish
king of Saragossa.

After a while Alfonzo recalled the Cid from banishment and gave him
seven castles and the lands adjoining them.  He needed the Cid's
help in the greatest of all his plans against the Moors.  He was
determined to capture Toledo.  He attacked it with a large army
in which there were soldiers from many foreign lands.  The Cid is
said to have been the commander.  After a long siege the city fell
and the victorious army marched across the great bridge built by the
Moors, which you would cross to-day if you went to Toledo.  [NOTE
FROM Brett Fishburne:  This stunned me, so I researched it briefly
and it turns out that the bridge was washed out completely in 1257,
then rebuilt by Alfonso X.  There were numerous other reconstructions
done between then and 2000, the most recent of which I am aware
was in the late 1970s using stone blocks found in situ.]

Valencia was one of the largest and richest cities in Moorish Spain.
It was strongly fortified, but the Cid determined to attack it.

The plain about the city was irrigated by streams that came down
from the neighboring hills.  To prevent the Cid's army from coming
near the city the Saracens flooded the plain.  But the Cid camped
on high ground above the plain and from that point besieged the
city.  Food became very scarce in Valencia.  Wheat, barley and
cheese were all so dear that none but the rich could buy them.
People ate horses, dogs, cats and mice, until in the whole city
only three horses and a mule were left alive.

Then on the fifteenth of June, 1094, the governor went to the camp
of the Cid and delivered to him the keys of the city.  The Cid
placed his men in all the forts and took the citadel as his own
dwelling.  His banner floated from the towers.  He called himself
the Prince of Valencia.

When the king of Morocco heard of this he raised an army of fifty
thousand men.  They crossed from Africa to Spain and laid siege to
Valencia.  But the Cid with his men made a sudden sally and routed
them and pursued them for miles.  It is said that fifteen thousand
soldiers were drowned in the river Guadalquivir (Gua-dal-qui-vir')
which they tried to cross.

The Cid was now at the height of his power and lived in great
magnificence.  One of the first things he did was to repay the two
friends who had lent him the six hundred marks.  He was kind and
just to the Saracens who had become his subjects.  They were allowed
to have their mosques and to worship God as they thought right.

In time the Cid's health began to fail.  He could lead his men forth
to battle no more.  He sent an army against the Moors, but it was
so completely routed that few of his men came back to tell the tale.
It is said by a Moorish writer that "when the runaways reached him
the Cid died of rage" (1099).

There is a legend that shortly before he died he saw a vision
of St. Peter, who told him that he should gain a victory over the
Saracens after his death.

So the Cid gave orders that his body should be embalmed.  It was
so well preserved that it seemed alive.  It was clothed in a coat
of mail, and the sword that had won so many battles was placed in
the hand.  Then it was mounted upon the Cid's favorite horse and
fastened into the saddle, and at midnight was borne out of the gate
of Valencia with a guard of a thousand knights.

All silently they marched to a spot where the Moorish king, with
thirty-six chieftains, lay encamped, and at daylight the knights
of the Cid made a sudden attack.  The king awoke.  It seemed to him
that there were coming against him full seventy thousand knights,
all dressed in robes as white as snow, and before them rode a knight,
taller than all the rest, holding in his left hand a snow-white
banner and in the other a sword which seemed of fire.  So afraid
were the Moorish chief and his men that they fled to the sea, and
twenty thousand of them were drowned as they tried to reach their
ships.

There is a Latin inscription near the tomb of the Cid which may
be translated: *Brave and unconquered, famous in triumphs of war,
Enclosed in this tomb lies Roderick the Great of Bivar.*/





Edward the Confessor




King from 1042-1066


I


The Danish kings who followed Canute were not like him.  They were
cruel, unjust rulers and all the people of England hated them.  So
when in the year 1042 the last of them died, Edward, the son of
the Saxon Ethelred, was elected king.

He is known in history as Edward the Confessor.  He was a man of
holy life and after his death was made a saint by the Church, with
the title of "the Confessor."  Though born in England, he passed the
greater part of his life in Normandy as an exile from his native
land.  He was thirty-eight years old when he returned from Normandy
to become king.

As he had lived so long in Normandy he always seemed more like a
Norman than one of English birth.  He generally spoke the French
language and he chose Normans to fill many of the highest offices
in his kingdom.

For the first eight years of his reign there was perfect peace in
his kingdom, except in the counties of Kent and Essex, where pirates
from the North Sea made occasional attacks.

These pirates were mostly Norwegians, whose leader was a barbarian
named Kerdric.  They would come sweeping down upon the Kentish
coast in many ships, make a landing where there were no soldiers,
and fall upon the towns and plunder them.  Then, as swiftly and
suddenly as they had come, they would sail away homeward, before
they could be captured.

One day Kerdic's fleet arrived off the coast, and as no opposing
force was visible, the pirates landed and started toward the nearest
town to plunder it.

By a quick march a body of English soldiers reached the town before
the pirates, and when the latter arrived they found a strong force
drawn up to give them battle.  A short struggle took place.  More
than half of the pirates were slain and the remainder were taken
prisoners.

After the prisoners had been secured the English ships that were
stationed on the coast attacked the pirate fleet and destroyed it.


II


Edward took part in the events upon which Shakespeare, five hundred
years later, founded his famous tragedy of "Macbeth."

There lived in Scotland during his reign an ambitious nobleman named
Macbeth, who invited Duncan, the King of Scotland, to his castle
and murdered him.  He tried to make it appear that the murder had
been committed by Duncan's attendants and he caused the king's
son and heir, Prince Malcolm, to flee from the land.  He then made
himself king of Scotland.

Malcolm hastened to England and appealed to King Edward for help.

When the king was told the number of soldiers Malcolm would probably
need he gave orders for double that number to march into Scotland.
Malcolm with this support attacked Macbeth, and after several
well-fought battles drove the usurper from Scotland and took
possession of the throne.

Edward did a great deal during his reign to aid the cause of
Christianity.  He rebuilt the ancient Westminster Abbey in London
and erected churches and monasteries in different parts of England.

Edward was long supposed to have made many just laws, and years after
his death the English people, when suffering from bad government,
would exclaim, "Oh, for the good laws and customs of Edward the
Confessor!"  What he really did was to have the old laws faithfully
carried out.

He died in 1066 and was buried in Westminster Abbey.





William the Conqueror




King from 1066-1087


I


On the death of Edward the Confessor the throne of England was
claimed by William, Duke of Normandy.

When Edward took refuge in Normandy after the Danes conquered
England, he stayed at the palace of William.  He was very kindly
treated there, and William said that Edward had promised in gratitude
that William should succeed him as king of England.

One day in the year 1066 when William was hunting with a party of
his courtiers in the woods near Rouen, a noble came riding rapidly
toward him shouting, "Your Highness, a messenger has just arrived
from England, bearing the news that King Edward is dead and that
Harold, the son of Earl Godwin, has been placed on the English
throne."

William at once called his nobles together and said to them, "I
must have your consent that I enforce my claim to England's throne
by arms."

The barons gave their consent.  So an army of sixty thousand men
was collected and a large fleet of ships was built to carry this
force across the channel.

During the months of preparation William sent an embassy to
the English court to demand of Harold that he give up the throne.
Harold refused.

Soon all England was startled by the news that William had landed
on the English coast at the port of Hastings with a large force.

Harold immediately marched as quickly as possible from the north to
the southern coast.  In a week or so he arrived at a place called
Senlac nine miles from Hastings, in the neighborhood of which town
the Norman army was encamped.  He took his position on a low range
of hills and awaited the attack of William.  His men were tired
with their march, but he encouraged them and bade them prepare for
battle.

On the morning of October 14, 1066, the two armies met.  The
Norman foot-soldiers opened the battle by charging on the English
stockades.  They ran over the plain to the low hills, singing a
war-song at the top of their voices; but they could not carry the
stockades although they tried again and again.  They therefore
attacked another part of the English forces.

William, clad in complete armor, was in the very front of the
fight, urging on his troops.  At one time a cry arose in his army
that he was slain and a panic began.  William drew off his helmet
and rode along the lines, shouting, "I live!  I live!  Fight on!
We shall conquer yet!"

The battle raged from morning till night.  Harold himself fought
on foot at the head of his army and behaved most valiantly.  His
men, tired as they were from their forced march, bravely struggled
on hour after hour.

But at last William turned their lines and threw them into confusion.
As the sun went down Harold was killed and his men gave up the
fight.

From Hastings William marched toward London.  On the way he
received the surrender of some towns and burned others that would
not surrender.  London submitted and some of the nobles and citizens
came forth and offered the English crown to the Norman duke.  On
the 25th of December, 1066, the "Conqueror," as he is always
called, was crowned in Westminster Abbey by Archbishop Ealdred.
Both English and Norman people were present.  When the question was
asked by the Archbishop, "Will you have William, Duke of Normandy,
for your king?" all present answered, "We will."


II


At first William ruled England with moderation.  The laws and
customs were not changed, and in a few months after the battle of
Hastings the kingdom was so peaceful that William left it in charge
of his brother and went to Normandy for a visit.

While he was gone many of the English nobles rebelled against him,
and on his return he made very severe laws and did some very harsh
things.  He laid waste an extensive territory, destroying all the
houses upon it and causing thousands of persons to die from lack of
food and shelter, because the people there had not sworn allegiance
to him.

He made a law that all lights should be put out and fires covered
with ashes at eight o'clock every evening, so that the people would
have to go to bed then.  A bell was rung in all cities and towns
throughout England to warn the people of the hour.  The bell was
called the "curfew," from the French words "couvre feu," meaning
"to cover fire."

To find out about the lands of England and their owners, so that
everybody might be made to pay taxes, he appointed officers in all
the towns to report what estates there were, who owned them, and
what they were worth.  The reports were copied into two volumes,
called the "Domesday Book."  This book showed that England at that
time had a population of a little more than a million.

William made war on Scotland, and conquered it.  During a war with
the king of France the city of Mantes (mont) was burned by William's
soldiers.  As William rode over the ruins his horse stumbled and the
king was thrown to the ground and injured.  He was borne to Rouen,
where he lay ill for six weeks.  His sons and even his attendants
abandoned him in his last hours.  It is said that in his death
struggle he fell from his bed to the floor, where his body was
found by his servants.





Peter the Hermit




About 1050-1115


I


During the Middle Ages the Christians of Europe used to go to the
Holy Land for the purpose of visiting the tomb of Christ and other
sacred places.  Those who made such a journey were called "pilgrims."

Every year thousands of pilgrims--kings, nobles and people of
humbler rank--went to the Holy Land.

While Jerusalem was in the hands of the Arabian caliphs who reigned
at Bagdad, the Christian pilgrims were generally well treated.  After
about 1070, when the Turks took possession of the city, outrages
became so frequent that it seemed as if it would not be safe for
Christians to visit the Savior's tomb at all.

About the year 1095 there lived at Amiens (a-me-an') France, a monk
named Peter the Hermit.

Peter was present at a council of clergy and people held at Clermont
in France when his Holiness, Pope Urban II, made a stirring speech.
He begged the people to rescue the Holy Sepulchre and other sacred
sites from the Mohammedans.

The council was so roused by his words that they broke forth into
loud cries, "God wills it!  God wills it!"

"It is, indeed, His will," said the Pope, "and let these words be
your war-cry when you meet the enemy."

Peter listened with deep attention.  Immediately after the council
he began to preach in favor of a war against the Turks.  With head
and feet bare, and clothed in a long, coarse robe tied at the waist
with a rope, he went through Italy from city to city, riding on a
donkey.  He preached in churches, on the streets--wherever he could
secure an audience.

When Peter had gone over Italy he crossed the Alps and preached to
the people of France, Germany, and neighboring countries.  Everywhere
he kindled the zeal of the people, and multitudes enlisted as
champions of the cross.

Thus began the first of seven wars known as the "Crusades" or "Wars
of the Cross," waged to rescue the Holy Land from the Mohammedans.

It is said that more than 100,000 men, women and children went on
the first Crusade.  Each wore on the right shoulder the emblem of
the cross.

Peter was in command of one portion of this great multitude.  His
followers began their journey with shouts of joy and praise.

But they had no proper supply of provisions.  So when passing through
Hungary they plundered the towns and compelled the inhabitants
to support them.  This roused the anger of the Hungarians.  They
attacked the Crusaders and killed a great many of them.

After long delays about seven thousand of those who had started on
the Crusade reached Constantinople.  They were still enthusiastic
and sounded their war-cry, "God wills it!" with as much fervor as
when they first joined Peter's standard.

Leaving Constantinople, they went eastward into the land of the
Turks.  A powerful army led by the sultan met them.  The Crusaders
fought heroically all day long but at length were badly beaten.
Only a few escaped and found their way back to Constantinople.

Peter the Hermit had left the Crusaders before the battle and returned
to Constantinople.  He afterwards joined the army of Godfrey of
Bouillon.

Godfrey's army was composed of six divisions, each commanded by a
soldier of high rank and distinction.  It was a well organized and
disciplined force and numbered about half a million men.

It started only a few weeks after the irregular multitude which
followed Peter the Hermit, and was really the first Crusading army,
for Peter's undisciplined throng could hardly be called an army.

After a long march Godfrey reached Antioch and laid siege to it.

It was believed that this Moslem stronghold could be taken in
a short time; but the city resisted the attacks of the Christians
for seven months.  Then it surrendered.

And now something happened that none of the Crusaders had dreamed
of.  An army of two hundred thousand Persians arrived to help the
Moslems.  They laid siege to Antioch and shut up the Crusaders
within its walls for weeks.  However, after a number of engagements
in which there was great loss of life, the Turks and Persians were
at last driven away.

The way was now opened to Jerusalem.  But out of the half million
Crusaders who had marched from Europe less than fifty thousand were
left.  They had won their way at a fearful cost.

Still onward they pushed with brave hearts, until on a bright
summer morning they caught the first glimpse of the Holy City in
the distance.  For two whole years they had toiled and suffered in
the hope of reaching Jerusalem.  Now it lay before them.

But it had yet to be taken.  For more than five weeks the Crusaders
carried on the siege.  Finally, on the 15th of July, 1099, the
Turks surrendered.  The Moslem flag was hauled down and the banner
of the cross floated over the Holy City.

A few days after the Christians had occupied Jerusalem Godfrey of
Bouillon was chosen king of the Holy Land.

"I will accept the office," he said, "but no crown must be put on
my head and I must never be called king.  I cannot wear a crown of
gold where Christ wore one of thorns nor will I be called king in
the land where once lived the King of Kings."

Peter the Hermit is said to have preached an eloquent sermon on the
Mount of Olives.  He did not, however, remain long in Jerusalem,
but after the capture of the city returned to Europe.  He founded
a monastery in France and within its walls passed the rest of his
life.





Frederick Barbarossa




Emperor from 1152-1190


I


Frederick I was one of the most famous of German emperors.  He was
a tall, stalwart man of majestic appearance.  He had a long red
beard and so the people called him Barbarossa, or Red-Beard.  He
came to the throne in 1152.

At that time the province of Lombardy in northern Italy was a part
of the German empire.

In 1158 Milan (mi-lan'), the chief city of Lombardy, revolted.  Then
over the Alps came an army of a hundred thousand German soldiers,
with Frederick at their head.  After a long siege the city surrendered.

But soon it revolted again.  The emperor besieged it once more and
once more it surrendered.  Its fortifications were destroyed and
many of its buildings ruined.

But even then the spirit of the Lombards was not broken.  Milan
and the other cities of Lombardy united in a league and defied
the emperor.  He called upon the German dukes to bring their men
to his aid.  All responded except Henry the Lion, duke of Saxony,
Frederick's cousin, whom he had made duke of Bavaria also.  Frederick
is said to have knelt and implored Henry to do his duty, but in
vain.

In his campaign against the Lombards Frederick was unsuccessful.  His
army was completely defeated and he was compelled to grant freedom
to the cities of Lombardy.  Everybody blamed Henry the Lion.  The
other dukes charged him with treason and he was summoned to appear
before a meeting of the nobles.  He failed to come and the nobles
thereupon declared him guilty and took from him everything that he
had, except the lands he had inherited from his father.

Frederick now devoted himself to making Germany a united nation.
Two of his nobles had been quarreling for a long time and as a
punishment for their conduct each was condemned, with ten of his
counts and barons, to carry dogs on his shoulders from one country
to another.

Frederick finally succeeded in keeping the nobles in the different
provinces of Germany at peace with one another, and persuaded them
to work together for the good of the whole empire.  He had no more
trouble with them and for many years his reign was peaceful and
prosperous.


II


After the Christians had held Jerusalem for eighty-eight years, it
was recaptured by the Moslems under the lead of the famous Saladin
(Sal'-a-din), in the year 1187.  There was much excitement in
Christendom, and the Pope proclaimed another Crusade.

Frederick immediately raised an army of Crusaders in the German
Empire and with one hundred and fifty thousand men started for
Palestine.

He marched into Asia Minor, attacked the Moslem forces, and defeated
them in two great battles.

But before the brave old warrior reached the Holy Land his career
was suddenly brought to an end.  One day his army was crossing
a small bridge over a river in Asia Minor.  At a moment when the
bridge was crowded with troops Frederick rode up rapidly.

He was impatient to join his son, who was leading the advance
guard; and when he found that he could not cross immediately by the
bridge, he plunged into the river to swim his horse across.  Both
horse and rider were swept away by the current.  Barbarossa's heavy
armor made him helpless and he was drowned.  His body was recovered
and buried at Antioch.

Barbarossa was so much loved by his people that it was said, "Germany
and Frederick Barbarossa are one in the hearts of the Germans."  His
death caused the greatest grief among the German Crusaders.  They
had now little heart to fight the infidels and most of them at once
returned to Germany.

In the Empire the dead hero was long mourned and for many years
the peasants believed that Frederick was not really dead, but was
asleep in a cave in the mountains of Germany, with his gallant
knights around him.  He was supposed to be sitting in his chair
of state, with the crown upon his head, his eyes half-closed in
slumber, his beard as white as snow and so long that it reached
the ground.

"When the ravens cease to fly round the mountain," said the legend,
"Barbarossa shall awake and restore Germany to its ancient greatness."





Henry the Second 1154-1189 and His Sons 1189-1216




I


In 1154, while Barbarossa was reigning in Germany, Henry II, one
of England's greatest monarchs, came to the throne.

Henry was the son of Geoffrey Plantagenet (Plan-tag'-e-net),
Count of Anjou in France, and Matilda, daughter of King Henry I
and granddaughter of William the Conqueror.  Count Geoffrey used
to wear in his hat a sprig of the broom plant, which is called in
Latin "planta genista."  From this he adopted the name Plantagenet,
and the kings who descended from him and ruled England for more
than three hundred years are called the Plantagenets.

Henry II inherited a vast domain in France and managing this in
addition England kept him very busy.  One who knew him well said,
"He never sits down; he is on his feet from morning till night."

His chief assistant in the management of public affairs was Thomas
Becket, whom he made chancellor of the kingdom.  Becket was fond of
pomp and luxury, and lived in a more magnificent manner than even
the king himself.

The clergy had at this time become almost independent of the king.
To bring them under his authority Henry made Becket Archbishop of
Canterbury, thus putting him at the head of the Church in England.
The king expected that Becket would carry out all his wishes.

Becket, however, refused to do that which the king most desired
and a quarrel arose between them.  At last, to escape the king's
anger, Becket fled to France and remained there for six years.

At the end of this time Henry invited him to come back to England.
Not long after, however, the old quarrel began again.  One day
while Henry was sojourning in France, he cried out in a moment of
passion, while surrounded by a group of knights, "Is there no one
who will rid me of this turbulent priest?"

Four knights who heard him understood from this angry speech that
he desired the death of Becket, and they went to England to murder
the Archbishop.  When they met Becket they first demanded that he
should do as the king wished, but he firmly refused.  At dusk that
same day they entered Canterbury Cathedral, again seeking for him.
"Where is the traitor, Thomas Becket?" one of them cried.

Becket boldly answered, "Here am I--no traitor, but a priest of
god."

As he finished speaking the knights rushed upon him and killed him.

The people of England were horrified by this brutal murder.  Becket
was called a martyr and his tomb became a place of pious pilgrimage.
The Pope canonized him and for years he was the most venerated of
English saints.

King Henry was in Normandy when the murder occurred.  He declared
that he had had nothing whatever to do with it and he punished the
murderers.

But from this time Henry had many troubles.  His own sons rebelled
against him, his barons were unfriendly, and conspiracies were
formed.  Henry thought that God was punishing him for the murder
of Becket and so determined to do penance at the tomb of the saint.

For some distance before he reached Canterbury Cathedral where
Becket was buried he walked over the road with bare head and feet.
After his arrival he fasted and prayed a day and a night.  The
next day he put scourges into the hands of the cathedral monks and
said, "Scourge me as I kneel at the tomb of the saint."  The monks
did as he bade them and he patiently bore the pain.

Henry finally triumphed over his enemies and had some years of
peace, which he devoted to the good of England.

In the last year of his life, however, he had trouble again.  The
king of France and Henry's son Richard took up arms against him.
Henry was defeated and was forced to grant what they wished.  When
he saw a list of the barons who had joined the French king he
found among them the name of his favorite son John, and his heart
was broken.  He died a few days later.


II


Henry's eldest surviving son, Richard, was crowned at Westminster
Abbey in 1190.  He took the title of Richard I but is better known
as "Ceur de Lion" ("the lion-hearted"), a name which was given
him on account of his bravery.  He had wonderful strength and his
brave deeds were talked about all over the land.

With such a man for their king, the English people became devoted
to chivalry, and on every field of battle brave men vied with another
in brave deeds.  Knighthood was often the reward of valor.  Then,
as now, knighthood was usually conferred upon a man by his king or
queen.  A part of the ceremony consisted in the sovereign's touching
the kneeling subject's soldier with the flat of a sword and saying,
"Arise, Sir Knight."  This was called "the accolade."

Richard did not stay long in England after his coronation.  In 1191
he went with Philip of France on a Crusade.

The French and English Crusaders together numbered more than one
hundred thousand men. They sailed to the Holy Land and joined an
army of Christian soldiers encamped before the city of Acre.  The
besiegers had despaired of taking the city but when reinforced they
gained fresh courage.

Ceur de Lion now performed deeds of valor which gave him fame
throughout Europe.  He was the terror of the Saracens.  In every
attack on Acre he led the Christians and when the city was captured
he planted his banner in triumph on its walls.

So great was the terror inspired everywhere in the Holy Land by
the name of Richard that Moslem mothers are said to have made their
children quiet by threatening to send for the English king.

Every night when the Crusaders encamped, the heralds blew their
trumpets, and cried three times, "Save the Holy Sepulchre!"  And
the Crusaders knelt and said, "Amen!"

The great leader of the Saracens was Saladin.  He was a model of
heroism and the two leaders, one the champion of the Christians and
the other the champion of the Mohammedans, vied with each other in
knightly deeds.

Just before one battle Richard rode down the Saracen line and
boldly called for any one to step forth and fight him alone.  No
one responded to the challenge, for the most valiant of the Saracens
did not dare to meet the lion-hearted king.

After the capture of Acre Richard took Ascalon (As'-ca-lon).  Then
he made a truce with Saladin, by which the Christians acquired the
right for three years to visit the Holy City without paying for
the privilege.


III


Richard now set out on his voyage home.  He was wrecked, however, on
the Adriatic Sea near Trieste.  To get to England he was obliged
to go through the lands of Leopold, duke of Austria, one of
his bitterest enemies.  So he disguised himself as a poor pilgrim
returning from the Holy Land.

But he was recognized by a costly ring that he wore and was taken
prisoner at Vienna by Duke Leopold.  His people in England anxiously
awaited his return, and when after a long time he did not appear
they were sadly distressed.  There is a legend that a faithful
squire named Blondel went in search of him, as a wandering minstrel
traveled for months over central Europe, vainly seeking for news
of his master.

At last one day, while singing one of Richard's favorite songs near
the walls of the castle where the king was confined, he heard the
song repeated from a window.  He recognized the voice of Richard.
From the window Richard told him to let the English people and
the people of Europe know where he was confined, and the minstrel
immediately went upon his mission.

Soon Europe was astounded to learn that brave Richard of England,
the great champion of Christendom, was imprisoned.  The story
of Blondel is probably not true, but what is true is that England
offered to ransom Richard; that the Pope interceded for him; and
that finally it was agreed that he should be given up on the payment
of a very large sum of money.  The English people quickly paid the
ransom and Richard was freed.

The king of France had little love for Richard, and Richard's own
brother John had less.  Both were sorry that Ceur de Lion was at
liberty.

John had taken charge of the kingdom during his brother's absence,
and hoped that Richard might pass the rest of his days in the prison
castle of Leopold.

As soon as Richard was released, the French king sent word to John,
"The devil is loose again."  And a very disappointed man was John
when all England rang with rejoicing at Richard's return.

Upon the death of Richard, in 1199, Arthur, the son of his elder
brother Geoffrey, was the rightful heir to the throne.  John,
however, seized the throne himself and cast Arthur into prison.
There is a legend that he ordered Arthur's eyes to be put out with
red hot irons.  The jailor, however, was touched by the boy's prayer
for mercy and spared him.  But Arthur was not to escape his uncle
long.  It is said that one night the king took him out upon the
Seine in a little boat, murdered him and cast his body into the
river.

Besides being a king of England, John was duke of Normandy, and
Philip, king of France, now summoned him to France to answer for
the crime of murdering Arthur.  John would not answer the summons
and this gave the king of France an excuse for taking possession
of Normandy.  He did so, and thus this great province was lost
forever to England.  Nothing in France was left to John except
Aquitaine (A-qui-taine'), which had come to him through his mother.

John's government was unjust and tyrannical, and the bishops and
barons determined to preserve their rights and the rights of the
people.  They met on a plain called Runnymeade, and there forced
John to sign the famous "Magna Carta" ("Great Charter").

Magna Carta is the most valuable charter ever granted by any sovereign
to his people.  In it King John names all the rights which belong
to the citizens under a just government, and he promises that no
one of these rights shall ever be taken away from any subjects of
the English king.  For violating this promise one English king lost
his life and another lost the American colonies.

Magna Carta was signed in 1215.  A year after he signed it the king
died.  His son, Henry III, succeeded him.





Louis the Ninth




King from 1226-1270


I


After the time of Barbarossa and Richard Ceur de Lion lived another
great Crusading king.  This was a grandson of Philip II, named
Louis IX, who became sovereign of France in 1226.  He was then only
eleven years old, so for some years his mother ruled the kingdom.

A few years after he had begun to reign Louis decided to make his
brother Alphonse the governor of a certain part of France.  The
nobles of the region refused to have Alphonse as governor and
invited Henry III of England to help them in a revolt.

Henry crossed to France with an army to support the rebellious
nobles.  He was duke of Aquitaine and Gascony; so that although he
was the king in England he had to do homage to the king of France
for his possessions in that country, and fight for him if called
upon to do so.

Louis gathered an army and hastened to meet the English troops.
He drove Henry from place to place, until at last he forced him
to make terms of peace.  The rebellious nobles who had invited the
English king to France soon after swore allegiance to Louis and
afterwards he had little trouble in his kingdom.

Once Louis was dangerously ill and his life was despaired of.
Finally he was believed to be dying and his wife and chief officials
gathered round his bed to await the end.  Suddenly he roused himself
and said in a feeble voice, "The cross!  The cross!"

They laid the cross upon his heart and he clasped it fervently.
For a while he slumbered.  When he awoke he appeared much better.
In a day or two he was entirely well.  He then made a solemn vow
that in thankfulness for his restoration he would go on a Crusade
to the Holy Land.

Louis lived at a time when everybody was full of the Crusading
spirit.  A few years before he was born even the children in France
and Germany started out upon a Crusade of their own.  It is called
in history the "Children's Crusade."  Several thousand left their
homes and marched toward the Mediterranean.  They thought that God
would open a pathway to the Holy Land for them through its waters.
A number of them died of cold and hunger when trying to cross the
Alps.  Some reached Rome, and when the Pope saw them he told them
to return home and not think of going on a Crusade until they were
grown up.

It is easy to understand how in such an age people flocked to
Louis' banner when he asked for volunteers to go with him on another
Crusade.

In a few months forty thousand Crusaders assembled at a French port
on the Mediterranean Sea.  On a bright day in August, 1248, they
went on board the fleet which was ready to sail.  The king called
to the Crusaders, "Sing in the name of God.  Shout forth his praises
as we sail away."  Then quickly, on ship after ship, shouts of
praise burst from the lips of thousands and amid the grand chorus
the fleet began its voyage.

The Crusaders went to Damietta (Dam-i-et'-ta), in Egypt.  Louis
was so eager to land that he jumped into water up to his waist and
waded ashore.  He captured the city without striking a blow.

He had resolved to make war on the Moslems in Egypt rather than in
the Holy Land, so when he left Damietta he marched southward.

He supposed there would be no strong force to stop his progress.
However, he was mistaken, for he had not marched forty miles toward
Cairo when he was attacked by a Moslem army led by the sultan of
Egypt.

A great battle was fought.  The Crusaders were commanded by King
Louis and throughout the battle showed the utmost bravery, but they
were outnumbered.  Thousands were slain and the survivors retreated
toward Damietta.

The Moslems pursued them and the Crusaders were obliged to surrender.
Out of the forty thousand men who had left France only about six
thousand now remained.  Many had died of disease as well as in
battle.

King Louis was among the prisoners, and the sultan of Egypt agreed
to release him only upon the payment of a large ransom.

When the ransom had been paid a truce was made for ten years between
Louis and the sultan, and the good king left Egypt.  He then went
to the Holy Land, and for four years worked to deliver Crusaders
who were in Moslem prisons.


II


During the time that Louis was in the Holy Land his mother ruled
France as regent.  When she died he returned immediately to his
kingdom and devoted himself to governing it.

In 1252 he took part in the founding of the Sorbonne, the most
famous theological college of Europe from the days of St. Louis
down to the time of the French Revolution.

He ruled his people so wisely and justly that it is hard to find
any better king or even one equally as good in the whole line
of French kings.  He never wronged any man himself, or knowingly
allowed any man to be wronged by others.

Near his palace there was a grand oak with wide-spreading branches,
under which he used to sit on pleasant days in summer.  There
he received all persons who had complaints to make, rich and poor
alike.  Every one who came was allowed to tell his story without
hindrance.

For hours Louis would listen patiently to all the tales of wrong-doing,
of hardships and misery that were told him, and he would do what
he could to right the wrongs of those who suffered.

When news came of some more dreadful persecutions of Christians by
the Moslems in Palestine, Louis again raised an army of Crusaders
and started with them for Tunis, although he was sick and feeble--so
sick, indeed, that he had to be carried on a litter.  Upon his
arrival at Tunis he was attacked by fever and died in a few days.

He is better known to the world as Saint Louis than as Louis IX,
because some years after his death Pope Boniface VIII canonized
him on account of his pious life and his efforts to rescue the Holy
Land from the Turks.





Robert Bruce




King from 1306-1329


The most famous king that Scotland ever had was Robert Bruce.  He
lived in the days when Edward I, Edward II, and Edward III were
kings of England.

During the reign of Edward I the king of Scotland died and thirteen
men claimed the throne.  Instead of fighting to decide which of them
should be king they asked Edward to settle the question.  When he
met the Scottish nobles and the rivals, each of whom thought that
next day he would be wearing the crown, Edward told them that he
would himself be their king.  Just then an English army marched
up.  What could the nobles do but kneel at the feet of Edward and
promise to be his vassals?  This they did; and so Scotland became
a part of Edward's kingdom and Baliol (Ba'-li-ol), one of the rivals
who claimed the Scottish throne, was made the vassal king.

Some time after this Edward ordered Baliol to raise an army and
help him fight the French.  Baliol refused to do this, so Edward
marched with an army into Scotland and took him prisoner.  He was
determined that the Scotch should have no more kings of their own.
So he carried away the sacred stone of Scone (scoon), on which all
kings of Scotland had to sit when they were crowned, and put it in
Westminster Abbey in London, and there it is to this day.  [NOTE
FROM Brett Fishburne:  As of 1994, the stone is in Edinburgh
Castle.]  It is underneath the chair on which the sovereigns of
England always sit when the crown of England, Scotland, and Ireland
is placed upon their heads.  It is said to have been the very
stone that Jacob used for a pillow on the night that he saw, in his
dream, angels ascending and descending on the ladder that reached
from earth to heaven.

Edward now supposed, as he had this sacred stone and had put King
Baliol in prison, that Scotland was conquered.

But the men whom he appointed to govern the Scotch ruled unwisely
and nearly all the people were discontented.  Suddenly an army of
Scots was raised.  It was led by Sir William Wallace, a knight who
was almost a giant in size.  Wallace's men drove the English out
of the country and Wallace was made the "Guardian of the Realm."

Edward then led a great army against him.  The Scottish soldiers were
nearly all on foot.  Wallace arranged them in hollow squares--spearmen
on the outside, bowmen within.  The English horsemen dashed vainly
against the walls of spear-points.  But King Edward now brought
his archers to the front.  Thousands of arrows flew from their bows
and thousands of Wallace's men fell dead.  The spears were broken
and the Scotch were defeated.  Wallace barely escaped with his life.
He was afterwards betrayed to Edward, who cruelly put him to death.


II


But the Scotch had learned what they could do and they still went
on fighting for freedom, under two leaders named Robert Bruce and
John Comyn.  Edward marched against them with another large army.
He won a great victory, and the nobles once more swore to obey him.

But in spite of this oath, Bruce meant to free Scotland if he could,
and win the crown.  He was privately crowned king of Scotland in
the Abbey of Scone in 1306.

He said to his wife, "Henceforth you are the queen and I am the
king of our country."

"I fear," said his wife, "that we are only playing at being king
and queen, like children in their games."

"Nay, I shall be king in earnest," said Bruce.

The news that Bruce had been crowned roused all Scotland and the
people took up arms to fight under him against the English.  But
again King Edward defeated the Scotch and Bruce himself fled to
the Grampian Hills.

For two months he was closely pursued by the English who used
bloodhounds to track him.  He and his followers had many narrow
escapes.  Once he had to scramble barefoot up some steep rocks, and
another time all the party would have been captured had not Bruce
awakened just in time to hear the approach of the enemy.  He and
his men lived by hunting and fishing.

However, many brave patriots joined them, until after a while Bruce
had a small army.  Five times he attacked the English, and five
times he was beaten.  After his last defeat he fled from Scotland
and took refuge in a wretched hut on an island off the north coast
of Ireland.  Here he stayed all alone during one winter.


III


It is said that one day, while he was very down-hearted, he saw
a spider trying to spin a web between two beams of his hut.  The
little creature tried to throw a thread from one beam to another,
but failed.  Not discouraged, it tried four times more without
success.

"Five times has the spider failed," said Bruce.  "That is just the
number of times the English have defeated me.  If the spider has
courage to try again, I also will try to free Scotland!"

He watched the spider.  It rested for a while as if to gain strength,
and then threw its slender thread toward the beam.  This time it
succeeded.

"I thank God!" exclaimed Bruce.  "The spider has taught me a lesson.
No more will I be discouraged."

About this time Edward I died and his son, Edward II, succeeded
to the throne of England.  For about two years the new king paid
little attention to Scotland.

Meantime Bruce captured nearly all the Scotch castles that were held
by the English, and the nobles and chiefs throughout the country
acknowledged him as their king.

At last Edward II marched into Scotland at the head of a hundred
thousand men.  Bruce met him at Bannockburn on June 24, 1314, with
thirty thousand soldiers.

Before the battle began Bruce rode along the front of his army to
encourage his men.  Suddenly an English knight, Henry de Bohun,
galloped across the field and tried to strike him down with
a spear.  Bruce saw his danger in time and with a quick stroke of
his battle-axe cleft the knight's skull.

The Scotch army shouted again and again at this feat of their
commander, and they went into the battle feeling sure that the
victory would be theirs.  They rushed upon the English with fury
and although outnumbered three to one, completely defeated them.
Thousands of the English were slain and a great number captured.

In spite of this terrible blow Edward never gave up his claim to
the Scottish crown.  But his son Edward III, in 1328, recognized
Scotland's independence and acknowledged Bruce as her king.





Marco Polo




Lived from 1254-1324


I


Some years before St. Louis led his last Crusade there was born in
Venice a boy named Marco Polo.  His father was a wealthy merchant
who often went on trading journeys to distant lands.

In 1271, when Marco was seventeen years old, he accompanied his
father and uncle on a journey through the Holy Land, Persia and
Tartary, and at length to the Empire of China--then called Cathay
(Ca-thay').  It took the travelers three years to reach Cathay.

The emperor of Cathay was a monarch named Kublai Khan (koo' bli-kan'),
who lived in Peking.

Marco's father and uncle had been in Cathay once before and had
entertained Kublai Khan by telling him about the manners and customs
of Europe.

So when the two Venetian merchants again appeared in Peking, Kublai
Khan was glad to see them.  He was also greatly pleased with the
young Marco, whom he invited to the palace.

Important positions at the Chinese court were given to Marco's
father and uncle, and so they and Marco lived in the country for
some years.  Marco studied the Chinese language, and it was not
very long before he could speak it.

When he was about twenty-one Kublai Khan sent him on very important
business to a distant part of China.  He did the work well and from
that time was often employed as an envoy of the Chinese monarch.  His
travels were sometimes in lands never before visited by Europeans
and he had many strange adventures among the almost unknown tribes
of Asia.  Step by step he was promoted.  For several years he was
governor of a great Chinese city.

Finally he and his father and uncle desired to return to Venice.
They had all served Kublai Khan faithfully and he had appreciated
it and given them rich rewards; but he did not wish to let them
go.

While the matter was being talked over an embassy arrived in Peking
from the king of Persia.  This monarch desired to marry the daughter
of Kublai Khan, the Princess Cocachin, and he had sent to ask her
father for her hand.  Consent was given, and Kublai Khan fitted
out a fleet of fourteen ships to carry the wedding party to Persia.

The Princess Cocachin was a great friend of Marco Polo, and urged
her father to allow him to go with the party.  Finally Kublai Khan
gave his consent.  Marco's father and uncle were also allowed to
go, and the three Venetians left China.

The fleet with the wedding party on board sailed southward on the
China Sea.  It was a long and perilous voyage.  Stops were made at
Borneo, Sumatra, Ceylon and other places, until the ships entered
the Persian Gulf and the princess was safely landed.  After
they reached the capital of Persia the party, including the three
Venetians, was entertained by the Persians for weeks in a magnificent
manner and costly presents were given to all.

At last the Venetians left their friends, went to the Black Sea
and took ship for Venice.

They had been away so long and were so much changed in appearance
that none of their relations and old friends knew them when they
arrived in Venice.  As they were dressed in Tatar costume and
sometimes spoke the Chinese language to one another, they found it
hard to convince people that they were members of the Polo family.

At length, on order to show that they were the men that they declared
themselves to be, they gave a dinner to all their relations and
old friends.  When the guests arrived they were greeted by the
travelers, arrayed in gorgeous Chinese robes of crimson satin.
After the first course they appeared in crimson damask; after the
second, they changed their costumes to crimson velvet; while at
the end of the dinner they appeared in the usual garb of wealthy
Venetians.

"Now, my friends," said Marco, "I will show you something that will
please you."  He then brought into the room the rough Tatar coats
which he and his father and uncle had worn when they reached
Venice.  Cutting open the seams, he took from inside the lining
packets filled with rubies, emeralds and diamonds.  It was the
finest collection of jewels ever seen in Venice.

The guests were now persuaded that their hosts were indeed what
they claimed to be.


II


Eight hundred years before Marco Polo's birth, some of the people
of North Italy had fled before the Attila to the muddy islands of
the Adriatic and founded Venice upon them.  Since then the little
settlement had become the most wealthy and powerful city of Europe.
Venice was the queen of the Adriatic and her merchants were princes.
They had vessels to bring the costly wares of the East to their
wharves; they had warships to protect their rich cargoes from the
pirates of the Mediterranean; they carried on wars.  At the time
when Marco Polo returned from Cathay they were at war with Genoa
(Gen'-o-a).

The two cities were fighting for the trade of the world.  In a
great naval battle the Venetians were completely defeated.  Marco
Polo was in the battle and with many of his countrymen was captured
by the enemy.  For a year he was confined in a Genoese prison.  One
of his fellow-prisoners was a skillful penman and Marco dictated
to him an account of his experiences in China, Japan, and other
Eastern countries.  This account was carefully written out.  Copies
of the manuscript exist to this day.  One of these is in a library
in Paris.  It was carried into France in the year 1307.  Another
copy is preserved in the city of Berne.  It is said that the book
was translated into many languages, so that people in all parts
of Europe learned about Marco's adventures.  About a hundred and
seventy-five years after the book was written, the famous Genoese,
Christopher Columbus, planned his voyage across the Atlantic.  It
is believed that he had read Marco's description of Java, Sumatra
and other East India Islands, which he thought he had reached when
he discovered Haiti (Hai'-ti) and Cuba.  So Marco Polo may have
suggested to Columbus the voyage which led to the discovery of
America.





Edward the Black Prince




Lived from 1330-1376


I


One of the most famous warriors of the Middle Ages was Edward the
Black Prince.  He was so called because he wore black armor in
battle.

The Black Prince was the son of Edward III who reigned over England
from 1327 to 1377.  He won his fame as a soldier in the wars which
his father carried on against France.

You remember that the early kings of England, from the time
of William the Conqueror, had possessions in France.  Henry II,
William's grandson, was the duke of Normandy and lord of Brittany
and other provinces, and when he married Eleanor of Aquitaine she
brought him that province also.

Henry's son John lost all the French possessions of the English
crown except a part of Aquitaine, and Edward III inherited this.
So when Philip of Valois (val-wah') became king of France, about
a year after Edward had become king of England, Edward had to do
homage to Philip.

To be king of England and yet to do homage to the king of France--to
bend the knee before Philip and kiss his foot--was something Edward
did not like.  He thought it was quite beneath his dignity, as his
ancestor Rollo had thought when told that he must kiss the foot of
King Charles.

So Edward tried to persuade the nobles of France that he himself
ought by right to be the king of France instead of being only
a vassal.  Philip of Valois was only a cousin of the late French
King Charles IV.  Edward was the son of his sister.  But there was
a curious old law in France, called the Salic Law, which forbade
that daughters should inherit lands.  This law barred the claim
of Edward, because his claim came through his mother.  Still he
determined to win the French throne by force of arms.

A chance came to quarrel with Philip.  Another of Philip's vassals
rebelled against him, and Edward helped the rebel.  He hoped by
doing so to weaken Philip and more easily overpower him.

Philip at once declared that Edward's possessions in France were
forfeited.

Then Edward raised an army of thirty thousand men, and with it
invaded France.

The Black Prince was now only about sixteen years of age, but he
had already shown himself brave in battle, and his father put him
in command of one of the divisions of the army.

Thousands of French troops led by King Philip were hurried from
Paris to meet the advance of the English; and on the 26th of August,
1346, the two armies fought a hard battle at the village of Crecy.

During the battle the division of the English army commanded by
the Black Prince had to bear the attack of the whole French force.
The prince fought so bravely and managed his men so well that King
Edward, who was overlooking the field of battle from a windmill on
the top of a hill, sent him words of praise for his gallant work.

Again and again the prince's men drove back the French in splendid
style.  But at last they seemed about to give way before a very
fierce charge, and the earl of Warwick hastened to Edward to advise
him to send the prince aid.

"Is my son dead or unhorsed or so wounded that he cannot help
himself?" asked the king.

"No, Sire," was the reply; "but he is hard pressed."

"Return to your post, and come not to me again for aid so long as
my son lives," said the king.  "Let the boy prove himself a true
knight and win his spurs."

The earl went to the prince and told him what his father had said.
"I will prove myself a true knight," exclaimed the prince.  "My
father is right.  I need no aid.  My men will hold their post as
long as they have strength to stand."

Then he rode where the battle was still furiously raging, and
encouraged his men.  The king of France led his force a number of
times against the prince's line, but could not break it and was at
last compelled to retire.

The battle now went steadily against the French, although they
far outnumbered the English.  Finally, forty thousand of Philip's
soldiers lay dead upon the field and nearly all the remainder of
his army was captured.  Philip gave up the struggle and fled.  Among
those who fought on the side of the French at Crecy was the blind
king of Bohemia, who always wore three white feathers in his helmet.
When the battle was at its height the blind king had his followers
lead him into the thick of the fight, and he dealt heavy blows upon
his unseen foes until he fell mortally wounded.  The three white
feathers were taken from his helmet by the Black Prince, who ever
after wore them himself.

As soon as he could King Edward rode over the field to meet his
son.  "Prince," he said, as he greeted him, "you are the conqueror
of the French."  Turning to the soldiers, who had gathered around
him, the king shouted, "Cheer, cheer for the Black Prince!  Cheer
for the hero of Crecy!"

What cheering then rose on the battle-field!  The air rang with
the name of the Black Prince.

Soon after the battle of Crecy King Edward laid siege to Calais;
but the city resisted his attack for twelve months.  During the
siege the Black Prince aided his father greatly.

After the capture of Calais, it was agreed to stop fighting for
seven years, and Edward's army embarked for England.


II


In 1355 Edward again declared war against the French.  The Black
Prince invaded France with an army of sixty thousand men.  He
captured rich towns and gathered a great deal of booty.  While he
was preparing to move on Paris, the king of France raised a great
army and marched against him.

The Black Prince had lost so many men by sickness that he had only
about ten thousand when he reached the city of Poitiers.  Suddenly,
near the city, he was met by the French force of about fifty-five
thousand, splendidly armed and commanded by the king himself.

"God help us!" exclaimed the prince, when he looked at the long
lines of the French as they marched on a plain before him.

Early on the morning of September 14, 1356, the battle began.  The
English were few in number, but they were determined to contest
every inch of the ground and not surrender while a hundred of
them remained to fight.  For hours they withstood the onset of the
French.  At last a body of English horsemen charged furiously on
one part of the French line, while the Black Prince attacked another
part.

This sudden movement caused confusion among the French.  Many of
them fled from the field.  When the Black Prince saw this he shouted
to his men, "Advance, English banners, in the name of God and St.
George!"  His army rushed forward and the French were defeated.
Thousands of prisoners were taken, including the king of France
and many of his nobles.

The king was sent to England, where he was treated with the greatest
kindness.  When, some time afterwards there was a splendid procession
in London to celebrate the victory of Poitiers, he was allowed to
ride in the procession on a beautiful white horse, while the Black
Prince rode on a pony at his side.

The Black Prince died in 1376.  He was sincerely mourned by the
English people.  They felt that they had lost a prince who would
have made a great and good king.





William Tell and Arnold von Winkelried




I


Far up among the Alps, in the very heart of Switzerland, are three
districts, or cantons, as they are called, which are known as the
Forest Cantons and are famous in the world's history.  About two
thousand years ago the Romans found in these cantons a hardy race
of mountaineers, who, although poor, were free men and proud of
their independence.  They became the friends and allies of Rome,
and the cantons were for many years a part of the Roman Empire, but
the people always had the right to elect their own officers and to
govern themselves.

When Goths and the Vandals and the Huns from beyond the Rhine and
the Danube overran the Roman Empire, these three cantons were not
disturbed.  The land was too poor and rocky to attract men who were
fighting for possession of the rich plains and valleys of Europe,
and so it happened that for century after century, the mountaineers
of these cantons lived on in their old, simple way, undisturbed by
the rest of the world.

In a canton in the valley of the Rhine lived the Hapsburg family,
whose leaders in time grew to be very rich and powerful.  They
became dukes of Austria and some of them were elected emperors.
One of the Hapsburgs, Albert I, claimed that the land of the Forest
Cantons belonged to him.  He sent a governor and a band of soldiers
to those cantons and made the people submit to his authority.

In one of the Forest Cantons at this time lived a famous mountaineer
named William Tell.  He was tall and strong.  In all Switzerland no
man had a foot so sure as his on the mountains or a hand so skilled
in the use of a bow.  He was determined to resist the Austrians.

Secret meetings of the mountaineers were held and all took a solemn
oath to stand by each other and fight for their freedom; but they
had no arms and were simple shepherds who had never been trained
as soldiers.  The first thing to be done was to get arms without
attracting the attention of the Austrians.  It took nearly a year
to secure spears, swords, and battle-axes and distribute them among
the mountains.  Finally this was done, and everything was ready.
All were waiting for a signal to rise.

The story tells us that just at this time Gessler, the Austrian
governor, who was a cruel tyrant, hung a cap on a high pole in the
market-place in the village of Altorf, and forced everyone who passed
to bow before it.  Tell accompanied by his little son, happened to
pass through the marketplace.  He refused to bow before the cap and
was arrested.  Gessler offered to release him if he would shoot an
apple from the head of his son.  The governor hated Tell and made
this offer hoping that the mountaineer's hand would tremble and
that he would kill his own son.  It is said that Tell shot the apple
from his son's head but that Gessler still refused to release him.
That night as Tell was being carried across the lake to prison a
storm came up.  In the midst of the storm he sprang from the boat
to an over-hanging rock and made his escape.  It is said that he
killed the tyrant.  Some people do not believe this story, but the
Swiss do, and if you go to Lake Lucerne some day they will show
you the very rock upon which Tell stepped when he sprang from the
boat.

That night the signal fires were lighted on every mountain and
by the dawn of day the village of Altorf was filled with hardy
mountaineers, armed and ready to fight for their liberty.  A battle
followed and the Austrians were defeated and driven from Altorf.
This victory was followed by others.

A few years later, the duke himself came with a large army,
determined to conquer the mountaineers.  He had to march through
a narrow pass, with mountains rising abruptly on either side.  The
Swiss were expecting him and hid along the heights above the pass,
as soon as the Austrians appeared in the pass, rocks and trunks of
trees were hurled down upon them.  Many were killed and wounded.
Their army was defeated, and the duke was forced to recognize the
independence of the Forest Cantons.

This was the beginning of the Republic of Switzerland.  In time
five other cantons joined them in a compact for liberty.


II


About seventy years later the Austrians made another attempt to
conquer the patriots.  They collected a splendid army and marched
into the mountains.  The Swiss at once armed themselves and met
the Austrians at a place called Sempach.  In those times powder
had not been invented, and men fought with spears, swords, and
battle-axes.  The Austrian soldiers stood shoulder to shoulder,
each grasping a long spear whose point projected far in front of
him.  The Swiss were armed with short swords and spears and it was
impossible for them to get to the Austrians.  For a while their cause
looked hopeless, but among the ranks of the Swiss was a brave man
from one of the Forest Cantons.  His name was Arnold von Winkelried
(Win'-kel-ried).  As he looked upon the bristling points of the
Austrian spears, he saw that his comrades had no chance to win
unless an opening could be made in that line.  He determined to
make such an opening even at the cost of his life.  Extending his
arms as far as he could, he rushed toward the Austrian line and
gathered within his arms as many spears as he could grasp.


"Make way for liberty!" he cried-- Then ran, with arms extended
wide,  As if his dearest friend to clasp;  Ten spears he swept
within his grasp.  "Make way for liberty!" he cried-- Their keen
points met from side to side.   He bowed among them like a tree,
And thus made way for liberty.


Pierced through and through Winkelried fell dead, but he had made
a gap in the Austrian line, and into this gap rushed the Swiss
patriots.  Victory was theirs and the Cantons were free.





Tamerlane




Lived from 1333-1405


I


Tamerlane was the son of the chief of a Mongolian tribe in Central
Asia.  His real name was Timour, but as he was lamed in battle
when a youth he was generally called Timour the Lame, and this name
was gradually changed to Tamerlane.  He was born in 1333, so that
he lived in the time of the English king, Edward III, when the
Black Prince was winning his victories over the French.  He was a
descendant of a celebrated Tatar soldier, Genghis (jen'-ghis) Khan,
who conquered Persia, China, and other countries of Asia.  When
twenty-four years old Tamerlane became the head of his tribe, and
in a few years he made himself the leader of the whole Mongolian
race.

He was a tall, stern-looking man, of great strength, and, although
lame in his right leg, could ride a spirited horse at full gallop
and do all the work of an active soldier.  He was as brave as a
lion--and as cruel.

He chose the ancient city of Samarcand (Sa-mar-cand'), in Turkistan
(Tur-kis-tan'), for his capital; and here he built a beautiful
marble palace, where he lived in the greatest luxury.

After he had enjoyed for some time the honors which fell to him as
chief ruler of the Mongolians, he began to desire further conquests.
He determined to make himself master of all the countries of Central
Asia.

"As there is but one God in heaven," he said, "there ought to be
but one ruler on the earth."

So he gathered an immense army from all parts of his dominion, and
for weeks his subjects were busy making preparations for war.  At
length he started for Persia in command of a splendid army.  After
gaining some brilliant victories he forced the Persian king to flee
from his capital.

All the rich country belonging to Persia, from the Tigris to the
Euphrates, submitted to the Mongolian conqueror.

Tamerlane celebrated his Persian conquest by magnificent festivities
which continued for a week.  Then orders were given to march into
the great Tatar empire of the North.  Here Tamerlane was victorious
over the principal chiefs and made them his vassals.  In pursuing
the Tatars he entered Russia and sacked and burned some of the
Russian cities.  He did not, however, continue his invasion of this
country, but turned in the direction of India.

At last his army stood before the city of Delhi, and after a fierce
assault forced it to surrender.  Other cities of India were taken
and the authority of Tamerlane was established over a large extent
of the country.


II


Bajazet (baj-a-zet'), sultan of Turkey, now determined to stop
Tamerlane's eastward march.

News of this reached the conqueror's ears.  Leaving India, he
marched to meet the sultan.  Bajazet was a famous warrior.  He was
so rapid in his movements in war that he was called "the lightning."

Tamerlane entered the sultan's dominions and devastated them.  He
stormed Bagdad, and after capturing the place killed thousands of
the inhabitants.

At length the rivals and their armies faced each other.  A great
battle followed.  It raged four or five hours and then the Turks
were totally defeated.  Bajazet was captured.

Tamerlane then ordered a great iron cage to be made and forced the
sultan to enter it.  The prisoner was chained to the iron bars of
the cage and was thus exhibited to the Mongol soldiers, who taunted
him as he was carried along the lines.

As the army marched from place to place the sultan in his cage was
shown to the people.  How long the fallen monarch had to bear this
humiliating punishment is not known.

Tamerlane's dominions now embraced a large part of Asia.  He
retired to his palace at Samarcand and for several weeks indulged
in festivities.

He could not, however, long be content away from the field of
battle.  So he made up his mind to invade the Empire of China.  At
the head of a great army of two hundred thousand soldiers he marched
from the city of Samarcand towards China.  He had gone about three
hundred miles on the way when, in February, 1405, he was taken
sick and died.  His army was disbanded and all thought of invading
China was given up.

Thus passed away one of the greatest conquerors of the Middle Ages.
He was a soldier of genius but he cannot be called a truly great
man.  His vast empire speedily fell to pieces after his death.  Since
his day there has been no leader like him in that part of Asia.





Henry V




King from 1413-1422


I


Of all the kings that England ever had Henry V was perhaps the
greatest favorite among the people.  They liked him because he was
handsome and brave and, above all, because he conquered France.

In his youth, Prince Hal, as the people called him, had a number
of merry companions who sometimes got themselves into trouble by
their pranks.  Once one of them was arrested and brought before
the chief justice of the kingdom.

Prince Hal was not pleased because sentence was given against his
companion and he drew his sword, threatening the judge.  Upon this
the judge bravely ordered the prince to be arrested and put into
prison.

Prince Hal submitted to his punishment with good grace and his
father is reported to have said, "Happy is the monarch who has so
just a judge, and a son so willing to obey the law."

One of Prince Hal's companions was a fat old knight named Sir John
Falstaff.  Once Falstaff was boasting that he and three men had
beaten and almost killed two men in buckram suits who had attacked
and tried to rob them.  The prince led him on and gave him a chance
to brag as much as he wanted to, until finally Falstaff swore that
there were at least a hundred robbers and that he himself fought
with fifty.  Then Prince Hal told their companions that only two
men had attacked Falstaff and his friends, and that he and another
man who was present were those two.  And he said that Falstaff,
instead of fighting, had run as fast as his legs could carry him.

There was real goodness as well as merriment in Prince Hal.  And
so the people found; for when he became king on the death of his
father he told his wild companions that the days of his wildness
were over; and he advised them to lead better lives in future.

As Henry V, Prince Hal made himself famous in English history by
his war with France.

Normandy, you remember, had belonged to Henry's ancestor, William
the Conqueror.  It had been taken from King John of England by the
French king, Philip Augustus, in 1203.

Soon after his coronation Henry sent a demand to the French king
that Normandy should be restored, and he made the claim which his
great-grandfather, Edward III, had made that he was by right the
king of France.

Of course, the king of France would not acknowledge this.  Henry
therefore raised an army of thirty thousand men and invaded France.

Before he began to attack the French he gave strict orders to his
men that they were to harm no one who was not a soldier and to
take nothing from the houses or farms of any persons who were not
fighting.

Sickness broke out among Henry's troops after they landed, so
that their number was reduced to about fifteen thousand.  Fifty or
sixty thousand Frenchmen were encamped on the field of Agincourt
(azh-an-koor') to oppose this little army.

The odds were greatly against Henry.  The night before the battle
one of his officers said he wished that the many thousand brave
soldiers who were quietly sleeping in their beds in England were
with the king.

"I would not have a single man more," said Henry.  "If god give
us victory, it will be plain we owe it to His grace.  If not, the
fewer we are the less loss for England."

The men drew courage from their king.  The English archers poured
arrows into the ranks of their opponents; and although the French
fought bravely, they were completely routed.  Eleven thousand
Frenchmen fell.  Among the slain were more than a hundred of the
nobles of the land.


II


Agincourt was not the last of Henry's victories.  He brought a
second army of forty thousand men over to France.  Town after town
was captured, and at last Henry and his victorious troops laid siege
to Rouen, which was then the largest and richest city in France.

The fortifications were so strong that Henry could not storm them,
so he determined to take the place by starving the garrison.  He
said, "War has three handmaidens--fire, blood, and famine.  I have
chosen the meekest of the three."

He had trenches dug round the town and placed soldiers in them to
prevent citizens from going out of the city for supplies, and to
prevent the country people from taking provisions in.

A great number of the country people had left their homes when
they heard that the English army was marching towards Rouen, and
had taken refuge within the city walls.  After the siege had gone
on for six months there was so little food left in the place that
the commander of the garrison ordered these poor people to go back
to their homes.

Twelve thousand were put outside the gates, but Henry would not
allow them to pass through his lines; so they starved to death
between the walls of the French and the trenches of the English.

As winter came on the suffering of the citizens was terrible.  At
last they determined to set fire to the city, open their gates,
and make a last desperate attack on the English.

Henry wished to preserve the city and offered such generous terms
of surrender that the people accepted them.  Not only Rouen but
the whole of Normandy, which the French had held for two hundred
years, was now forced to submit to Henry.

The war continued for about two years more, and the English gained
possession of such a large part of France that at Christmas Henry
entered Paris itself in triumph.

But, strange to say, the king against whom he had been fighting
and over whom he was triumphing sat by his side as he rode through
the streets.  What did this mean?  It meant that the French were
so terrified by the many victories of Henry that all--king and
people--were willing to give him whatever he asked.  A treaty was
made that as the king was feeble Henry should be regent of the
kingdom and that when the king died Henry should succeed him as
king of France.

In the treaty the French king also agreed to give to Henry his
daughter, the Princess Katherine, in marriage.  She became the
mother of the English King, Henry VI.

The arrangement that an English sovereign should be king of France
was never put into effect; for in less than two years after the
treaty was signed the reign of the great conqueror came to an end.
Henry died.

In the reign of his son all his work in gaining French territory
was undone.  By the time that Henry VI was twenty years old England,
as you will read in the story of Joan of Arc, had nothing left of
all that had been won by so many years of war except the single
town of Calais.





Joan of Arc




Lived from 1412-1431


I


In the long wars between the French and English not even the Black
Prince or King Henry V gained such fame as did a young French
peasant girl, Joan of Arc.

She was born in the little village of Domremy (dom-re-me').  Her
father had often told her of the sad condition of France--how the
country was largely in the possession of England, and how the French
king did not dare to be crowned.

And so the thought came to be ever in her mind, "How I pity my
country!"  She brooded over the matter so much that by and by she
began to have visions of angels and heard strange voices, which
said to her, "Joan, you can deliver the land from the English.  go
to the relief of King Charles."

At last these strange visions and voices made the young girl believe
that she had a mission from God, and she determined to try to save
France.

When she told her father and mother of her purpose, they tried to
persuade her that the visions of angels and the voices telling her
of the divine mission were but dreams.  "I tell thee, Joan," said
her father, "it is thy fancy.  Thou hadst better have a kind husband
to take care of thee, and do some work to employ thy mind."

"Father, I must do what God has willed, for this is no work of my
choosing," she replied.  "Mother, I would far rather sit and spin
by your side than take part in war.  My mission is no dream.  I
know that I have been chosen by the Lord to fulfill His purpose and
nothing can prevent me from going where He purposes to send me."

The village priest, her young companions, even the governor of the
town, all tried to stop her, but it was in vain.

To the governor she said, "I must do the work my Lord has laid out
for me."

Little by little people began to believe in her mission.  At last
all stopped trying to discourage her and some who were wealthy
helped her to make the journey to the town of Chinon (she-non'),
where the French king, Charles the Seventh, was living.


II


When Joan arrived at Chinon, a force of French soldiers was preparing
to go to the south of France to relieve the city of Orleans which
the English were besieging.

King Charles received Joan kindly and listened to what she had to
say with deep attention.  The girl spoke modestly, but with a calm
belief that she was right.

"Gracious King," she said, "my name is Joan.  God has sent me to
deliver France from her enemies.  You shall shortly be crowned in
the cathedral of Rheims (remz).  I am to lead the soldiers you are
about to send for the relief of Orleans.  So God has directed and
under my guidance victory will be theirs."

The king and his nobles talked the matter over and finally it was
decided to allow Joan to lead an army of about five thousand men
against the English at Orleans.

When she left Chinon at the head of her soldiers, in April, 1429,
she was in her eighteenth year.  Mounted on a fine war-horse and
clad in white armor from head to foot, she rode along past the
cheering multitude, "seeming rather," it has been said, "of heaven
than earth."  In one hand she carried an ancient sword that she
had found near the tomb of a saint, and in the other a white banner
embroidered with lilies.

The rough soldiers who were near her left off their oaths and coarse
manners, and carefully guarded her.  She inspired the whole army
with courage and faith as she talked about her visions.

When she arrived at the besieged city of Orleans she fearlessly
rode round its walls, while the English soldiers looked on in
astonishment.  She was able to enter Orleans, despite the efforts
of the besiegers to prevent her.

She aroused the city by her cheerful, confident words and then led
her soldiers forth to give battle to the English.  Their success
was amazing.  One after another the English forts were taken.

When only the strongest remained and Joan was leading the attacking
force, she received a slight wound and was carried out of the
battle to be attended by a surgeon.  Her soldiers began to retreat.
"Wait," she commanded, "eat and drink and rest; for as soon as I
recover I will touch the walls with my banner and you shall enter
the fort."  In a few minutes she mounted her horse again and riding
rapidly up to the fort, touched it with her banner.  Her soldier
almost instantly carried it.  The very next day the enemy's troops
were forced to withdraw from before the city and the siege was at
end.

The French soldiers were jubilant at the victory and called Joan
the "Maid of Orleans."  By this name she is known in history.
Her fame spread everywhere, and the English as well as the French
thought she had more than human power.

She led the French in several other battles, and again and again
her troops were victorious.

At last the English were driven far to the north of France.  Then
Charles, urged by Joan, went to Rheims with twelve thousand soldiers,
and there, with splendid ceremonies, was crowned king.  Joan holding
her white banner, stood near Charles during the coronation.

When the ceremony was finished, she knelt at his feet and said, "O
King, the will of God is done and my mission is over!  Let me now
go home to my parents."

But the king urged her to stay a while longer, as France was not
entirely freed from the English.  Joan consented, but she said, "I
hear the heavenly voices no more and I am afraid."

However she took part in an attack upon the army of the Duke of
Burgundy, but was taken prisoner by him.  For a large sum of money
the duke delivered her into the hands of the English, who put her
in prison in Rouen.  She lay in prison for a year, and finally
was charged with sorcery and brought to trial.  It was said that
she was under the influence of the Evil One.  She declared to her
judges her innocence of the charge and said, "God has always been
my guide in all that I have done.  The devil has never had power
over me."

Her trial was long and tiresome.  At its close she was doomed to
be burned at the stake.

So in the market-place at Rouen the English soldiers fastened her
to a stake surrounded by a great pile of fagots.

A soldier put into her hands a rough cross, which he had made from
a stick that he held.  She thanked him and pressed it to her bosom.
Then a good priest, standing near the stake, read to her the prayers
for the dying, and another mounted the fagots and held towards her
a crucifix, which she clasped with both hands and kissed.  When
the cruel flames burst out around her, the noble girl uttered the
word "Jesus," and expired.

A statue of her now stands on the spot where she suffered.

Among all the men of her time none did nobler work than Joan.  And
hence it is that we put the story of her life among the stories
of the lives of the great MEN of the Middle Ages, although she was
only a simple peasant girl.





Gutenberg




Lived from 1400-1468


I


While Joan of Arc was busy rescuing France from the English, another
wonderful worker was busy in Germany.  This was John Gutenberg,
who was born in Mainz.

The Germans--and most other people--think that he was the inventor
of the art of printing with movable types.  And so in the cities of
Dresden and Mainz his countrymen have put up statues in his memory.

Gutenberg's father was a man of good family.  Very likely the boy
was taught to read.  But the books from which he learned were not
like ours; they were written by hand.  A better name for them than
books is "manuscripts," which means "hand-writings."

While Gutenberg was growing up a new way of making books came into
use, which was a great deal better than copying by hand.  It was
what is called block-printing.  The printer first cut a block of
hard wood the size of the page that he was going to print.  Then he
cut out every word of the written page upon the smooth face of his
block.  This had to be very carefully done.  When it was finished
the printer had to cut away the wood from the sides of every
letter.  This left the letters raised, as the letters are in books
now printed for the blind.

The block was now ready to be used.  The letters were inked, paper
was laid upon them and pressed down.

With blocks the printer could make copies of a book a great deal
faster than a man could write them by hand.  But the making of the
blocks took a long time, and each block would print only one page.

Gutenberg enjoyed reading the manuscripts and block books that his
parents and their wealthy friends had; and he often said it was a
pity that only rich people could own books.  Finally he determined
to contrive some easy and quick way of printing.

He did a great deal of his work in secret, for he thought it was
much better that his neighbors should know nothing of what he was
doing.

So he looked for a workshop where no one would be likely to find
him.  He was now living in Strasburg, and there was in that city a
ruined old building where, long before his time, a number of monks
had lived.  There was one room of the building which needed only a
little repairing to make it fit to be used.  So Gutenberg got the
right to repair that room and use it as his workshop.

All his neighbors wondered what became of him when he left home in
the early morning, and where he had been when they saw him coming
back late in the twilight.  Some felt sure that he must be a wizard,
and that he had meetings somewhere with the devil, and that the
devil was helping him to do some strange business.

Gutenberg did not care much what people had to say, and in his
quiet room he patiently tried one experiment after another, often
feeling very sad and discouraged day after day because his experiments
did not succeed.

At last the time came when he had no money left.  He went back to
his old home, Mainz, and there met a rich goldsmith named Fust (or
Faust).

Gutenberg told him how hard he had tried in Strasburg to find some
way of making books cheaply, and how he had now no more money to
carry on his experiments.  Fust became greatly interested and gave
Gutenberg what money he needed.  But as the experiments did not
at first succeed Fust lost patience.  He quarreled with Gutenberg
and said that he was doing nothing but spending money.  At last he
brought suit against him in the court, and the judge decided in
favor of Fust.  So everything in the world that Gutenberg had, even
the tools with which he worked, came into Fust's possession.


II


But though he had lost his tools, Gutenberg had not lost his courage.
And he had not lost all his friends.  One of them had money, and he
bought Gutenberg a new set of tools and hired a workshop for him.
And now at last Gutenberg's hopes were fulfilled.  First of all it
is thought that he made types of hard wood.  Each type was a little
block with a single letter at one end.  Such types were a great
deal better than block letters.  The block letters were fixed.
They could not be taken out of the words of which they were parts.
The new types were movable so they could be set up to print one
page, then taken apart and set up again and again to print any
number of pages.

But type made of wood did not always print the letters clearly and
distinctly, so Gutenberg gave up wood types and tried metal types.
Soon a Latin Bible was printed.  It was in two volumes, each of
which had three hundred pages, while each of the pages had forty-two
lines.  The letters were sharp and clear.  They had been printed
from movable types of metal.


III


The Dutch claim that Lorenz Coster, a native of Harlem, in the
Netherlands, was the first person who printed with movable type.
They say that Coster was one day taking a walk in a beech forest
not far from Harlem, and that he cut bark from one of the trees
and shaped it with his knife into letters.

Not long after this the Dutch say Coster had made movable types
and was printing and selling books in Harlem.

The news that books were being printed in Mainz by Gutenberg went
all over Europe, and before he died printing-presses like his were
at work making books in all the great cities of the continent.

About twenty years after his death, when Venice was the richest of
European cities, a man named Aldus (Al'-dus) Manutius (Ma-nu'-tius)
established there the most famous printing house of that time.
He was at work printing books two years before Columbus sailed on
his first voyage.  The descendents of Aldus continued the business
after his death for about one hundred years.  The books published
by them were called "Aldine," from Aldus.  They were the most
beautiful that had ever come from the press.  They are admired and
valued to this day.





Warwick the Kingmaker




Lived from 1428-1471


I


The earl of Warwick, known as the "kingmaker," was the most famous
man in England for many years after the death of Henry V.  He lived
in a great castle with two towers higher than most church spires.
It is one of the handsomest dwellings in the world and is visited
every year by thousands of people.  The kingmaker had a guard of
six hundred men.  At his house in London meals were served to so
many people that six fat oxen were eaten at breakfast alone.  He
had a hundred and ten estates in different parts of England and
no less than 30,000 persons were fed daily at his board.  He owned
the whole city of Worcester, and besides this and three islands,
Jersey, Guernsey and Alderney, so famed in our time for their
cattle, belonged to him.

He had a cousin of whom he was as fond as if he were a brother.
This was Richard, duke of York, who was also own cousin to King
Henry VI, the son of Henry V.

One evening as the sun was setting, and the warders were going to
close the gates of the city of York for the night, a loud blast of
a horn was heard.  It was made by the sentry on the wall near the
southern gate.  An armed troop was approaching.  When they drew
near the gate their scarlet coats embroidered with the figure of
a boar proved them to be the men of the earl of Warwick.  The earl
himself was behind them.  The gate was opened.

Passing through it and on to the castle, the earl and his company
were soon within its strong stone walls.

"Cousin," said the earl of Warwick to the duke of York as they sat
talking before a huge log fire in the great room of the castle,
"England will not long endure the misrule of a king who is half
the time out of his mind."

The earl spoke the truth.  Every now and then Henry VI lost his
reason, and the duke of York, or some other nobleman, had to govern
the kingdom for him.

The earl of Warwick added:  "You are the rightful heir to the
throne.  The claim of Henry VI comes through Lancaster, the fourth
son of Edward III--yours through Lionel, the second.  His claim
comes through his father only--yours through both your father and
mother.  It is a better claim and it is a double claim."

"That is true, my cousin of Warwick," replied the duke of York,
"but we must not plunge England into war."

"Surely not if we can help it," replied the earl.  "Let us first
ask for reform.  If the king heeds our petition, well and good.
If not I am determined, cousin of York, that you shall sit on the
throne of England instead of our insane sovereign."

A petition was soon drawn up and signed and presented to Henry.
It asked that Henry would do something which would make the people
contented.

The king paid no attention to it.  Then a war began.  It was the
longest and most terrible that ever took place in England.  It
lasted for thirty years.

Those who fought on the king's side were called Lancastrians, because
Henry's ancestor, John of Gaunt, was the duke of Lancaster.  The
friends of Richard were called Yorkists, because he was duke of York.
The Lancastrians took a red rose for their badge; the Yorkists a
white one.  For this reason the long struggle has always been called
the "War of the Roses."

In the first great battle the Red Rose party was defeated and the
king himself was taken prisoner.

The victors now thought that the duke of York ought to be made king
at once.  However, a parliament was called to decide the question,
and it was agreed that Henry should be king as long as he lived,
but that at his death the crown should pass to the duke of York.


II


Most people though this was a wise arrangement; but Queen Margaret,
Henry's wife, did not like it at all, because it took from her
son the right to reign after his father's death.  So she went to
Scotland and the North of England, where she had many friends, and
raised an army.

She was a brave woman and led her men in a battle in which she
gained the victory.  The duke of York was killed, and the queen
ordered some of her men to cut off his head, put upon it a paper
crown in mockery, and fix it over one of the gates of the city of
York.

Warwick attacked the queen again as soon as he could; but again
she was victorious and captured from Warwick her husband, the king,
whom the earl had held prisoner for some time past.

This was a great triumph for Margaret, for Henry became king once
more.

But the people were still discontented.  The York party was determined
that Edward, the son of the old duke of York, should be made king.
So thousands flocked to the White Rose standard and Warwick marched
to London at their head.

The queen saw that her only safety was in flight.  She left London
and the kingmaker entered the city in triumph.

The citizens had been very fond of the old duke of York, and when
his party proclaimed his handsome young son King Edward IV, the
city resounded with the cry "God save King Edward."

Brave Queen Margaret was completey defeated in another battle.
The story is told that after this she fled into a forest with her
young son.  A robber met them, but Margaret, with wonderful courage,
said to him, "I am your queen and this is your prince.  I entrust
him to your care."

The man was pleased with the confidence that she showed.  He took
her and the young prince to a safe hiding place, and helped them
to escape from England in a sailing vessel.


III


Edward IV now seemed to be seated securely upon the throne.  But
trouble was near.  Warwick wished him to follow his advice.  Edward
thought he could manage without any advice.  Then the king and the
kingmaker quarreled, and at last became open enemies and fought
one another on the field of battle.  The end of it was that Warwick
was defeated, and driven out of the country.  He sailed across the
channel and sought refuge in France.

There whom should he meet but his old enemy, Queen Margaret.  She
had beaten him in battle, and had beheaded his cousin Richard,
duke of York; he had beaten her and driven her from her kingdom;
and twice he had made her husband prisoner and taken from him his
crown.  In spite of all this the two now became fast friends, and
the kingmaker agreed to make war upon Edward and restore Henry to
the throne.

He asked assistance from Louis XI, king of France, who supplied
him with men and money.  So with an army of Frenchmen the kingmaker
landed on the shores of England.  Thousands of Englishmen who were
tired of Edward flocked to Warwick's standard, and when he reached
London he had an army of sixty thousand men.

Edward fled without waiting for a battle and escaped to the
Netherlands in a sailing-vessel.  The kingmaker had now no one to
resist him.  The gates of London were opened to him, and the citizens
heartily welcomed him.  Marching to the Tower, he brought out the
old king and placed him once more upon the throne.

But though Edward had fled, he was not discouraged.  He followed
the example of the kingmaker and asked aid from foreign friends.
The duke of Burgundy supplied him with money and soldiers, and he
was soon back in England.

His army grew larger and larger every day.  People had been very
much dissatisfied with Edward and had rejoiced to get rid of him
and have Henry for king, because if Henry was not clever he was
good.  But in a short time they had found out that England needed
a king who was not only good but capable.

So when Edward and his French soldiers landed most people in England
welcomed them.  The kingmaker was now on the wrong side.

Edward met him in battle at a place called Barnet, and completely
defeated him.  Warwick was killed and Henry once more became
prisoner.

In another battle both Margaret and her son were made prisoners.
The son was brutally murdered in the presence of King Edward.
Margaret was placed in the Tower, and King Henry, who died soon
after the battle of Tewksbury, was probably poisoned by order of
Edward.

In 1438, after a reign of twenty-two years, Edward died, leaving
two sons.  Both were boys, so Edward's brother, Richard, duke of
Gloucester, was made regent until young Edward V, the older of the
two, should come of age.

But Richard was determined to make himself king.  So he put both
the young princes in the Tower.  He than hired ruffians to murder
them.  One night, when the little princes were asleep, the murderers
smothered them with pillows and buried their bodies at the foot of
a stairway in the Tower, and there, after many years, their bones
were found.

After Richard had murdered his two nephews, he was crowned king,
as Richard III, much pleased that his plans had succeeded so well.
He thought that now nobody could lay claim to the throne.  But he
was mistaken.  One person did claim it.  This was Henry Tudor, earl
of Richmond.

Henry's father, Edmund Tudor, was only a Welsh gentleman, but was
the half-brother of Henry VI through their mother Queen Katherine.
Henry's mother was descended from John of Gaunt, fourth son of
Edward III, and thus through his mother he was of royal blood and
a Lancastrian.

When Richard III by his wickedness and cruelty had made all England
hate him, the Red Rose party gathered about Henry Tudor, raised an
army, and fought against the king in the battle of Bosworth.

Richard was a bad man, but he was brave, and he fought like a
lion.  However, it was all in vain.  He was defeated and killed.
His body was thrown on the back of a horse, carried to a church
near the field of battle and buried.

The battered crown which Richard had worn was picked up and placed
on Henry's head and the whole Lancastrian army shouted, "Long live
King Henry!"

Parliament now voted that Henry Tudor and his heirs should be
kings of England.  Not long afterwards Henry married the heiress of
the house of York, and thus both the Red Roses and the White were
satisfied, as the king was a Lancastrian and the queen a Yorkist.
So the long and terrible Wars of the Roses came to an end.


THE END










Scanned and proofed by Alfred J. Drake (www.ajdrake.com)





FROUDACITY (1889)
J.J. Thomas

WEST INDIAN FABLES BY JAMES ANTHONY FROUDE
EXPLAINED BY J. J. THOMAS


Contents


Preface by J.J. Thomas

BOOK I.

Introduction: 27-33
Voyage out: 34-41
Barbados: 41-44
St. Vincent: 44-48
Grenada: 48-50

BOOK II.

Trinidad: 53-55
Reform in Trinidad: 55-80
Negro Felicity in the West Indies: 81-110

BOOK III.

Social Revolution: 113-174
West Indian Confederation: 175-200
The Negro as a Worker: 201-206
Religion for Negroes: 207-230

BOOK IV.

Historical Summary or Resume: 233-261, end



FROUDACITY

PREFACE

[5] Last year had well advanced towards its middle--in fact it was
already April, 1888--before Mr. Froude's book of travels in the West
Indies became known and generally accessible to readers in those
Colonies.

My perusal of it in Grenada about the period above mentioned
disclosed, thinly draped with rhetorical flowers, the dark outlines
of a scheme to thwart political aspiration in the Antilles.  That
project is sought to be realized by deterring the home authorities
from granting an elective local legislature, however restricted in
character, to any of the Colonies not yet enjoying such an advantage.
An argument based on the composition of the inhabitants of those
Colonies is confidently relied upon to confirm the inexorable mood of
Downing Street.

[6] Over-large and ever-increasing,--so runs the argument,--the
African element in the population of the West Indies is, from its
past history and its actual tendencies, a standing menace to the
continuance of civilization and religion.  An immediate catastrophe,
social, political, and moral, would most assuredly be brought about
by the granting of full elective rights to dependencies thus
inhabited.  Enlightened statesmanship should at once perceive the
immense benefit that would ultimately result from such refusal of the
franchise.  The cardinal recommendation of that refusal is that it
would avert definitively the political domination of the Blacks,
which must inevitably be the outcome of any concession of the modicum
of right so earnestly desired.  The exclusion of the Negro vote being
inexpedient, if not impossible, the exercise of electoral powers by
the Blacks must lead to their returning candidates of their own race
to the local legislatures, and that, too, in numbers preponderating
according to the majority of the Negro electors.  The Negro
legislators thus supreme in the councils of the Colonies would
straightway proceed to pass vindictive and retaliatory laws against
their white fellow- [7] colonists.  For it is only fifty years since
the White man and the Black man stood in the reciprocal relations of
master and slave.  Whilst those relations subsisted, the white
masters inflicted, and the black slaves had to endure, the hideous
atrocities that are inseparable from the system of slavery.  Since
Emancipation, the enormous strides made in self-advancement by the
ex-slaves have only had the effect of provoking a resentful
uneasiness in the bosoms of the ex-masters.  The former bondsmen, on
their side, and like their brethren of Hayti, are eaten up with
implacable, blood-thirsty rancour against their former lords and
owners.  The annals of Hayti form quite a cabinet of political and
social object lessons which, in the eyes of British statesmen, should
be invaluable in showing the true method of dealing with Ethiopic
subjects of the Crown.  The Negro race in Hayti, in order to obtain
and to guard what it calls its freedom, has outraged every humane
instinct and falsified every benevolent hope.  The slave-owners there
had not been a whit more cruel than slave-owners in the other
islands.  But, in spite of this, how ferocious, how sanguinary, [8]
how relentless against them has the vengeance of the Blacks been in
their hour of mastery!  A century has passed away since then, and,
notwithstanding that, the hatred of Whites still rankles in their
souls, and is cherished and yielded to as a national creed and guide
of conduct.  Colonial administrators of the mighty British Empire,
the lesson which History has taught and yet continues to teach you in
Hayti as to the best mode of dealing with your Ethiopic colonists
lies patent, blood-stained and terrible before you, and should be
taken definitively to heart.  But if you are willing that
Civilization and Religion--in short, all the highest developments of
individual and social life--should at once be swept away by a
desolating vandalism of African birth; if you do not recoil from the
blood-guiltiness that would stain your consciences through the
massacre of our fellow-countrymen in the West Indies, on account of
their race, complexion and enlightenment; finally, if you desire
those modern Hesperides to revert into primeval jungle, horrent lairs
wherein the Blacks, who, but a short while before, had been
ostensibly civilized, shall be revellers, as high-priests and [9]
devotees, in orgies of devil-worship, cannibalism, and obeah--dare to
give the franchise to those West Indian Colonies, and then rue the
consequences of your infatuation! . . .

Alas, if the foregoing summary of the ghastly imaginings of Mr.
Froude were true, in what a fool's paradise had the wisest and best
amongst us been living, moving, and having our being!  Up to the date
of the suggestion by him as above of the alleged facts and
possibilities of West Indian life, we had believed (even granting the
correctness of his gloomy account of the past and present positions
of the two races) that to no well-thinking West Indian White, whose
ancestors may have, innocently or culpably, participated in the gains
as well as the guilt of slavery, would the remembrance of its palmy
days be otherwise than one of regret.  We Negroes, on the other hand,
after a lapse of time extending over nearly two generations, could be
indebted only to precarious tradition or scarcely accessible
documents for any knowledge we might chance upon of the sufferings
endured in these Islands of the West by those of our race who have
gone before us.  Death, with undiscriminating hand, had gathered [10]
in the human harvest of masters and slaves alike, according to or out
of the normal laws of nature; while Time had been letting down on the
stage of our existence drop-scene after drop-scene of years, to the
number of something like fifty, which had been curtaining off the
tragic incidents of the past from the peaceful activities of the
present.  Being thus circumstanced, thought we, what rational
elements of mutual hatred should now continue to exist in the bosoms
of the two races?

With regard to the perpetual reference to Hayti, because of our
oneness with its inhabitants in origin and complexion, as a criterion
for the exact forecast of our future conduct under given
circumstances, this appeared to us, looking at actual facts,
perversity gone wild in the manufacture of analogies.  The founders
of the Black Republic, we had all along understood, were not in any
sense whatever equipped, as Mr. Froude assures us they were, when
starting on their self-governing career, with the civil and
intellectual advantages that had been transplanted from Europe.  On
the contrary, we had been taught to regard them as most unfortunate
in the circumstances under which [11] they so gloriously conquered
their merited freedom.  We saw them free, but perfectly illiterate
barbarians, impotent to use the intellectual resources of which their
valour had made them possessors, in the shape of books on the spirit
and technical details of a highly developed national existence.  We
had learnt also, until this new interpreter of history had
contradicted the accepted record, that the continued failure of Hayti
to realize the dreams of Toussaint was due to the fatal want of
confidence subsisting between the fairer and darker sections of the
inhabitants, which had its sinister and disastrous origin in the
action of the Mulattoes in attempting to secure freedom for
themselves, in conjunction with the Whites, at the sacrifice of their
darker-hued kinsmen.  Finally, it had been explained to us that the
remembrance of this abnormal treason had been underlying and
perniciously influencing the whole course of Haytian national
history.  All this established knowledge we are called upon to throw
overboard, and accept the baseless assertions of this conjuror-up of
inconceivable fables!  He calls upon us to believe that, in spite of
being free, educated, progressive, and at peace with [12] all men, we
West Indian Blacks, were we ever to become constitutionally dominant
in our native islands, would emulate in savagery our Haytian fellow-
Blacks who, at the time of retaliating upon their actual masters,
were tortured slaves, bleeding and rendered desperate under the
oppressors' lash--and all this simply and merely because of the
sameness of our ancestry and the colour of our skin!  One would have
thought that Liberia would have been a fitter standard of comparison
in respect of a coloured population starting a national life, really
and truly equipped with the requisites and essentials of civilized
existence.  But such a reference would have been fatal to Mr.
Froude's object: the annals of Liberia being a persistent refutation
of the old pro-slavery prophecies which our author so feelingly
rehearses.

Let us revert, however, to Grenada and the newly-published "Bow of
Ulysses," which had come into my hands in April, 1888.

It seemed to me, on reading that book, and deducing therefrom the
foregoing essential summary, that a critic would have little more to
do, in order to effectually exorcise this negrophobic political
hobgoblin, than to appeal to [13] impartial history, as well as to
common sense, in its application to human nature in general, and to
the actual facts of West Indian life in particular.

History, as against the hard and fast White-master and Black-slave
theory so recklessly invented and confidently built upon by Mr.
Froude, would show incontestably--(a) that for upwards of two hundred
years before the Negro Emancipation, in 1838, there had never existed
in one of those then British Colonies, which had been originally
discovered and settled for Spain by the great Columbus or by his
successors, the Conquistadores, any prohibition whatsoever, on the
ground of race or colour, against the owning of slaves by any free
person possessing the necessary means, and desirous of doing so; (b)
that, as a consequence of this non-restriction, and from causes
notoriously historical, numbers of blacks, half-breeds, and other
non-Europeans, besides such of them as had become possessed of their
"property" by inheritance, availed themselves of this virtual
license, and in course of time constituted a very considerable
proportion of the slave-holding section of those communities; (c)
that these [14] dusky plantation-owners enjoyed and used in every
possible sense the identical rights and privileges which were enjoyed
and used by their pure-blooded Caucasian brother-slaveowners.  The
above statements are attested by written documents, oral tradition,
and, better still perhaps, by the living presence in those islands of
numerous lineal representatives of those once opulent and flourishing
non-European planter-families.

Common sense, here stepping in, must, from the above data, deduce
some such conclusions as the following.  First that, on the
hypothesis that the slaves who were freed in 1838--full fifty years
ago--were all on an average fifteen years old, those vengeful ex-
slaves of to-day will be all men of sixty-five years of age; and,
allowing for the delay in getting the franchise, somewhat further
advanced towards the human life-term of threescore and ten years.
Again, in order to organize and carry out any scheme of legislative
and social retaliation of the kind set forth in the "Bow of Ulysses,"
there must be (which unquestionably there is not) a considerable,
well-educated, and very influential number surviving of those who had
actually [15] been in bondage.  Moreover, the vengeance of these
people (also assuming the foregoing nonexistent condition) would
have, in case of opportunity, to wreak itself far more largely and
vigorously upon members of their own race than upon Whites, seeing
that the increase of the Blacks, as correctly represented in the "Bow
of Ulysses," is just as rapid as the diminution of the White
population.  And therefore, Mr. Froude's "Danger-to-the-Whites" cry
in support of his anti-reform manifesto would not appear, after all,
to be quite so justifiable as he possibly thinks.

Feeling keenly that something in the shape of the foregoing programme
might be successfully worked up for a public defence of the maligned
people, I disregarded the bodily and mental obstacles that have beset
and clouded my career during the last twelve years, and cheerfully
undertook the task, stimulated thereto by what I thought weighty
considerations.  I saw that no representative of Her Majesty's
Ethiopic West Indian subjects cared to come forward to perform this
work in the more permanent shape that I felt to be not only desirable
but essential for our self-vindication.  [16] I also realized the
fact that the "Bow of Ulysses" was not likely to have the same
ephemeral existence and effect as the newspaper and other periodical
discussions of its contents, which had poured from the press in Great
Britain, the United States, and very notably, of course, in all the
English Colonies of the Western Hemisphere.  In the West Indian
papers the best writers of our race had written masterly refutations,
but it was clear how difficult the task would be in future to procure
and refer to them whenever occasion should require.  Such
productions, however, fully satisfied those qualified men of our
people, because they were legitimately convinced (even as I myself am
convinced) that the political destinies of the people of colour could
not run one tittle of risk from anything that it pleased Mr. Froude
to write or say on the subject.  But, meditating further on the
question, the reflection forced itself upon me that, beyond the mere
political personages in the circle more directly addressed by Mr.
Froude's volume, there were individuals whose influence or possible
sympathy we could not afford to disregard, or to esteem lightly.  So
I deemed it right and a patriotic duty to attempt [17] the enterprise
myself, in obedience to the above stated motives.

At this point I must pause to express on behalf of the entire
coloured population of the West Indies our most heartfelt
acknowledgments to Mr. C. Salmon for the luminous and effective
vindication of us, in his volume on "West Indian Confederation,"
against Mr. Froude's libels.  The service thus rendered by Mr. Salmon
possesses a double significance and value in my estimation.  In the
first place, as being the work of a European of high position, quite
independent of us (who testifies concerning Negroes, not through
having gazed at them from balconies, decks of steamers, or the seats
of moving carriages, but from actual and long personal intercourse
with them, which the internal evidence of his book plainly proves to
have been as sympathetic as it was familiar), and, secondly, as the
work of an individual entirely outside of our race, it has been
gratefully accepted by myself as an incentive to self-help, on the
same more formal and permanent lines, in a matter so important to the
status which we can justly claim as a progressive, law-abiding, and
self-respecting section of Her Majesty's liege subjects.

[18] It behoves me now to say a few words respecting this book as a
mere literary production.

Alexander Pope, who, next to Shakespeare and perhaps Butler, was the
most copious contributor to the current stock of English maxims,
says:

     "True ease in writing comes from Art, not Chance,
     As those move easiest who have learnt to dance."

A whole dozen years of bodily sickness and mental tribulation have
not been conducive to that regularity of practice in composition
which alone can ensure the "true ease" spoken of by the poet; and
therefore is it that my style leaves so much to be desired, and
exhibits, perhaps, still, more to be pardoned.  Happily, a quarrel
such as ours with the author of "The English in the West Indies"
cannot be finally or even approximately settled on the score of
superior literary competency, whether of aggressor or defender.  I
feel free to ignore whatever verdict might be grounded on a
consideration so purely artificial.  There ought to be enough, if not
in these pages, at any rate in whatever else I have heretofore
published, that should prove me not so hopelessly stupid and wanting
in [19] self-respect, as would be implied by my undertaking a contest
in artistic phrase-weaving with one who, even among the foremost of
his literary countrymen, is confessedly a master in that craft.  The
judges to whom I do submit our case are those Englishmen and others
whose conscience blends with their judgment, and who determine such
questions as this on their essential rightness which has claim to the
first and decisive consideration.  For much that is irregular in the
arrangement and sequence of the subject-matter, some blame fairly
attaches to our assailant.  The erratic manner in which lie launches
his injurious statements against the hapless Blacks, even in the
course of passages which no more led up to them than to any other
section of mankind, is a very notable feature of his anti-Negro
production.  As he frequently repeats, very often with cynical
aggravations, his charges and sinister prophecies against the sable
objects of his aversion, I could see no other course open to me than
to take him up on the points whereto I demurred, exactly how, when,
and where I found them.

My purpose could not be attained up without direct mention of, or
reference to, certain public [20] employes in the Colonies whose
official conduct has often been the subject of criticism in the
public press of the West Indies.  Though fully aware that such
criticism has on many occasions been much more severe than my own
strictures, yet, it being possible that some special responsibility
may attach to what I here reproduce in a more permanent shape, I most
cheerfully accept, in the interests of public justice, any
consequence which may result.

A remark or two concerning the publication of this rejoinder.  It has
been hinted to me that the issue of it has been too long delayed to
secure for it any attention in England, owing to the fact that the
West Indies are but little known, and of less interest, to the
generality of English readers.  Whilst admitting, as in duty bound,
the possible correctness of this forecast, and regretting the oft-
recurring hindrances which occasioned such frequent and, sometimes,
long suspension of my labour; and noting, too, the additional delay
caused through my unacquaintance with English publishing usages, I
must, notwithstanding, plead guilty to a lurking hope that some small
fraction of Mr. Froude's readers will yet be found, [21] whose
interest in the West Indies will be temporarily revived on behalf of
this essay, owing to its direct bearing on Mr. Froude and his
statements relative to these Islands, contained in his recent book of
travels in them.  This I am led to hope will be more particularly the
case when it is borne in mind that the rejoinder has been attempted
by a member of that very same race which he has, with such eloquent
recklessness of all moral considerations, held up to public contempt
and disfavour.  In short, I can scarcely permit myself to believe it
possible that concern regarding a popular author, on his being
questioned by an adverse critic of however restricted powers, can be
so utterly dead within a twelvemonth as to be incapable of
rekindling.  Mr. Froude's "Oceana," which had been published long
before its author voyaged to the West Indies, in order to treat the
Queen's subjects there in the same more than questionable fashion as
that in which he had treated those of the Southern Hemisphere, had
what was in the main a formal rejoinder to its misrepresentations
published only three months ago in this city.  I venture to believe
that no serious work in defence of an [22] important cause or
community can lose much, if anything, of its intrinsic value through
some delay in its issue; especially when written in the vindication
of Truth, whose eternal principles are beyond and above the influence
of time and its changes.

At any rate, this attempt to answer some of Mr. Froude's main
allegations against the people of the West Indies cannot fail to be
of grave importance and lively interest to the inhabitants of those
Colonies.  In this opinion I am happy in being able to record the
full concurrence of a numerous and influential body of my fellow-West
Indians, men of various races, but united in detestation of falsehood
and injustice.

J.J.T.

LONDON, June, 1889.



BOOK I: INTRODUCTION

[27] Like the ancient hero, one of whose warlike equipments furnishes
the complementary title of his book, the author of "The English in
the West Indies; or, The Bow of Ulysses," sallied forth from his home
to study, if not cities, at least men (especially black men), and
their manners in the British Antilles.

James Anthony Froude is, beyond any doubt whatever, a very
considerable figure in modern English literature.  It has, however,
for some time ceased to be a question whether his acceptability, to
the extent which it reaches, has not been due rather to the verbal
attractiveness than to the intrinsic value and trustworthiness of his
opinions and teachings.  In fact, so far as a judgment can be formed
from examined specimens of his writings, it appears that our [28]
author is the bond-slave of his own phrases.  To secure an artistic
perfection of style, he disregards all obstacles, not only those
presented by the requirements of verity, but such as spring from any
other kind of consideration whatsoever.  The doubt may safely be
entertained whether, among modern British men of letters, there be
one of equal capability who, in the interest of the happiness of his
sentences, so cynically sacrifices what is due not only to himself as
a public instructor, but also to that public whom he professes to
instruct.  Yet, as the too evident plaything of an over-permeable
moral constitution, he might set up some plea in explanation of his
ethical vagaries.  He might urge, for instance, that the high culture
of which his books are all so redolent has utterly failed to imbue
him with the nil admirari sentiment, which Horace commends as the
sole specific for making men happy and keeping them so.  For, as a
matter of fact, and with special reference to the work we have
undertaken to discuss, Mr.  Froude, though cynical in his general
utterances regarding Negroes-of the male sex, be it noted-is, in the
main, all extravagance and self-abandonment whenever he [29] brings
an object of his arbitrary likes or dislikes under discussion.  At
such times he is no observer, much less worshipper, of proportion in
his delineations.  Thorough-paced, scarcely controllable, his
enthusiasm for or against admits no degree in its expression, save
and except the superlative.  Hence Mr.  Froude's statement of facts
or description of phenomena, whenever his feelings are enlisted
either way, must be taken with the proverbial "grain of salt" by all
when enjoying the luxury of perusing his books.  So complete is his
self-identification with the sect or individual for the time being
engrossing his sympathy, that even their personal antipathies are
made his own; and the hostile language, often exaggerated and unjust,
in which those antipathies find vent, secures in his more chastened
mode of utterance an exact reproduction none the less injurious
because divested of grossness.

Of this special phase of self-manifestation a typical instance is
afforded at page 164, under the heading of "Dominica," in a passage
which at once embraces and accentuates the whole spirit and method of
the work.  To a eulogium of the professional skill and successful
[30] agricultural enterprise of Dr.  Nichol, a medical officer of
that Colony, with whom he became acquainted for the first time during
his short stay there, our author travels out of his way to tack on a
gratuitous and pointless sneer at the educational competency of all
the elected members of the island legislature, among whom, he tells
us, the worthy doctor had often tried in vain to obtain a place.  His
want of success, our author informs his readers, was brought about
through Dr.  Nichol "being the only man in the Colony of superior
attainments."  Persons acquainted with the stormy politics of that
lovely little island do not require to be informed that the bitterest
animosity had for years been raging between Dr.  Nichol and some of
the elected members-a fact which our author chose characteristically
to regard as justifying an onslaught by himself on the whole of that
section of which the foes of his new friend formed a prominent part.

Swayed by the above specified motives, our author also manages to see
much that is, and always has been, invisible to mortal eye, and to
fail to hear what is audible to and remarked upon by every other
observer.

[31] Thus we find him (p. 56) describing the Grenada Carenage as
being surrounded by forest trees, causing its waters to present a
violet tint; whilst every one familiar with that locality knows that
there are no forest trees within two miles of the object which they
are so ingeniously made to colour.  Again, and aptly illustrating the
influence of his prejudices on his sense of hearing, we will notice
somewhat more in detail the following assertion respecting the speech
of the gentry of Barbados:--

"The language of the Anglo-Barbadians was pure English, the voices
without the smallest transatlantic intonation."

Now it so happens that no Barbadian born and bred, be he gentle or
simple, can, on opening his lips, avoid the fate of Peter of Galilee
when skulking from the peril of a detected nationality: "Thy speech
bewrayeth thee!"  It would, however, be prudent on this point to take
the evidence of other Englishmen, whose testimony is above suspicion,
seeing that they were free from the moral disturbance that affected
Mr.  Froude's auditory powers.  G.  J.  Chester, in his
"Transatlantic Sketches" (page 95), deposes as follows-

[32] "But worse, far worse than the colour, both of men and women, is
their voice and accent.  Well may Coleridge enumerate among the pains
of the West Indies, 'the yawny-drawny way in which men converse.'
The soft, whining drawl is simply intolerable.  Resemble the worst
Northern States woman's accent it may in some degree, but it has not
a grain of its vigour.  A man tells you, 'if you can speer it, to
send a beerer with a bottle of bare,' and the clergyman excruciates
you by praying in church, 'Speer us, good Lord.'  The English
pronunciation of A and E is in most words transposed.  Barbados has a
considerable number of provincialisms of dialect.  Some of these, as
the constant use of 'Mistress' for 'Mrs.,' are interesting as
archaisms, or words in use in the early days of the Colony, and which
have never died out of use.  Others are Yankeeisms or vulgarisms;
others, again, such as the expression 'turning cuffums,' i.e.
summersets, from cuffums, a species of fish, seem to be of local
origin."

In a note hereto appended, the author gives a list of English words
of peculiar use and acceptation in Barbados.

[33] To the same effect writes Anthony Trollope:

"But if the black people differ from their brethren of the other
islands, so certainly do the white people.  One soon learns to know--
a Bim.  That is the name in which they themselves delight, and
therefore, though there is a sound of slang about it, I give it here.
One certainly soon learns to know a Bim.  The most peculiar
distinction is in his voice.  There is always a nasal twang about it,
but quite distinct from the nasality of a Yankee.  The Yankee's word
rings sharp through his nose; not so that of the first-class Bim.
There is a soft drawl about it, and the sound is seldom completely
formed.  The effect on the ear is the same as that on the hand when a
man gives you his to shake, and instead of shaking yours, holds his
own still, &c., &c." ("The West Indies," p. 207).

From the above and scores of other authoritative testimonies which
might have been cited to the direct contrary of our traveller's tale
under this head, we can plainly perceive that Mr. Froude's love is
not only blind, but adder-deaf as well.  We shall now contemplate him
under circumstances where his feelings are quite other than those of
a partisan.



BOOK I: VOYAGE OUT

[34] That Mr. Froude, despite his professions to the contrary, did
not go out on his explorations unhampered by prejudices, seems clear
enough from the following quotation:--

"There was a small black boy among us, evidently of pure blood, for
his hair was wool and his colour black as ink.  His parents must have
been well-to-do, for the boy had been to Europe to be educated.  The
officers on board and some of the ladies played with him as they
would play with a monkey.  He had little more sense than a monkey,
perhaps less, and the gestures of him grinning behind gratings and
perching out his long thin arms between the bars were curiously
suggestive of the original from whom we are told now that all of us
came.  The worst of it was that, being lifted above his own people,
he had been taught to despise them.  He was spoilt as a black and
could not be made into a white, and this I found afterwards was the
invariable and dangerous consequence whenever a superior negro
contrived to raise himself.  He might do well enough himself, but his
family feel their blood as degradation.  His [35] children will not
marry among their own people, and not only will no white girl marry a
negro, but hardly any dowry can be large enough to tempt a West
Indian white to make a wife of a black lady.  This is one of the most
sinister features in the present state of social life there."

We may safely assume that the playing of "the officers on board and
some of the ladies" with the boy, "as they would play with a monkey,"
is evidently a suggestion of Mr. Froude's own soul, as well as the
resemblance to the simian tribe which he makes out from the frolics
of the lad.  Verily, it requires an eye rendered more than
microscopic by prejudice to discern the difference between the
gambols of juveniles of any colour under similar conditions.  It is
true that it might just be the difference between the friskings of
white lambs and the friskings of lambs that are not white.  That any
black pupil should be taught to despise his own people through being
lifted above them by education, seems a reckless statement, and far
from patriotic withal; inasmuch as the education referred to here was
European, and the place from which it was obtained presumably
England.  At all events, [36] the difference among educated black men
in deportment towards their unenlightened fellow-blacks, can be
proved to have nothing of that cynicism which often marks the bearing
of Englishmen in an analogous case with regard to their less favoured
countrymen.  The statement that a black person can be "spoilt" for
such by education, whilst he cannot be made white, is one of the
silly conceits which the worship of the skin engenders in ill-
conditioned minds.  No sympathy should be wasted on the negro
sufferer from mortification at not being able to "change his skin."
The Ethiopian of whatever shade of colour who is not satisfied with
being such was never intended to be more than a mere living figure.
Mr. Froude further confidently states that whilst a superior Negro
"might do well himself," yet "his family feel their blood as a
degradation."  If there be some who so feel, they are indeed very
much to be pitied; but their sentiments are not entitled to the
serious importance with which our critic has invested them.  But is
it at all conceivable that a people whose sanity has never in any way
been questioned would strain every nerve to secure for their
offspring a [37] distinction the consequence of which to themselves
would be a feeling of their own abasement? The poor Irish peasant who
toils and starves to secure for his eldest son admission into the
Catholic priesthood, has a far other feeling than one of humiliation
when contemplating that son eventually as the spiritual director of a
congregation and parish.  Similarly, the laudable ambition which, in
the case of a humble Scotch matron, is expressed in the wish and
exertion to see her Jamie or Geordie "wag his pow in the pou'pit,"
produces, when realized, salutary effects in the whole family
connection.  These effects, which Mr. Froude would doubtless allow
and commend in their case, he finds it creditable to ignore the very
possibility of in the experience of people whose cuticle is not
white.  It is, however, but bare justice to say that, as Negroes are
by no means deficient in self-love and the tenderness of natural
affection, such gratifying fulfilment of a family's hopes exerts an
elevating and, in many cases, an ennobling influence on every one
connected with the fortunate household.  Nor, from the eminently
sympathetic nature of the African race, are the near friends of a
family [38] unbenefited in a similar way.  This is true, and
distinctively human; but, naturally, no apologist of Negro
depreciation would admit the reasonableness of applying to the
affairs of Negroes the principles of common equity, or even of common
sense.  To sum up practically our argument on this head, we shall
suppose West Indians to be called upon to imagine that the less
distinguished relations respectively of, say, the late Solicitor-
General of Trinidad and the present Chief Justice of Barbados could
be otherwise than legitimately elated at the conspicuous position won
by a member of their own household.

Mr. Froude further ventures to declare, in this connection, that the
children of educated coloured folk "will not marry among their own
people."  Will he tell us, then, whom the daughters marry, or if they
ever do marry at all, since he asserts, with regard to West Indian
Whites, that "hardly any dowry can be large enough to tempt them to
make a wife of a black lady"?  Our author evidently does not feel or
care that the suggestion he here induces is a hideous slander against
a large body of respectable people of whose affairs he is absolutely
ignorant.  Full [39] of the "go" imparted to his talk by a
consciousness of absolute license with regard to Negroes, our
dignified narrator makes the parenthetical assertion that no white
girl (in the West Indies) will "marry a Negro."  But has he been
informed that cases upon cases have occurred in those Colonies, and
in very high "Anglo-West Indian" families too, where the social
degradation of being married to Negroes has been avoided by the
alternative of forming base private connections even with menials of
that race?

The marrying of a black wife, on the other hand, by a West Indian
White was an event of frequent occurrence at a period in regard to
which our historian seems to be culpably uninformed.  In slavery
days, when all planters, black and white alike, were fused in a
common solidarity of interests, the skin-distinction which Mr. Froude
so strenuously advocates, and would fain risk so much to promote, did
not, so far as matrimony was concerned, exist in the degree that it
now does.  Self-interest often dictated such unions, especially on
the part of in-coming Whites desiring to strengthen their position
and to increase their influence in [40] the land of their adoption by
means of advantageous Creole marriages.  Love, too, sheer
uncalculating love, impelled not a few Whites to enter the hymeneal
state with the dusky captivators of their affections.  When rich, the
white planter not seldom paid for such gratification of his laudable
impulse by accepting exclusion from "Society"--and when poor, he
incurred almost invariably his dismissal from employment.  Of course,
in all cases of the sort the dispensers of such penalties were
actuated by high motives which, nevertheless, did not stand in the
way of their meeting, in the households of the persons thus obnoxious
to punishment, the same or even a lower class of Ethiopic damsels,
under the title of "housekeeper," on whom they lavished a very
plethora of caresses.  Perhaps it may be wrong so to hint it, but,
judging from indications in his own book, our author himself would
have been liable in those days to enthralment by the piquant charms
that proved irresistible to so many of his brother-Europeans.  It is
almost superfluous to repeat that the skin-discriminating policy
induced as regards the coloured subjects of the Queen since the [41]
abolition of slavery did not, and could not, operate when coloured
and white stood on the same high level as slave-owners and ruling
potentates in the Colonies.  Of course, when the administrative power
passed entirely into the hands of British officials, their colonial
compatriots coalesced with them, and found no loss in being in the
good books of the dominant personages.

In conclusion of our remarks upon the above extracts, it may be
stated that the blending of the races is not a burning question.  "It
can keep," as Mr. Bright wittily said with regard to a subject of
similar urgency.  Time and Nature might safely be left uninterfered
with to work out whatever social development of this kind is in store
for the world and its inhabitants.



BOOK I: BARBADOS

[41] Our distinguished voyager visited many of the British West
Indies, landing first at Barbados, his social experience whereof is
set forth in a very agreeable account.  Our immediate business,
however, is not with what West Indian hospitality, especially among
the well-to-do classes, can and does accomplish for [42] the
entertainment of visitors, and particularly visitors so eminent as
Mr. Froude.  We are concerned with what Mr. Froude has to say
concerning our dusky brethren and sisters in those Colonies.  We
have, thus, much pleasure in being able at the outset to extract the
following favourable verdict of his respecting them--premising, at
the same time, that the balcony from which Mr. Froude surveyed the
teeming multitude in Bridgetown was that of a grand hotel at which he
had, on invitation, partaken of the refreshing beverage mentioned in
the citation:--

"Cocktail over, and walking in the heat of the sun being a thing not
to be thought of, I sat for two hours in the balcony, watching the
people, who were as thick as bees in swarming time.  Nine-tenths of
them were pure black.  You rarely saw a white face, but still less
would you see a discontented one, imperturbable good humour and self-
satisfaction being written on the features of every one.  The women
struck me especially.  They were smartly dressed in white calico,
scrupulously clean, and tricked out with ribands and feathers; but
their figures were so good, and they carried themselves so [43] well
and gracefully, that although they might make themselves absurd, they
could not look vulgar.  Like the Greek and Etruscan women, they are
trained from childhood to carry weights on their heads.  They are
thus perfectly upright, and plant their feet firmly and naturally on
the ground.  They might serve for sculptors' models, and are well
aware of it."

Regarding the other sex, Mr. Froude says:--

"The men were active enough, driving carts, wheeling barrows, and
selling flying-fish," &c.

He also speaks with candour of the entire absence of drunkenness and
quarrelling and the agreeable prevalence of good humour and light-
heartedness among them.  Some critic might, on reading the above
extract from our author's account of the men, be tempted to ask--"But
what is the meaning of that little word 'enough' occurring therein?"
We should be disposed to hazard a suggestion that Mr. Froude, being
fair-minded and loyal to truth, as far as is compatible with his
sympathy for his hapless "Anglo-West Indians," could not give an
entirely ungrudging testimony in favour of the possible, nay
probable, voters by whose suffrages the supremacy of the Dark [44]
Parliament will be ensured, and the relapse into obeahism, devil-
worship, and children-eating be inaugurated.  Nevertheless, Si sic
omnia dixisset--if he had said all things thus!  Yes, if Mr. Froude
had, throughout his volume, spoken in this strain, his occasional
want of patience and fairness with regard to our male kindred might
have found condonation in his even more than chivalrous appreciation
of our womankind.  But it has been otherwise.  So we are forced to
try conclusions with him in the arena of his own selection--
unreflecting spokesman that he is of British colonialism, which, we
grieve to learn through Mr. Froude's pages, has, like the Bourbon
family, not only forgotten nothing, but, unfortunately for its own
peace, learnt nothing also.



BOOK I: ST. VINCENT

[44] The following are the words in which our traveller embodies the
main motive and purpose of his voyage:--

"My own chief desire was to see the human inhabitants, to learn what
they were doing, how they were living, and what they were thinking
about. . . ."

[45] But, alas, with the mercurialism of temperament in which he has
thought proper to indulge when only Negroes and Europeans not of
"Anglo-West Indian" tendencies were concerned, he jauntily threw to
the winds all the scruples and cautious minuteness which were
essential to the proper execution of his project.  At Barbados, as we
have seen, he satisfies himself with sitting aloft, at a balcony-
window, to contemplate the movements of the sable throng below, of
whose character, moral and political, he nevertheless professes to
have become a trustworthy delineator.  From the above-quoted account
of his impressions of the external traits and deportment of the
Ethiopic folk thus superficially gazed at, our author passes on to an
analysis of their mental and moral idiosyncrasies, and other intimate
matters, which the very silence of the book as to his method of
ascertaining them is a sufficient proof that his knowledge in their
regard has not been acquired directly and at first hand.  Nor need we
say that the generally adverse cast of his verdicts on what he had
been at no pains to study for himself points to the "hostileness" of
the witnesses whose [46] testimony alone has formed the basis of his
conclusions.  Throughout Mr. Froude's tour in the British Colonies
his intercourse was exclusively with "Anglo-West Indians," whose
aversion to the Blacks he has himself, perhaps they would think
indiscreetly, placed on record.  In no instance do we find that he
condescended to visit the abode of any Negro, whether it was the
mansion of a gentleman or the hut of a peasant of that race.  The
whole tenor of the book indicates his rigid adherence to this one-
sided course, and suggests also that, as a traveller, Mr. Froude
considers maligning on hearsay to be just as convenient as reporting
facts elicited by personal investigation.  Proceed we, however, to
strengthen our statement regarding his definitive abandonment, and
that without any apparent reason, of the plan he had professedly laid
down for himself at starting, and failing which no trustworthy data
could have been obtained concerning the character and disposition of
the people about whom he undertakes to thoroughly enlighten his
readers.  Speaking of St. Vincent, where he arrived immediately after
leaving Barbados, our author says:--

[47] "I did not land, for the time was short, and as a beautiful
picture the island was best seen from the deck.  The characteristics
of the people are the same in all the Antilles, and could be studied
elsewhere."

Now, it is a fact, patent and notorious, that "the characteristics of
the people are" not "the same in all the Antilles."  A man of Mr.
Froude's attainments, whose studies have made him familiar with
ethnological facts, must be aware that difference of local
surroundings and influences does, in the course of time, inevitably
create difference of characteristic and deportment.  Hence there is
in nearly every Colony a marked dissimilarity of native qualities
amongst the Negro inhabitants, arising not only from the causes above
indicated, but largely also from the great diversity of their African
ancestry.  We might as well be told that because the nations of
Europe are generally white and descended from Japhet, they could be
studied one by the light derived from acquaintance with another.  We
venture to declare that, unless a common education from youth has
been shared by them, the Hamitic inhabitants of one island have very
little in common with [48] those of another, beyond the dusky skin
and woolly hair.  In speech, character, and deportment, a coloured
native of Trinidad differs as much from one of Barbados as a North
American black does from either, in all the above respects.



BOOK I: GRENADA

[48] In Grenada, the next island he arrived at, our traveller's
procedure with regard to the inhabitants was very similar.  There he
landed in the afternoon, drove three or four miles inland to dine at
the house of a "gentleman who was a passing resident," returned in
the dark to his ship, and started for Trinidad.  In the course of
this journey back, however, as he sped along in the carriage, Mr.
Froude found opportunity to look into the people's houses along the
way, where, he tells us, he "could see and was astonished to observe
signs of comfort, and even signs of taste--armchairs, sofas, side-
boards with cut-glass upon them, engravings and coloured prints upon
the walls."  As a result of this nocturnal examination, a vol
d'oiseau, he has written paragraph upon paragraph about the people's
character [49] and prospects in the island of Grenada.  To read the
patronizing terms in which our historian-traveller has seen fit to
comment on Grenada and its people, one would believe that his account
is of some half-civilized, out-of-the-way region under British sway,
and inhabited chiefly by a horde of semi-barbarian ignoramuses of
African descent.  If the world had not by this time thoroughly
assessed the intrinsic value of Mr. Froude's utterances, one who
knows Grenada might have felt inclined to resent his causeless
depreciation of the intellectual capacity of its inhabitants; but
considering the estimate which has been pretty generally formed of
his historical judgment, Mr. Froude may be dismissed, as regards
Grenada and its people, with a certain degree of scepticism.  Such
scepticism, though lost upon himself, is unquestionably needful to
protect his readers from the hallucination which the author's
singular contempt for accuracy is but too liable to induce.

Those who know Grenada and its affairs are perfectly familiar with
the fact that all of its chief intellectual business, whether
official (even in the highest degree, such as temporary [50]
administration of the government), legal, commercial, municipal,
educational, or journalistic, has been for years upon years carried
on by men of colour.  And what, as a consequence of this fact, has
the world ever heard in disparagement of Grenada throughout this long
series of years?  Assuredly not a syllable.  On the contrary, she has
been the theme of praise, not only for the admirable foresight with
which she avoided the sugar crisis, so disastrous to her sister
islands, but also for the pluck and persistence shown in sustaining
herself through an agricultural emergency brought about by commercial
reverses, whereby the steady march of her sons in self-advancement
was only checked for a time, but never definitively arrested.  In
fine, as regards every branch of civilized employment pursued there,
the good people of Grenada hold their own so well and worthily that
any show of patronage, even from a source more entitled to
confidence, would simply be a piece of obtrusive kindness, not
acceptable to any, seeing that it is required by none.



BOOK II: TRINIDAD / TRINIDAD AND REFORM+

[53] Mr. Froude, crossing the ninety miles of the Caribbean Sea lying
between Grenada and Trinidad, lands next morning in Port of Spain,
the chief city of that "splendid colony," as Governor Irving, its
worst ruler, truly calls it in his farewell message to the
Legislature.  Regarding Port of Spain in particular, Mr. Froude is
positively exuberant in the display of the peculiar qualities that
distinguish him, and which we have already admitted.  Ecstatic praise
and groundless detraction go hand in hand, bewildering to any one not
possessed of the key to the mystery of the art of blowing hot and
cold, which Mr. Froude so startlingly exemplifies.  As it is our
purpose to make what he says concerning this Colony the crucial test
of his veracity as a writer of travels, [54] and also of the value of
his judgments respecting men and things, we shall first invite the
reader's attention to the following extracts, with our discussion
thereof:--

"On landing we found ourselves in a large foreign-looking town, Port
of Spain having been built by French and Spaniards according to their
national tendencies, and especially with a view to the temperature,
which is that of a forcing house, and rarely falls below 80 degrees.  
The streets are broad, and are planted with trees for shade, each house
where room permits having a garden of its own, with palms and mangoes
and coffee-plants and creepers.  Of sanitary arrangements there
seemed to be none.  There is abundance of rain, and the gutters which
run down by the footway are flushed almost every day.  But they are
all open.  Dirt of every kind lies about freely, to be washed into
them or left to putrify as fate shall direct" (p. 64).

Lower down, on the same page, our author, luxuriating in his contempt
for exactitude when the character of other folk only is at stake,
continues:--"The town has between thirty and forty thousand people
living in it, and the [55] rain and Johnny crows between them keep
off pestilence."  On page 65 we have the following astounding
statement with respect to one of the trees in the garden in front of
the house in which Mr. Froude was sojourning:--"At the gate stood as
sentinel a cabbage palm a hundred feet high."

The above quotations, in which we have elected to be content
with indicating by typographical differences the points on which
attention should be mostly directed, will suffice, with any one
knowing Trinidad, as examples of Mr. Froude's trustworthiness.  But
as these are only on matters of mere detail, involving no question of
principle, they are dismissed without any further comment.  It must
not be so, however, with the following remarkable deliverances which
occur on page 67 of his too picturesque work:--"The commonplace
intrudes upon the imaginative.  At moments one can fancy that the
world is an enchanted place after all, but then comes generally an
absurd awakening.  On the first night of my arrival, before we went
to bed, there came an invitation to me to attend a political meeting
which was to be held in a few days on the Savannah.

[56] "Trinidad is a purely Crown colony, and has escaped hitherto the
introduction of the election virus.  The newspapers and certain busy
gentlemen in Port of Spain had discovered that they were living under
a 'degrading tyranny,' and they demanded a constitution.  They did
not complain that their affairs had been ill-managed.  On the
contrary, they insisted that they were the most prosperous of the
West Indian colonies, and alone had a surplus in their treasury.  If
this was so, it seemed to me that they had better let well alone.
The population, all told, was but 170,000, less by thirty thousand
than that of Barbados.  They were a mixed and motley assemblage of
all races and colours, busy each with their own affairs, and never
hitherto troubling themselves about politics.  But it had pleased the
Home Government to set up the beginning of a constitution again in
Jamaica; no one knew why, but so it was; and Trinidad did not choose
to be behindhand.  The official appointments were valuable, and had
been hitherto given away by the Crown.  The local popularities very
naturally wished to have them for themselves.  This was the [57]
reality in the thing, so far as there was a reality.  It was dressed
up in the phrases borrowed from the great English masters of the art,
about privileges of manhood, moral dignity, the elevating influence
of the suffrage, &c., intended for home consumption among the
believers in the orthodox radical faith."

The passages which we have signalized in the above quotation, and
which occur with more elaboration and heedless assurance on a later
page, will produce a feeling of wonder at the hardihood of him who
not only conceived, but penned and dared to publish them as well,
against the gentlemen whom we all know to be foremost in the
political agitation at which Mr. Froude so flippantly sneers.  An
emphatic denial may be opposed to his pretence that "they did not
complain that their affairs had been ill-managed."  Why, the very
gist and kernel of the whole agitation, set forth in print through
long years of iteration, has been the scandalous mismanagement of the
affairs of the Colony--especially under the baleful administration of
Governor Irving.  The Augean Stable, miscalled by him "The Public
Works Department," and whose officials he coolly [58] fastened upon
the financial vitals of that long-suffering Colony, baffled even the
resolute will of a Des Voeux to cleanse it.  Poor Sir Sanford
Freeling attempted the cleansing, but foundered ignominiously almost
as soon as he embarked on that Herculean enterprise.  Sir A. E.
Havelock, who came after, must be mentioned by the historian of
Trinidad merely as an incarnate accident in the succession of
Governors to whom the destinies of that maltreated Colony have been
successively intrusted since the departure of Sir Arthur Hamilton
Gordon.  The present Governor of Trinidad, Sir William Robinson, is a
man of spirit and intelligence, keenly alive to the grave
responsibilities resting on him as a ruler of men and moulder of
men's destinies.  Has he, with all his energy, his public spirit and
indisputable devotion to the furtherance of the Colony's interests,
been able to grapple successfully with the giant evil?  Has he
effectually gained the ear of our masters in Downing Street regarding
the inefficiency and wastefulness of Governor Irving's pet
department?  We presume that his success has been but very partial,
for otherwise it is difficult to conceive the motive for [59]
retaining the army of officials radiating from that office, with the
chief under whose supervision so many architectural and other
scandals have for so long been the order of the day.  The Public
Works Department is costly enough to have been a warning to the whole
of the West Indies.  It is true that the lavish squandering of the
people's money by that department has been appreciably checked since
the advent of the present head of the Government.  The papers no
longer team with accounts, nor is even the humblest aesthetic sense,
offended now, as formerly, with views of unsightly, useless and
flimsy erections, the cost of which, on an average, was five times
more than that of good and reputable structures.

This, however, has been entirely due to the personal influence of the
Governor.  Sir William Robinson, not being the tool, as Sir Henry
Irving owned that he was, of the Director of Public Works, could not
be expected to be his accomplice or screener in the cynical waste of
the public funds.  Here, then, is the personal rectitude of a ruler
operating as a safeguard to the people's interests; and we gladly
confess our entire agreement with [60] Mr. Froude on the subject of
the essential qualifications of a Crown Governor.  Mr. Froude
contends, and we heartily coincide with him, that a ruler of high
training and noble purposes would, as the embodiment of the
administrative authority, be the very best provision for the
government of Colonies constituted as ours are.  But he has also
pointed out, and that in no equivocal terms, that the above are far
from having been indispensable qualifications for the patronage of
Downing Street.  He has shown that the Colonial Office is, more often
than otherwise, swayed in the appointment of Colonial Governors by
considerations among which the special fitness of the man appointed
holds but a secondary place.  On this point we have much
gratification in giving Mr. Froude's own words (p. 91):--"Among the
public servants of Great Britain there are persons always to be found
fit and willing for posts of honour and difficulty if a sincere
effort be made to find them.  Alas! in times past we have sent
persons to rule our Baratarias to whom Sancho Panza was a sage--
troublesome members of Parliament, younger brothers of powerful
families, impecunious peers; favourites, [61] with backstairs
influence, for whom a provision was to be found; colonial clerks bred
in the office who had been obsequious and useful!"  Now then,
applying these facts to the political history of Trinidad, with which
we are more particularly concerned at present, what do we find?  We
find that in the person of Sir A. H. Gordon (1867-1870) that Colony
at length chanced upon a ruler both competent and eager to advance
her interests, not only materially, but in the nobler respects that
give dignity to the existence of a community.  Of course, he was
opposed--ably, strenuously, violently, virulently--but the metal of
which the man was composed was only fused into greater firmness by
being subjected to such fiery tests.  On leaving Trinidad, this
eminent ruler left as legacies to the Colony he had loved and worked
for so heartily, laws that placed the persons and belongings of the
inhabitants beyond the reach of wanton aggression; the means by which
honest and laborious industry could, through agriculture, benefit
both itself and the general revenue.  He also left an educational
system that opened (to even the humblest) a free pathway to
knowledge, to [62] distinction, and, if the objects of its
beneficence were worthy of the boon, to serviceableness to their
native country.  Above all, he left peace among the jarring interests
which, under the badge of Englishman and of Creole, under the badge
of Catholic and under the badge of Protestant, and so many other
forms of sectional divergence, had too long distracted Trinidad.
This he had effected, not by constituting himself a partisan of
either section, but by inquiring with statesmanlike appreciation, and
allowing the legitimate claims of each to a certain scope of
influence in the furtherance of the Colony's welfare.  Hence the
bitter rivalry of jarring interests was transformed into harmonious
co-operation on all sides, in advancing the common good of the common
country.

The Colonial Office, knowing little and caring less about that noble
jewel in the British Crown, sent out as successor to so brilliant and
successful an administrator--whom?  One Sir James Robert Longden, a
gentleman without initiative, without courage, and, above all, with a
slavish adherence to red-tape and a clerk-like dread of compromising
his berth.  Having served for a long series of years in subordinate
posts in [63] minor dependencies, the habit of being impressed and
influenced by colonial magnates grew and gathered strength within
him.  Such a ruler, of course, the serpents that had only been
"scotched, but not killed," by the stern procedures of Governor
Gordon, could wind round, beguile, and finally cause to fall.
Measure after measure of his predecessor which he could in any way
neutralize in the interests of the colonial clique, was rendered of
none effect.  In fact, he was subservient to the wishes of those who
had all long objected to those measures, but had not dared even to
hint their objections to the beneficent autocrat who had willed and
given them effect for the general welfare.  After Governor Longden
came Sir Henry Turner Irving, a personage who brought to Trinidad a
reputation for all the vulgar colonial prejudices which,
discreditable enough in ordinary folk, are, in the Governor of a
mixed community, nothing less than calamitous.  More than amply did
he justify the evil reports with which rumour had heralded his
coming.  Abler, more astute, more daring than Sir James Longden, who
was, on the whole, only a constitutionally timid man, Governor Irving
threw [64] himself heart and soul into the arms of the Sugar
Interest, by whom he had been helped into his high office, and whose
belief he evidently shared, that sugar-growers alone should be
possessors of the lands of the West Indies.  It would be wearisome to
detail the methods by which every act of Sir Arthur Gordon's to
benefit the whole population was cynically and systematically undone
by this his native-hating successor.  In short, the policy of
reaction which Sir James Longden began, found in Governor Irving not
only a consistent promoter, but, as it were, a sinister incarnation.
It is true that he could not, at the bidding and on the advice of his
planter-friends, shut up the Crown Lands of the Colony against
purchasers of limited means, because they happened to be mostly
natives of colour, but he could annul the provision by which every
Warden in the rural districts, on the receipt of the statutory fees,
had to supply a Government title on the spot to every one who
purchased any acreage of Crown Lands.  Every intending purchaser,
therefore, whether living at Toco, Guayaguayare, Monos, or Icacos,
the four extreme points of the Island of Trinidad, was compelled to
go to Port of [65] Spain, forty or fifty miles distant, through an
almost roadless country, to compete at the Sub-Intendant's auction
sales, with every probability of being outbid in the end, and having
his long-deposited money returned to him after all his pains.
Lieutenant-Governor Des Voeux told the Legislature of Trinidad that
the monstrous Excise imposts of the Colony were an incentive to
smuggling, and he thought that the duties, licenses, &c., should be
lowered in the interest of good and equitable government.  Sir Henry
Turner Irving, however, besides raising the duties on spirituous
liquors, also enacted that every distillery, however small, must pay
a salary to a Government official stationed within it to supervise
the manufacture of the spirits.  This, of course, was the death-blow
to all the minor competition which had so long been disturbing the
peace of mind of the mighty possessors of the great distilleries.
Ahab was thus made glad with the vineyard of Naboth.

In the matter of official appointments, too, Governor Irving was
consistent in his ostentatious hostility to Creoles in general, and
to coloured Creoles in particular.  Of the fifty-six appointments
which that model Governor [66] made in 1876, only seven happened to
be natives and coloured, out of a population in which the latter
element is so preponderant as to excite the fears of Mr. Froude.  In
educational matters, though he could not with any show of sense or
decency re-enact the rule which excluded students of illegitimate
birth from the advantages of the Royal College, he could,
nevertheless, pander to the prejudices of himself and his friends by
raising the standard of proficiency while reducing the limit of the
age for free admission to that institution--boys of African descent
having shown an irrepressible persistency in carrying off prizes.

Every one acquainted with Trinidad politics knows very well the
ineffably low dodges and subterfuges under which the Arima Railway
was prevented from having its terminus in the centre of that town.
The public was promised a saving of Eight Thousand Pounds by their
high-minded Governor for a diversion of the line "by only a few
yards" from the originally projected terminus.  In the end it was
found out not only that the terminus of the railway was nearly a
whole mile outside of the town of Arima, but also that Twenty [67]
Thousand Pounds "Miscellaneous" had to be paid up by the good folk of
Trinidad, in addition to gulping down their disappointment at saving
no Eight Thousand Pounds, and having to find by bitter experience,
especially in rainy weather, that their Governor's few yards were
just his characteristic way of putting down yards which he well knew
were to be counted by hundreds.  Then, again, we have the so-called
San Fernando Waterworks, an abortion, a scandal for which there is no
excuse, as the head of the Public Works Department went his own way
despite the experience of those who knew better than he, and the
protests of those who would have had to pay.  Seventeen Thousand
Pounds represent the amount of debt with which Governor Irving's pet
department has saddled the town of San Fernando for water, which half
the inhabitants cannot get, and which few of the half who do get it
dare venture to drink.  Summa fastigia rerum secuti sumus.  If in the
works that were so prominent before the public gaze these enormous
abuses could flourish, defiant of protest and opposition, what shall
we think of the nooks and corners of that same squandering
department, which of [68] course must have been mere gnats in the
eyes of a Governor who had swallowed so many monstrous camels!  The
Governor was callous.  Trinidad was a battening ground for his
friends; but she had in her bosom men who were her friends, and the
struggle began, constitutionally of course, which, under the
leadership of the Mayor of San Fernando, has continued up to now,
culminating at last in the Reform movement which Mr. Froude decries,
and which his pupil, Mr. S. H. Gatty, is, from what has appeared in
the Trinidad papers, doing his "level best" to render abortive.

Sir Sanford Freeling, by the will and pleasure of Downing Street, was
the next successor, after Governor Irving, to the chief ruler-ship of
Trinidad.  Incredible as it may sound, he was a yet more
disadvantageous bargain for the Colony's L4000 a year.  A better man
in many respects than his predecessor, he was in many more a much
worse Governor.  The personal affability of a man can be known only
to those who come into actual contact with him--the public measures
of a ruler over a community touches it, mediately or immediately,
throughout all its sections.  The bad boldness of [69] Governor
Irving achieved much that the people, especially in the outlying
districts, could see and appreciate.  For example, he erected Rest-
houses all over the remoter and more sparsely peopled quarters of the
Colony, after the manner of such provisions in Oriental lands.  The
population who came in contact with these conveniences, and to whom
access to them--for a consideration--had never been denied, saw with
their own eyes tangible evidence of the Governor's activity, and
inferred therefrom a solicitude on his part for the public welfare.
Had they, however, been given a notion of the bill which had had to
be paid for those frail, though welcome hostelries, they would have
stood aghast at the imbecility, or, if not logically that, the
something very much worse, through which five times the actual worth
of these buildings had been extracted from the Treasury.  Sir Sanford
Freeling, on the other hand, while being no screener of jobbery and
peculation, had not the strength of mind whereof jobbers and
peculators do stand in dread.  In evidence of that poor ruler's
infirmity of purpose, we would only cite the double fact that,
whereas in 1883 he was the first to enter a practical protest against
the housing [70] of the diseased and destitute in the then newly
finished, but most leaky, House of Refuge on the St. Clair Lands, by
having the poor saturated inmates carried off in his presence to the
Colonial Hospital, yet His Excellency was the very man who, in the
very next year, 1884, not only sanctioned the shooting down of Indian
immigrants at their festival, but actually directed the use of buck-
shot for that purpose!  Evidently, if these two foregoing statements
are true, Mr. Froude must join us in thinking that a man whose mind
could be warped by external influences from the softest commiseration
for the sufferings of his kind, one year, into being the cold-blooded
deviser of the readiest method for slaughtering unarmed holiday-
makers, the very next year, is not the kind of ruler whom he and we
so cordially desiderate.  We have already mentioned above how
ignominious Governor Freeling's failure was in attempting to meddle
with the colossal abuses of the Public Works Department.

Sir Arthur Elibank Havelock next had the privilege of enjoying the
paradisaic sojourn at Queen's House, St. Ann's, as well as the four
thousand pounds a year attached to the [71] right of occupying that
princely residence.  Save as a dandy, however, and the harrier of
subordinate officials, the writer of the annals of Trinidad may well
pass him by.  So then it may be seen what, by mere freaks of Chance--
the ruling deity at Downing Street--the administrative experience of
Trinidad had been from the departure of that true king in Israel,--
Sir Arthur Gordon, up to the visit of Mr. Froude.  First, a slave to
red-tape, procrastination, and the caprices of pretentious
colonialists; next, a daring schemer, confident of the support of the
then dominant Sugar Interest, and regarding and treating the
resources of the Island as free booty for his friends, sycophants,
and favourites; then, an old woman, garbed in male attire, having an
infirmity of purpose only too prone to be blown about by every wind
of doctrine, alternating helplessly between tenderness and
truculence, the charity of a Fry and the tragic atrocity of Medea.
After this dismal ruler, Trinidad, by the grace of the Colonial
Office, was subjected to the manipulation of an unctuous dandy.  This
successor of Gordon, of Elliot, and of Cairns, durst not oppose high-
placed official malfeasants, but [72] was inexorable with regard to
minor delinquents.  In the above retrospect we have purposely omitted
mentioning such transient rulers as Mr. Rennie, Sir G. W. Des Voeux,
and last, but by no means least, Sir F. Barlee, a high-minded
Governor, whom death so suddenly and inscrutably snatched away from
the good work he had loyally begun.  Every one of the above temporary
administrators was a right good man for a post in which brain power
and moral back-bone are essential qualifications.  But the Fates so
willed it that Trinidad should never enjoy the permanent governance
of either.  In view of the above facts; in view also of the lessons
taught the inhabitants of Trinidad so frequently, so cruelly, what
wonder is there that, failing of faith in a probability, which stands
one against four, of their getting another worthy ruler when Governor
Robinson shall have left them, they should seek to make hay while the
sun shines, by providing against the contingency of such Governors as
they know from bitter experience that Downing Street would place over
their destinies, should the considerations detailed by Mr. Froude or
any other equally [73] unworthy counsellor supervene?  That the
leading minds of Trinidad should believe in an elective legislature
is a logical consequence of the teachings of the past, when the
Colony was under the manipulation of the sort of Governors above
mentioned as immediately succeeding Sir Arthur Gordon.

This brings us to the motives, the sordid motives, which Mr. Froude,
oblivious of the responsibility of his high literary status, has
permitted himself gratuitously, and we may add scandalously, to
impute to the heads of the Reform movement in Trinidad.  It was
perfectly competent that our author should decline, as he did
decline, to have anything to do, even as a spectator, at a meeting
with the object of which he had no sympathy.  But our opinion is
equally decided that Mr. Froude has transgressed the bounds of decent
political antagonism, nay, even of common sense, when he presumes to
state that it was not for any other object than the large salaries of
the Crown appointments, which they covet for themselves, that the
Reform leaders are contending.  This is not criticism: it is slander.
To make culpatory statements against others, [74] without ability to
prove them, is, to say the least, hazardous; but to make accusations
to formulate which the accuser is forced, not only to ignore facts,
but actually to deny them, is, to our mind, nothing short of rank
defamation.

Mr. Froude is not likely to impress the world (of the West Indies, at
any rate) with the transparently silly, if not intentionally
malicious, ravings which he has indulged in on the subject of
Trinidad and its politics.  Here are some of the things which this
"champion of Anglo-West Indians" attempts to force down the throats
of his readers.  He would have us believe that Mr. Francis Damian,
the Mayor of Port of Spain, and one of the wealthiest of the native
inhabitants of Trinidad, a man who has retired from an honourable and
lucrative legal practice, and devotes his time, his talents, and his
money to the service of his native country; that Mr. Robert Guppy,
the venerable and venerated Mayor of San Fernando, with his weight of
years and his sufficing competence, and with his long record of self-
denying services to the public; that Mr. George Goodwille, one of the
most successful merchants in the Colonies; that Mr. Conrad [75] F.
Stollmeyer, a gentleman retired, in the evening of his days, on his
well-earned ample means, are open to the above sordid accusation.  In
short, that those and such-like individuals who, on account of their
private resources and mental capabilities, as well as the public
influence resulting therefrom, are, by the sheer logic of
circumstances, forced to be at the head of public movements, are
actuated by a craving for the few hundred pounds a year for which
there is such a scramble at Downing Street among the future official
grandees of the West Indies!  But granting that this allegation of
Mr. Froude's was not as baseless as we have shown it to be, and that
the leaders of the Reform agitation were impelled by the desire which
our author seeks to discredit them with, what then?  Have they who
have borne the heat and the burden of the day in making the Colonies
what they are no right to the enjoyment of the fruits of their
labours?  The local knowledge, the confidence and respect of the
population, which such men enjoy, and can wield for good or evil in
the community, are these matters of small account in the efficient
government of the Colony?  Our author, in [76] specifying the
immunities of his ideal Governor, who is also ours, recommends,
amongst other things, that His Excellency should be allowed to choose
his own advisers.  By this Mr. Froude certainly does not mean that
the advisers so chosen must be all pure-blooded Englishmen who have
rushed from the destitution of home to batten on the cheaply obtained
flesh-pots of the Colonies.

At any rate, whatever political fate Mr. Froude may desire for the
Colonies in general, and for Trinidad in particular, it is
nevertheless unquestionable that he and the scheme that he may have
for our future governance, in this year of grace 1888, have both come
into view entirely out of season.  The spirit of the times has
rendered impossible any further toleration of the arrogance which is
based on historical self-glorification.  The gentlemen of Trinidad,
who are struggling for political enfranchisement, are not likely to
heed, except as a matter for indignant contempt, the obtrusion by our
author of his opinion that "they had best let well alone."  On his
own showing, the persons appointed to supreme authority in the
Colonies are, more usually than not, entirely unfit for [77] holding
any responsible position whatever over their fellows.  Now, can it be
doubted that less care, less scruple, less consideration, would be
exercised in the choice of the satellites appointed to revolve, in
these far-off latitudes, around the central luminaries?  Have we not
found, are we not still finding every day, that the brain-dizziness--
Xenophon calls it kephalalgeia+--induced by sudden promotion has
transformed the abject suppliants at the Downing Street backstairs
into the arrogant defiers of the opinions, and violators of the
rights, of the populations whose subjection to the British Crown
alone could have rendered possible the elevation of such folk and
their impunity in malfeasance?  The cup of loyal forbearance reached
the overflowing point since the trickstering days of Governor Irving,
and it is useless now to believe in the possibility of a return of
the leading minds of Trinidad to a tame acquiescence as regards the
probabilities of their government according to the Crown system.  Mr.
Froude's own remarks point out definitely enough that a community so
governed is absolutely at the mercy, for good or for evil, of the man
who happens to be invested with [78] the supreme authority.  He has
also shown that in our case that supreme authority is very often
disastrously entrusted.  Yet has he nothing but sneers for the
efforts of those who strive to be emancipated from liability to such
subjection.  Mr. Froude's deftly-worded sarcasms about "degrading
tyranny," "the dignity of manhood," &c., are powerless to alter the
facts.  Crown Colony Government--denying, as it does to even the
wisest and most interested in a community cursed with it all
participation in the conduct of their own affairs, while investing
irresponsible and uninterested "birds of passage" (as our author
aptly describes them) with the right of making ducks and drakes of
the resources wrung from the inhabitants--is a degrading tyranny,
which the sneers of Mr. Froude cannot make otherwise.  The dignity of
manhood, on the other hand, we are forced to admit, runs scanty
chance of recognition by any being, however masculine his name, who
could perpetrate such a literary and moral scandal as "The Bow of
Ulysses."  Yet the dignity of manhood stands venerable there, and
whilst the world lasts shall gain for its possessors the right of
record on the roll of [79] those whom the worthy of the world delight
to honour.

All of a piece, as regards veracity and prudence, is the further
allegation of Mr. Froude's, to the effect that there was never any
agitation for Reform in Trinidad before that which he passes under
review.  It is, however, a melancholy fact, which we are ashamed to
state, that Mr. Froude has written characteristically here also,
either through crass ignorance or through deliberate malice.  Any
respectable, well-informed inhabitant of Trinidad, who happened not
to be an official "bird of passage," might, on our author's honest
inquiry, have informed him that Trinidad is the land of chronic
agitation for Reform.  Mr. Froude might also have been informed that,
even forty-five years ago, that is in 1843, an elective constitution,
with all the electoral districts duly marked out, was formulated and
transmitted by the leading inhabitants of Trinidad to the then
Secretary of State for the Colonies.  He might also have learnt that
on every occasion that any of the shady Governors, whom he has so
well depicted, manifested any excess of his undesirable qualities,
there has been a movement [80] among the educated people in behalf of
changing their country's political condition.

We close this part of our review by reiterating our conviction that,
come what will, the Crown Colony system, as at present managed, is
doomed.  Britain may, in deference to the alleged wishes of her
impalpable "Anglo-West Indians"--whose existence rests on the
authority of Mr. Froude alone--deny to Trinidad and other Colonies
even the small modicum prayed for of autonomy, but in doing so the
Mother Country will have to sternly revise her present methods of
selecting and appointing Governors.  As to the subordinate lot, they
will have to be worth their salt when there is at the head of the
Government a man who is truly deserving of his.

NOTES

53. +It is not clear from the original text exactly where the brief
chapter "Trinidad" ends and where the longer one entitled "Reform in
Trinidad" begins.  (The copy indicates that the "Trinidad" chapter
ends at page 54, but the relevant page contains no subheading.)  I
have, therefore, chosen to fuse the two chapters since they form a
logical unit.

77. +Since there is little Greek in this work, I have simply
transliterated it.



BOOK II: NEGRO FELICITY IN THE WEST INDIES

[81] We come now to the ingenious and novel fashion in which Mr.
Froude carries out his investigations among the black population, and
to his dogmatic conclusions concerning them.  He says:--

"In Trinidad, as everywhere else, my own chief desire was to see the
human inhabitants, to learn what they were doing, how they were
living, and what they were thinking about, and this could best be
done by drives about the town and neighbourhood."

"Drives about the town and neighbourhood," indeed!  To learn and be
able to depict with faithful accuracy what people "were doing, how
they were living, and what they were thinking about"--all this being
best done (domestic circumstances, nay, soul-workings and all!)
through fleeting glimpses of shifting [82] panoramas of intelligent
human beings!  What a bright notion!  We have here the suggestion of
a capacity too superhuman to be accepted on trust, especially when,
as in this case, it is by implication self-arrogated.  The modesty of
this thaumaturgic traveller in confining the execution of his
detailed scrutiny of a whole community to the moderate progression of
some conventional vehicle, drawn by some conventional quadruped or
the other, does injustice to powers which, if possessed at all, might
have compassed the same achievement in the swifter transit of an
express train, or, better still perhaps, from the empyrean elevation
of a balloon!  Yet is Mr. Froude confident that data professed to be
thus collected would easily pass muster with the readers of his book!
A confidence of this kind is abnormal, and illustrates, we think most
fully, all the special characteristics of the man.  With his passion
for repeating, our author tells us in continuation of a strange
rhapsody on Negro felicity:--

"Once more, the earth does not contain any peasantry so well off, so
well-cared for, so happy, so sleek and contented, as the sons [83]
and daughters of the emancipated slaves in the English West Indian
Islands."

Again:--

"Under the rule of England, in these islands, the two millions of
these brothers-in-law of ours are the most perfectly contented
specimens of the human race to be found upon the planet. . . . If
happiness be the satisfaction of every conscious desire, theirs is a
condition that admits of no improvement: were they independent, they
might quarrel among themselves, and the weaker become the bondsmen of
the stronger; under the beneficent despotism of the English
Government, which knows no difference of colour and permits no
oppression, they can sleep, lounge, and laugh away their lives as
they please, fearing no danger," &c.

Now, then, let us examine for a while this roseate picture of
Arcadian blissfulness said to be enjoyed by British West Indian
Negroes in general, and by the Negroes of Trinidad in particular.
"No distinction of colour" under the British rule, and, better
still, absolute protection of the weaker against the stronger!  This
latter consummation especially, [84] Mr. Froude tells us, has been
happily secured "under the beneficent despotism" of the Crown Colony
system.  However, let the above vague hyperboles be submitted to the
test of practical experience, and the abstract government analysed in
its concrete relations with the people.

Unquestionably the actual and direct interposition of the shielding
authority above referred to, between man and man, is the immediate
province of the MAGISTRACY.  All other branches of the Government,
having in themselves no coercive power, must, from the supreme
executive downwards, in cases of irreconcilable clashing of
interests, have ultimate recourse to the magisterial jurisdiction.
Putting aside, then, whatever culpable remissness may have been
manifested by magistrates in favour of powerful malfeasants, we would
submit that the fact of stipendiary justices converting the
tremendous, far-reaching powers which they wield into an engine of
systematic oppression, ought to dim by many a shade the glowing
lustre of Mr. Froude's encomiums.  Facts, authentic and notorious,
might be adduced in hundreds, especially with respect to [85] the
Port of Spain and San Fernando magistracies (both of which, since the
administration of Sir J. R. Longden, have been exclusively the prizes
of briefless English barristers*), to prove that these gentry, far
from being bulwarks to the weaker as against the stronger, have, in
their own persons, been the direst scourges that the poor,
particularly when coloured, have been afflicted by in aggravation of
the difficulties of their lot.  Only typical examples can here be
given out of hundreds upon hundreds which might easily be cited and
proved against the incumbents of the abovementioned chief stipendiary
magistracies.  One such example was a matter of everyday discussion
at the time of Mr. Froude's visit.  The inhabitants were even backed
in their complaints by the Governor, who had, in response to their
cry of distress, forwarded their prayer [86] to the home authorities
for relief from the hard treatment which they alleged themselves to
be suffering at the hands of the then magistrate.  Our allusion here
is to the chief town, Port of Spain, the magistracy of which embraces
also the surrounding districts, containing a total population of
between 60,000 and 70,000 souls.  Mr. R. D. Mayne filled this
responsible office during the latter years of Sir J. R. Longden's
governorship.  He was reputed, soon after his arrival, to have
announced from the bench that in every case he would take the word of
a constable in preference to the testimony of any one else.  The
Barbadian rowdies who then formed the major part of the constabulary
of Trinidad, and whose bitter hatred of the older residents had been
not only plainly expressed, but often brutally exemplified, rejoiced
in the opportunity thus afforded for giving effect to their truculent
sentiments.  At that time the bulk of the immigrants from Barbados
were habitual offenders whom the Government there had provided with a
free passage to wherever they elected to betake themselves.  The more
intelligent of the men flocked to the Trinidad [87] police ranks,
into which they were admitted generally without much inquiry into
their antecedents.  On this account they were shunned by the decent
inhabitants, a course which they repaid with savage animosity.
Perjuries the most atrocious and crushing, especially to the
respectable poor, became the order of the day.  Hundreds of innocent
persons were committed to gaol and the infamy of convict servitude,
without the possibility of escape from, or even mitigation of, their
ignominious doom.  A respectable woman (a native of Barbados, too,
who in the time of the first immigration of the better sort of her
compatriots had made Trinidad her home) was one of the first victims
of this iniquitous state of affairs.

The class of people to which she belonged was noted as orderly,
industrious and law-abiding, and, being so, it had identified itself
entirely with the natives of the land of its adoption.  This fact
alone was sufficient to involve these immigrants in the same lot of
persecution which their newly arrived countrymen had organized and
were carrying out against the Trinidadians proper.  It happened that,
on the occasion to which we wish particularly [88] to refer, the
woman in question was at home, engaged in her usual occupation of
ironing for her honest livelihood.  Suddenly she heard a heavy blow
in the street before her door, and almost simultaneously a loud
scream, which, on looking hastily out, she perceived to be the cry of
a boy of some ten or twelve years of age, who had been violently
struck with the fist by another youth of larger size and evidently
his senior in age.  The smaller fellow had laid fast hold of his
antagonist by the collar, and would not let go, despite the blows
which, to extricate himself and in retaliation of the puny buffets of
his youthful detainer, he "showered thick as wintry rain."

The woman, seeing the posture of affairs, shouted to the combatants
to desist, but to no purpose, rage and absorption in their wrathful
occupation having deafened both to all external sounds.  Seized with
pity for the younger lad, who was getting so mercilessly the worst of
it, the woman, hastily throwing a shawl over her shoulders, sprang
into the street and rushed between the juvenile belligerents.
Dexterously extricating the hand of the little fellow from the collar
of his antagonist, she hurried the former [89] into her gateway,
shouting out to him at the same time to fasten the door on the
inside.  This the little fellow did, and no doubt gladly, as this
surcease from actual conflict, short though it was, must have
afforded space for the natural instinct of self-preservation to
reassert itself.  Hereupon the elder of the two lads, like a tiger
robbed of his prey, sprang furiously to the gate, and began to use
frantic efforts to force an entrance.  Perceiving this, the woman
(who meanwhile had not been idle with earnest dissuasions and
remonstrances, which had all proved futile) pulled the irate
youngster back, and interposed her body between him and the gate,
warding him off with her hands every time that he rushed forward to
renew the assault.  At length a Barbadian policeman hove in sight,
and was hastily beckoned to by the poor ironer, who, by this time,
had nearly come to the end of her strength.  The uniformed "Bim" was
soon on the spot; but, without asking or waiting to hear the cause of
the disturbance, he shouted to the volunteer peacemaker, "I see you
are fighting: you are my prisoner!"  Saying this, he clutched the
poor thunderstruck creature by the wrist, and there [90] and then set
about hurrying her off towards the police station.  It happened,
however, that the whole affair had occurred in the sight of a
gentleman of well-known integrity.  He, seated at a window
overlooking the street, had witnessed the whole squabble, from its
beginning in words to its culmination in blows; so, seeing that the
woman was most unjustly arrested, he went out and explained the
circumstances to the guardian of order.  But to no purpose; the poor
creature was taken to the station, accompanied by the gentleman, who
most properly volunteered that neighbourly turn.  There she was
charged with "obstructing the policeman in the lawful execution of
his duty."  She was let out on bail, and next day appeared to answer
the charge.

Mr. Mayne, the magistrate, presided.  The constable told his tale
without any material deviation from the truth, probably confident,
from previous experience, that his accusation was sufficient to
secure a conviction.  On the defendant's behalf, the gentleman
referred to, who was well known to the magistrate himself, was
called, and he related the facts as we have above given them.  Even
Mr. Mayne [91] could see no proof of the information, and this he
confessed in the following qualified judgment:--

"You are indeed very lucky, my good woman, that the constable has
failed to prove his case against you; otherwise you would have been
sent to hard labour, as the ordinance provides, without the option of
a fine.  But as the case stands, you must pay a fine of L2"!!!

Comment on this worse than scandalous decision would be superfluous.

Another typical case, illustrative of the truth of Mr. Froude's boast
of the eminent fair play, nay, even the stout protection, that
Negroes, and generally, "the weaker," have been wont to receive from
British magistrates, may be related.

An honest, hard-working couple, living in one of the outlying
districts, cultivated a plot of ground, upon the produce of which
they depended for their livelihood.  After a time these worthy folk,
on getting to their holding in the morning, used to find exasperating
evidence of the plunder overnight of their marketable provisions.
Determined to discover the depredator, they concealed themselves
[92] in the garden late one night, and awaited the result.  By that
means they succeeded in capturing the thief, a female, who, not
suspecting their presence, had entered the garden, dug out some of
the provisions, and was about to make off with her booty.  In spite
of desperate resistance, she was taken to the police station and
there duly charged with larceny.  Meanwhile her son, on hearing of
his mother's incarceration, hastened to find her in her cell, and,
after briefly consulting with her, he decided on entering a
countercharge of assault and battery against both her captors.
Whether or not this bold proceeding was prompted by the knowledge
that the dispensing of justice in the magistrate's court was a mere
game of cross-purposes, a cynical disregard of common sense and
elementary equity, we cannot say; but the ultimate result fully
justified this abnormal hardihood of filial championship.

On the day of the trial, the magistrate heard the evidence on both
sides, the case of larceny having been gone into first.  For her
defence, the accused confined herself to simple denials of the
allegations against her, at the [93] same time entertaining the court
with a lachrymose harangue about her rough treatment at the hands of
the accusing parties.  Finally, the decision of the magistrate was:
that the prisoner be discharged, and the plundered goods restored to
her; and, as to the countercharge, that the husband and wife be
imprisoned, the former for three and the latter for two months, with
hard labour!  When we add that there was, at that time, no Governor
or Chief Justice accessible to the poorer and less intelligent
classes, as is now the case (Sir Henry T. Irving and Sir Joseph
Needham having been respectively superseded by Sir William Robinson
and Sir John Gorrie), one can imagine what scope there was for
similar exhibitions of the protecting energy of British rule.

As we have already said, during Mr. Froude's sojourn in Trinidad the
"sleek, happy, and contented" people, whose condition "admitted of no
improvement," were yet groaning in bitter sorrow, nay, in absolute
despair, under the crushing weight of such magisterial decisions as
those which I have just recorded.  Let me add two more [94] typical
cases which occurred during Mr. Mayne's tenure of office in the
island.

L. B. was a member of one of those brawling sisterhoods that
frequently disturbed the peace of the town of Port of Spain.  She had
a "pal" or intimate chum familiarly known as "Lady," who staunchly
stood by her in all the squabbles that occurred with their
adversaries.  One particular night, the police were called to a
street in the east of the town, in consequence of an affray between
some women of the sort referred to.  Arriving on the spot, they found
the fight already over, but a war of words was still proceeding among
the late combatants, of whom the aforesaid "Lady" was one of the most
conspicuous.  A list was duly made out of the parties found so
engaged, and it included the name of L. B., who happened not to be
there, or even in Port of Spain at all, she having some days before
gone into the country to spend a little time with some relatives.
The inserting of her name was an inferential mistake on the part of
the police, arising from the presence of "Lady" at the brawl, she
being well known by them to be the inseparable ally of L. B. on such
occasions.

[95] It was not unnatural that in the obscurity they should have
concluded that the latter was present with her altera ego, when in
reality she was not there.

The participants in the brawl were charged at the station, and
summonses, including one to L. B., were duly issued.  On her return
to Port of Spain a day or two after the occurrence, the wrongly
incriminated woman received from the landlady her key, along with the
magisterial summons that had resulted from the error of the
constables.  The day of the trial came on, and L. B. stood before Mr.
Mayne, strong in her innocence, and supported by the sworn testimony
of her landlady as well as of her uncle from the country, with whom
and with his family she had been uninterruptedly staying up to one or
two days after the occurrence in which she had been thus implicated.
The evidence of the old lady, who, like thousands of her advanced age
in the Colony, had never even once had occasion to be present in any
court of justice, was to the following effect: That the defendant,
who was a tenant of hers, had, on a certain morning (naming days
before the affray occurred), [96] come up to her door well dressed,
and followed by a porter carrying her luggage.  L. B., she continued,
then handed her the key of the apartment, informing her at the same
time that she was going for some days into the country to her
relatives, for a change, and requesting also that the witness should
on no account deliver the key to any person who should ask for it
during her absence.  This witness further deposed to receiving the
summons from the police, which she placed along with the key for
delivery to L. B. on the latter's return home.

The testimony of the uncle was also decisively corroborative of that
of the preceding witness, as to the absence from Port of Spain of L.
B. during the days embraced in the defence.  The alibi was therefore
unquestionably made out, especially as none of the police witnesses
would venture to swear to having actually seen L. B. at the brawl.
The magistrate had no alternative but that of acquiescing in the
proof of her innocence; so he dismissed the charge against the
accused, who stood down from among the rest, radiant with
satisfaction.  The other defendants were duly [97] convicted, and
sentenced to a term of imprisonment with hard labour.  All this was
quite correct; but here comes matter for consideration with regard to
the immaculate dispensation of justice as vaunted so confidently by
Mr. Froude.

On receiving their sentence the women all stood down from the dock,
to be escorted to prison, except "Lady," who, by the way, had
preserved a rigid silence, while some of the other defendants had
voluntarily and, it may be added, generously protested that L. B.
was not present on the occasion of this particular row.  "Lady,"
whether out of affection or from a less respectable motive, cried out
to the stipendiary justice.  "But, sir, it ain't fair.  How is it
every time that L. B. and me come up before you, you either fine or
send up the two of us together, and to-day you are sending me up
alone?"  Moved either by the logic or the pathos of this objurgation,
the magistrate, turning towards L. B., who had lingered after her
narrow escape to watch the issue of the proceedings, thus addressed
her:--"L. B., upon second thoughts I order you to the same term of
hard labour at the Royal Gaol with the [98] others."  The poor girl,
having neither money nor friends intelligent enough to interfere on
her behalf, had to submit, and she underwent the whole of this
iniquitous sentence.

The last typical case that we shall give illustrates the singular
application by this more than singular judge of the legal maxim
caveat emptor.  A free coolie possessed of a donkey resolved to
utilize the animal in carting grass to the market.  He therefore
called on another coolie living at some distance from him, whom he
knew to own two carts, a small donkey-cart and an ordinary cart for
mule or horse.  He proposed the purchase of the smaller cart, stating
his reason for wishing to have it.  The donkey-cart was then shown to
the intending purchaser, who, along with two Creole witnesses brought
by him to make out and attest the receipt on the occasion, found some
of the iron fittings defective, and drew the vendor's attention
thereto.  He, on his side, engaged, on receiving the amount agreed to
for the cart, to send it off to the blacksmith for immediate repairs,
to be delivered to the purchaser next morning at the latest.  On this
understanding the purchase money was paid down, and the [99] receipt,
specifying that the sum therein mentioned was for a donkey-cart,
passed from the vendor to the purchaser of the little vehicle.  Next
day at about noon the man went with his donkey for the cart.  Arrived
there, his countryman had the larger of the two carts brought out,
and in pretended innocence said to the purchaser of the donkey-cart,
"Here is your cart."  On this a warm dispute arose, which was not
abated by the presence and protests of the two witnesses of the day
before, who had hastily been summoned by the victim to bear out his
contention that it was the donkey-cart and not the larger cart which
had been examined, bargained for, purchased, and promised to be
delivered, the day before.

The matter, on account of the sturdiness of the rascal's denials, had
to be referred to a court of law.  The complainant engaged an able
solicitor, who laid the case before Mr. Mayne in all its transparent
simplicity and strength.  The defendant, although he had, and as a
matter of fact could have, no means of invalidating the evidence of
the two witnesses, and above all of his receipt with his signature,
relied upon the fact that the cart which he [100] offered was much
larger than the one the complainant had actually bought, and that
therefore complainant would be the gainer by the transaction.
Incredible as it may sound, this view of the case commended itself to
the magistrate, who adopted it in giving his judgment against the
complainant.  In vain did the solicitor protest that all the facts of
the case were centred in the desire and intention of the prosecutor
to have specifically a donkey-cart, which was abundantly proved by
everything that had come out in the proceedings.  In vain also was
his endeavour to show that a man having only a donkey would be
hopelessly embarrassed by having a cart for it which was entirely
intended for animals of much larger size.  The magistrate solemnly
reiterated his decision, and wound up by saying that the victim had
lost his case through disregard of the legal maxim caveat emptor--let
the purchaser be careful.  The rascally defendant thus gained his
case, and left the court in defiant triumph.

The four preceding cases are thoroughly significant of the original
method in which thousands of cases were decided by this model
magistrate, to the great detriment, pecuniary, [101] social, and
moral, during more than ten years, of between 60,000 and 70,000 of
the population within the circle of his judicial authority.  What
shall we think, therefore, of the fairness of Mr. Froude or his
informants, who,  prompt and eager in imputing unworthy motives to
gentlemen with characters above reproach, have yet been so silent
with regard to the flagrant and frequent abuses of more than one of
their countrymen by whom the honour and fair fame of their nation
were for years draggled in the mire, and whose misdeeds were the
theme of every tongue and thousands of newspaper-articles in the West
Indian Colonies?

     MR. ARTHUR CHILD, S.J.P.

We now take San Fernando, the next most important magisterial
district after Port of Spain.  At the time of Mr. Froude's visit, and
for some time before, the duties of the magistracy there were
discharged by Mr. Arthur Child, an "English barrister" who, of
course, had possessed the requisite qualification of being hopelessly
briefless.  For the ideal justice which Mr. Froude would have Britons
believe is meted out to the weaker classes by their fellow-
countrymen [102] in the West Indies, we may refer the reader to the
conduct of the above-named functionary on the memorable occasion of
the slaughter of the coolies under Governor Freeling, in October,
1884.  Mr. Child, as Stipendiary justice, had the duty of reading the
Riot Act to the immigrants, who were marching in procession to the
town of San Fernando, contrary, indeed, to the Government
proclamation which had forbidden it; and he it was who gave the order
to "fire," which resulted fatally to many of the unfortunate devotees
of Hosein.  This mandate and its lethal consequences anticipated by
some minutes the similar but far more death-dealing action of the
Chief of Police, who was stationed at another post in the vicinity of
San Fernando.  The day after the shooting down of a total of more
than one hundred immigrants, the protecting action of this magistrate
towards the weaker folk under his jurisdiction had a striking
exemplification, to which Mr. Froude is hereby made welcome.  Of
course there was a general cry of horror throughout the Colony, and
especially in the San Fernando district, at the fatal outcome of the
proclamation, which had mentioned only "fine" and "imprisonment,"
[103] but not Death, as the penalty of disregarding its prohibitions.
For nearly forty years, namely from their very first arrival in the
Colony, the East Indian immigrants had, according to specific
agreement with the Government, invariably been allowed the privilege
of celebrating their annual feast of Hosein, by walking in procession
with their Pagodas through the public roads and streets of the
island, without prohibition or hindrance of any kind from the
authorities, save and except in cases where rival estate pagodas were
in danger of getting into collision on the question of precedence.
On such occasions the police, who always attended the processions,
usually gave the lead to the pagodas of the labourers of estates
according to their seniority as immigrants.

In no case up to 1884, after thirty odd years' inauguration in the
Colony, was the Hosein festival ever pretended to be any cause of
danger, actual or prospective, to any town or building.  On the
contrary, business grew brisker and solidly improved at the approach
of the commemoration, owing to the very considerable sale of parti-
coloured paper, velvet, calico, and similar articles used in the
construction [104] of the pagodas.  Governor Freeling, however, was,
it may be presumed, compelled to see danger in an institution which
had had nearly forty years' trial, without a single accident
happening to warrant any sudden interposition of the Government
tending to its suppression.  At all events, the only action taken in
1884, in prospect of their usual festival, was to notify the
immigrants by proclamation, and, it is said, also through authorized
agents, that the details of their fete were not to be conducted in
the usual manner; and that their appearance with pagodas in any
public road or any town, without special license from some competent
local authority, would entail the penalty of so many pounds fine, or
imprisonment for so many months with hard labour.  The immigrants, to
whom this unexpected change on the part of the authorities was
utterly incomprehensible, both petitioned and sent deputations to the
Governor, offering guarantees for the, if possible, more secure
celebration of the Hosein, and praying His Excellency to cancel the
prohibition as to the use of the roads, inasmuch as it interfered
with the essential part of their religious rite, which was the
"drowning," or casting into [105] the sea, of the pagodas.  Having
utterly failed in their efforts with the Governor, the coolies
resolved to carry out their religious duty according to prescriptive
forms, accepting, at the same time, the responsibility in the way of
fine or imprisonment which they would thus inevitably incur.  A
rumour was also current at the time that, pursuant to this
resolution, the head men of the various plantations had authorized a
general subscription amongst their countrymen, for meeting the
contingency of fines in the police courts.  All these things were the
current talk of the population of San Fernando, in which town the
leading immigrants, free as well as indentured, had begun to raise
funds for this purpose.

All that the public, therefore, expected would have resulted from the
intended infringement of the Proclamation was an enormous influx of
money in the shape of fines into the Colonial Treasury; as no one
doubted the extreme facility which existed for ascertaining exactly,
in the case of persons registered and indentured to specific
plantations, the names and abodes of at least the chief offenders
against the proclamation.  Accordingly, on the [106] occurrence of
the bloody catastrophe related above, every one felt that the mere
persistence in marching all unarmed towards the town, without
actually attempting to force their way into it, was exorbitantly
visited upon the coolies by a violent death or a life-long
mutilation.  This sentiment few were at any pains to conceal; but as
the poorer and more ignorant classes can be handled with greater
impunity than those who are intelligent and have the means of self-
defence, Mr. Justice Child, the very day after the tragedy, and
without waiting for the pro forma official inquiry into the tragedy
in which he bore so conspicuous a part, actually caused to be
arrested, sat to try and sent to hard labour, persons whom the
police, in obedience to his positive injunctions, had reported to him
as having condemned the shooting down of the immigrants!  Those who
were arrested and thus summarily punished had, of course, no means of
self-protection; and as the case is typical of others, as
illustrative of "justice-made law" applied to "subject races" in a
British colony, Mr. Froude is free to accept it, or not, in
corroboration of his unqualified panegyrics.

[107]

     MR. GROVE HUMPHREY CHAPMAN, S.J.P.

As Stipendary Magistrate of this self-same San Fernando district,
Grove Humphrey Chapman, Esquire (another English barrister), was the
immediate predecessor of Mr. Child.  More humane than Mr. Mayne, his
colleague and contemporary in Port of Spain, this young magistrate
began his career fairly well.  But he speedily fell a victim to the
influences immediately surrounding him in his new position.  His
head, which later events proved never to have been naturally strong,
began to be turned by the unaccustomed deference which he met with on
all hands, from high and low, official and non-official, and he
himself soon consummated the addling of his brain by persistent
practical revolts against every maxim of the ancient Nazarenes in the
matter of potations.  His decisions at the court, therefore, became
perfect emulations of those of Mr. Mayne, as well in perversity as in
harshness, and many in his case also were the appeals for relief made
to the head of the executive by the inhabitants of the district--but
of course in vain.  Governor Irving was at this time in office, and
the unfortunate [108] victims of perverse judgments--occasionally
pronounced by this magistrate in his cups--were only poor Negroes,
coolies, or other persons whose worldly circumstances placed them in
the category of the "weaker" in the community.  To these classes of
people that excellent ruler unhappily denied--we dare not say his
personal sympathy, but--the official protection which, even through
self-respect, he might have perfunctorily accorded.  Bent, however,
on running through the whole gamut of extravagance, Mr. Chapman--by
interpreting official impunity into implying a direct license for the
wildest of his caprices--plunged headlong with ever accelerating
speed, till the deliverance of the Naparimas became the welcome
consequence of his own personal action.  On one occasion it was
credibly reported in the Colony that this infatuated dispenser of
British justice actually stretched his official complaisance so far
as to permit a lady not only to be seated near him on the judicial
bench, but also to take a part--loud, boisterous and abusive--in the
legal proceedings of the day.  Meanwhile, as the Governor could not
be induced to interfere, things went [109] on from bad to worse, till
one day, as above hinted, the unfortunate magistrate so publicly
committed himself as to be obliged to be borne for temporary refuge
to the Lunatic Asylum, whence he was clandestinely shipped from the
Colony on "six months' leave of absence," never more to resume his
official station.

The removal of two such magistrates as those whose careers we have so
briefly sketched out--Mr. Mayne having died, still a magistrate,
since Mr. Froude's departure--has afforded opportunity for the
restoration of British protecting influence.  In the person of Mr.
Llewellyn Lewis, as magistrate of Port of Spain, this opportunity has
been secured.  He, it is generally rumoured, strives to justify the
expectations of fair play and even-handed justice which are generally
entertained concerning Englishmen.  It is, however, certain that with
a Governor so prompt to hear the cry of the poor as Sir William
Robinson has proved himself to be, and with a Chief Justice so
vigilant, fearless, and painstaking as Sir John Gorrie, the entire
magistracy of the Colony must be so beneficially influenced as to
preclude [110] the frequency of appeals being made to the higher
courts, or it may be to the Executive, on account of scandalously
unjust and senseless decisions.

So long, too, as the names of T. S. Warner, Captain Larcom, and F. H.
Hamblin abide in the grateful remembrance of the entire population,
as ideally upright, just, and impartial dispensers of justice, each
in his own jurisdiction, we can only sigh at the temporal
dispensation which renders practicable the appointment and retention
in office of such administrators of the Law as were Mr. Mayne and Mr.
Chapman.  The widespread and irreparable mischiefs wrought by these
men still affect disastrously many an unfortunate household; and the
execration by the weaker in the community of their memory,
particularly that of Robert Dawson Mayne, is only a fitting
retribution for their abuse of power.

NOTES

85. *A West Indian official superstition professes to believe that a
British barrister must make an exceptionally good colonial S.J.P.,
seeing that he is ignorant of everything, save general English law,
that would qualify him for the post!  In this, to acquit oneself
tolerably, some acquaintance with the language, customs, and habits
of thought of the population is everywhere else held to be of prime
importance,--native conscientiousness and honesty of purpose being
definitively presupposed.



BOOK III: SOCIAL REVOLUTION

[113] Never was the Knight of La Mancha more convinced of his
imaginary mission to redress the wrongs of the world than Mr. James
Anthony Froude seems to be of his ability to alter the course of
events, especially those bearing on the destinies of the Negro in the
British West Indies.  The doctrinaire style of his utterances, his
sublime indifference as to what Negro opinion and feelings may be, on
account of his revelations, are uniquely charming.  In that portion
of his book headed "Social Revolution" our author, with that mixture
of frankness and cynicism which is so dear to the soul of the British
esprit fort of to-day, has challenged a comparison between British
Colonial policy on the [114] one hand, and the Colonial policy of
France and Spain on the other.  This he does with an evident
recklessness that his approval of Spain and France involves a
definite condemnation of his own country.  However, let us hear
him:--

"The English West Indies, like other parts of the world, are going
through a silent revolution.  Elsewhere the revolution, as we hope,
is a transition state, a new birth; a passing away of what is old and
worn out, that a fresh and healthier order may rise in its place.  In
the West Indies the most sanguine of mortals will find it difficult
to entertain any such hope at all."

As Mr. Froude is speaking dogmatically here of his, or rather our,
West Indies, let us hear him as he proceeds:--

"We have been a ruling power there for two hundred and fifty years;
the whites whom we planted as our representatives are drifting into
ruin, and they regard England and England's policy as the principal
cause of it.  The blacks whom, in a fit of virtuous benevolence, we
emancipated, do not feel particularly obliged to us.  They think, if
they think at all, that they were [115] ill-treated originally, and
have received no more than was due to them."

Thus far.  Now, as to "the whites whom we planted as our
representatives," and who, Mr. Froude avers, are drifting into ruin,
we confess to a total ignorance of their whereabouts in these islands
in this jubilee year of Negro Emancipation.  Of the representatives
of Britain immediately before and after Emancipation we happen to
know something, which, on the testimony of Englishmen, Mr. Froude
will be made quite welcome to before our task is ended.  With respect
to Mr. Froude's statement as to the ingratitude of the emancipated
Blacks, if it is aimed at the slaves who were actually set free, it
is utterly untrue; for no class of persons, in their humble and
artless way, are more attached to the Queen's majesty, whom they
regard as incarnating in her gracious person the benevolence which
Mr. Froude so jauntily scoffs at.  But if our censor's remark under
this head is intended for the present generation of Blacks, it is a
pure and simple absurdity.  What are we Negroes of the present day to
be grateful for to the US, personified by Mr. Froude and the Colonial
[116] Office exportations?  We really believe, from what we know of
Englishmen, that very few indeed would regard Mr. Froude's reproach
otherwise than as a palpable adding of insult to injury.  Obliged to
"us," indeed!  Why, Mr. Froude, who speaks of us as dogs and horses,
suggests that the same kindliness of treatment that secures the
attachment of those noble brutes would have the same result in our
case.  With the same consistency that marks his utterances throughout
his book, he tells his readers "that there is no original or
congenital difference between the capacity of the White and the Negro
races."  He adds, too, significantly: "With the same chances and with
the same treatment, I believe that distinguished men would be
produced equally from both races."  After this truthful testimony,
which Pelion upon Ossa of evidence has confirmed, does Mr. Froude, in
the fatuity of his skin-pride, believe that educated men, worthy of
the name, would be otherwise than resentful, if not disgusted, at
being shunted out of bread in their own native land, which their
parents' labours and taxes have made desirable, in order to afford
room to blockheads, vulgarians, [117] or worse, imported from beyond
the seas?  Does Mr. Froude's scorn of the Negroes' skin extend,
inconsistently on his part, to their intelligence and feelings also?
And if so, what has the Negro to care--if let alone and not wantonly
thwarted in his aspirations?  It sounds queer, not to say unnatural
and scandalous, that Englishmen should in these days of light be the
champions of injustice towards their fellow-subjects, not for any
intellectual or moral disqualification, but on the simple account of
the darker skin of those who are to be assailed and thwarted in their
life's career and aspirations.  Really, are we to be grateful that
the colour difference should be made the basis and justification of
the dastardly denials of justice, social, intellectual, and moral,
which have characterized the regime of those who Mr. Froude boasts
were left to be the representatives of Britain's morality and fair
play?  Are the Negroes under the French flag not intensely French?
Are the Negroes under the Spanish flag not intensely Spanish?
Wherefore are they so?  It is because the French and Spanish nations,
who are neither of them inferior in origin or the [118] nobility of
the part they have each played on the historic stage, have had the
dignity and sense to understand the lowness of moral and intellectual
consciousness implied in the subordination of questions of an
imperial nature to the slaveholder's anxiety about the hue of those
who are to be benefited or not in the long run.  By Spain and France
every loyal and law-abiding subject of the Mother Country has been a
citizen deemed worthy all the rights, immunities, and privileges
flowing from good and creditable citizenship.  Those meriting such
distinction were taken into the bosom of the society which their
qualifications recommended them to share, and no office under the
Government has been thought too good or too elevated for men of their
stamp.  No wonder, then, that Mr. Froude is silent regarding the
scores of brilliant coloured officials who adorn the civil service of
France and Spain, and whose appointment, in contrast with what has
usually been the case in British Colonies, reflects an abiding lustre
on those countries, and establishes their right to a foremost place
among nations.

Mr. Froude, in speaking of Chief Justice [119] Reeves, ventures upon
a smart truism which we can discuss for him, but of course not in the
sense in which he has meant it.  "Exceptions," our author remarks,
"are supposed proverbially to prove nothing, or to prove the very
opposite of what they appear to prove.  When a particular phenomenon
occurs rarely, the probabilities are strong against the recurrence of
it."  Now, is it in ignorance, or through disingenuousness, that Mr.
Froude has penned this argument regarding exceptions?  Surely, in the
vast area of American life, it is not possible that he could see
Frederick Douglass alone out of the cluster of prominent Black
Americans who are doing the work of their country so worthily and so
well in every official department.  Anyhow, Mr. Froude's history of
the Emancipation may here be amended for him by a reminder that, in
the British Colonies, it was not Whites as masters, and Blacks as
slaves, who were affected by that momentous measure.  In fact, 1838
found in the British Colonies very nearly as many Negro and Mulatto
slave-owners as there were white.  Well then, these black and yellow
planters received their quota, it may be presumed, of [120] the
L20,000,000 sterling indemnity.  They were part and parcel of the
proprietary body in the Colonies, and had to meet the crisis like the
rest.  They were very wealthy, some of these Ethiopic accomplices of
the oppressors of their own race.  Their sons and daughters were
sent, like the white planter's children, across the Atlantic for a
European education.  These young folk returned to their various
native Colonies as lawyers and doctors.  Many of them were also
wealthy planters.  The daughters, of course, became in time the
mothers of the new generation of prominent inhabitants.  Now, in
America all this was different.  No "nigger," however alabaster fair,
was ever allowed the privileges of common citizenship, let alone the
right to hold property in others.  If possessed by a weakness to pass
for white men, as very many of them could easily have contrived to
do, woe unto the poor impostors!  They were hunted down from city to
city as few felons would be, and finally done to death--"serve them
right!" being the grim commentary regarding their fate for having
sought to usurp the ineffable privilege of whitemanship!  All this,
Mr. Froude, was [121] the rule, the practice, in America, with regard
to persons of colour up to twenty-five years ago.  Now, sir, what is
the phenomenon which strikes your vision in that mighty Republic to-
day, with regard to those self-same despised, discountenanced,
persecuted and harried descendants of Ham?  We shall tell you of the
change that has taken place in their condition, and also some of the
reasons of that beneficent revolution.

The Proclamation of Emancipation on January 1st, 1863, was, by
President Lincoln, frankly admitted to have been a war necessity.  No
abstract principle of justice or of morals was of primary
consideration in the matter.  The saving of the Union at any cost,--
that is, the stern political emergency forced forth the document
which was to be the social salvation of every descendant of Ham in
the United States of America.  Close upon the heels of their
emancipation, the enfranchisement of the Negroes was pushed forward
by the thorough-going American statesmen.  They had no sentimentality
to defer to.  The logic of events--the fact not only of the coloured
race being freedmen, but also of their having been effective [122]
comrades on the fields of battle, where the blood of eager thousands
of them had flowed on the Union side, pointed out too plainly that
men with such claims should also be partners in the resulting
triumph.

Mr. Froude, being so deferential to skin prejudice, will doubtless
find it strange that such a measure as the Civil Rights Bill should
have passed a Congress of Americans.  Assuredly with the feeling
against the coloured race which custom and law had engrafted into the
very nature of the vast majority, this was a tremendous call to make
on the national susceptibilities.  But it has been exactly this that
has brought out into such vivid contrast the conduct of the British
statesman, loudly professing to be unprejudiced as to colour, and
fair and humane, on the one hand, and, on the other hand, the
dealings of the politicians of America, who had, as a matter of fact,
sucked in aversion and contempt towards the Negro together with their
mother's milk.  Of course no sane being could expect that feelings so
deeply ingrained and nourished could be rooted out by logic or by any
legislative enactment.  But, indeed, it is sublimely creditable to
[123] the American Government that, whatever might be the personal
and private sentiments of its individual members as regards race,
palmam ferat qui meruit--"let him bear the palm who has deserved it"-
-has been their motto in dealing generally with the claims of their
Ethiopic fellow-citizens.  Hence it is that in only twenty-five years
America can show Negro public officers as thick as blackberries,
while Mr. Froude can mention only Mr. Justice Reeves in FIFTY years
as a sample of the "exceptional" progress under British auspices of a
man of African descent!  Verily, if in fifty long years British
policy can recognize only one single exception in a race between
which and the white race there is no original or congenital
difference of capacity, the inference must be that British policy has
been not only systematically, but also too successfully, hostile to
the advancement of the Ethiopians subject thereto; while the "fair
field and no favour" management of the strong-minded Americans has,
by its results, confirmed the culpability of the English policy in
its relation to "subject races."

The very suggestive section of "the English [124] in the West
Indies," from which we have already given extracts, and which bears
the title "Social Revolution," thus proceeds:--

"But it does not follow that what can be done eventually can be done
immediately, and the gulf which divides the colours is no arbitrary
prejudice, but has been opened by the centuries of training and
discipline which have given us the start in the race" (p. 125
[Froude]).

The reference in the opening clause of the above citation, as to what
is eventually possible not being immediately feasible, is to the
elevation of Blacks to high official posts, such as those occupied by
Judge Reeves in Barbados, and by Mr. F. Douglass in the United
States.  We have already disposed by anticipation of the above
contention of Mr. Froude's, by showing that in only twenty-five years
America has found hundreds of eminent Blacks to fill high posts under
her government.  Our author's futile mixture of Judge Reeves'
exceptional case with that of Fred. Douglass, which he cunningly
singles out from among so many in the United States, is nothing but a
subterfuge, of the same queer and flimsy description with which the
literature of the cause now championed [125] by his eloquence has
made the world only too familiar.  What can Mr. Froude conceive any
sane man should see in common between the action of British and of
American statesmanship in the matter now under discussion?  If his
utterance on this point is that of a British spokesman, let him abide
by his own verdict against his own case, as embodied in the words,
"the gulf which divides the two COLOURS is no arbitrary prejudice,"
which, coupled with his contention that the elevation of the Blacks
is not immediately feasible, discloses the wideness of divergence
between British and American political opinion on this identical
subject.

Mr. Froude is pathetically eloquent on the colour question.  He tells
of the wide gulf between the two colours--we suppose it is as wide as
exists between his white horse and his black horse.  Seriously,
however, does not this kind of talk savour only too much of the
slave-pen and the auction-block of the rice-swamp and the cotton-
field; of the sugar-plantation and the driver's lash?  In the United
States alone, among all the slave-holding Powers, was the difference
of race and colour invoked openly and boldly to justify all the
enormities that [126] were the natural accompaniments of those
"institutions" of the Past.  But is Mr. Froude serious in invoking
the ostracizing of innocent, loyal, and meritorious British subjects
on account of their mere colour?  Physical slavery--which was no
crime per se, Mr. Froude tells us--had at least overwhelming brute
power, and that silent, passive force which is even more potential as
an auxiliary, viz., unenlightened public opinion, whose neutrality is
too often a positive support to the empire of wrong.

But has Mr. Froude, in his present wild propaganda on behalf of
political and, therefore, of social repression, anything analogous to
those two above-specified auxiliaries to rely on?  We trow not.  Then
why this frantic bluster and shouting forth of indiscreet aspirations
on be half of a minority to whom accomplished facts, when not
agreeable to or manipulated by themselves, are a perpetual grievance,
generating life-long impotent protestations?  Presumably there are
possibilities the thoughts of which fascinate our author and his
congeners in this, to our mind, vain campaign in the cause of social
retrogression.  But, be the incentives what they may, it might not be
amiss on our [127] part to suggest to those impelled by them that the
ignoring of Negro opinion in their calculations, though not only
possible but easily practised fifty years ago, is a portentous
blunder at the present time.  Verbum sapienti.

Mr. Froude must see that he has set about his Negro-repression
campaign in too blundering a fashion.  He evidently expects to be
able to throw dust into the eyes of the intelligent world, juggler-
wise, through the agency of the mighty pronoun US, as representing
the entire Anglo-Saxon race, in his advocacy of the now scarcely
intelligible pretensions of a little coterie of Her Majesty's
subjects in the West Indies.  These gentry are hostile, he urges, to
the presence of progressive Negroes on the soil of the tropics!  Yet
are these self-same Negroes not only natives, but active improvers
and embellishers of that very soil.  We cannot help concluding that
this impotent grudge has sprung out of the additional fact that these
identical Negroes constitute also a living refutation of the sinister
predictions ventured upon generally against their race, with frantic
recklessness, even within the last three decades, by affrighted
slave-holders, of whose ravings Mr. Froude's book is only a [128]
diluted echo, out of season and outrageous to the conscience of
modern civilization.

It is patent, then, that the matters which Mr. Froude has sought to
force up to the dignity of genetic rivalship, has nothing of that
importance about it.  His US, between whom and the Negro subjects of
Great Britain the gulf of colour lies, comprises, as he himself owns,
an outnumbered and, as we hope to prove later on, a not over-
creditable little clique of Anglo-Saxon lineage.  The real US who
have started ahead of the Negroes, "through the training and
discipline of centuries," are assuredly not anything like
"represented" by the few pretentious incapables who, instead of
conquering predominance, as they who deserve it always do, like men,
are whimpering like babies after dearly coveted but utterly
unattainable enjoyments--to be had at the expense of the interests of
the Negroes whom they, rather amusingly, affect to despise.  When Mr.
Froude shall have become able to present for the world's
contemplation a question respecting which the Anglo-Saxon family, in
its grand world-wide predominance, and the African family, in its yet
feeble, albeit promising, incipience of self-adjustment, shall [129]
actually be competitors, then, and only then, will it be time to
accept the outlook as serious.  But when, as in the present case, he
invokes the whole prestige of the Anglo-Saxon race in favour of the
untenable pretensions of a few blases of that race, and that to the
social and political detriment of tens of thousands of black fellow-
subjects, it is high time that the common sense of civilization
should laugh him out of court.  The US who are flourishing, or
pining, as the case may be, in the British West Indies--by favour of
the Colonial Office on the former hypothesis, or, on the second,
through the misdirection of their own faculties--do not, and, in the
very nature of things, cannot in any race take the lead of any set of
men endowed with virile attributes, the conditions of the contest
being on all sides identical.

Pass we onward to extract and comment on other passages in this very
engaging section of Mr. Froude's book.  On the same page (125) he
says:--

"The African Blacks have been free enough for thousands, perhaps for
ten thousands of years, and it has been the absence of restraint
which has prevented them from becoming civilized."

[130] All this, perhaps, is quite true, and, in the absence of
positive evidence to the contrary of our author's dogmatic
assertions, we save time by allowing him all the benefit he can
derive from whatever weight they might carry.

"Generation has followed generation, and the children are as like
their fathers as the successive generations of apes."

To this we can have nothing to object; especially in view of what the
writer goes on to say, and that on his own side of the hedge--
somewhat qualified though his admission may be:--"The whites, it is
likely enough, succeeded one another with the same similarity for a
series of ages."  Our speculator grows profoundly philosophic here;
and in this mood thus entertains his readers in a strain which,
though deep, we shall strive to find clear:--

"It is now supposed that human race has been on the planet for a
hundred thousand years at least; and the first traces of civilization
cannot be thrown back at furthest beyond six thousand.  During all
this time mankind went on treading in the same steps, century after
century making no more advance than the birds and beasts."

[131] In all this there is nothing that can usefully be taken
exception to; for speculation and conjecture, if plausible and
attractive, are free to revel whenever written documents and the
unmistakable indications of the earth's crust are both entirely at
fault.  Warming up with his theme, Mr. Froude gets somewhat ambiguous
in the very next sentence.  Says he:--

"In Egypt or India or one knows not where, accident or natural
development quickened into life our moral and intellectual faculties;
and these faculties have grown into what we now experience, not in
the freedom in which the modern takes delight, but under the sharp
rule of the strong over the weak, of the wise over the unwise."

Our author, as we see, begins his above quoted deliverance quite at a
loss with regard to the agency to which the incipience, growth, and
fructification of man's faculties should be attributed.  "Accident,"
"natural development," he suggests, quickened the human faculties
into the progressive achievements which they have accomplished.  But
then, wherefore is this writer so forcible, so confident in his
prophecies regarding Negroes and their future temporal condition
[132] and proceedings, since it is "accident," and "accident" only,
that must determine their fulfilment?  Has he so securely bound the
fickle divinity to his service as to be certain of its agency in the
realization of his forecasts?  And if so, where then would be the
fortuitousness that is the very essence of occurrences that glide,
undesigned, unexpected, unforeseen, into the domain of Fact, and
become material for History?  So far as we feel capable of
intelligently meditating on questions of this inscrutable nature, we
are forced to conclude that since "natural development" could be so
regular, so continuous, and withal so efficient, in the production of
the marvellous results that we daily contemplate, there must be
existent and in operation--as, for instance, in the case of the
uniformity characterizing for ages successive generations of mankind,
as above adduced by our philosopher himself--some controlling LAW,
according and subject to which no check has marred the harmonious
progression, or prevented the consummations that have crowned the
normal exercise of human energy, intellectual as well as physical.

The sharp rule of the strong over the [133] weak," is the first
clause of the Carlylean-sounding phrase which embodies the requisite
conditions for satisfactory human development.  The terms expressive
of these conditions, however, while certainly suggesting and
embracing the beneficent, elevating influence and discipline of
European civilization, such as we know and appreciate it, do not by
any means exclude the domination of Mr. Legree or any other typical
man-monster, whose power over his fellow-creatures is at once a
calamity to the victims and a disgrace to the community tolerating
not only its exercise, but the very possibility of its existence.
The sharp rule of "the wise over the unwise," is the closing section
of the recommendation to ensure man's effective development.  Not
even savages hesitate to defer in all their important designs to the
sought-for guidance of superior judgments.  But in the case of us
West Indian Blacks, to whom Mr. Froude's doctrine here has a special
reference, is it suggested by him that the bidders for predominance
over us on the purely epidermal, the white skin, ground, are ipso
facto the monopolists of directing wisdom?  It surely cannot be so;
for Mr. Froude's own chapters regarding both the [134] nomination by
Downing Street of future Colonial office-holders and the disorganized
mental and moral condition of the indigenous representatives--as he
calls them!--of his country in these climes, preclude the possibility
that the reference regarding the wise can be to them.  Now since this
is so, we really cannot see why the pains should have been taken to
indite the above truism, to the truth whereof, under every normal or
legitimate circumstance, the veriest barbarian, by spontaneously
resorting to and cheerfully abiding by it, is among the first to
secure practical effect.

"Our own Anglo-Saxon race," continues our author, "has been capable
of self-government only after a thousand years of civil and spiritual
authority.  European government, European instruction, continued
steadily till his natural tendencies are superseded by higher
instincts, may shorten the probation period of the negro.  Individual
blacks of exceptional quality, like Frederick Douglass in America, or
the Chief Justice of Barbados, will avail themselves of opportunities
to rise, and the freest opportunity OUGHT TO BE offered them."  Here
we are reminded of the dogma laid down by a certain [135] class of
ethnologists, to the effect that intellectuality, when displayed by a
person of mixed European and African blood, must always be assigned
to the European side of the parentage; and in the foregoing citation
our author speaks of two personages undoubtedly belonging to the
class embraced in the above dogma.  Three specific objections may,
therefore, be urged against the statements which we have indicated in
the above quotation.  First and foremost, neither Judge Reeves nor
Mr. Fred Douglass is a black man, as Mr. Froude inaccurately
represents each of them to be.  The former is of mixed blood, to what
degree we are not adepts enough to determine; and the latter, if his
portrait and those who have personally seen him mislead us not, is a
decidedly fair man.

We, of course, do not for a moment imagine that either of those
eminent descendants of Ham cares a jot about the settlement of this
question, which doubtless would appear very trivial to both.  But as
our author's crusade is against the Negro--by which we understand the
undiluted African descendant, the pure Negro, as he singularly
describes Chief Justice Reeves--our anxiety is to show that there
exist, both [136] in the West Indies and in the United States, scores
of genuine black men to whom neither of these two distinguished
patriots would, for one instant, hesitate to concede any claim to
equality in intellectual and social excellence.  The second exception
which we take is, as we have already shown in a previous page, to the
persistent lugging in of America by Mr. Froude, doubtless to keep his
political countrymen in countenance with regard to the Negro
question.  We have already pointed out the futility of this
proceeding on our author's part, and suggested how damaging it might
prove to the cause he is striving to uphold.  "Blacks of exceptional
quality," like the two gentlemen he has specially mentioned, "will
avail themselves of opportunities to rise."  Most certainly they
will, Mr. Froude--but, for the present, only in America, where those
opportunities are really free and open to all.  There no parasitical
non-workers are to be found, eager to eat bread, but in the sweat of
other people's brows; no impecunious title-bearers; no importunate
bores, nor other similar characters whom the Government there would
regard it as their duty  "to provide for"--by quartering them on the
revenues [137] of Colonial dependencies.  But in the British Crown--
or rather "Anglo-West Indian"--governed Colonies, has it ever been,
can it ever be, thus ordered?  Our author's description of the
exigencies that compel injustice to be done in order to requite, or
perhaps to secure, Parliamentary support, coupled with his account of
the bitter animus against the coloured race that rankles in the bosom
of his "Englishmen in the West Indies," sufficiently proves the utter
hypocrisy of his recommendation, that the freest opportunities should
be offered to Blacks of the said exceptional order.  The very wording
of Mr. Froude's recommendation is disingenuous.  It is one stone sped
at two birds, and which, most naturally, has missed them both.

Mr. Froude knew perfectly well that, twenty-five years before he
wrote his book, America had thrown open the way to public advancement
to the Blacks, as it had been previously free to Whites alone.  His
use of "should be offered," instead of "are offered," betrays his
consciousness that, at the time he was writing, the offering of any
opportunities of the kind he suggests was a thing still to be desired
under British jurisdiction.  The third objection [138] which we
shall take to Mr. Froude's bracketing of the cases of Mr. Fred
Douglass and of Judge Reeves together, is that, when closely
examined, the two cases can be distinctly seen to be not in any way
parallel.  The applause which our author indirectly bids for on
behalf of British Colonial liberality in the instance of Mr. Reeves
would be the grossest mockery, if accorded in any sense other than we
shall proceed to show.  Fred Douglass was born and bred a slave in
one of the Southern States of the Union, and regained his freedom by
flight from bondage, a grown man, and, of course, under the
circumstances, solitary and destitute.  He reached the North at a
period when the prejudice of the Whites against men of his race was
so rampant as to constitute a positive mania.

The stern and cruelly logical doctrine, that a Negro had no rights
which white men were bound to respect, was in full blast and
practical exemplification.  Yet amidst it all, and despite of it all,
this gifted fugitive conquered his way into the Temple of Knowledge,
and became eminent as an orator, a writer, and a lecturer on
political and general subjects.  Hailed abroad [139] as a prodigy,
and received with acclamation into the brotherhood of intelligence,
abstract justice and moral congruity demanded that such a man should
no longer be subject to the shame and abasement of social, legal, and
political proscription.  The land of his birth proved herself equal
to this imperative call of civilized Duty, regardless of customs and
the laws, written as well as unwritten, which had doomed to life-long
degradation every member of the progeny of Ham.  Recognizing in the
erewhile bondman a born leader of men, America, with the unflinching
directness that has marked her course, whether in good or in evil,
responded with spontaneous loyalty to the inspiration of her highest
instincts.  Shamed into compunction and remorse at the solid fame and
general sympathy secured for himself by a son of her soil, whom, in
the wantonness of pride and power, she had denied all fostering care
(not, indeed, for any conscious offending on his part, but by reason
of a natural peculiarity which she had decreed penal), America, like
a repentant mother, stooped from her august seat, and giving with
enthusiasm both hands to the outcast, she helped him to stand forward
and erect, [140] in the dignity of untrammeled manhood, making him,
at the same time, welcome to a place of honour amongst the most
gifted, the worthiest and most favoured of her children.

Chief Justice Reeves, on the other hand, did not enter the world, as
Douglass had done, heir to a lot of intellectual darkness and
legalized social and political proscription.  Associated from
adolescence with S. J. Prescod, the greatest leader of popular
opinion whom Barbados has yet produced, Mr. Reeves possessed in his
nature the material to assimilate and reflect in his own principles
and conduct the salient characteristics of his distinguished Mentor.
Arrived in England to study law, he had there the privilege of the
personal acquaintance of Lord Brougham, then one of the Nestors of
the great Emancipation conflict.  On returning to his native island,
which he did immediately after his call to the bar, Mr. Reeves sprung
at once into the foremost place, and retained his precedence till his
labours and aspirations were crowned by his obtaining the highest
judicial post in that Colony.  For long years before becoming Chief
Justice, Mr. Reeves had conquered for himself the respect and
confidence [141] of all Barbadians--even including the ultra
exclusive "Anglo-West-Indians" of Mr. Froude--by the manful
constitutional stand which, sacrificing official place, he had
successfully made against the threatened abrogation of the Charter of
the Colony, which every class and colour of natives cherish and
revere as a most precious, almost sacred, inheritance.  The
successful champion of their menaced liberties found clustering
around him the grateful hearts of all his countrymen, who, in their
hour of dread at the danger of their time-honoured constitution, had
clung in despair to him as the only leader capable of heading the
struggle and leading the people, by wise and constitutional guidance,
to the victory which they desired but could not achieve for
themselves.

Sir William Robinson, who was sent out as pacificator, saw and took
in at a glance the whole significance of the condition of affairs,
especially in their relation to Mr. Reeves, and vice versa.  With the
unrivalled pre-eminence and predominant personal influence of the
latter, the Colonial Office had possessed more than ample means of
being perfectly familiar.  What, then, could be more natural and
consonant with [142] sound policy than that the then acknowledged,
but officially unattached, head of the people (being an eminent
lawyer), should, on the occurrence of a vacancy in the highest
juridical post, be appointed to co-operate with the supreme head of
the Executive?  Mr. Reeves was already the chief of the legal body of
the Colony; his appointment, therefore, as Chief Justice amounted to
nothing more than an official ratification of an accomplished and
unalterable fact.  Of course, it was no fault of England's that the
eminent culture, political influence, and unapproached legal status
of Mr. Reeves should have coincided exactly with her political
requirements at that crisis, nor yet that she should have utilized a
coincidence which had the double advantage of securing the permanent
services, whilst realizing at the same time the life's aspiration, of
a distinguished British subject.  But that Mr. Froude should be
dinning in our ears this case of benefited self-interest, gaining the
amplest reciprocity, both as to service and serviceableness, with the
disinterested spontaneity of America's elevation of Mr. Douglass, is
but another proof of the obliquity of the moral medium through [143]
which he is wont to survey mankind and their concerns.

The distinction between the two marvellous careers which we have been
discussing demands, as it is susceptible of, still sharper
accentuation.  In the final success of Reeves, it is the man himself
who confronts one in the unique transcendency and victoriousness of
personal merit.  On the other hand, a million times the personal
merit of Reeves combined with his own could have availed Douglass
absolutely nothing in the United States, legal and social proscript
that he was, with public opinion generally on the side of the laws
and usages against him.  The very little countries of the world are
proverbial for the production of very great men.  But, on the other
hand, narrowness of space favours the concentration and coherence of
the adverse forces that might impede, if they fail of utterly
thwarting, the success which may happen to be grudged by those
possessing the will and the power for its obstruction.  In Barbados,
so far as we have heard, read, and seen ourselves of the social ins
and outs of that little sister-colony, the operation of the above
mentioned [144] influences has been, may still be, to a certain
extent, distinctly appreciable.  Although in English jurisprudence
there is no law ordaining the proscription, on the ground of race or
colour, of any eligible candidate for social or political
advancement, yet is it notorious that the ethics and practices of the
"Anglo-West Indians"--who, our author has dared to say, represent the
higher type of Englishmen--have, throughout successive generations,
effectually and of course detrimentally operated, as though by a
positive Medo-Persian edict, in a proscriptive sense.  It therefore
demanded extraordinary toughness of constitutional fibre, moral,
mental, and, let us add, physical too, to overcome the obstacles
opposed to the progress of merit, too often by persons in
intelligence below contempt, but, in prosperity and accepted
pretension, formidable indeed to fight against and overcome.  We
shudder to think of the petty cabals, the underbred indignities,
direct and indirect, which the present eminent Judge had to watch
against, to brush aside, to smile at, in course of his epic strides
towards the highest local pinnacle of his profession.  But [145] with
him, as Time has shown, it was all sure and safe.

Providence had endowed him with the powers and temperament that break
down, when opportunity offers, every barrier to the progress of the
gifted and strong and brave.  That opportunity, in his particular
case, offered itself in the Confederation crisis.  Distracted and
helpless "Anglo-West Indians" thronged to him in imploring crowds,
praying that their beloved Charter should be saved by the exertion of
his incomparable abilities.  Save and except Dr. Carrington, there
was not a single member of the dominant section in Barbados whom it
would not be absurd to name even as a near second to him whom all
hailed as the Champion of their Liberties.  In the contest to be
waged the victory was not, as it never once has been, reserved to the
SKIN or pedigree of the combatants.  The above two matters, which in
the eyes of the ruling "Bims" had, throughout long decades of
undisturbed security, been placed before and above all possible
considerations, gravitated down to their inherent insignificance when
Intellect and Worth were destined to fight out the issue.  Mr. [146]
Reeves, whose possession of the essential qualifications was
admittedly greater than that of every colleague, stood, therefore, in
unquestioned supremacy, lord of the political situation, with the
result above stated.

To what we have already pointed out regarding the absolute
impossibility of such an opportunity ever presenting itself in
America to Mr. Douglass, in a political sense, we may now add that,
whereas, in Barbados, for the intellectual equipment needed at the
crisis, Mr. Reeves stood quite alone, there could, in the bosom of
the Union, even in respect of the gifts in which Mr. Douglass was
most brilliant, be no "walking over the course" by him.  It was in
the country and time of Bancroft, Irving, Whittier, Longfellow,
Holmes, Bryant, Motley, Henry Clay, Dan Webster, and others of the
laureled phalanx which has added so great and imperishable a lustre
to the literature of the English tongue.

We proceed here another step, and take up a fresh deliverance of our
author's in reference to the granting of the franchise to the black
population of these Colonies.  "It is," says Mr. James Anthony
Froude, who is just as prophetic [147] as his prototypes, the slave-
owners of the last half-century, "it is as certain as anything future
can be, that if we give the negroes as a body the political
privileges which we claim for ourselves, they will use them only to
their own injury."  The forepart of the above citation reads very
much as if its author wrote it on the principle of raising a ghost
for the mere purpose of laying it.  What visionary, what dreamer of
impossible dreams, has ever asked for the Negroes as a body the same
political privileges which are claimed for themselves by Mr. Froude
and others of his countrymen, who are presumably capable of
exercising them?  No one in the West Indies has ever done so silly a
thing as to ask for the Negroes as a body that which has not, as
everybody knows, and never will be, conceded to the people of Great
Britain as a body.  The demand for Reform in the Crown Colonies--a
demand which our author deliberately misrepresents--is made neither
by nor for the Negro, Mulatto, White, Chinese, nor East Indian.  It
is a petition put forward by prominent responsible colonists--the
majority of whom are Whites, and mostly Britons besides.

[148] Their prayer, in which the whole population in these Colonies
most heartily join, is simply and most reasonably that we, the said
Colonies, being an integral portion of the British Empire, and
having, in intelligence and every form of civilized progress,
outgrown the stage of political tutelage, should be accorded some
measure of emancipation therefrom.  And thereby we--White, Black,
Mulatto, and all other inhabitants and tax-payers--shall be able to
protect ourselves against the self-seeking and bold indifference to
our interests which seem to be the most cherished expression of our
rulers' official existence.  It may be possible (for he has attempted
it), that our new instructor in Colonial ethics and politics, under
the impulsion of skin-superiority, and also of confidence in the
probable success of experiments successfully tried fifty years
before, does really believe in the sensibleness of separating
COLOURS, and representing the wearers of them as being generally
antagonistic to one another in Her Majesty's West Indian Dominions.
How is it then, we may be permitted to ask Mr. Froude, that no
complaint of the sort formulated by him as against the Blacks has
ever been put [149] forward by the thousands of Englishmen,
Scotchmen, Irishmen, and other Europeans who are permanent
inhabitants, proprietors, and tax-payers of these Colonies?  The
reason is that Anglo-West Indianism, or rather Colonialism, is the
creed of a few residents sharply divisible into two classes in the
West Indies.  Labouring conjointly under race-madness, the first
believes that, as being of the Anglo-Saxon race, they have a right to
crow and dominate in whatever land they chance to find themselves,
though in their own country they or their forefathers had had to be
very dumb dogs indeed.  The Colonial Office has for a long time been
responsible for the presence in superior posts of highly salaried
gentry of this category, who have delighted in showing themselves off
as the unquestionable masters of those who supply them with the pay
that gives them the livelihood and position they so ungratefully
requite. These fortunate folk, Mr. Froude avers, are likely to
leave our shores in a huff, bearing off with them the civilizing
influences which their presence so surely guarantees.  Go tell to the
marines that the seed of Israel flourishing in the borders of
[150] Misraim will abandon their flourishing district of Goshen
through sensitiveness on account of the idolatry of the devotees of
Isis and Osiris!

The second and less placable class of "Englishmen in the West
Indies," whose final departure our author would have us to believe
would complete the catastrophe to progress in the British Antilles,
is very impalpable indeed.  We cannot feel them.  We have failed to
even see them.  True, Mr. Froude scouts on their behalf the bare
notion of their condescending to meet, on anything like equality, us,
whom he and they pretend (rather anachronistically, at least) to have
been their former slaves, or servants.  But where, in the name of
Heaven, where are these sortis de la cuisse de Jupiter, Mr. Froude?
If they are invisible, mourning in impenetrable seclusion over the
impossibility of having, as their fathers had before them, the luxury
of living at the Negroes' expense, shall we Negroes who are in the
sunshine of heaven, prepared to work and win our way, be anywise
troubled in our Jubilee by the drivelling ineptitude which insanely
reminds us of the miseries of those who went before us?  We have thus
arrived at the cardinal, [151] essential misrepresentation, out of
scores which compose "The Bow of Ulysses," and upon which its phrases
mainly hinge.  Semper eadem--"Always the same"--has been the proud
motto of the mightiest hierarchy that has controlled human action and
shaped the destinies of mankind, no less in material than in ghostly
concerns.  Yet is a vast and very beneficial change, due to the
imperious spirit of the times, manifest in the Roman Church.  No
longer do the stake, the sword, and the dismal horrors of the
interdict figure as instruments for assuring conformity and
submission to her dogmas.  She is now content to rest her claims on
herbeneficence in the past, as attested by noble and imperishable
memorials of her solicitude for the poor and the ignorant, and in
proclaiming the gospel without those ghastly coercives to its
acceptance.  Surely such a change, however unpalatable to those who
have been compelled to make it, is most welcome to the outside world
at large.  "Always the same" is also, or should be, the device of the
discredited herd whose spokesman Mr. Froude is so proud to be.  In
nothing has their historical.  character, as shown in the published
literature of their [152] cause up to 1838, exhibited any sign of
amelioration.  It cannot be affected by the spirit and the lessons of
the times.  Mendacity and a sort of judicial blindness seem to be the
two most salient characteristics by which are to be distinguished
these implacable foes and would-be robbers of human rights and
liberty.  But, gracious heavens! what can tempt mortals to incur this
weight of infamy?  Wealth and Power?  To be (very improbably) a
Croesus or (still more improbably) a Bonaparte, and to perish at the
conventional age, and of vulgar disease, like both?  Turpitudes on
the part of sane men, involving the sacrifice of the priceless
attributes of humanity, can be rendered intelligible by the supreme
temporal gains above indicated, but only if exemption from the common
lot of mankind--in the shape of care, disease, and death--were
accompaniments of those prizes.

In favour of slavery, which has for so many centuries desolated the
African family and blighted its every chance of indigenous progress--
of slavery whose abolition our author so ostentatiously regrets--only
one solitary permanent result, extending in every case over [153] a
natural human life, has been paraded by him as a respectable
justification.  At page 246, speaking of Negroes met by him during a
stroll which he took at Mandeville, Jamaica, he tells us:--

"The people had black faces; but even they had shaped their manners
in the old English models.  The men touched their hats respectfully
(as they eminently did not in Kingston and its environs).  The women
smiled and curtsied, and the children looked shy when one spoke to
them.  The name of slavery is a horror to us; but there must have
been something human and kindly about it, too, when it left upon the
character the marks of courtesy and good breeding"!

Alas for Africa and the sufferings of her desolated millions, in view
of so light-hearted an assessment as this!  Only think of the ages of
outrage, misery, and slaughter--of the countless hecatombs that
Mammon is hereby absolved from having directly exacted, since the
sufficing expiatory outcome of it all has been only "marks of
courtesy and good breeding"!  Marks that are displayed, forsooth, by
the survivors of the ghastly experiences or by [154] their
descendants!  And yet, granting the appreciable ethical value of the
hat-touching, the smirking and curtseyings of those Blacks to persons
whom they had no reason to suspect of unfriendliness, or whose white
face they may in the white man's country have greeted with a civility
perhaps only prudential, we fail to discover the necessity of the
dreadful agency we have adverted to, for securing the results on
manners which are so warmly commended.  African explorers, from Mungo
Park to Livingstone and Stanley, have all borne sufficient testimony
to the world regarding the natural friendliness of the Negro in his
ancestral home, when not under the influence of suspicion, anger, or
dread.

It behoves us to repeat (for our detractor is a persistent repeater)
that the cardinal dodge by which Mr. Froude and his few adherents
expect to succeed in obtaining the reversal of the progress of the
coloured population is by misrepresenting the elements, and their
real attitude towards one another, of the sections composing the
British West Indian communities.  Everybody knows full well that
Englishmen, Scotchmen, and Irishmen (who are not officials), as [155]
well as Germans, Spaniards, Italians, Portuguese, and other
nationalities, work in unbroken harmony and, more or less, prosper in
these Islands.  These are no cherishers of any vain hankering after a
state of things in which men felt not the infamy of living not only
on the unpaid labour, but at the expense of the sufferings, the
blood, and even the life of their fellow-men.  These men, honourable
by instinct and of independent spirit, depend on their own resources
for self-advancement in the world--on their capital either of money
in their pockets or of serviceable brains in their heads, energy in
their limbs, and on these alone, either singly or more or less in
combination.  These reputable specimens of manhood have created homes
dear to them in these favoured climes; and they, at any rate, being
on the very best terms with all sections of the community in which
their lot is cast, have a common cause as fellow-sufferers under the
regime of Mr. Froude's official "birds of passage."  The agitation in
Trinidad tells its own tale.  There is not a single black man--though
there should have been many--among the leaders of the movement for
Reform.  Nevertheless the honourable [156] and truthful author of
"The English in the West Indies," in order to invent a plausible
pretext for his sinister labours of love on behalf of the poor pro-
slavery survivals, and despite his knowledge that sturdy Britons are
at the head of the agitation, coolly tells the world that it is a
struggle to secure "negro domination."

The further allegation of our author respecting the black man is
curious and, of course, dismally prophetic.  As the reader may
perhaps recollect, it is to the effect that granting political power
to the Negroes as a body, equal in scope "to that claimed by Us"
(i.e., Mr. Froude and his friends), would certainly result in the use
of these powers by the Negroes to their own injury.  And wherefore?
If Mr. Froude professes to believe--what is a fact--that there is "no
original or congenital difference of capacity" between the white and
the African races, where is the consistency of his urging a
contention which implies inferiority in natural shrewdness, as
regards their own affairs, on the part of black men?  Does this
blower of the two extremes of temperature in the same breath pretend
that the average British voter is better informed, can see more
clearly what is for his own advantage, [157] is better able to
assess the relative merits of persons to be entrusted with the
spending of his taxes, and the general management of his interests?
If Mr. Froude means all this, he is at issue not only with his own
specific declaration to the contrary, but with facts of overwhelming
weight and number showing precisely the reverse.  We have personally
had frequent opportunities of coming into contact, both in and out of
England, with natives of Great Britain, not of the agricultural order
alone, but very often of the artisan class, whose ignorance of the
commonest matters was as dense as it was discreditable to the land of
their birth and breeding.  Are these people included (on account of
having his favourite sine qua non of a fair skin) in the US of this
apostle of skin-worship, in the indefeasible right to political power
which is denied to Blacks by reason, or rather non-reason, of their
complexion?

The fact is, that, judging by his own sentiments and those of his
Anglo-West Indian friends, Mr. Froude calculated on producing an
impression in favour of their discreditable views by purposely
keeping out of sight the numerous European and other sufferers under
the yoke [158] which he sneers at seeing described by its proper
appellation of "a degrading tyranny."  The prescriptive unfavourable
forecast of our author respecting political power in the hands of the
Blacks may, in our opinion, be hailed as a warrant for its bestowal
by those in whose power that bestowal may be.  As a pro-slavery
prophecy, equally dismal and equally confident with the hundreds that
preceded it, this new vaticination may safely be left to be
practically dealt with by the Race, victimized and maligned, whose
real genius and character are purposely belied by those who expect to
be gainers by the process.  Invested with political power, the
Negroes, Mr. Froude goes on to assure his readers, "will slide back
into their old condition, and the chance will be gone of lifting them
to the level to which we have no right to say they are incapable of
rising."  How touchingly sympathetic!  How transcendently liberal and
righteous!  But, to speak the truth, is not this solicitude of our
cynical defamer on our behalf, after all, a useless waste of emotion
on his part?  Timeo Danaos et dona ferentes.+  The tears of the
crocodile are most copious in close view of the banquet on his prey.
This [159] reiterated twaddle of Mr. Froude, in futile and
unseasonable echo of the congenial predictions of his predecessors in
the same line, might be left to receive not only the answer of his
own book to the selfsame talk of the slavers fifty years ago, but
also that of the accumulated refutations which America has furnished
for the last twenty-five years as to the retrograde tendency so
falsely imputed.  But, taking it as a serious contention, we find
that it involves a suggestion that the according of electoral votes
to citizens of a certain complexion would, per se and ipso facto,
produce a revulsion and collapse of the entire prevailing
organization and order of a civilized community.

What talismanic virtue this prophet of evil attributes to a vote in
the hand of a Negro out of Barbados, where for years the black man's
vote has been operating, harmlessly enough, Heaven knows, we cannot
imagine.  At all events, as sliding back on the part of a community
is a matter which would require some appreciable time, however brief,
let us hope that the authorities charged "to see that the state
receive no detriment" would be vigilant enough and in time to arrest
the evil and vindicate [160] the efficiency of the civilized methods
of self-preservation.

Our author concludes by another reference to Chief Justice Reeves:
"Let British authority die away, and the average black nature, such
as it now is, be left free to assert itself, there will be no more
negroes like him in Barbadoes or anywhere."  How the dying away of
British authority in a British Colony is to come to pass, Mr. Froude
does not condescend here explicitly to state.  But we are left free
to infer from the whole drift of "The English in the West Indies"
that it will come through the exodus en masse said to be threatened
by his "Anglo-West Indians."  Mr. Froude sympathetically justifies
the disgust and exasperation of these reputable folk at the presence
and progress of the race for whose freedom and ultimate elevation
Britain was so lavish of the wealth of her noblest intellects,
besides paying the prodigious money-ransom of TWENTY MILLION pounds
sterling.  With regard to our author's talk about "the average black
nature, such as it now exists, being left free to assert itself," and
the dire consequences therefrom to result, we can only feel pity at
the desperate straits to [161] which, in his search for a pretext for
gratuitous slander, a man of our author's capacity has been so
ignominiously reduced.  All we can say to him with reference to this
portion of his violent suppositions is that "the average black
nature, such as it now exists," should NOT, in a civilized community,
be left free to assert itself, any more than the average white, the
average brown, the average red, or indeed any average colour of human
nature whatsoever.  As self-defence is the first law of nature, it
has followed that every condition of organized society, however
simple or primitive, is furnished with some recognized means of self-
protection against the free assertion of itself by the average nature
of any of its members.

Of course, if things should ever turn out according to Mr. Froude's
desperate hypothesis, it may also happen that there will be no more
Negroes like Mr. justice Reeves in Barbados.  But the addition of the
words "or anywhere" to the above statement is just another of those
suppressions of the truth which, absolutely futile though they are,
constitute the only means by which the policy he writes to promote
can possibly be made to [162] appear even tolerable.  The assertion
of our author, therefore, standing as it actually does, embracing the
whole world, is nothing less than an audacious absurdity, for there
stand the United States, the French and Spanish islands--not to speak
of the Central and South American Republics, Mexico, and Brazil--all
thronged with black, mixed blood, and even half-breed high officials,
staring him and the whole world in the face.

The above noted suppression of the truth to the detriment of the
obnoxious population recalls a passage wherein the suggestion of what
is not the truth has been resorted to for the same purpose.  At page
123 we read: "The disproportion of the two races--always dangerously
large--has increased with ever-gathering velocity since the
emancipation.  It is now beyond control on the old lines."  The use
of the expletive "dangerously," as suggestive of the truculence of
the people to whom it refers, is critically allowable in view of the
main intention of the author.  But what shall we say of the
suggestion contained in the very next sentence, which we have
italicized?  We are required by it to understand that in slavery-time
the [163] planters had some organized method, rendered impracticable
by the Emancipation, of checking, for their own personal safety, the
growth of the coloured population.  If we, in deference to the
superior mental capacity of our author, admit that self-interest was
no irresistible motive for promoting the growth of the human
"property" on which their prosperity depended, we are yet at liberty
to ask what was the nature of the "old lines" followed for
controlling the increase under discussion.  Was it suffocation of the
babes by means of sulphur fumes, the use of beetle-paste, or exposure
on the banks of the Caribbean rivers?  In the later case History
evidently lost a chance of self-repetition in the person of some
leader like Moses, the Hebra-Egyptian Spartacus, arising to avenge
and deliver his people.

We now shall note how he proceeds to descant on slavery itself:--
"Slavery," says he, "was a survival from a social order which had
passed away, and slavery could not be continued.  IT DOES NOT FOLLOW
THAT per se IT WAS A CRIME.  The negroes who were sold to the dealers
in the factories were most of them either slaves already to worse
masters or were servi, servants [164] in the old meaning of the
word, or else criminals, servati or reserved from death.  They would
otherwise have been killed, and since the slave trade has been
abolished, are again killed in the too celebrated customs. . . ."

Slavery, as Mr. Froude and the rest of us are bound to discuss it at
present, is by no means susceptible of the gloss which he has
endeavoured, in the above extract, to put on it.  The British nation,
in 1834, had to confront and deal with the only species of slavery
which was then within the cognizance of public morals and practical
politics.  Doubtless our author, learned and erudite as he is, would
like to transport us to those patriarchal ages when, under theocratic
decrees, the chosen people were authorized to purchase (not to
kidnap) slaves, and keep them as an everlasting inheritance in their
posterity.  The slaves so purchased, we know, became members of the
families to which their lot was attached, and were hedged in from
cruel usage by distinct and salutary regulations.  This is the only
species of slavery which--with the addition of the old Germanic self-
enslavements and the generally prevailing ancient custom of pledging
one's personal services [165] in liquidation of indebtedness--can be
covered by the singular verdict of noncriminality which our author
has pronounced.  He, of course, knows much better than we do what the
condition of slaves was in Greece as well as in Rome.  He knows, too,
that the "wild and guilty phantasy that man could hold property in
man," lost nothing of its guilt or its wildness with the lapse of
time and the changes of circumstances which overtook and affected
those reciprocal relations.  Every possibility of deterioration,
every circumstance wherein man's fallen nature could revel in its
worst inspirations, reached culmination at the period when the
interference of the world, decreed by Providence, was rendered
imperative by the sufferings of the bondsmen.  It is this crisis of
the history of human enslavement that Mr. Froude must talk about, if
he wishes to talk to any purpose on the subject at all.  His scoffs
at British "virtuous benevolence," and his imputation of ingratitude
to the Negro in respect of that self-same benevolence, do not refer
to any theocratic, self-contracted, abstract, or idyllic condition of
servitude.  They pin his meaning down [166] to that particular phase
when slavery had become not only "the sum," but the very
quintessence, "of all human villainies."

At its then phase, slavery had culminated into being a menace,
portentous and far encroaching, to not only the moral life but the
very civilization of the higher types of the human family, so
debasing and blighting were its effects on those who came into even
tolerating contact with its details.  The indescribable atrocities
practised on the slaves, the deplorable sapping of even respectable
principles in owners of both sexes--all these stood forth in their
ineffable hideousness before the uncorrupted gaze of the moral
heroes, sons of Britain and America, and also of other countries,
who, buckling on the armour of civilization and right, fought for the
vindication of them both, through every stern vicissitude, and won
the first grand, ever-memorable victory of 1838, whereof we so
recently celebrated the welcome Jubilee!  Oh! it was a combat of
archangels against the legions that Mammon had banded together and
incited to the conflict.  But though it was Sharp, Clarkson,
Wilberforce, and the rest [167] of that illustrious host of cultured,
lofty-souled, just, merciful, and beneficent men, who were thus the
saviours, as well as the servants, of society, yet have we seen it
possible for an Englishman of to-day to mouth against their memory
the ineptitudes of their long-vanquished foes, and to flout the
consecrated dead in their graves, as the Boeotian did the living
Pericles in the market-place of Athens!

Why waste words and time on this defamer of his own countrymen, who,
on account of the material gain and the questionable martial glory of
the conquest, eulogizes Warren Hastings, the viceregal plunderer of
India, whilst, in the same breath, he denounces Edmund Burke for
upholding the immutable principles of right and justice!  These
principles once, and indubitably now, so precious in their fullest
integrity to the normal British conscience, must henceforth, say Mr.
Froude and his fellow-colonialists, be scored off the moral code of
Britain, since they "do not pay" in tangible pelf, in self-
aggrandisement, or in dazzling prestige.

The statement that many negroes who were sold to the dealers in the
factories were "slaves [168] already to worse masters" is, in the
face of facts which could not possibly have been unknown to him, a
piece of very daring assertion.  But this should excite no wonder,
considering that precise and scrupulous accuracy would be fatal to
the discreditable cause to which he so shamelessly proclaims his
adhesion.  As being familiar since early childhood with members of
almost every tribe of Africans (mainly from or arriving by way of the
West Coast) who were brought to our West Indies, we are in a position
to contradict the above assertion of Mr. Froude's, its unfaltering
confidence notwithstanding.  We have had the Madingoes, Foulahs,
Houssas, Calvers, Gallahs, Karamenties, Yorubas, Aradas, Cangas,
Kroos, Timnehs, Veis, Eboes, Mokoes, Bibis, and Congoes, as the most
numerous and important of the tribal contribution of Africa to the
population of these Colonies.  Now, from what we have intimately
learned of these people (excepting the Congoes, who always appeared
to us an inferior tribe to all the others), we unhesitatingly deny
that even three in ten of the whole number were ever slaves in their
own country, in the sense of having been born under any organized
[169] system of servitude.  The authentic records relating to the
enslavement of Africans, as a regular systematized traffic, do not
date further back than five centuries ago.  It is true that a great
portion of ancient literature and many monuments bear distinct
evidence, all the more impressive because frequently only casual,
that, from the earliest ages, the Africans had shared, in common with
other less civilized peoples, the doom of having to furnish the
menial and servile contingents of the more favoured sections of the
human family.  Now, dating from, say, five hundred years ago, which
was long indeed after the disappearance of the old leading empires of
the world, we have (save and except in the case of Arab incursionists
into the Eastern and Northern coasts) no reliable authority for
saying, or even for supposing, that the tribes of the African
interior suffered from the molestations of professional man-hunters.

It was the organization of the West Coast slave traffic towards the
close of the sixteenth century, and the extermination of the
Caribbean aborigines by Spain, soon after Columbus had discovered the
Western Continent, which [170] gave cohesion, system, impetus, and
aggressiveness to the trade in African flesh and blood.  Then the
factory dealers did not wait at their seaboard mart, as our author
would have us suppose, for the human merchandize to be brought down
to them.  The auri sacra fames, the accursed craving for gain, was
too imperious for that.  From the Atlantic border to as far inland as
their emissaries could penetrate, their bribes, in every species of
exchangeable commodities, were scattered among the rapacious chiefs
on the river banks; while these latter, incited as well by native
ferocity as by lust of gain, rushed forth to "make war" on their
neighbours, and to kidnap, for sale to the white purchaser, every
man, woman, and child they could capture amidst the nocturnal flames,
confusion, tumult, and terror resulting from their unexpected
irruption.  That the poor people thus captured and sold into foreign
on age were under worse masters than those under whom they, on being
actually bought and becoming slaves, were doomed to experience all
the atrocities that have thrilled with horror the conscience of the
civilized Christian world, is a statement of worse than [171]
childish absurdity.  Every one, except Mr. Froude and his fellow-
apologists for slavery, knows that the cruelty of savage potentates
is summary, uncalculating, and, therefore, merciful in its
ebullitions.  A head whisked off, brains dashed out, or some other
short form of savage dispatch, is the preferential method of
destruction.  With our author's better masters, there was the long,
dreary vicissitude, beginning from the horrors of the capture, and
ending perhaps years upon years after, in some bush or under the lash
of the driver.  The intermediate stages of the starvation life of
hunger, chains, and hideous exposure at the barancoon, the stowing
away like herrings on board the noisome ship, the suffocation, the
deck-sores wrought into the body by the attrition of the bonier parts
of the system against the unyielding wood--all these, says Mr.
Froude, were more tolerable than the swift doing away with life under
an African master!  Under such, at all events, the care and comfort
suitable to age were strictly provided for, and cheered the advanced
years of the faithful bondsman.

After a good deal of talk, having the same logical value, our author,
in his enthusiasm for [172] slavery, delivers himself thus: "For
myself, I would rather be the slave of a Shakespeare or a Burghley,
than the slave of a majority in the House of Commons, or the slave of
my own folly."  Of the four above specified alternatives of
enslavement, it is to be regretted that temperament, or what is more
likely, perhaps, self-interest, has driven him to accept the fourth,
or the latter of the two deprecated yokes, his book being an
irrefutable testimony to the fact.  For, most assuredly, it has not
been at the prompting of wisdom that a learned man of unquestionably
brilliant talents and some measure of accorded fame could have
prostituted those talents and tarnished that fame by condescending to
be the literary spokesman of the set for whose miserable benefit he
recommends the statesmen of his country to perjure and compromise
themselves, regardless of inevitable consequences, which the value of
the sectional satisfaction to be thereby given would but very poorly
compensate.  Possibly a House of Commons majority, whom this
dermatophilist evidently rates far lower than his "Anglo-West
Indians," might, if he were their Slave, have protected their own
self- [173] respect by restraining him from vicariously scandalizing
them by his effusions.

After this curious boast about his preferences as a hypothetic
bondsman, Mr. Froude proceeds gravely to inform his readers that
"there may be authority yet not slavery; a soldier is not a slave, a
wife is not a slave. . ." and he continues, with a view of utilizing
these platitudes against the obnoxious Negro, by telling us that
persons sustaining the above specified and similar relations "may not
live by their own wills, or emancipate themselves at their own
pleasure from positions in which nature has placed them, or into
which they have themselves voluntarily entered.  The negroes of the
West Indies are children, and not yet disobedient children. . . . If
you enforce self-government upon them when they are not asking for
it, you may . . . wilfully drive them back into the condition of
their ancestors, from which the slave-trade was the beginning of
their emancipation."!  The words which we have signalized by italics
in the above extract could have been conceived only by a bigot--such
an atrocious sentiment being possible only as the product of mind or
morals [174] wrenched hopelessly out of normal action.  All the
remainder of this hashing up of pointless commonplaces has for its
double object a suggestio falsi against us Negroes as a body, and a
diverting of attention, as we have proved before, from the numerous
British claimants of Reform, whose personality Mr. Froude and his
friends would keep out of view, provided their crafty policy has the
result of effectually repressing the hitherto irrepressible, and, as
such, to the "Anglo-West Indian," truly detestable Negro.

NOTES

158. +Translation: "I fear the Greeks even when they bear gifts."



BOOK III: WEST INDIAN CONFEDERATION

[175] In heedless formulation of his reasons, if such they should be
termed, for urging tooth and nail the non-according of reform to the
Crown-governed Colonies, our author puts forth this dogmatic
deliverance (p. 123):--

"A West Indian self-governing dominion is possible only with a full
Negro vote.  If the whites are to combine, so will the blacks.  It
will be a rule by the blacks and for the blacks."

That a constitution for any of our diversely populated Colonies which
may be fit for it is possible only with "a full Negro vote" (to the
extent within the competence of such voting), goes without saying, as
must be the case with every section of the Queen's subjects eligible
for the franchise.  The duly qualified Spaniard, [176] Coolie,
Portuguese, or man of any other non-British race, will each thus have
a vote, the same as every Englishman or any other Briton.  Why, then,
should the vote of the Negro be so especially a bugbear?  It is
because the Negro is the game which our political sportsman is in
full chase of, and determined to hunt down at any cost.  Granted,
however, for the sake of argument, that black voters should
preponderate at any election, what then?  We are gravely told by this
latter-day Balaam that "If the whites are to combine, so will the
blacks," but he does not say for what purpose.

His sentence, therefore, may be legitimately constructed in full for
him in the only sense which is applicable to the mutual relations
actually existing between those two directly specified sections of
British subjects who he would fain have the world believe live in a
state of active hostility:--"If the whites are to combine for the
Promotion of the general welfare, as many of the foremost of them
have done before and are doing now, so will the blacks also combine
in the support of such whites, and as staunch auxiliaries equally
interested in the furtherance of the same ameliorative [177]
objects."  Except in the sense embodied in the foregoing sentence, we
cannot, in these days, conceive with what intent persons of one
section should so specially combine as to compel combination on the
part of persons of any other.  The further statement that a
confederation having a full black voting-power would be a government
"by the blacks and for the blacks," is the logical converse of the
now obsolete doctrine of Mr. Froude's inspirers--"a government by
whites should be only for whites."  But this formula, however
strenuously insisted on by those who gave it shape, could never,
since even before three decades from the first introduction of
African slaves, be thoroughly put in practice, so completely had
circumstances beyond man's devising or control compelled the altering
of men's minds and methods with regard to the new interests which had
irresistibly forced themselves into importance as vital items in
political arrangements.  Nowadays, therefore, that Mr. Froude should
desire to create a state of feeling which had, and could have had, no
existence with regard to the common interests of the inhabitants for
upwards of two full centuries, is [178] evidently an excess of
confidence which can only be truly described as amazing.  But, after
all, what does our author mean by the words "a government by the
blacks?"  Are we to understand him as suggesting that voting by black
electors would be synonymous with electing black representatives?  If
so, he has clearly to learn much more than he has shown that he
lacks, in order to understand and appreciate the vital influences at
work in West Indian affairs.  Undoubtedly, being the spokesman of few
who (secretly) avow themselves to be particularly hostile to
Ethiopians, he has done no more than reproduce their sentiments.
For, conscious, as these hankerers after the old "institutions" are,
of being utterly ineligible for the furthering of modern progressive
ideas, they revenge themselves for their supersession on everybody
and everything, save and except their own arrogant stolidity.  White
individuals who have part and lot in the various Colonies, with their
hearts and feelings swayed by affections natural to their birth and
earliest associations; and Whites who have come to think the land of
their adoption as dear to themselves as the land of their birth,
entertain no such dread of [179] their fellow-citizens of any other
section, whom they estimate according to intelligence and probity,
and not according to any accident of exterior physique.  Every
intelligent black is as shrewd regarding his own interests as our
author himself would be regarding his in the following hypothetical
case: Some fine day, being a youth and a bachelor, he gets wedded,
sets up an establishment, and becomes the owner of a clipper yacht.
For his own service in the above circumstances we give him the credit
to believe that, on the persons specified below applying among others
to him for employment, as chamber-maid and house-servant, and also as
hands for the vessel, he would, in preference to any ordinarily
recommended white applicants, at once engage the two black servant-
girls at President Churchill's in Dominica, the droghermen there as
able seamen, and as cabin-boy the lad amongst them whose precocious
marine skill he has so warmly and justly extolled.  It is not because
all these persons are black, but because of the soul-consciousness of
the selector, that they each (were they even blue) had a title to
preferential consideration, his experience and sense of fitness being
[180] their most effectual supporters.  Similarly, the Negro voter
would elect representatives whom he knew he could trust for
competency in the management of his affairs, and not persons whose
sole recommendation to him would be the possession of the same kind
of skin.  Nor, from what we know of matters in the West Indies, do we
believe that any white man of the class we have eulogized would
hesitate to give his warmest suffrage to any black candidate who he
knew would be a fitting representative of his interests.  We could
give examples from almost every West Indian island of white and
coloured men who would be indiscriminately chosen as their candidate
by either section.  But the enumeration is needless, as the fact of
the existence of such men is too notorious to require proof.

Mr. Froude states plainly enough (p. 123) that, whereas a whole
thousand years were needed to train and discipline the Anglo-Saxon
race, yet "European government, European instruction, continued
steadily till his natural tendencies are superseded by a higher
instinct, may shorten the probation period of the negro."  Let it be
supposed that this period of probation [181] for the Negro should
extend, under such exceptionally favourable circumstances, to any
period less than that which is alleged to have been needed by the
Anglo-Saxon to attain his political manhood--what then are the
prospects held out by Mr. Froude to us and our posterity on our
mastering the training and discipline which he specially recommends
for Blacks?  Our author, in view, doubtless, of the rapidity of our
onward progress, and indeed our actual advancement in every respect,
thus answers (pp. 123-4):--"Let a generation or two pass by and carry
away with them the old traditions, and an English governor-general
will be found presiding over a black council, delivering the speeches
made for him by a black prime minister; and how long could this
endure?  No English gentleman would consent to occupy so absurd a
situation."

And again, more emphatically, on the same point (p. 285):--"No
Englishman, not even a bankrupt peer, would consent to occupy such
position; the blacks themselves would despise him if he did; and if
the governor is to be one of their own race and colour, how long
would such a connection endure?"

[182] It is plainly to be seen from the above two extracts that the
political ethics of our author, being based on race and colour
exclusively, would admit of no conceivable chance of real elevation
to any descendant of Africa, who, being Ethiopian, could not possibly
change his skin.  The "old traditions" which Mr. Froude supposes to
be carried away by his hypothetical (white) generations who have
"passed by," we readily infer from his language, rendered impossible
such incarnations of political absurdity as those he depicts.  But
what should be thought of the sense, if not indeed the sanity, of a
grave political teacher who prescribes "European government" and
"European education" as the specifics to qualify the Negro for
political emancipation, and who, when these qualifications are
conspicuously mastered by the Negro who has undergone the training,
refuses him the prize, because he is a Negro?  We see further that,
in spite of being fit for election to council, and even to be prime
ministers competent to indite governors' messages, the pigment under
our epidermis dooms us to eventual disappointment and a life-long
condition of contempt.  Even so is it [183] desired by Mr. Froude and
his clients, and not without a spice of piquancy is their opinion
that for a white ruler to preside and rule over and accept the best
assistance of coloured men, qualified as above stated, would be a
self-degradation too unspeakable for toleration by any Englishman--
"even a bankrupt peer."  Unfortunately for Mr. Froude, we can point
him to page 56 of this his very book, where, speaking of Grenada and
deprecating the notion of its official abandonment, our author
says:--

"Otherwise they [Negroes] were quiet fellows, and if the politicians
would only let them alone, they would be perfectly contented, and
might eventually, if wisely managed, come to some good. . . . Black
the island was, and black it would remain.  The conditions were never
likely to arise which would bring back a European population; but a
governor who was a sensible man, who would reside and use his natural
influence, could manage it with perfect ease."

Here, then, we see that the governor of an entirely black population
may be a sensible man, and yet hold the post.  Our author, indeed,
gives the Blacks over whom this sensible governor would hold rule as
being in number [184] just 40,000 souls; and we are therefore bound
to accept the implied suggestion that the dishonour of holding
supremacy over persons of the odious colour begins just as their
number begins to count onward from 40,000!  There is quite enough in
the above verbal vagaries of our philosopher to provoke a volume of
comment.  But we must pass on to further clauses of this precious
paragraph.  Mr. Froude's talent for eating his own words never had a
more striking illustration than here, in his denial of the utility of
native experience as the safest guide a governor could have in the
administration of Colonial affairs.  At page 91 he says:--"Among the
public servants of Great Britain there are persons always to be found
fit and willing for posts of honour and difficulty, if a sincere
effort be made to find them."

A post of honour and difficulty, we and all other persons in the
British dominions had all along understood was regarded as such in
the case of functionaries called upon to contend with adverse forces
in the accomplishment of great ends conceived by their superiors.
But we find that, according to Mr. Froude, all the credit that has
hitherto redounded to those [185] who had succeeded in such tasks has
been in reality nothing more than a gilding over of disgrace,
whenever the exertions of such officials had been put forth amongst
persons not wearing a European epidermis.  The extension of British
influence and dominion over regions inhabited by races not white is
therefore, on the part of those who promote it, a perverse opening of
arenas for the humiliation and disgrace of British gentlemen, nay,
even of those titled members of the "black sheep" family--bankrupt
peers!  As we have seen, however, ample contradiction and refutation
have been considerately furnished by the same objector in this same
volume, as in his praises of the governor just quoted.

The cavil of Mr. Froude about English gentlemen reading messages
penned by black prime ministers applies with double force to English
barristers (who are gentlemen by statute) receiving the law from the
lips of black Judges.

For all that, however, an emergency arose so pressing as to compel
even the colonialism of Barbados to practically and completely refute
this doctrine, by praying for, and submitting with gratitude to, the
supreme headship of a [186] man of the race which our author so
finically depreciates.  In addition it may be observed that for a
governor to even consult his prime minister in the matter of
preparing his messages might conceivably be optional, whilst it is
obligatory on all barristers, whether English or otherwise, to defer
to the judge's interpretation of the law in every case--appeal
afterwards being the only remedy.  As to the dictum that "the two
races are not equal and will not blend," it is open to the fatal
objection that, having himself proved, with sympathizing pathos, how
the West Indies are now well-nigh denuded of their Anglo-Saxon
inhabitants, Mr. Froude would have us also understand that the
miserable remnant who still complainingly inhabit those islands must,
by doing violence to the understanding, be taken as the whole of the
world-pervading Anglo-Saxon family.  The Negroes of the West Indies
number a good deal more than two million souls.  Does this suggester
of extravagances mean that the prejudices and vain conceit of the few
dozens whom he champions should be made to override and overbear, in
political arrangements, the serious and solid interests of so many
[187] hundreds of thousands?  That "the two races are not equal" is a
statement which no sane man would dispute, but acquiescence in its
truth involves also a distinct understanding that the word race, as
applied in the present case by our author, is a simple accommodation
of terms--a fashion of speech having a very restricted meaning in
this serious discussion.

The Anglo-Saxon race pervades Great Britain, its cradle, and the
Greater Britain extending almost all over the face of the earth,
which is the arena of its activities and marvellous achievements.  To
tell us, therefore, as Mr. Froude does, that the handful of
malcontents whose unrespectable grievance he holds up to public
sympathy represents the Anglo-Saxon race, is a grotesque facon de
parler.  Taking our author's "Anglo-West Indians" and the people of
Ethiopian descent respectively, it would not be too much to assert,
nor in anywise difficult to prove by facts and figures, that for
every competent individual of the former section in active civilized
employments, the coloured section can put forward at least twenty
thoroughly competent rivals.  Yet are these latter the people whom
the classic Mr. [188] Froude wishes to be immolated, root and branch,
in all their highest and dearest interests, in order to secure the
maintenance of "old traditions" which, he tells us, guaranteed for
the dominant cuticle the sacrifice of the happiness of down-trodden
thousands!  Referring to his hypothetical confederation with its
black officeholders, our author scornfully asks:---

"And how long would this endure?"

The answer must be that, granting the existence of such a state of
things, its duration would be not more nor less than under white
functionaries.  For according to himself (p. 124): "There is no
original or congenital difference of capacity between" the white and
black races, and "with the same chances and the same treatment, . . .
distinguished men would be produced equally from both races."

If, therefore, the black ministers whose hue he so much despises do
possess the training and influence rendering them eligible and
securing their election to the situations we are considering, it must
follow that their tenure of office would be of equal duration with
that of individuals of the white race under the same conditions.  Not
content with making himself [189] the mouthpiece of English
gentlemen in this matter, our author, with characteristic hardihood,
obtrudes himself into the same post on behalf of Negroes; saying
that, in the event of even a bankrupt peer accepting the situation of
governor-general over them, "The blacks themselves would despise
him"!

Mr. Froude may pertinently be asked here the source whence he derived
his certainty on this point, inasmuch as it is absolutely at variance
with all that is sensible and natural; for surely it is both foolish
and monstrous to suppose that educated men would infer the
degradation of any one from the fact of such a one consenting to
govern and co-operate with themselves for their own welfare.  He
further asks on the same subject:--

"And if the governor is to be one of their own race and colour, how
long could such a connection endure?"

Our answer must be the same as with regard to the duration of the
black council and black prime minister carrying out the government
under the same conditions.  It must be regretted that no indication
in his book, so far as it professes to deal with facts and with [190]
persons not within the circle of his clients, would justify a belief
that its wanton misstatements have filtrated through a mind entitled
to declare, with the authority of self-consciousness, what a
gentleman would or would not do under given circumstances.

In reiteration of his favourite doctrine of the antagonism between
the black and white races, our author continues on the same page to
say:---

"No one, I presume, would advise that the whites of the island should
govern.  The relations between the two populations are too
embittered, and equality once established by law, the exclusive
privilege of colour over colour cannot be restored.  While slavery
continued, the whites ruled effectively and economically; the blacks
are now as they."

As far as could possibly be endeavoured, every proof has been crowded
into this book in refutation of this favourite allegation of Mr.
Froude's.  It is only an idle waste of time to be thus harping on his
colour topic.  No one can deserve to govern simply because he is
white, and no one is bound to be subject simply because he is black.
The whole of West [191] Indian history, even after the advent of the
attorney-class, proves this, in spite of the efforts to secure
exclusive white domination at a time when crude political power might
have secured it.

"The relations between the two populations are too embittered," says
Mr. Froude.  No doubt his talk on this point would be true, had any
such skin-dominancy as he contemplates been officially established;
but as at present most officials are appointed (locally at least)
according to their merit, and not to their epidermis, nothing is
known of the embittered relations so constantly dinned into our ears.
Whatever bitterness exists is in the minds of those gentry who would
like to be dominant on the cheap condition of showing a simple bodily
accident erected by themselves into an evidence and proof of
superiority.

"The exclusive privilege of colour over colour cannot be restored."
Never in the history of the British West Indies--must we again state-
-was there any law or usage establishing superiority in privileges
for any section of the community on account of colour.  This
statement of fact is also and again an answer to, and refutation of,
the succeeding allegation [192] that, "While slavery continued, the
whites ruled effectively and economically."  It will be yet more
clearly shown in a later part of this essay that during slavery, in
fact for upwards of two centuries after its introduction, the West
Indies were ruled by slave-owners, who happened to be of all colours,
the means of purchasing slaves and having a plantation being the one
exclusive consideration in the case.  It is, therefore, contrary to
fact to represent the Whites exclusively as ruling, and the Blacks
indiscriminately as subject.

He goes on to say, "There are two classes in the community; their
interests are opposite as they are now understood."  As regards the
above, Mr. Froude's attention may be called to the fact that
classification in no department of science has ever been based on
colour, but on relative affinity in certain salient qualities.  To
use his own figure, no horse or dog is more or less a horse or dog
because it happens to be white or black.  No teacher marshals his
pupils into classes according to any outward physical distinction,
but according to intellectual approximation.  In like manner there
has been wealth for hundreds of men of Ethiopic origin, [193] and
poverty for hundreds of men of Caucasian origin, and the reverse in
both cases.  We have, therefore, had hundreds of black as well as
white men who, under providential dispensation, belonged to the
class, rich men; while, on the other hand, we have had hundreds of
white men who, under providential dispensation, belonged to the
class, poor men.  Similarly, in the composition of a free mixed
community, we have hundreds of both races belonging to the class,
competent and eligible; and hundreds of both races belonging to the
class, incompetent and ineligible: to both of which classes all
possible colours might belong.  It is from the first mentioned that
are selected those who are to bear the rule, to which the latter
class is, in the very nature of things, bound to be subject.  There
is no government by reason merely of skins.  The diversity of
individual intelligence and circumstances is large enough to embrace
the possibility of even children being, in emergencies, the most
competent influencers of opinion and action.

But let us analyse this matter for just a while more.  The fatal
objection to all Mr. Froude's advocacy of colour-domination is that
[194] it is futile from being morally unreasonable.  In view of the
natural and absolute impossibility of reviving the same external
conditions under which the inordinate deference and submission to
white persons were both logically and inevitably engendered and
maintained, his efforts to talk people into a frame of mind
favourable to his views on this subject are but a melancholy waste of
well-turned sentences.  Man's estimate of his fellow-man has not and
never can have any other standard, save and except what is the
outcome of actual circumstances influencing his sentiment.  In the
primitive ages, when the fruits of the earth formed the absorbing
object of attention and interest, the men most distinguished for
successful culture of the soil enjoyed, as a consequence, a larger
share than others of popular admiration and esteem.  Similarly, among
nomadic tribes, the hunters whose courage coped victoriously with the
wild and ferocious denizens of the forest became the idols of those
who witnessed and were preserved by such sylvan exploits.  When men
came at length to venture in ships over the trackless deep in pursuit
of commerce and its gains, the mariner grew important in [195] public
estimation.  The pursuit of commerce and its gains led naturally to
the possession of wealth.  This, from the quasi-omnipotence with
which it invests men--enabling them not only to command the best
energies, but also, in many cases, to subvert the very principles of
their fellows--has, in the vast majority of cases, an overpowering
sway on human opinion: a sway that will endure till the Millennium
shall have secured for the righteous alone the sovereignty of the
world.  Likewise, as cities were founded and constitutions
established, those who were foremost as defenders of the national
interests, on the field of bodily conflict or in the intellectual
arena, became in the eyes of their contemporaries worthiest of
appreciation--and so on of other circumstances through which
particular personal distinctions created claims to preference.

In the special case of the Negroes kidnapped out of Africa into
foreign bondage, the crowning item in their assessment of their alien
enslavers was the utter superiority, over their most redoubtable "big
men," which those enslavers displayed.  They actually subjugated and
put in chains, like the commonest peasants, native [196] potentates
at whose very names even the warriorhood of their tribes had been
wont to blench.  But far surpassing even this in awful effect was the
doom meted out to the bush-handlers, the medicine-men, the rain-
compellers, erewhile so inscrutably potent for working out the bliss
or the bale of friend or enemy.  "Lo, from no mountain-top, from no
ceiba-hollow in the forest recesses, has issued any interposing sign,
any avenging portent, to vindicate the Spirit of Darkness so foully
outraged in the hitherto inviolate person of his chosen minister!
Verily, even the powers of the midnight are impotent against these
invaders from beyond the mighty salt-water!  Here, huddled together
in confused, hopeless misery and ruin, lie, fettered and prostrate,
even priest as well as potentate, undistinguishable victims of crude,
unblenching violence, with its climax of nefarious sacrilege.  We,
common mortals, therefore, can hope for no deliverance from, or even
succour in, the woful plight thus dismally contrived for us all by
the fair-skinned race who have now become our masters."  Such was
naturally the train of thought that ran through those forlorn bosoms.
The formidable death-dealing guns [197] of the invaders, the ships
which had brought them to the African shores, and much besides in
startling contrast to their own condition of utter helplessness, the
Africans at once interpreted to themselves as the manifestation and
inherent attributes of beings of a higher order than man.  Their
skin, too, the difference whereof from their own had been accentuated
by many calamitous incidents, was hit upon as the reason of so
crushing an ascendency.

White skin therefore became, in those disconsolate eyes, the symbol
of fearful irresistible power: which impression was not at all
weakened afterwards by the ineffable atrocities of the "middle-
passage."  Backed ultimately by their absolute and irresponsible
masterhood at home over the deported Blacks, the European abductors
could easily render permanent in the minds of their captives the
abject terror struck into them by the enormities of which they had
been the victims.  Now, the impressions we touched upon before
bringing forward the case of the Negro slaves were mainly produced by
pleasurable circumstances.  But of a contrary nature and much more
deeply graven are those sentiments which are the outcome of hopeless
terror [198] and pain.  For whilst impressions of the former
character glide into the consciousness through accesses no less
normal than agreeable, the infusion of fear by means of bodily
suffering is a process too violent to be forgotten by minds tortured
and strained to unnatural tension thereby.  Such tension, oft-
recurrent and scarcely endurable, leaves behind it recollections
which are in themselves a source of sadness.  But time, favoured by a
succession of pleasurable experiences, is a sovereign anodyne to
remembrances of this poignant class.  No wonder, then, from our
foregoing detail of facts, that whiteness of skin was both redoubted
and tremblingly crouched to by Negroes on whom Europeans had wrought
such unspeakable calamities.  Time, however, and the action of
circumstances, especially in countries subject to Catholic dominion,
soon began to modify the conditions under which this sentiment of
terror had been maintained, and, with those conditions, the very
sentiment itself.  For it was not long in the life of many of the
expatriated Africans before numbers of their own race obtained
freedom, and, eventually, wealth sufficient for purchasing black
slaves on their [199] own account.  In other respects, too (outwardly
at least), the prosperous career of such individual Blacks could not
fail to induce a revulsion of thought, whereby the attribution of
unapproachable powers exclusively to the Whites became a matter
earnestly reconsidered by the Africans.  Centuries of such
reconsideration have produced the natural result in the West Indies.
With the daily competition in intelligence, refinement, and social
and moral distinction, which time and events have brought about
between individuals of the two races, nothing, surely, has resulted,
nor has even been indicated, to re-infuse the ancient colour-dread
into minds which had formerly been forced to entertain it; and still
less to engender it in bosoms to which such a feeling cannot, in the
very nature of things, be an inborn emotion.  Now, can Mr. Froude
show us by what process he would be able to infuse in the soul of an
entire population a sentiment which is both unnatural and beyond
compulsion?

The foregoing remarks roughly apply to preeminence given to outward
distinction, and the conditions under which mainly it impresses and
is accepted by men not yet arrived at the [200] essentially
intellectual stage.  In the spiritual domain the conditions have ever
been quite different.  A belief in the supernatural being inborn in
man, the professors of knowledge and powers beyond natural attainment
were by common consent accorded a distinct and superior
consideration, deemed proper to the sacredness of their progression.
Hence the supremacy of the priestly caste in every age and country of
the world.  Potentate as well as peasant have bowed in reverence
before it, as representing and declaring with authority the counsels
of that Being whom all, priest, potentate and peasant alike,
acknowledge and adore, each according to the measure of his inward
illumination.



BOOK III: THE NEGRO AS WORKER

[201] The laziness, the incurable idleness, of the Negro, was, both
immediately before their emancipation in 1838, and for long years
after that event, the cuckoo-cry of their white detractors.  It was
laziness, pure and simple, which hindered the Negro from exhausting
himself under a tropical sun, toiling at starvation wages to ensure
for his quondam master the means of being an idler himself, with the
additional luxury of rolling in easily come-by wealth.  Within the
last twenty years, however, the history of the Black Man, both in the
West Indies and, better still, in the United States of America, has
been a succession of achievements which have converted the charge of
laziness into a baseless and absurd calumny.  The repetition of the
charge referred to is, in these [202] waning days of the nineteenth
century, a discredited anachronism, which, however, has no deterring
features for Mr. Froude.  As the running down of the Negro was his
cue, he went in boldly for the game, with what result we shall
presently see.  At page 239, our author, speaking of the Negro
garden-farms in Jamaica, says:--

"The male proprietors were lounging about smoking.  Their wives, as
it was market-day, were tramping into Kingston with their baskets on
their heads.  We met them literally in thousands, all merry and
light-hearted, their little ones with little baskets trudging at
their side.  Of the lords of the creation we saw, perhaps, one to
each hundred of the women, and he would be riding on mule or donkey,
pipe in mouth and carrying nothing.  He would be generally sulky too,
while the ladies, young and old, had a civil word for us, and
curtsied under their loads.  Decidedly if there is to be a black
constitution I will give my vote to the women."

To the above direct imputation of indolence, heartlessness, and
moroseness, Mr. Froude appends the following remarks on other moral
characteristics of certain sable peasants at [203] Mandeville,
Jamaica, given on the authority of a police official, who, our author
says, described them as--

"Good-humoured, but not universally honest.  They stole cattle, and
would not give evidence against each other.  If brought into Court,
they held a pebble in their mouth, being under the impression that
when they were so provided, perjury did not count.  Their education
was only skin-deep, and the schools which the Government provided had
not touched their characters at all."

But how could the education so provided be otherwise than futile when
the administration of its details is entirely in the hands of persons
unsympathizing with and utterly despising the Negro?  But of this
more anon and elsewhere.  We resume Mr. Froude's evidence respecting
the black peasantry.  Our author proceeds to admit, on the same
subject, that his informant's duties (as a police official) "brought
him in contact with the unfavourable specimens."  He adds:--

"I received a far pleasanter impression from a Moravian minister. . . .
I was particularly glad to see this gentleman, for of the Moravians
[204] every one had spoken well to me.  He was not the least
enthusiastic about his poor black sheep, but he said that if they
were not better than the average English labourer, he did not think
them worse.  They were called idle; they would work well enough if
they had fair wages and if the wages were paid regularly; but what
could be expected when women servants had but three shillings a week
and found themselves, when the men had but a shilling a day and the
pay was kept in arrear in order that if they came late to work, or if
they came irregularly, it may be kept back or cut down to what the
employer choose to give?  Under such conditions ANY man of ANY colour
would prefer to work for himself if he had a garden, or would be idle
if he had none."

Take, again, the following extract regarding the heroism of the
emigrants to the Canal :--

"I walked forward" (on the steamer bound to Jamaica), "after we had
done talking.  We had five hundred of the poor creatures on their way
to the Darien pandemonium.  The vessel was rolling with a heavy beam
sea.  I found the whole mass of them reduced to the condition of the
pigs who used to occupy the fore decks on the Cork and Bristol
packets.  They were [205] lying in a confused heap together,
helpless, miserable, without consciousness, apparently, save a sense
in each that he was wretched.  Unfortunate brothers-in-law! following
the laws of political economy, and carrying their labour to the
dearest market, where, before a year was out, half of them were to
die.  They had souls, too, some of them, and honest and kindly
hearts."

It surely is refreshing to read the revelation of his first learning
of the possession of a soul by a fellow-human being, thus artlessly
described by one who is said to be an ex-parson.  But piquancy is Mr.
Froude's strong point, whatever else he may be found wanting in.

Still, apart from Mr. Froude's direct testimony to the fact that from
year to year, during a long series of years, there has been a
continuous, scarcely ever interrupted emigration of Negroes to the
Spanish mainland, in search of work for a sufficing livelihood for
themselves and their families--and that in the teeth of physical
danger, pestilence, and death--there would be enough indirect
exoneration of the Black Man from that indictment in the wail of Mr.
Froude and his friends regarding the alarming absorption of the lands
of Grenada [206] and Trinidad by sable proprietors.  Land cannot be
bought without money, nor can money be possessed except through
labour, and the fact that so many tens of thousand Blacks are now the
happy owners of the soil whereon, in the days so bitterly regretted
by our author, their forefathers' tears, nay, very hearts' blood, had
been caused to flow, ought to silence for ever an accusation, which,
were it even true, would be futile, and, being false, is worse than
disgraceful, coming from the lips of the Eumolpids who would fain
impose a not-to-be-questioned yoke on us poor helots of Ethiopia.  It
is said that lying is the vice of slaves; but the ethics of West
Indian would-be mastership assert, on its behalf, that they alone
should enjoy the privilege of resorting to misrepresentation to give
colour, if not solidity, to their pretensions.



BOOK III: RELIGION FOR NEGROES

[207] Mr. Froude's passing on from matters secular to matters
spiritual and sacred was a transition to be expected in the course of
the grave and complicated discussion which he had volunteered to
initiate.  It was, therefore, not without curiosity that his views in
the direction above indicated were sought for and earnestly
scrutinized by us.  But worse than in his treatment of purely mundane
subjects, his attitude here is marked by a nonchalant levity which
excites our wonder that even he should have touched upon the
spiritual side of his thesis at all.  The idea of the dove sent forth
from the ark fluttering over the heaving swells of the deluge, in
vain endeavour to secure a rest for the soles of its feet, represents
not inaptly the unfortunate predicament of his spirit with regard to
a solid [208] faith on which to repose amid the surges of doubt by
which it is so evidently beset.  Yet although this is his obvious
plight with regard to a satisfying belief, he nevertheless
undertakes, with characteristic confidence, to suggest a creed for
the moralization of West Indian Negroes.  His language is :--

"A religion, at any rate, which will keep the West Indian blacks from
falling back into devil-worship is still to seek.  In spite of the
priests, child-murder and cannibalism have re-appeared in Hayti, but
without them things might have been much worse than they are, and the
preservation of white authority and influence in any form at all may
be better than none."

We discern in the foregoing citation the exercise of a charity that
is unquestionably born of fetish-worship, which, whether it be obeah
generally, or restricted to a mere human skin, can be so powerful an
agent in the formation and retention of beliefs.  Hence we see that
our philosopher relies here, in the domain of morals and spiritual
ethics, on a white skin as implicitly as he does on its sovereign
potency in secular politics.  The curiousness of the matter lies
mainly in its application to natives [209] of Hayti, of all people in
the world.  As a matter of fact we have had our author declaring as
follows, in climax to his oft-repeated predictions about West Indian
Negroes degenerating into the condition of their fellow-Negroes in
the "Black Republic" (p. 285) :--

"Were it worth while, one  might draw a picture of an English
governor, with a black parliament and a black ministry, recommending,
by advice of his constitutional ministers, some measure like the
Haytian Land Law."

Now, as the West Indies degenerating into so many white-folk-
detesting Haytis, under our prophet's dreaded supremacy of the
Blacks, is the burden of his book; and as the Land Law in question
distinctly forbids the owning by any white person of even one inch of
the soil of the Republic, it might, but for the above explanation,
have seemed unaccountable, in view of the implacable distrust, not to
say hatred, which this stern prohibition so clearly discloses, that
our author should, nevertheless, rely on the efficacy of white
authority and influence over Haytians.

In continuation of his religious suggestions, he goes on to descant
upon slavery in the [210] fashion which we have elsewhere noticed,
but it may still be proper to add a word or two here regarding this
particular disquisition of his.  This we are happy in being able to
do under the guidance of an anterior and more reliable exponent of
ecclesiastical as well as secular obedience on the part of all free
and enlightened men in the present epoch of the world's history:--

               "Dogma and Descent, potential twin
     Which erst could rein submissive millions in,
     Are now spent forces on the eddying surge
     Of Thought enfranchised.  Agencies emerge
     Unhampered by the incubus of dread
     Which cramped men's hearts and clogged their onward tread.
     Dynasty, Prescription! spectral in these days
     When Science points to Thought its surest ways,
     And men who scorn obedience when not free
     Demand the logic of Authority!
     The day of manhood to the world is here,
     And ancient homage waxes faint and drear.
        .      .      .      .      .      .
     Vision of rapture!  See Salvation's plan
     'Tis serving God through ceaseless toil for man!"

The lines above quoted are by a West Indian Negro, and explain in
very concise form the attitude of the educated African mind [211]
with reference to the matters they deal with.  Mr. Froude is free to
perceive that no special religion patched up from obsolete creeds
could be acceptable to those with whose sentiments the thoughts of
the writer just quoted are in true racial unison.  It is preposterous
to expect that the same superstition regarding skin ascendency, which
is now so markedly played out in our Colonies in temporal matters,
could have any weight whatsoever in matters so momentous as morals
and religion.  But granting even the possibility of any code of
worldly ethics or of religion being acceptable on the dermal score so
strenuously insisted on by him, it is to be feared that, through
sheer respect for the fitness of things, the intelligent Negro in
search of guidance in faith and morals would fail to recognize in our
author a guide, philosopher, and friend, to be followed without the
most painful misgivings.  The Catholic and the Dissenting Churches
which have done so much for the temporal and spiritual advancement of
the Negro, in spite of hindrance and active persecution wherever
these were possible, are, so far as is visible, maintaining their
hold on the adhesion of those who belong to them.

[212] And it cannot be pretended that, among enlightened Africans as
compared with other enlightened people, there have been more grievous
failings off from the scriptural standard of deportment.  Possible it
certainly is that considerations akin to, or even identical with,
those relied upon by Mr. Froude might, on the first reception of
Christianity in their exile, have operated effectually upon the minds
of the children of Africa.  At that time the evangelizers whose
converts they so readily became possessed the recommendation of
belonging to the dominant caste.  Therefore, with the humility proper
to their forlorn condition, the poor bondsmen requited with intense
gratitude such beneficent interest on their behalf, as a
condescension to which people in their hapless situation could have
had no right.  But for many long years, the distinction whether of
temporal or of spiritual superiority has ceased to be the monopoly of
any particular class.  The master and employer has for far more than
a century and a half been often represented in the West Indies by
some born African or his descendant; and so also has the teacher and
preacher.  It is not too much to say that [213] the behaviour of the
liberated slaves throughout the British Antilles, as well as the
deportment of the manumitted four million slaves of the Southern
United States later on, bore glorious testimony to the humanizing
effects which the religion of charity, clutched at and grasped in
fragments, and understood with childlike incompleteness, had produced
within those suffering bosoms.

Nothing has occurred to call for a remodelling of the ordinary moral
and spiritual machinery for the special behoof of Negroes.  Religion,
as understood by the best of men, is purely a matter of feeling and
action between man and man--the doing unto others as we would they
should do unto us; and any creed or any doctrine which directly or
indirectly subverts or even weakens this basis is in itself a danger
to the highest welfare of mankind.  The simple conventional faith in
God, in Jesus, and in a future state, however modified nowadays, has
still a vitality which can restrain and ennoble its votaries,
provided it be inculcated and received in a befitting spirit.  Our
critic, in the plenitude of his familiarity with such matters,
confidently asks :--

[214] "Who is now made wretched by the fear of hell?"

Possibly the belief in the material hell, the decadence of which he
here triumphantly assumes to be so general, may have considerably
diminished; but experience has shown that, with the advance of
refinement, there is a concurrent growth in the intensity of moral
sensibility, whereby the waning terrors of a future material hell are
more than replaced by the agonies of a conscience self-convicted of
wilful violation of the right.  The same simple faith has, in its
practical results, been rich in the records of the humble whom it has
exalted; of the poor to whom it has been better than wealth; of the
rich whose stewardship of worldly prosperity it has sanctified; of
the timid whom it has rendered bold; and of the valiant whom it has
raised to a divine heroism--in fine, of miracles of transformation
that have impelled to higher and nobler tendencies and uses the
powers and gifts inherited or acquired by man in his natural state.
They who possess this faith, and cherish it as a priceless
possession, may calmly oppose to the philosophic reasoning against
the existence of [215] a Deity and the rationalness of entreating Him
in prayer, the simple and sufficient declaration, "I believe."
Normal-minded men, sensible of the limitations of human faculties,
never aspire to be wise beyond what is revealed.  Whatever might
exist beyond the grave is, so far as man and man in their mutual
relations are concerned, not a subject that discussion can affect or
speculation unravel.  To believers it cannot matter whether the
Sermon on the Mount embodies or does not embody the quality of ethics
that the esoteric votaries of Mr. Froude's "new creed" do accept or
even can tolerate.  Under the old creed man's sense of duty kindled
in sympathy towards his brother, urging him to achieve by self-
sacrifice every possibility of beneficence; hence the old creed
insured an inward joy as well as "the peace which passeth all
understanding."  There can be no room for desiring left, when
receptiveness of blessings overflows; and it is the worthiest
direction of human energy to secure for others that fulness of
fruition.  Is not Duty the first, the highest item of moral
consciousness; and is not promoting, according to our best ability,
the welfare of our fellow creatures, the first and [216] most urgent
call of human duty?  Can the urgency of such responsibility ever
cease but with the capacity, on our own or on our brother's part, to
do or be done by respectively?  Contemptuously ignoring his share of
this solemn responsibility--solemn, whether regarded from a religious
or a purely secular point of view--to observe at least the negative
obligation never to wantonly do or even devise any harm to his
fellows, or indeed any sentient creature, our new apostle affords, in
his light-hearted reversal of the prescriptive methods of civilized
ethics, a woful foretaste of the moral results of the "new, not as
yet crystallized" belief, whose trusted instruments of spiritual
investigation are the telescope and mental analysis, in order to
satisfy the carpings of those who so impress the world with their
superhuman strong-mindedness.

The following is a profound reflection presenting, doubtless, quite a
new revelation to an unsophisticated world, which had so long
submitted in reverential tameness to the self-evident impossibility
of exploring the Infinite:--

"The tendency of popular thought is against [217] the supernatural in
any shape.  Far into space as the telescope can search, deep as
analysis can penetrate into mind and consciousness or the forces
which govern natural things, popular thought finds only uniformity
and connection of cause and effect; no sign anywhere of a personal
will which is influenced by prayer or moral motives."

How much to be pitied are the gifted esoterics who, in such a quest,
vainly point their telescopes into the star-thronged firmament, and
plunge their reasoning powers into the abyss of consciousness and
such-like mysteries!  The commonplace intellect of the author of
"Night Thoughts" was, if we may so speak, awed into an adoring
rapture which forced from him the exclamation (may believers hail it
as a dogma!)--

"An undevout astronomer is mad!"

Most probably it was in weak submission to some such sentiment as
this that Isaac Newton nowhere in his writings suggests even the
ghost of a doubt of there being a Great Architect of the Universe as
the outcome of his telescopic explorations into the illimitable
heavens.

[218] It is quite possible, too, that he was, "on insufficient
grounds," perhaps, perfectly satisfied, as a host of other
intellectual mediocrities like himself have been, and even up to now
rather provokingly continue to be, with the very "uniformity and
connection of cause and effect" as visible evidence of there being
not only "a personal will," but a creative and controlling Power as
well.  In this connection comes to mind a certain old Book which,
whatever damage Semitic Scholarship and Modern Criticism may succeed
in inflicting on its contents, will always retain for the spiritual
guidance of the world enough and to spare of divine suggestions.
With the prescience which has been the heritage of the inspired in
all ages, one of the writers in that Book, whom we shall now quote,
foresaw, no doubt, the deplorable industry of Mr. Froude and his
protege "popular thought," whose mouth-piece he has so
characteristically constituted himself, and asks in a tone wherein
solemn warning blends with inquiry: "Canst thou by searching find out
God; canst thou find out the Almighty unto perfection!"  The rational
among the most loftily endowed of mankind have grasped [219] the
sublime significance of this query, acquiescing reverently in its
scarcely veiled intimation of man's impotence in presence of the task
to which it refers.

But though Mr. Froude's spiritual plight be such as we have just
allowed him to state it, with regard to an object of faith and a
motive of worship, yet let us hear him, in his anxiety to furbish up
a special Negro creed, setting forth the motive for being in a hurry
to anticipate the "crystallization" of his new belief :--

"The new creed, however, not having crystallized as yet into a shape
which can be openly professed, and as without any creed at all the
flesh and the devil might become too powerful, we maintain the old
names, as we maintain the monarchy."

The allusion to the monarchy seems not a very obvious one, as it
parallels the definitive rejection of a spiritual creed with the
theoretical change of ancient notions regarding a concrete fact.  At
any rate we have it that his special religion, when concocted and
disseminated, will have the effect of preventing the flesh and the
devil from having too much power over Negroes.  The objection to the
[220] devil's sway seems to us to come with queer grace from one who
owes his celebrity chiefly to the production of works teeming with
that peculiar usage of language of which the Enemy of Souls is
credited with the special fatherhood.

No, sir, in the name of the Being regarding whose existence you and
your alleged "popular thought" are so painfully in doubt, we protest
against your right, or that of any other created worm, to formulate
for the special behoof of Negroes any sort of artificial creed
unbelieved in by yourself, having the function and effect of
detective "shadowings" of their souls.  Away with your criminal
suggestion of toleration of the hideous orgies of heathenism in Hayti
for the benefit of our future morals in the West Indies, when the
political supremacy which you predict and dread and deprecate shall
have become an accomplished fact.  Were any special standard of
spiritual excellence required, our race has, in Josiah Henson and
Sojourner Truth, sufficing models for our men and our women
respectively.  Their ideal of Christian life, which we take to be the
true one, is not to be judged of with direct reference to the Deity
whom we cannot [221] see, interrogate, or comprehend, but to its
practical bearing in and on man, whom we can see and have cognizance
of, not only with our physical senses, but by the intimations of the
divinity which abides within us.*  We can see, feel, and appreciate
the virtue of a fellow-mortal who consecrates himself to the Divine
idea through untiring exertion for the bettering of the condition of
the world around him, whose agony he makes it his duty, only to
satisfy his burning desire, to mitigate.  The fact in its ghastly
reality lies before us that the majority of mankind labour and are
being crushed under the tremendous trinity of Ignorance, Vice, and
Poverty.

It is mainly in the succouring of those who thus suffer that the
vitality of the old creed is manifested in the person of its
professors.  Under this aspect we behold it moulding men, of all
nations, countries, and tongues, whose virtues have challenged and
should command on its behalf the unquestioning faith and adhesion of
every rational observer.  "Evidences of Christianity,"
"Controversies," "Exegetical Commentaries," have all proved [222]
more or less futile--as perhaps they ought--with the Science and
Modern Criticism which perverts religion into a matter of dialectics.
But there is a hope for mankind in the fact that Science itself shall
have ultimately to admit the limitations of human inquiry into the
details of the Infinite.  Meanwhile it requires no technical
proficiency to recognize the criminality of those who waste their
brief threescore and ten years in abstract speculations, while the
tangible, visible, and hideous soul-destroying trinity of Vice,
Ignorance, and Poverty, above mentioned, are desolating the world in
their very sight.  There are possessors of personal virtue,
enlightenment, and wealth, who dare stand neutral with regard to
these dire exigencies among their fellows.  And yet they are the
logical helpers, as holders of the special antidote to each of those
banes!  Infinitely more deserving of execration are such folk than
the callous owner of some specific, who allows a suffering neighbour
to perish for want of it.

We who believe in the ultimate development of the Christian notion of
duty towards God, as manifested in untiring beneficence to man, cling
to this faith--starting from the [223] beginning of the New Testament
dispensation--because Saul of Tarsus, transformed into Paul the
Apostle through his whole-souled acceptance of this very creed with
its practical responsibilities, has, in his ardent, indefatigable
labours for the enlightenment and elevation of his fellows, left us a
lesson which is an enduring inspiration; because Augustine, Bishop of
Hippo, benefited, in a manner which has borne, and ever will bear,
priceless fruit, enormous sections of the human family, after his
definite submission to the benign yoke of the same old creed; because
Vincent de Paul has, through the identical inspiration, endowed the
world with his everlasting legacy of organized beneficence; because
it impelled Francis Xavier with yearning heart and eager footsteps
through thousands of miles of peril, to proclaim to the darkling
millions of India what he had experienced to be tidings of great joy
to himself; because Matthew Hale, a lawyer, and of first prominence
in a pursuit which materializes the mind and nips its native candour
and tenderness, escaped unblighted, through the saving influence of
his faith, approving himself in the sight of all [224] an ideal
judge, even according to the highest conception; because John Howard,
opulent and free to enjoy his opulence and repose, was drawn thereby
throughout the whole continent of Europe in quest of the hidden
miseries that torture those whom the law has shut out, in dungeons,
from the light and sympathy of the world; because Thomas Clarkson,
animated by the spirit of its teachings, consecrated wealth, luxury,
and the quiet of an entire lifetime on the altar of voluntary
sacrifice for the salvation of an alien people; because Samuel
Johnson, shut out from mirthfulness by disease and suffering, and
endowed with an intellectual pride intolerant of froward ignorance,
was, through the chastening power of that belief, transformed into
the cheerful minister and willing slave of the weaklings whom he
gathered into his home, and around whom the tendrils of his heart had
entwined themselves, waxing closer and stronger in the moisture of
his never-failing charity; because Henry Havelock, a man of the
sword, whose duties have never been too propitious to the cultivation
and fostering of the gentler virtues, lived and died a blameless
hero, constrained by that faith to be one of its most illustrious
exemplars; [225] because David Livingstone looms great and reverend
in our mental sight in his devotion to a land and race embraced in
his boundless fellow-feeling, and whose miseries he has commended to
the sympathy of the civilized world in words the pathos whereof has
melted thousands of once obdurate hearts to crave a share in applying
a balm to the "open sore of Africa"--that slave-trade whose
numberless horrors beggar description; and finally--one more example
out of the countless varieties of types that blend into a unique
solidarity in the active manifestation of the Christian life--we
believe because Charles Gordon, the martyr-soldier of Khartoum, in
trusting faith a very child, but in heroism more notable than any
mere man of whom history contains a record, gathered around himself,
through the sublime attractiveness of his faith-directed life, the
united suffrages of all nations, and now enjoys, as the recompense
and seal of his life's labours, an apotheosis in homage to which the
heathen of Africa, the man-hunting Arab, the Egyptian, the Turk, all
jostle each other to blend with the exulting children of Britain who
are directly glorified by his life and history.

[226] Here, then, are speaking evidences of the believers' grounds.
Verily they are of the kind that are to be seen in our midst,
touched, heard, listened to, respected, beloved--nay, honoured, too,
with the glad worship our inward spirit springs forth to render to
goodness so largely plenished from the Source of all Good.  Can
Modern Science and Criticism explain them away, or persuade us of
their insufficiency as incentives to the hearty acceptance of the
religion that has received such glorious, yet simply logical,
incarnation in the persons of weak, erring men who welcomed its
responsibilities conjointly with its teachings, and thereby raised
themselves to the spiritual level pictured to ourselves in our
conception of angels who have been given the Divine charge concerning
mankind.  Religion for Negroes, indeed!  White priests, forsooth!
This sort of arrogance might, possibly, avail in quarters where the
person and pretensions of Mr. Froude could be impressive and
influential--but here, in the momentous concern of man with Him who
"is no respecter of persons," his interference, mentally disposed as
he tells us he is with reference to such a matter, is nothing less
than profane intrusion.

[227] We will conclude by stating in a few words our notion of the
only agency by which, not Blacks alone, but every race of mankind,
might be uplifted to the moral level which the thousands of examples,
of which we have glanced at but a few, prove so indubitably the
capacity of man to attain--each to a degree limited by the scope of
his individual powers.  The priesthood whereof the world stands in
such dire need is not at all the confederacy of augurs which Mr.
Froude, perhaps in recollection of his former profession, so glibly
suggests, with an esoteric creed of their own, "crystallized into
shape" for profession before the public.  The day of priestcraft
being now numbered with the things that were, the exploitation of
those outside of the sacerdotal circle is no longer possible.
Therefore the religion of mere talk, however metaphysical and
profound; the religion of scenic display, except such display be
symbolic of living and active verities, has lost whatever of efficacy
it may once have possessed, through the very spirit and tendency of
To-day.  The reason why those few whom we have mentioned, and the
thousands who cannot possibly be recalled, have, as [228] typical
Christians, impressed themselves on the moral sense and sympathy of
the ages, is simply that they lived the faith which they professed.
Whatever words they may have employed to express their serious
thoughts were never otherwise than, incidentally, a spoken fragment
of their own interior biography. In fine, success must infallibly
attend this special priesthood (whether episcopally "ordained" or
not) of all races, all colours, all tongues whatsoever, since their
lives reflect their teachings and their teachings reflect their
lives.  Then, truly, they, "the righteous, shall inherit the earth,"
leading mankind along the highest and noblest paths of temporal
existence.  Then, of course, the obeah, the cannibalism, the devil-
worship of the whole world, including that of Hayti, which Mr. Froude
predicts will be adopted by us Blacks in the West Indies, shall no
more encumber and scandalize the earth.

But Mr. Froude should, at the same time, be reminded that cannibalism
and the hideous concomitants which he mentions are, after all,
relatively minor and restricted dangers to man's civilization and
moral soundness.  They can [229] neither operate freely nor expand
easily.  The paralysis of horrified popular sentiment obstructs their
propagation, and the blight of the death-penalty which hangs over the
heads of their votaries is an additional guarantee of their being
kept within bounds that minimize their perniciousness. But there are
more fatal and further-reaching dangers to public morality and
happiness of which the regenerated current opinion of the future will
take prompt and remedial cognizance. Foremost among these will be the
circulation of malevolent writings whereby the equilibrium of
sympathy between good men of different races is sought to be
destroyed, through misleading appeals to the weaknesses and
prejudices of readers; writings in which the violation of actual
truth cannot, save by stark stupidity, be attributed to innocent
error; writings that scoff at humanitarian feeling and belittle the
importance of achievements resulting therefrom; writings which strike
at the root of national manliness, by eulogizing brute force directed
against weaker folk as a fit and legitimate mode of securing the
wishes of a mighty and enlightened people; writings, in fine, which
ignore the divine principle [230] in man, and implicitly deny the
possibility of a Divine Power existing outside of and above man, thus
materializing the mind, and tending to render the earth a worse hell
than it ever could have been with faith in the supremacy of a
beneficent Power.

NOTES

221. *"Est deus in nobis, agitante calescimus illo."--Ovid.



BOOK IV: HISTORICAL SUMMARY

[233] Thus far we have dealt with the main questions raised by Mr.
Froude on the lines of his own choosing; lines which demonstrate to
the fullest how unsuited his capacity is for appreciating--still less
grappling with--the political and social issues he has so confidently
undertaken to determine.  In vain have we sought throughout his
bastard philosophizing for any phrase giving promise of an adequate
treatment of this important subject.  We find paraded ostentatiously
enough the doctrine that in the adjustment of human affairs the
possession of a white skin should be the strongest recommendation.
Wonder might fairly be felt that there is no suggestion of a
corresponding advantage being accorded to the possession of a long
nose or of auburn hair.  Indeed, little [234] or no attention that
can be deemed serious is given to the interest of the Blacks, as a
large and (out of Africa) no longer despicable section of the human
family, in the great world-problems which are so visibly preparing
and press for definitive solutions.  The intra-African Negro is
clearly powerless to struggle successfully against personal
enslavement, annexation, or volunteer forcible "protection" of his
territory.  What, we ask, will in the coming ages be the opinion and
attitude of the extra-African millions--ten millions in the Western
Hemisphere--dispersed so widely over the surface of the globe, apt
apprentices in every conceivable department of civilized culture?
Will these men remain for ever too poor, too isolated from one
another for grand racial combinations?  Or will the naturally opulent
cradle of their people, too long a prey to violence and unholy greed,
become at length the sacred watchword of a generation willing and
able to conquer or perish under its inspiration?  Such large and
interesting questions it was within the province and duty of a famous
historian, laying confident claim to prophetic insight, not to
propound alone, but also definitely to solve.  The sacred power [235]
of forecast, however, has been confined to finical pronouncements
regarding those for whose special benefit he has exercised it, and to
childish insults of the Blacks whose doom must be sealed to secure
the precious result which is aimed at.  In view of this ill-
intentioned omission, we shall offer a few cursory remarks bearing
on, but not attempting to answer, those grave inquiries concerning
the African people.  As in our humble opinion these are questions
paramount to all the petty local issues finically dilated on by the
confident prophet of "The Bow of Ulysses," we will here briefly
devote ourselves to its discussion.

Accepting the theory of human development propounded by our author,
let us apply it to the African race.  Except, of course, to
intelligences having a share in the Councils of Eternity, there can
be no attainable knowledge respecting the laws which regulate the
growth and progress of civilization among the races of the earth.
That in the existence of the human family every age has been marked
by its own essential characteristics with regard to manifestations of
intellectual life, however circumscribed, is a proposition too self-
evident [236] to require more than the stating.  But investigation
beyond such evidence as we possess concerning the past--whether
recorded by man himself in the written pages of history, or by the
Creator on the tablets of nature--would be worse than futile.  We see
that in the past different races have successively come to the front,
as prominent actors on the world's stage.  The years of civilized
development have dawned in turn on many sections of the human family,
and the Anglo-Saxons, who now enjoy preeminence, got their turn only
after Egypt, Assyria, Babylon, Greece, Rome, and others had
successively held the palm of supremacy.  And since these mighty
empires have all passed away, may we not then, if the past teaches
aught, confidently expect that other racial hegemonies will arise in
the future to keep up the ceaseless progression of temporal existence
towards the existence that is eternal?  What is it in the nature of
things that will oust the African race from the right to participate,
in times to come, in the high destinies that have been assigned in
times past to so many races that have not been in anywise superior to
us in the qualifications, physical, moral, and intellectual, [237]
that mark out a race for prominence amongst other races?

The normal composition of the typical Negro has the testimony of ages
to its essential soundness and nobility.  Physically, as an active
labourer, he is capable of the most protracted exertion under
climatic conditions the most exhausting.  By the mere strain of his
brawn and sinew he has converted waste tracts of earth into fertile
regions of agricultural bountifulness.  On the scenes of strife he
has in his savage state been known to be indomitable save by the
stress of irresistible forces, whether of men or of circumstances.
Staunch in his friendship and tender towards the weak directly under
his protection, the unvitiated African furnishes in himself the
combination of native virtue which in the land of his exile was so
prolific of good results for the welfare of the whole slave-class.
But distracted at home by the sudden irruptions of skulking foes, he
has been robbed, both intellectually and morally, of the immense
advantage of Peace, which is the mother of Progress.  Transplanted to
alien climes, and through centuries of desolating trials, this
irrepressible race has [238] bated not one throb of its energy, nor
one jot of its heart or hope.  In modern times, after his
expatriation into dismal bondage, both Britain and America have had
occasion to see that even in the paralysing fetters of political and
social degradation the right arm of the Ethiop can be a valuable
auxiliary on the field of battle.  Britain, in her conflict with
France for supremacy in the West Indies, did not disdain the aid of
the sable arms that struck together with those of Britons for the
trophies that furnished the motives for those epic contests.

Later on, the unparalleled struggle between the Northern and Southern
States of the American Union put to the test the indestructible
fibres of the Negro's nature, moral as well as physical.  The
Northern States, after months of hesitating repugnance, and when
taught at last by dire defeats that colour did not in any way help to
victory, at length sullenly acquiesced in the comradeship, hitherto
disdained, of the eager African contingent.  The records of Port
Hudson, Vicksburg, Morris Island, and elsewhere, stand forth in
imperishable attestation of the fact that the distinction of being
laurelled during life as victor, or filling [239] in death a hero's
grave, is reserved for no colour, but for the heart that can dare and
the hand that can strike boldly in a righteous cause.  The experience
of the Southern slave-holders, on the other hand, was no less
striking and worthy of admiration.  Every man of the twelve seceding
States forming the Southern Confederacy, then fighting desperately
for the avowed purpose of perpetuating slavery, was called into the
field, as no available male arm could be spared from the conflict on
their side.  Plantation owner, overseer, and every one in authority,
had to be drafted away from the scene of their usual occupation to
the stage whereon the bloody drama of internecine strife was being
enacted.  Not only the plantation, but the home and the household,
including the mistress and her children, had to be left, not
unprotected, it is glorious to observe, but, with confident assurance
in their loyalty and good faith, under the protection of the four
million of bondsmen, who, through the laws and customs of these very
States, had been doomed to lifelong ignorance and exclusion from all
moralizing influences.  With what result?  The protraction of the
conflict on the part of the South would [240] have been impossible
but for the admirable management and realization of their resources
by those benighted slaves.  On the other hand, not one of the
thousands of Northern prisoners escaping from the durance of a
Southern captivity ever appealed in vain for the assistance and
protection of a Negro.  Clearly the head and heart of those bondsmen
were each in its proper place.  The moral effect of these experiences
of the Negroes' sterling qualities was not lost on either North or
South.  In the North it effaced from thousands of repugnant hearts
the adverse feelings which had devised and accomplished so much to
the Negro's detriment.  In the South--but for the blunders of the
Reconstructionists--it would have considerably facilitated the final
readjustment of affairs between the erewhile master and slave in
their new-born relations of employer and employed.

Reverting to the Africans who were conveyed to places other than the
States, it will be seen that circumstances amongst them and in their
favour came into play, modifying and lightening their unhappy
condition.  First, attention must be paid to the patriotic solidarity
existing [241] amongst the bondsmen, a solidarity which, in the case
of those who had been deported in the same ship, had all the sanctity
of blood-relationship.  Those who had thus travelled to the "white
man's country" addressed and considered each other as brothers and
sisters.  Hence their descendants for many generations upheld, as if
consanguineous, the modes of address and treatment which became
hereditary in families whose originals had travelled in the same
ship.  These adopted uncles, aunts, nephews, nieces, were so united
by common sympathies, that good or ill befalling any one of them
intensely affected the whole connection.  Mutual support commensurate
with the area of their location thus became the order among these
people.  At the time of the first deportation of Africans to the West
Indies to replace the aborigines who had been decimated in the mines
at Santo Domingo and in the pearl fisheries of the South Caribbean,
the circumstances of the Spanish settlers in the Antilles were of
singular, even romantic, interest.

The enthusiasm which overflowed from the crusades and the Moorish
wars, upon the discovery and conquest of America, had occasioned
[242]  the peopling of the Western Archipelago by a race of men in
whom the daring of freebooters was strangely blended with a fierce
sort of religiousness.  As holders of slaves, these men recognized,
and endeavoured to their best to give effect to, the humane
injunctions of Bishop Las Casas.  The Negroes, therefore, male and
female, were promptly presented for admission by baptism into the
Catholic Church, which always had stood open and ready to welcome
them.  The relations of god-father and god-mother resulting from
these baptismal functions had a most important bearing on the
reciprocal stations of master and slave.  The god-children were,
according to ecclesiastical custom, considered in every sense
entitled to all the protection and assistance which were within the
competence of the god-parents, who, in their turn, received from the
former the most absolute submission.  It is easy to see that the
planters, as well as those intimately connected with them, in
assuming such obligations with their concomitant responsibilities,
practically entered into bonds which they all regarded as, if
possible, more solemn than the natural ties of secular parentage.
The duty [243] of providing for these dependents usually took the
shape of their being apprenticed to, and trained in the various arts
and vocations that constitute the life of civilization.  In many
cases, at the death of their patrons, the bondsmen who were deemed
most worthy were, according to the means of the testator, provided
for in a manner lifting them above the necessity of future
dependence.  Manumission, too, either by favour or through purchase,
was allowed the fullest operation.  Here then was the active
influence of higher motives than mere greed of gain or the pride of
racial power mellowing the lot and gilding the future prospects of
the dwellers in the tropical house of bondage.

The next, and even more effectual agency in modifying and harmonizing
the relations between owner and bondspeople was the inevitable
attraction of one race to the other by the sentiment of natural
affection.  Out of this sprang living ties far more intimate and
binding on the moral sense than even obligations contracted in
deference to the Church.  Natural impulses have often diviner sources
than ecclesiastical mandates.  Obedience to the former not seldom
brings down the penalties of the Church; but [244] the culprit finds
solace in the consciousness that the offence might in itself be a
protection from the thunders it has provoked.  Under these
circumstances the general body of planters, who were in the main
adventurers of the freest type, were fain to establish connections
with such of the slave-women as attracted their sympathy, through
personal comeliness or aptitude in domestic affairs, or, usually,
both combined.  There was ordinarily in this beginning of the
seventeenth century no Vashti that needed expulsion from the abode of
a plantation Ahasuerus to make room for the African Esther to be
admitted to the chief place within the portals.  One great natural
consequence of this was the extension to the relatives or guardians
of the bondswoman so preferred of an amount of favour which, in the
case of the more capable males, completes the parallel we have been
drawing by securing for each of them the precedence and
responsibilities of a Mordecai.  The offspring of these natural
alliances came in therefore to cement more intimately the union of
interests which previous relations had generated.  Beloved by their
fathers, and in many cases destined by them to a lot superior [245]
to that whereto they were entitled by formal law and social
prescription, these young procreations--Mulattos, as they were
called--were made the objects of special and careful provisions on
the fathers' part.  They were, according to the means of their
fathers in the majority of cases, sent for education and training to
European or other superior institutions.  After this course they were
either formally acknowledged by their fathers, or, if that was
impracticable, amply and suitably provided for in a career out of
their native colony.  To a reflecting mind there is something that
interests, not to say fascinates, in studying the action and reaction
upon one another of circumstances in the existence of the Mulatto.
As a matter of fact, he had much more to complain of under the slave
system than his pure-blooded African relations.  The law, by
decreeing that every child of a freeman and a slave woman must follow
the fortune of the womb, thus making him the property of his mother
exclusively, practically robbed him before his very birth of the
nurture and protection of a father.  His reputed father had no
obligation to be even aware of his procreation, and nevertheless
[246] --so inscrutable are the ways of Providence!--the Mulatto was
the centre around which clustered the outraged instincts of nature in
rebellion against the desecrating mandates that prescribed treason to
herself.  Law and society may decree; but in our normal humanity
there throbs a sentiment which neutralizes every external impulse
contrary to its promptings.

In meditating on the varied history of the Negro in the United
States, since his first landing on the banks of the James River in
1619 till the Emancipation Act of President Lincoln in 1865, it is
curious to observe that the elevation of the race, though in a great
measure secured, proceeded from circumstances almost the reverse of
those that operated so favourably in the same direction elsewhere.
The men of the slave-holding States, chiefly Puritans or influenced
by Puritanic surroundings, were not under the ecclesiastical sway
which rendered possible in the West Indies and other Catholic
countries the establishment of the reciprocal bonds of god-parents
and god-children.  The self-same causes operated to prevent any large
blending of the two races, inasmuch as the immigrant from Britain who
[247] had gone forth from his country to better his fortune had not
left behind him his attachment to the institutions of the mother-
land, among which marrying, whenever practicable, was one of the most
cherished.  Above all, too, as another powerful check at first to
such alliances between the ruling and servile races of the States,
there existed the native idiosyncracy of the Anglo-Saxon.  That class
of them who had left Britain were likelier than the more refined of
their nation to exhibit in its crudest and cruellest form the innate
jealousy and contempt of other races that pervades the Anglo-Saxon
bosom.  It is but a simple fact that, whenever he condescended
thereto, familiarity with even the loveliest of the subject people
was regarded as a mighty self-unbending for which the object should
be correspondingly grateful.  So there could, in the beginning, be no
frequent instances of the romantic chivalry that gilded the quasi-
marital relations of the more fervid and humane members of the Latin
stock.

But this kind of intercourse, which in the earlier generation was
undoubtedly restricted in North America by the checks above adverted
to, and, presumably, also by the mutual unintelligibility [248] in
speech, gradually expanded with the natural increase of the slave
population.  The American-born, English-speaking Negro girl, who had
in many cases been the playmate of her owner, was naturally more
intelligible, more accessible, more attractive--and the inevitable
consequence was the extension apace of that intercourse, the
offspring whereof became at length so visibly numerous.

Among the Romans, the grandest of all colonizers, the individual's
Civis Romanus sum--I am a Roman citizen--was something more than
verbal vapouring; it was a protective talisman--a buckler no less
than a sword.  Yet was the possession of this noble and singular
privilege no barrier to Roman citizens meeting on a broad
humanitarian level any alien race, either allied to or under the
protection of that world-famous commonwealth.  In the speeches of the
foremost orators and statesmen among the conquerors of the then known
world, the allusions to subject or allied aliens are distinguished by
a decorous observance of the proprieties which should mark any
reference to those who had the dignity of Rome's [249] friendship, or
the privilege of her august protection.  Observations, therefore,
regarding individuals of rank in these alien countries had the same
sobriety and deference which marked allusions to born Romans of
analogous degree.  Such magnanimity, we grieve to say, is not
characteristic of the race which now replaces the Romans in the
colonizing leadership of the world.  We read with feelings akin to
despair of the cheap, not to say derogatory, manner in which, in both
Houses of Parliament, native potentates, especially of non-European
countries, are frequently spoken of by the hereditary aristocracy and
the first gentlemen of the British Empire.  The inborn racial
contempt thus manifested in quarters where rigid self-control and
decorum should form the very essence of normal deportment, was not
likely, as we have before hinted, to find any mollifying ingredient
in the settlers on the banks of the Mississippi.  Therefore should we
not be surprised to find, with regard to many an illicit issue of
"down South," the arrogance of race so overmastering the promptings
of nature as to render not unfrequent at the auction-block the sight
of many a chattel of mixed blood, the offspring [250] of some planter
whom business exigency had forced to this commercial transaction as
the readiest mode of self-release.  Yet were the exceptions to this
rule enough to contribute appreciably to the weight and influence of
the mixed race in the North, where education and a fair standing had
been clandestinely secured for their children by parents to whom law
and society had made it impossible to do more, and whom conscience
rendered incapable of stopping at less.

From this comparative sketch of the history of the slaves in the
States, in the West Indies and countries adjacent, it will be
perceived that in the latter scenes of bondage everything had
conspired to render a fusion of interests between the ruling and the
servile classes not only easy, but inevitable.  In the very first
generation after their introduction, the Africans began to press
upward, a movement which every decade has accelerated, in spite of
the changes which supervened as each of the Colonies fell under
British sway.  Nearly two centuries had by this time elapsed, and the
coloured influence, which had grown with their wealth, education,
numbers, and unity, though [251] circumscribed by the emancipation of
the slaves, and the consequent depression in fortune of all slave-
owners, never was or could be annihilated.  In the Government service
there were many for whom the patronage of god-parents or the sheer
influence of their family had effected an entrance.  The prevalence
and potency of the influences we have been dilating upon may be
gauged by the fact that personages no less exalted than Governors of
various Colonies--of Trinidad in three authentic cases--have been
sharers in the prevailing usages, in the matter of standing sponsors
(by proxy), and also of relaxing in the society of some fascinating
daughter of the sun from the tension and wear of official duty.  In
the three cases just referred to, the most careful provision was made
for the suitable education and starting in life of the issues.  For
the god-children of Governors there were places in the public
service, and so from the highest to the lowest the humanitarian
intercourse of the classes was confirmed.

Consequent on the frequent abandonment of their plantations by many
owners who despaired of being able to get along by paying [252] their
way, an opening was made for the insinuation of Absenteeism into our
agricultural, in short, our economic existence.  The powerful sugar
lords, who had invested largely in the cane plantations, were fain to
take over and cultivate the properties which their debtors doggedly
refused to continue working, under pretext of the entire absence, or
at any rate unreliability, of labour.  The representatives of those
new transatlantic estate proprietors displaced, but never could
replace, the original cultivators, who were mostly gentlemen as well
as agriculturists.  It was from this overseer class that the
vituperations and slanders went forth that soon became stereotyped,
concerning the Negro's incorrigible laziness and want of ambition--
those gentry adjusting the scale of wages, not according to the
importance and value of the labour done, but according to the
scornful estimate which they had formed of the Negro personally.  And
when the wages were fixed fairly, they almost invariably sought to
indemnify themselves for their enforced justice by the insulting
license of their tongues, addressed to males and females alike.  The
influence of such men on local legislation, in which they [253] had a
preponderating share, either as actual proprietors or as the
attorneys of absentees, was not in the direction of refinement or
liberality.  Indeed, the kind of laws which they enacted, especially
during the apprenticeship (1834-8), is thus summarized by one, and
him an English officer, who was a visitor in those agitated days of
the Colonies:--

"It is demonstrated that the laws which were to come into operation
immediately on expiration of the apprenticeship are of the most
objectionable character, and fully established the fact not only of a
future intention to infringe the rights of the emancipated classes,
but of the actual commencement and extensive progress of a Colonial
system for that purpose.  The object of the laws is to circumscribe
the market for free labour--to prohibit the possession or sale of
ordinary articles of produce on sale, the obvious intention of which
is to confine the emancipated classes to a course of agricultural
servitude--to give the employers a monopoly of labour, and to keep
down a free competition for wages--to create new and various modes of
apprenticeship for the purpose of prolonging predial service,
together with many evils of the [254] late system--to introduce
unnecessary restraint and coercion, the design of which is to create
a perpetual surveillance over the liberated negroes, and to establish
a legislative despotism.  The several laws passed are based upon the
most vicious principles of legislation, and in their operation will
be found intolerably oppressive and entirely subversive of the just
intentions of the British Legislature."

These liberal-souled gentry were, in sooth, Mr. Froude's
"representatives" of Britain, whose traditions steadily followed in
their families, he has so well and sympathetically set forth.

We thus see that the irritation and rancour seething in the breast of
the new plantocracy, of whom the majority was of the type that then
also flourished in Barbados, Jamaica, and Demerara, were nourished
and kept acute in order to crush the African element.  Harm was done,
certainly; but not to the ruinous extent sometimes declared.  It was
too late for perfect success, as, according to the Negroes' own
phrase, people of colour had by that time already "passed the lock-
jaw"* stage (at which trifling misadventures [255] might have nipped
the germ of their progress in the bud.)  In spite of adverse
legislation, and in spite of the scandalous subservience of certain
Governors to the Colonial Legislatures, the Race can point with
thankfulness and pride to the visible records of their success
wherever they have permanently sojourned.

Primary education of a more general and undiscriminating character,
especially as to race and colour, was secured for the bulk of the
West Indies by voluntary undertakings, and notably through the
munificent provision of Lady Mico, which extended to the whole of the
principal islands.

Thanks to Lord Harris for introducing, and to Sir Arthur Gordon for
extending to the secondary stage, the public education of Trinidad,
there has been since Emancipation, that is, during the last thirty-
seven years, a more effective bringing together in public schools of
various grades, of children of all races and ranks.  Rivals at home,
at school and college, in books as well as on the playground, they
have very frequently gone abroad together to learn the professions
they have selected.  In this way there is an intercommunion between
all the [256] intelligent sections of the inhabitants, based on a
common training and the subtle sympathies usually generated in
enlightened breasts by intimate personal knowledge.  In mixed
communities thus circumstanced, there is no possibility of
maintaining distinctions based on mere colour, as advocated by Mr.
Froude.

The following brief summary by the Rev. P. H. Doughlin, Rector of St.
Clement's, Trinidad, a brilliant star among the sons of Ham, embodies
this fact in language which, so far as it goes, is as comprehensive
as it is weighty:--

"Who could, without seeming to insult the intelligence of men, have
predicted on the day of Emancipation that the Negroes then released
from the blight and withering influence of ten generations of cruel
bondage, so weakened and half-destroyed--so denationalized and
demoralized--so despoiled and naked, would be in the position they
are now?  In spite of the proud, supercilious, and dictatorial
bearing of their teachers, in spite of the hampering of
unsympathetic, alien oversight, in spite of the spirit of dependence
and servility engendered by slavery, not only have individual members
of the race entered into all the offices of dignity in [257] Church
and State, as subalterns--as hewers of wood and drawers of water--but
they have attained to the very highest places.  Here in the West
Indies, and on the West Coast of Africa, are to be found Surgeons of
the Negro Race, Solicitors, Barristers, Mayors, Councillors,
Principals and Founders of High Schools and Colleges, Editors and
Proprietors of Newspapers, Archdeacons, Bishops, Judges, and Authors-
-men who not only teach those immediately around them, but also teach
the world.  Members of the race have even been entrusted with the
administration of Governments.  And it is not mere commonplace men
that the Negro Race has produced.  Not only have the British
Universities thought them worthy of their honorary degrees and
conferred them on them, but members of the race have won these
University degrees.  A few years back a full-blooded Negro took the
highest degree Oxford has to give to a young man.  The European world
is looking with wonder and admiration at the progress made by the
Negro Race--a progress unparalleled in the annals of the history of
any race."

To this we may add that in the domain [258] of high literature the
Blacks of the United States, for the twenty-five years of social
emancipation, and despite the lingering obstructions of caste
prejudice, have positively achieved wonders.  Leaving aside the
writings of men of such high calibre as F. Douglass, Dr. Hyland
Garnet, Prof. Crummell, Prof. E. Blyden, Dr. Tanner, and others, it
is gratifying to be able to chronicle the Ethiopic women of North
America as moving shoulder to shoulder with the men in the highest
spheres of literary activity.  Among a brilliant band of these our
sisters, conspicuous no less in poetry than in prose, we single out
but a solitary name for the double purpose of preserving brevity and
of giving in one embodiment the ideal Afro-American woman of letters.
The allusion here can scarcely fail to point to Mrs. S. Harper.  This
lady's philosophical subtlety of reasoning on grave questions finds
effective expression in a prose of singular precision and vigour.
But it is as a poet that posterity will hail her in the coming ages
of our Race.  For pathos, depth of spiritual insight, and magical
exercise of a rare power of self-utterance, it will hardly be
questioned that she has surpassed every competitor [259] among
females--white or black--save and except Elizabeth Barett Browning,
with whom the gifted African stands on much the same plane of poetic
excellence.

The above summary of our past vicissitudes and actual position shows
that there is nothing in our political circumstances to occasion
uneasiness.  The miserable skin and race doctrine we have been
discussing does not at all prefigure the destinies at all events of
the West Indies, or determine the motives that will affect them.
With the exception of those belonging to the Southern states of the
Union, the vast body of African descendants now dispersed in various
countries of the Western Hemisphere are at sufficient peace to begin
occupying themselves, according to some fixed programme, about
matters of racial importance.  More than ten millions of Africans are
scattered over the wide area indicated, and possess amongst them
instances of mental and other qualifications which render them
remarkable among their fellow-men.  But like the essential parts of a
complicated albeit perfect machine, these attainments and
qualifications so widely dispersed await, it is evident, some
potential [260] agency to collect and adjust them into the vast
engine essential for executing the true purposes of the civilized
African Race.  Already, especially since the late Emancipation
Jubilee, are signs manifest of a desire for intercommunion and
intercomprehension amongst the more distinguished of our people.
With intercourse and unity of purpose will be secured the means to
carry out the obvious duties which are sure to devolve upon us,
especially with reference to the cradle of our Race, which is most
probably destined to be the ultimate resting-place and headquarters
of millions of our posterity.  Within the short time that we had to
compass all that we have achieved, there could not have arisen
opportunities for doing more than we have effected.  Meanwhile our
present device is: "Work, Hope, and Wait!"

Finally, it must be borne in mind that the abolition of physical
bondage did not by any means secure all the requisite conditions of
"a fair field and no favour" for the future career of the freedmen.
The remnant of Jacob, on their return from the Captivity, were
compelled, whilst rebuilding their Temple, literally to labour with
the working tool in one hand [261] and the sword for personal defence
in the other.  Even so have the conditions, figuratively, presented
themselves under which the Blacks have been obliged to rear the
fabric of self-elevation since 1838, whilst combating ceaselessly the
obstacles opposed to the realizing of their legitimate aspirations.
Mental and, in many cases, material success has been gained, but the
machinery for accumulating and applying the means required for
comprehensive racial enterprises is waiting on Providence, time, and
circumstances for its establishment and successful working.

NOTES

254. *"Yo te'ja passe mal machoe"--in metaphorical allusion to new-
born infants who have lived beyond a certain number of days.








Scanned and proofed by Alfred J. Drake (www.ajdrake.com)






GASTON DE LATOUR: AN UNFINISHED ROMANCE
WALTER PATER

1. A Clerk in Orders: 1-25

2. Our Lady's Church: 26-47

3. Modernity: 48-72

4. Peach-Blossom and Wine: 73-90

5. Suspended Judgment: 91-115

6. Shadows of Events: 116-131

7. The Lower Pantheism: 132-end



I.  A CLERK IN ORDERS

The white walls of the Chateau of Deux-manoirs, with its precincts,
composed, before its dismantling at the Revolution, the one prominent
object which towards the southwest broke the pleasant level of La
Beauce, the great corn-land of central France.  Abode in those days
of the family of Latour, nesting there century after century, it
recorded significantly the effectiveness of their brotherly union,
less by way of invasion of the rights of others than by the
improvement of all gentler sentiments within.  From the sumptuous
monuments of their last resting-place, backwards to every object
which had encircled them in that warmer and more lightsome home it
was visible they had cared for so much, even in some peculiarities of
the very ground-plan of the house itself--everywhere was the token of
their anxious estimate of all those incidents of man's pathway
through the world [2] which knit the wayfarers thereon most closely
together.

Why this irregularity of ground-plan?--the traveller would ask;
recognising indeed a certain distinction in its actual effect on the
eye, and suspecting perhaps some conscious aim at such effect on the
part of the builders of the place in an age indulgent of
architectural caprices.  And the traditional answer to the question,
true for once, still showed the race of Latour making much, making
the most, of the sympathetic ties of human life.  The work, in large
measure, of Gaston de Latour, it was left unfinished at his death,
some time about the year 1594.  That it was never completed could
hardly be attributed to any lack of means, or of interest; for it is
plain that to the period of the Revolution, after which its scanty
remnants passed into humble occupation (a few circular turrets, a
crenellated curtain wall, giving a random touch of dignity to some
ordinary farm-buildings) the place had been scrupulously maintained.
It might seem to have been a kind of reverence rather that had
allowed the work to remain untouched for future ages precisely at
this point in its growth.

And the expert architectural mind, peeping acutely into recondite
motives and half-accomplished purposes in such matters, could detect
the circumstance which had determined that so noticeable peculiarity
of ground-plan.  Its kernel was not, as in most similar buildings of
that date, [3] a feudal fortress, but an unfortified manor-house--a
double manoir--two houses, oddly associated at a right angle.  Far
back in the Middle Age, said a not uncertain tradition, here had been
the one point of contact between two estates, intricately interlocked
with alien domain, as, in the course of generations, the family of
Latour, and another, had added field to field.  In the single lonely
manor then existing two brothers had grown up; and the time came when
the marriage of the younger to the heiress of those neighbouring
lands would divide two perfect friends.  Regretting over-night so
dislocating a change it was the elder who, as the drowsy hours flowed
away in manifold recollection beside the fire, now suggested to the
younger, himself already wistfully recalling, as from the past, the
kindly motion and noise of the place like a sort of audible sunlight,
the building of a second manor-house--the Chateau d'Amour, as it came
to be called--that the two families, in what should be as nearly as
possible one abode, might take their fortunes together.

Of somewhat finer construction than the rough walls of the older
manor, the Chateau d'Amour stood, amid the change of years, as a
visible record of all the accumulated sense of human existence among
its occupants.  The old walls, the old apartments, of those two
associated houses still existed, with some obvious additions, beneath
the delicate, fantastic surfaces of the chateau [4] of the sixteenth
century.  Its singularity of outline was the very symbol of the
religion of the family in the race of Latour, still full of loyalty
to the old home, as its numerous outgrowths took hold here and there
around.  A race with some prominent characteristics ineradicable in
the grain, they went to raise the human level about them by a
transfer of blood, far from involving any social decadence in
themselves.  A peculiar local variety of character, of manners, in
that district of La Beauce, surprised the more observant visitor who
might find his way into farmhouse or humble presbytery of its
scattered townships.  And as for those who kept up the central
tradition of their house, they were true to the soil, coming back,
under whatever obstacles, from court, from cloister, from distant
crusade, to the visible spot where the memory of their kindred was
liveliest and most exact--a memory, touched so solemnly with a
conscience of the intimacies of life, its significant events, its
contacts and partings, that to themselves it was like a second sacred
history.

It was a great day, amid all their quiet days, for the people of
Deux-manoirs--one of the later days of August.  The event, which
would mark it always in the life of one of them, called into play all
that was most expressive in that well-defined family character: it
was at once the recognition of what they valued most in past years,
and an assertion of will, or hope, for the [5] future, accordant
thereto.  Far away in Paris the young King Charles the Ninth, in his
fourteenth year, had been just declared of age.  Here, in the church
of Saint Hubert, church of their parish, and of their immemorial
patronage, though it lay at a considerable distance from their abode,
the chiefs of the house of Latour, attended by many of its dependents
and less important members, were standing ready, around the last hope
of their old age--the grandparents, their aged brothers and sisters,
certain aged ecclesiastics of their kindred, wont to be called to the
family councils.

They had set out on foot, after a votive mass said early in the old
chapel of the manor, to assist at the ceremony of the day.
Distinguishable from afar by unusual height in proportion to its
breadth within, the church of Saint Hubert had an atmosphere, a
daylight, to itself.  Its stained glass, work of the same hands that
had wrought for the cathedral of Chartres, admitted only an almost
angry ray of purple or crimson, here or there, across the dark, roomy
spaces.  The heart, the heart of youth at least, sank, as one
entered, stepping warily out of the sunshine over the sepulchral
stones which formed the entire pavement of the church, a great
blazonry of family history from age to age for indefatigable eyes.
An abundance of almost life-sized sculpture clung to the pillars,
lurked in the angles, seemed, with those symbolical gestures, and
mystic faces [6] ready to speak their parts, to be almost in motion
through the gloom.  Many years after, Gaston de Latour, an enemy of
all Gothic darkness or heaviness, returning to his home full of a
later taste, changed all that.  A thicket of airy spires rose above
the sanctuary; the blind triforium broke into one continuous window;
the heavy masses of stone were pared down with wonderful dexterity of
hand, till not a hand's-breadth remained uncovered by delicate
tracery, as from the fair white roof, touched sparingly with gold,
down to the subterranean chapel of Saint Taurin, where the peasants
of La Beauce came to pray for rain, not a space was left unsearched
by cheerful daylight, refined, but hardly dimmed at all, by painted
glass mimicking the clearness of the open sky.  In the sombre old
church all was in stately order now: the dusky, jewelled reliquaries,
the ancient devotional ornaments from the manor--much-prized family
possessions, sufficient to furnish the whole array of a great
ecclesiastical function like this--the lights burning, flowers
everywhere, gathered amid the last handfuls of the harvest by the
peasant-women, who came to present their children for the happy
chance of an episcopal blessing.

And the almost exclusively aged people, in all their old personal
adornments, which now so rarely saw the light, forming the central
group, expectant around the young seigneur they had conducted hither,
seemed of one piece with [7] those mystic figures, the old, armour-
clad monumental effigies, the carved and painted imageries which ran
round the outer circuit of the choir--a version of the biblical
history, for the reading of those who loitered on their way from
chapel to chapel.  There was Joseph's dream, with the tall sheaves of
the elder brethren bowing to Joseph's sheaf, like these aged heads
around the youthful aspirant of to-day.  There was Jacob going on his
mysterious way, met by, conversing with, wrestling with, the Angels
of God--rescuing the promise of his race from the "profane" Esau.
There was the mother of Samuel, and, in long white ephod, the much-
desired, early-consecrated child, who had inherited her religious
capacity; and David, with something of his extraordinary genius for
divine things written on his countenance; onward, to the sacred
persons of the Annunciation, with the golden lily in the silver cup,
only lately set in its place.  With dress, expression, nay! the very
incidents themselves innocently adapted to the actual habits and
associations of the age which had produced them, these figures of the
old Jewish history seemed about to take their places, for the
imparting of a divine sanction, among the living actors of the day.
One and all spoke of ready concurrence with religious motions, a
ready apprehension of, and concurrence with, the provisions of a
certain divine scheme for the improvement of one's opportunities in
the world.

[8] Would that dark-haired, fair-skinned lad concur, in his turn, and
be always true to his present purpose--Gaston de Latour, standing
thus, almost the only youthful thing, amid the witness of these
imposing, meditative, masks and faces?  Could his guardians have read
below the white propriety of the youth, duly arrayed for dedication,
with the lighted candle in his right hand and the surplice folded
over his left shoulder, he might sorely have disturbed their placid
but somewhat narrow ruminations, with the germs of what was strange
to or beyond them.  Certain of those shrewd old ecclesiastics had in
fact detected that the devout lad, so visibly impressed, was not
altogether after their kind; that, together with many characteristics
obviously inherited, he possessed--had caught perhaps from some
ancestor unrepresented here--some other potencies of nature, which
might not always combine so accordantly as to-day with the mental
requisites of an occasion such as this.  One of them, indeed, touched
notwithstanding by his manifest piety just then, shortly afterwards
recommended him a little prayer "for peace" from the Vespers of the
Roman Breviary--for the harmony of his heart with itself; advice
which, except for a very short period, he ever afterwards followed,
saying it every evening of his life.

Yet it was the lad's own election which had led him to this first
step in a career that might take him out of the world and end the
race of [9] Latour altogether.  Approaching their fourscore years,
and realising almost suddenly the situation of the young Gaston, left
there alone, out of what had been a large, much-promising, resonant
household, they wished otherwise, but did not try to change his
early-pronounced preference for the ecclesiastical calling.  When he
determined to seek the clericature, his proposal made a demand on all
their old-fashioned religious sentiment.  But the fund was a deep
one, and their acquiescence in the result entire.  He might indeed
use his privilege of "orders" only as the stepping-stone to material
advancement in a church which seemed to have gone over wholly to the
world, and of which at that time one half the benefices were
practically in the hands of laymen.  But, actually, the event came to
be a dedication on their part, not unlike those old biblical ones--an
offering in old age of the single precious thing left them; the
grandchild, whose hair would presently fall under the very shears
which, a hundred years before, had turned an earlier, brilliant,
Gaston de Latour into a monk.

Charles Guillard, Bishop of Chartres, a courtly, vivacious prelate,
whose quick eyes seemed to note at a glance the whole assembly, one
and all, while his lips moved silently, arrived at last, and the rite
began with the singing of the Office for the Ninth Hour.  It was like
a stream of water crossing unexpectedly a dusty way--Mirabilia
testimonia tua!  In psalm and antiphon, inexhaustibly [10] fresh, the
soul seemed to be taking refuge, at that undevout hour, from the
sordid languor and the mean business of men's lives, in contemplation
of the unfaltering vigour of the divine righteousness, which had
still those who sought it, not only watchful in the night but alert
in the drowsy afternoon.  Yes! there was the sheep astray, sicut ovis
quae periit--the physical world; with its lusty ministers, at work,
or sleeping for a while amid the stubble, their faces upturned to the
August sun--the world so importunately visible, intruding a little
way, with its floating odours, in that semicircle of heat across the
old over-written pavement at the great open door, upon the mysteries
within.  Seen from the incense-laden sanctuary, where the bishop was
assuming one by one the pontifical ornaments, La Beauce, like a many-
coloured carpet spread under the great dome, with the white double
house-front quivering afar through the heat, though it looked as if
you might touch with the hand its distant spaces, was for a moment
the unreal thing.  Gaston alone, with all his mystic preoccupations,
by the privilege of youth, seemed to belong to both, and link the
visionary company about him to the external scene.

The rite with which the Roman Church "makes a clerk," aims certainly
at no low measure of difference from the coarser world around him, in
its supposed scholar: and in this case the [11] aspirant (the precise
claims of the situation being well considered) had no misgiving.
Discreetly, and with full attention, he answers Adsum! when his name
is called, and advances manfully; though he kneels meekly enough, and
remains, with his head bowed forward, at the knees of the seated
bishop who recites the appointed prayers, between the anthems and
responses of his Schola, or attendant singers--Might he be saved from
mental blindness!  Might he put on the new man, even as his outward
guise was changed!  Might he keep the religious habit for ever! who
had thus hastened to lay down the hair of his head for the divine
love.  "The Lord is my inheritance" whispers Gaston distinctly, as
the locks fall, cut from the thickly-grown, black head, in five
places, "after the fashion of Christ's crown," the shears in the
episcopal hands sounding aloud, amid the silence of the curious
spectators.  From the same hands, in due order, the fair surplice
ripples down over him.  "This is the generation of them that seek
Him," the choir sings: "The Lord Himself is the portion of my
inheritance and my cup."  It was the Church's eloquent way of bidding
unrestricted expansion to the youthful heart in its timely purpose to
seek the best, to abide among the things of the spirit.

The prospect from their cheerful, unenclosed road, like a white scarf
flung across the land, as [12] the party returned home in the late
August afternoon, was clear and dry and distant.  The great barns at
the wayside had their doors thrown back, displaying the dark, cool
space within.  The farmsteads seemed almost tenantless, the villagers
being still at work over the immense harvest-field.  Crazy bells
startled them, striking out the hour from behind, over a deserted
churchyard.  Still and tenantless also seemed the manor as they
approached, door and window lying open upon the court for the
coolness; or rather it was as if at their approach certain spectral
occupants started back out of the daylight--"Why depart, dear
ghosts?" was what the grandparents would have cried.  They had more
in common with that immaterial world than with flesh and blood.
There was room for the existing household, enough and to spare, in
one of the two old houses.  That other, the Chateau d'Amour, remained
for Gaston, at first as a delightful, half-known abode of wonders,
though with some childish fear; afterwards, as a delightful nursery
of refined or fantastic sentiment, as he recalled, in this chamber or
that, its old tenants and their doings, from the affectionate
brothers, onwards--above all, how in one room long ago Gabrielle de
Latour had died of joy.

With minds full of their recent business it was difficult to go back
to common occupations; as darkness came on, the impressions of the
day did but return again more vividly and concentrate [13] themselves
upon the inward sense.  Observance, loyal concurrence in some high
purpose for him, passive waiting on the hand one might miss in the
darkness, with the gift or gifts therein of which he had the
presentiment, and upon the due acceptance of which the true fortune
of life would turn; these were the hereditary traits alert in Gaston,
as he lay awake in the absolute, moon-lit, stillness, his outward ear
attentive for the wandering footsteps which, through that wide,
lightly-accentuated country, often came and went about the house,
with weird suggestions of a dim passage to and fro, and of an
infinite distance.  He would rise, as the footsteps halted perhaps
below his window, to answer the questions of the travellers,
pilgrims, or labourers who had missed their way from farm to farm, or
halting soldier seeking guidance; terrible or terror-stricken
companies sometimes, rudely or piteously importunate to be let in--
for it was the period of the Religious Wars, flaming up here and
there over France, and never quite put out, during forty years.

Once, in the beginning of these troubles (he was then a child,
leaning from the window, as a sound of rickety, small wheels
approached) the enquiry came in broken French, "Voulez-vous donner
direction?" from a German, one of the mercenaries of the Duc de
Guise, hired for service in a civil strife of France, drawing wearily
a crippled companion, so far from home. [14] The memory of it,
awakening a thousand strange fancies, had remained by him, as a
witness to the power of fortuitous circumstance over the imagination.

One night there had come a noise of horns, and presently King Charles
himself was standing in the courtyard, belated, and far enough now
from troublesome company, as he hunted the rich-fleshed game of La
Beauce through the endless corn.  He entered, with a relish for the
pleasant cleanliness of the place, expressed in a shrill strain of
half-religious oaths, like flashes of hell-fire to Gaston's suddenly-
awakened sense.  It was the invincible nature of the royal lad to
speak, and feel, on these mad, alto notes, and not unbecoming in a
good catholic; for Huguenots never swore, and these were subtly
theological oaths.  Well! the grandparents repressed as best they
could their apprehensions as to what other hunters, what other
disconcerting incident, might follow; for catholic France very
generally believed that the Huguenot leaders had a scheme for
possessing themselves of the person of the young king, known to be
mentally pliable.  Meanwhile they led him to their daintiest
apartment, with great silver flambeaux, that he might  wash off the
blood with which not his hands only were covered; for he hunted also
with the eagerness of a madman--steeped in blood.  He lay there for a
few hours, after supping very familiarly on his own birds, Gaston
rising from [15] his bed to look on at a distance, and, afterwards,
on his knee, serving the rose-water dish and spiced wine, as the
night passed in reassuring silence; Charles himself, as usual, keenly
enjoying this "gipsy" incident, with the supper after that unexpected
fashion, among strange people, he hardly knew where.  He was very
pale, like some cunning Italian work in wax or ivory, of partly
satiric character, endued by magic or crafty mechanism with vivacious
movement.  But as he sat thus, ever for the most part the unhappy
plaything of other people's humours, escaped for a moment out of a
world of demoniac politicians, the pensive atmosphere around seemed
gradually to change him, touching his wild temper, pleasantly,
profitably, so that he took down from the wall and struck out the
notes of a lute, and fell to talking of verses, leaving a stanza of
his own scratched with a diamond on the window-pane--lines simpler-
hearted, and more full of nature than were common at that day.

The life of Gaston de Latour was almost to coincide with the duration
of the Religious Wars.  The earliest public event of his memory was
that famous siege of Orleans from which the young Henri de Guise rode
away the head of his restless family, tormented now still further by
the reality or the pretence of filial duty, seeking vengeance on the
treacherous murder of his father.  Following a long period of quiet
progress--the tranquil and tolerant years of the [16] Renaissance--
the religious war took possession of, and pushed to strangely
confused issues, a society somewhat distraught by an artificial
aesthetic culture; and filled with wild passions, wildly-dramatic
personalities, a scene already singularly attractive by its artistic
beauty.  A heady religious fanaticism was worked by every prominent
egotist in turn, pondering on his chances, in the event of the
extinction of the house of Valois with the three sons of Catherine de
Medici, born unsound, and doomed by astrological prediction.  The old
manors, which had exchanged their towers for summer-houses under the
softening influence of Renaissance fashions, found themselves once
more medievally insecure amid a vagrant warfare of foreign
mercenaries and armed peasants.  It was a curiously refined people
who now took down the armour, hanging high on the wall for decoration
among newer things so little warlike.

A difficult age, certainly, for scrupulous spirits to move in!  A
perplexed network of partizan or personal interests underlay, and
furnished the really directing forces in, a supposed Armageddon of
contending religious convictions.  The wisest perhaps, like Michel de
L'Hopital, withdrew themselves from a conflict, in which not a single
actor has the air of quite pure intentions; while religion, itself
the assumed ground of quarrel, seems appreciable all the while only
by abstraction from the parties, the leaders, at once violent [17]
and cunning, who are most pretentious in the assertion of its rival
claims.  What there was of religion was in hiding, perhaps, with the
so-called "Political" party, professedly almost indifferent to it,
but which had at least something of humanity on its side, and some
chance of that placidity of mind in which alone the business of the
spirit can be done.  The new sect of "Papists" were not the true
catholics: there was little of the virtue of the martyr in militant
Calvinism.  It is not a catholic historian who notes with profound
regret "that inauspicious day," in the year 1562, Gaston's tenth
year, "when the work of devastation began, which was to strip from
France that antique garniture of religious art which later ages have
not been able to replace."  Axe and hammer at the carved work sounded
from one end of France to the other.

It was a peculiarity of this age of terror, that every one, including
Charles the Ninth himself, dreaded what the accident of war might
make, not merely of his enemies, but of temporary allies and
pretended friends, in an evenly balanced but very complex strife--of
merely personal rivals also, in some matter which had nothing to do
with the assumed motives of that strife.  Gaston de Latour passing on
his country way one night, with a sudden flash of fierce words two
young men burst from the doors of a road-side tavern.  The brothers
are quarrelling about [18] the division, lately effected there, of
their dead father's morsel of land.  "I shall hate you till death!"
cries the younger, bounding away in the darkness; and two atheists
part, to take opposite sides in the supposed strife of Catholic and
Huguenot.

The deeds of violence which occupy the foreground of French history
during the reigns of Catherine's sons might indeed lead one to fancy
that little human kindness could have remained in France,--a
fanatical civil war of forty years, that no place at all could have
been left for the quiet building of character.  Contempt for human
life, taught us every day by nature, and alas! by man himself:--all
war intensifies that.  But the more permanent forces, alike of human
nature and of the natural world, are on the whole in the interest of
tranquillity and sanity, and of the sentiments proper to man.  Like
all good catholic children, Gaston had shuddered at the name of
Adretz, of Briquemaut with his great necklace of priests' ears, of
that dark and fugitive Montgomeri, the slayer, as some would have it
the assassin, of a king, now active, and almost ubiquitous, on the
Huguenot side.  Still, at Deux-manoirs, this warfare, seething up
from time to time so wildly in this or that district of France, was
for the most part only sensible in incidents we might think
picturesque, were they told with that intention; delightful enough,
certainly, to the curiosity of a boy, in whose [19] mind nevertheless
they deepened a native impressibility to the sorrow and hazard that
are constant and necessary in human life, especially for the poor.
The troubles of "that poor people of France"--burden of all its
righteous rulers, from Saint Lewis downwards--these, at all events,
would not be lessened by the struggle of Guise and Conde and Bourbon
and Valois, of the Valois with each other, of those four brilliant
young princes of the name of Henry.  The weak would but suffer
somewhat more than was usual, in the interest of the strong.  If you
were not sure whether that gleaming of the sun in the vast distance
flashed from swords or sickles, whether that far-off curl of smoke
rose from stubble-fire or village-steeple, to protect which the
peasants, still lovers of their churches, would arm themselves, women
and all, with fork and scythe,--still, those peasants used their
scythes, in due season, for reaping their leagues of cornland, and
slept with faces as tranquil as ever towards the sky, for their
noonday rest.  In effect, since peace is always in some measure
dependent on one's own seeking, disturbing forces do but fray their
way along somewhat narrow paths over the great spaces of the quiet
realm of nature.  La Beauce, vast enough to present at once every
phase of weather, its one landmark the twin spires of Chartres,
salient as the finger of a dial, guiding, by their change of
perspective, victor or vanquished on his way, offered room enough
[20] for the business both of peace and war to those enamoured of
either.  When Gaston, after a brief absence, was unable to find his
child's garden-bed, that was only because in a fine June the corn had
grown tall so quickly, through which he was presently led to it, with
all its garish sweets undisturbed: and it was with the ancient
growths of mind--customs, beliefs, mental preferences--as with the
natural world.

It may be understood that there was a certain rudeness about the old
manor, left almost untouched from age to age, with a loyalty which
paid little or no heed to changes of fashion.  The Chateau d'Amour,
indeed, as the work of a later age, refined somewhat upon the rough
feudal architecture; and the daintier taste had centred itself in
particular upon one apartment, a veritable woman's apartment, with an
effect in some degree anticipating the achievement of Gaston's own
century, in which the apparatus of daily life became so eloquent of
the moods of those to whom it ministered.  It was the chamber of
Gabrielle de Latour, who had died of joy.  Here certainly she had
watched, at these windows, during ten whole years, for the return of
her beloved husband from a disastrous battle in the East, till
against all expectation she beheld him crossing the court at last.
Immense privilege!  Immense distinction!  Again and again Gaston
tried to master the paradox, at times, in deep concentration of mind,
seemed [21] almost to touch the point of that wonderful moment.

Hither, as to an oratory, a religious place, the finer spirits of her
kin had always found their way, to leave behind them there the more
intimate relics of themselves.  To Gaston its influence imparted
early a taste for delicate things as being indispensable in all his
pleasures to come; and, from the very first, with the appetite for
some great distinguishing passion, the peculiar genius of his age
seeming already awake spontaneously within him.  Here, at least, had
been one of those grand passions, such as were needed to give life
its true meaning and effect.  Conscious of that rudeness in his home,
and feeding a strong natural instinct for outward beauty hitherto on
what was barely sufficient, he found for himself in this perfumed
place the centre of a fanciful world, reaching out to who could tell
what refined passages of existence in that great world beyond, of
which the echoes seemed to light here amid the stillness.  On his
first visit one pensive afternoon, fitting the lately attained key in
the lock, he seemed to have drawn upon himself, yet hardly to have
disturbed, the meditations of its former occupant.  A century of
unhindered summers had taken the heat from its colours--the couches,
the curtains half shading the windows, which the rain in the south-
west wind just then touched so softly.  That great passion of old had
been also a dainty love, leaving [22] its impress everywhere in this
magic apartment, on the musical instruments, the books lying where
they might have fallen from the hands of the listless reader so long
since, the fragrance which the lad's movement stirred around him.
And there, on one of the windows, were the verses of King Charles,
who had slept here, as in the most courtly resting-place of the
house.  On certain nights Gaston himself was not afraid to steal from
his own bed to lie in it, though still too healthy a sleeper to be
visited by the appropriate dreams he so greatly longed for.

A nature, instinctively religious, which would readily discover and
give their full value to all such facts of experience as might be
conformable thereto!  But what would be the relation of this
religious sensibility to sensibilities of another kind, now awaking
in the young Gaston, as he mused in this dreamy place, surrounded by
the books, the furniture, almost the very presence of the past, which
had already found tongues to speak of a still living humanity--
somewhere, somewhere, in the world!--waiting for him in the distance,
or perchance already on its way, to explain, by its own plenary
beauty and power, why wine and roses and the languorous summer
afternoons were so delightful.  So far indeed, the imaginative heat,
that might one day enter into dangerous rivalry with simple old-
fashioned faith, was blent harmoniously with it.  They [23] were
hardly distinguishable elements of an amiable character, susceptible
generally to the poetic side of things--two neighbourly apprehensions
of a single ideal.

The great passions, the fervid sentiments, of which Gaston dreamed as
the true realisation of life, have not always softened men's natures:
they have been compatible with many cruelties, as in the lost spirits
of that very age.  They may overflow, on the other hand, in more
equable natures, through the concurrence of happier circumstance,
into that universal sympathy which lends a kind of amorous power to
the homeliest charities.  So it seemed likely to be with Gaston de
Latour.  Sorrow came along with beauty, a rival of its intricate
omnipresence in life.  In the sudden tremor of an aged voice, the
handling of a forgotten toy, a childish drawing, in the tacit
observance of a day, he became aware suddenly of the great stream of
human tears falling always through the shadows of the world.  For
once the darling of old age actually more than responded in full to
its tenderness.  In the isolation of his life there had been little
demand for sympathy on the part of those anywhere near his own age.
So much the larger was the fund of superfluous affection which went
forth, with a delicacy not less than their own, to meet the
sympathies of the aged people who cherished him.  In him, their old,
almost forgotten sorrows bled anew.

[24] Variety of affection, in a household in which many relations had
lived together, had brought variety of sorrow.  But they were well-
nigh healed now--those once so poignant griefs--the scars remaining
only as deeper lines of natural expression.  It was visible, to their
surprise, that he penetrated the motive of the mass said so solemnly,
in violet, on the Innocents' Day, and understood why they wept at the
triumphant antiphons:--"My soul is escaped as a bird out of the snare
of the fowler!"--thinking intently of the little tombs which had
recorded carefully almost the minutes of children's lives, Elizabeth
de Latour, Cornelius de Latour, aged so many years, days, hours.
Yes! the cold pavement under one's feet had once been molten lava.
Surely the resources of sorrow were large in things!  The fact must
be duly marked and provided for, with due estimate of his own
susceptibility thereto, in his scheme of life.  Might he pass through
the world, unriven by sorrows such as those!  And already it was as
if he stept softly over the earth, not to outrage its so abundant
latent sensibilities.

The beauty of the world and its sorrow, solaced a little by religious
faith, itself so beautiful a thing; these were the chief impressions
with which he made his way outwards, at first only in longer rambles,
as physical strength increased, over his native plains, whereon, as
we have seen, the cruel warfare of that age had [25] aggravated at a
thousand points the everyday appeal of suffering humanity.  The vast
level, stretching thirty miles from east to west, thirty from north
to south:--perhaps the reader may think little of its resources for
the seeker after natural beauty, or its capacity to develope the
imagination.  A world, he may fancy, in which there could be no
shadows, at best not too cheerful colours.  In truth, it was all
accent, so to speak.  But then, surely, all the finer influences of
every language depend mostly on accent; and he has but to think of it
as Gaston actually lived in it to find a singularly companionable
soul there.  Gaston, at least, needed but to go far enough across it
for those inward oppositions to cease, which already at times beset
him; to feel at one with himself again, under the influence of a
scene which had for him something of the character of the sea--its
changefulness, its infinity, its pathos in the toiling human life
that traversed it.  Featureless, if you will, it was always under the
guidance of its ample sky.  Scowling back sometimes moodily enough,
but almost never without a remnant of fine weather, about August it
was for the most part cloudless.  And then truly, under its blue
dome, the great plain would as it were "laugh and sing," in a kind of
absoluteness of sympathy with the sun.



II.  OUR LADY'S CHURCH

     "I had almost said even as they."

[26] Like a ship for ever a-sail in the distance, thought the child,
everywhere the great church of Chartres was visible, with the passing
light or shadow upon its grey, weather-beaten surfaces.  The people
of La Beauce were proud, and would talk often of its rich store of
sacred furniture, the wonder-working relics of "Our Lady under the
Earth," and her sacred veil or shift, which kings and princes came to
visit, returning with a likeness thereof, replete in miraculous
virtue, for their own wearing.  The busy fancy of Gaston, multiplying
this chance hearsay, had set the whole interior in array--a dim,
spacious, fragrant place, afloat with golden lights.  Lit up over the
autumn fields at evening, the distant spires suggested the splendour
within, with so strong an imaginative effect, that he seemed scarcely
to know whether it was through the mental or bodily eye that he
beheld.  When he came [27] thither at last, like many another well-
born youth, to join the episcopal household as a kind of half-
clerical page, he found (as happens in the actual testing of our
ideals) at once more and less than he had supposed; and his earlier
vision was a thing he could never precisely recover, or disentangle
from the supervening reality.  What he saw, certainly, was greater
far in mere physical proportion, and incommensurable at first by
anything he knew--the volume of the wrought detail, the mass of the
component members, the bigness of the actual stones of the masonry,
contrary to the usual Gothic manner, and as if in reminiscence of
those old Druidic piles amid which the Virgin of Chartres had been
adored, long before the birth of Christ, by a mystic race, possessed
of some prophetic sense of the grace in store for her.  Through
repeated dangers good-fortune has saved that unrivalled treasure of
stained glass; and then, as now, the word "awful," so often applied
to Gothic aisles, was for once really applicable.  You enter, looking
perhaps for a few minutes' cool shelter from the summer noonday; and
the placid sunshine of La Beauce seems to have been transformed in a
moment into imperious, angry fire.

It was not in summer, however, that Gaston first set foot there; he
saw the beautiful city for the first time as if sheathed austerely in
repellent armour.  In his most genial subsequent impressions of the
place there was always a lingering [28] trace of that famous frost
through which he made his way, wary of petrifying contact against
things without, to the great western portal, on Candlemas morning.
The sad, patient images by the doorways of the crowded church seemed
suffering now chiefly from the cold.  It was almost like a funeral--
the penitential violet, the wandering taper-light, of this half-
lenten feast of Purification.  His new companions, at the head and in
the rear of the long procession, forced every one, even the Lord
Bishop himself, to move apace, bustling along, cross-bearer and
acolyte, in their odd little copes, out of the bitter air, which made
the jolly life Gaston now entered on, around the great fire of their
hall in the episcopal palace, seem all the more winsome.

Notre-Dame de Chartres!  It was a world to explore, as if one
explored the entire Middle Age; it was also one unending, elaborate,
religious function--a life, or a continuous drama, to take one's part
in.  Dependent on its structural completeness, on its wealth of well-
preserved ornament, on its unity in variety, perhaps on some
undefinable operation of genius, beyond, but concurrently with, all
these, the church of Chartres has still the gift of a unique power of
impressing.  In comparison, the other famous churches of France, at
Amiens for instance, at Rheims or Beauvais, may seem but formal, and
to a large extent reproducible, effects of mere architectural rule on
a gigantic scale.  The [29] somewhat Gothic soul of Gaston relished
there something strange, or even bizarre, in the very manner in which
the building set itself, so broadly couchant, upon the earth; in the
natural richness of tone on the masonry within; in its vast echoing
roof of timber, the "forest," as it was called; in the mysterious
maze traced upon its pavement; its maze-like crypt, centering in the
shrine of the sibylline Notre-Dame, itself a natural or very
primitive grotto or cave.  A few years were still to pass ere
sacrilegious hands despoiled it on a religious pretext:--the catholic
church must pay, even with the molten gold of her sanctuaries, the
price of her defence in the civil war.  At present, it was such a
treasure-house of medieval jewellery as we have to make a very
systematic effort even to imagine.  The still extant register of its
furniture and sacred apparel leaves the soul of the ecclesiologist
athirst.

And it had another very remarkable difference from almost all Gothic
churches: there were no graves there.  Its emptiness in this respect
is due to no revolutionary or Huguenot desecration.  Once indeed,
about this very time, a popular military leader had been interred
with honour, within the precinct of the high altar itself.  But not
long afterwards, said the reverend canons, resenting on the part of
their immaculate patroness this intrusion, the corpse itself, ill at
ease, had protested, lifting up its hands above [30] the surface of
the pavement, as if to beg interment elsewhere; and Gaston could
remember assisting, awakened suddenly one night, at the removal of
the remains to a more ordinary place of sepulture.

And yet that lavish display of jewellers' work on the altars, in the
chapels, the sacristies, of Our Lady's Church, was but a framing for
little else than dead people's bones.  To Gaston, a piteous soul,
with a touch also of that grim humour which, as we know, holds of
pity, relic-worship came naturally.  At Deux-manoirs too there had
been relics, including certain broken children's toys and some rude
childish drawings, taken forth now and then with almost religious
veneration, with trembling hands and renewal of old grief, to his
wondering awe at the greatness of men's sorrows.  Yes! the pavement
under one's feet had once been, might become again for him, molten
lava.  The look, the manner, of those who exposed these things, had
been a revelation.  The abundant relics of the church of Chartres
were for the most part perished remnants of the poor human body
itself; but, appertaining to persons long ago and of a far-off,
immeasurable kind of sanctity, stimulated a more indifferent sort of
curiosity, and seemed to bring the distant, the impossible, as with
tangible evidence of fact, close to one's side.  It was in one's
hand--the finger of an Evangelist!  The crowned head of Saint Lubin,
bishop of Chartres [31] long centuries since, but still able to
preserve its wheat-stacks from fire; bones of the "Maries," with some
of the earth from their grave; these, and the like of these, was what
the curious eye discerned in the recesses of those variously
contrived reliquaries, great and small, glittering so profusely about
the dusky church, itself ministering, by its very shadows, to a
certain appetite in the soul of Gaston for dimness--for a dim place
like this--such as he had often prefigured to himself, albeit with
some suspicion of what might seem a preference for darkness.
Physical twilight we most of us love, in its season.  To him, that
perpetual twilight came in close identity with its moral or
intellectual counterpart, as the welcome requisite for that part of
the soul which loves twilight, and is, in truth, never quite at rest
out of it, through some congenital uneasiness or distress, perhaps,
in its processes of vision.

As complex, yet not less perfectly united under a single leading
motive,--its sister volume, was the ritual order of Notre-Dame de
Chartres, a year-long dramatic action, in which every one had, and
knew, his part--the drama or "mystery" of Redemption, to the
necessities of which the great church had shaped itself.  All those
various "offices" which, in Pontifical, Missal and Breviary, devout
imagination had elaborated from age to age with such a range of
spiritual colour and light and shade, with so much poetic tact in
quotation, such a depth of insight into [32] the Christian soul, had
joined themselves harmoniously together, one office ending only where
another began, in the perpetual worship of this mother of churches,
which had also its own picturesque peculiarities of "use," proud of
its maternal privilege therein.  And the music rose--warmed,
expanded, or fell silent altogether--as the order of the year, the
colours, the whole expression of things changed, gathering around the
full mystic effulgence of the pontiff in his own person, while the
sacred theme deepened at the great ecclesiastical seasons, when the
aisles overflowed with a vast multitude, and like a court, combed,
starched, rustling around him, Gaston and his fellows "served"
Monseigneur--they, zealous, ubiquitous, more prominent than ever,
though for the most part profoundly irreverent, and, notwithstanding
that, one and all, with what disdain of the untonsured laity!

Well! what was of the past there--the actual stones of the temple and
that sacred liturgical order--entered readily enough into Gaston's
mental kingdom, filling places prepared by the anticipations of his
tranquil, dream-struck youth.  It was the present, the uncalculated
present, which now disturbed the complacent habit of his thoughts,
proposing itself, importunately, in the living forms of his immediate
companions, in the great clerical body of which he was become a part,
in the people of Chartres itself (none the less animated because
provincial) as [33] a thing, alien at a thousand points from his
preconceptions of life, to be judged by him, to be rejected or
located within.  How vivid, how delightful, they were!--the other
forty-nine of the fifty lads who had come hither, after the old-
fashioned way, to serve in the household of Monseigneur by way of an
"institution" in learning and good manners, as to which a grave
national assembly, more than three centuries before the States-
General of 1789, had judged French youth of quality somewhat
behindhand, recommending king and nobles to take better care for the
future of their education, "to the end that, enlightened and
moralised, they might know their duties, and be less likely to abuse
their privileges."

And how becomingly that cleric pride, that self-respecting quiet, sat
upon their high-bred figures, their angelic, unspoiled faces,
saddened transiently as they came under the religious spell for a
moment.  As for Gaston, they welcomed him with perfect friendliness,
kept their best side foremost for an hour, and would not leave his
very dreams.  In absolute unconsciousness, they had brought from
their remote old homes all varieties of hereditary gifts, vices,
distinctions, dark fates, mercy, cruelty, madness.  Appetite and
vanity abounded, but with an abundant superficial grace, befitting a
generation which, as by some aesthetic sense in the air, made the
most of the pleasant outsides of life.  All the [34] various traits
of the dying Middle Age were still in evidence among them, in all
their crude effectiveness; only, blent, like rusty old armour
wreathed in flowers, with the peculiar fopperies of the time,
shrewdly divined from a distance, as happens with competent youth.
To be in Paris itself, amid the full, delightful, fragrance of those
dainty visible things which Huguenots despised:--that, surely, were
the sum of good-fortune!  Half-clerical, they loved nevertheless the
touch of steel; had a laughing joy in trifling with its latent soul
of destruction.  In mimicry of the great world, they had their
leaders, so inscrutably self-imposed:--instinctively, they felt and
underwent that mystery of leadership, with its consequent heats of
spirit, its tides and changes of influence.

On the other hand also, to Gaston, dreamily observant, it was quaint,
likeable, the way they had of reproducing, unsuspectingly, the
humours of animal nature.  Does not the anthropologist tell us of a
heraldry, with a large assortment of heraldic beasts, to be found
among savage or half-savage peoples, as the "survival" of a period
when men were nearer than they are or seem to be now, to the
irrational world?  Throughout the sprightly movement of the lads'
daily life it was as if their "tribal" pets or monsters were with or
within them.  Tall Exmes, lithe and cruel like a tiger--it was
pleasant to stroke him.  The tiger was there, the parrot, the hare,
the goat of course, and certainly much apishness.  [35] And, one and
all, they were like the creatures, in their vagrant, short, memories,
alert perpetually on the topmost crest of the day and hour,
transferred so heartlessly, so entirely, from yesterday to to-day.
Yet out of them, sure of some response, human heart did break:--in
and around Camille Pontdormi, for instance, brilliant and ambitious,
yet so sensitive about his threadbare home, concerning which however
he had made the whole company, one by one, his confidants--so loyal
to the people there, bursting into wild tears over the letter which
brought the news of his younger brother's death, visibly fretting
over it long afterwards.  Still, for the most part, in their perfect
health, nothing seemed to reach them but their own boyish ordinances,
their own arbitrary "form."  It was an absolute indifference; most
striking when they lifted their well-trained voices to sing in choir,
vacant as the sparrows, while the eloquent, far-reaching, aspiring
words floated melodiously from them, sometimes, with truly medieval
license, singing to the sacred music those songs from the streets (no
one cared to detect) which were really in their hearts.  A world of
vanity and appetite, yet after all of honesty with itself!  Like
grown people, they were but playing a game, and meant to observe its
rules.  Say, rather, a world of honesty, and of courage!  They, at
least, were not preoccupied all day long, and, if they woke in the
night, with the fear of death.

[36] It was part of their precocious worldliness to recognise, to
feel a little afraid of their new companion's intellectual power.
Those obviously meditative souls, which seem "not to sleep o'
nights," seldom fail to put others on their guard.  Who can tell what
they may be judging, planning in silence, so near to one?  Looking
back long afterwards across the dark period that had intervened,
Gaston could trace their ways through the world.  Not many of them
had survived to his own middle life.  Reappearing, from point to
point, they connected themselves with the great crimes, the great
tragedies of the time, as so many bright-coloured threads in that
sombre tapestry of human passion.  To recall in the obtuse, grieved,
marred faces of uninteresting men or women, the disappointments, the
sorrows, the tragic mistakes of the children they were long ago; that
is a good trick for taking our own sympathy by surprise, which Gaston
practised when he saw the last, or almost the last, of some of them,
and felt a great pity, a great indulgence.

Here and now, at all events, carrying their cheerful tumult through
all those quiet ecclesiastical places--the bishop's garden, the great
sacristy, neat and clean in its brown, pensive lights, they seemed of
a piece with the bright, simple, inanimate things, the toys, of
nature.  They made one lively picture with the fruit and wine they
loved, the birds they captured, the buckets of clear water drawn for
pastime from [37] the great well, and Jean Semur's painted conjuring
book stolen from the old sorceress, his grandmother, out of which he
told their fortunes; with the musical instruments of others; with
their carefully hidden dice and playing-cards, worn or soiled by the
fingers of the older gamesters who had discarded them.  Like their
elders, they read eagerly, in racy, new translations, old Greek and
Latin books, with a delightful shudder at the wanton paganism.  It
was a new element of confusion in the presentment of that miniature
world.  The classical enthusiasm laid hold on Gaston too, but essayed
in vain to thrust out of him the medieval character of his
experience, or put on quite a new face, insinuating itself rather
under cover of the Middle Age, still in occupation all around him.
Venus, Mars, Aeneas, haunted, in contemporary shape, like ghosts of
folk one had known, the places with which he was familiar.  Latin
might still seem the fittest language for oratory, sixteen hundred
years after Cicero was dead; those old Roman pontiffs, draped
grandly, sat in the stalls of the choir; Propertius made love to
Cynthia in the raiment of the foppish Amadee; they played Terence,
and it was but a play within a play.  Above all, in natural,
heartfelt kinship with their own violent though refined and cunning
time, they loved every incident of soldiering; while the changes of
the year, the lights, the shadows, the flickering fires of winter,
with [38] which Gaston had first associated his companions, so full
of artificial enjoyment for the well-to-do, added themselves
pleasantly, by way of shifting background, to the spectacular effect.

It was the brilliant surface with which the untried world confronted
him.  Touch it where you might, you felt the resistant force of the
solid matter of human experience--of human experience, in its strange
mixture of beauty and evil, its sorrow, its ill-assorted fates, its
pathetic acquiescence; above all, in its overpowering certainty, over
against his own world of echoes and shadows, which perhaps only
seemed to be so much as echoes or shadows.  A nature with the
capacity of worship, he was straightway challenged, as by a rival new
religion claiming to supersede the religion he knew, to identify
himself conclusively with this so tangible world, its suppositions,
its issues, its risks.  Here was a world, certainly, which did not
halt in meditation, but prompted one to make actual trial of it, with
a liberty of heart which might likely enough traverse this or that
precept (if it were not rather a mere scruple) of his earlier
conscience.  These its children, at all events, were, as he felt, in
instinctive sympathy with its motions; had shrewd divinations of the
things men really valued, and waited on them with unquestioning
docility.  Two worlds, two antagonistic ideals, were in evidence
before him.  Could a third condition supervene, to mend their
discord, or [39] only vex him perhaps, from time to time, with
efforts towards an impossible adjustment?

At a later date, Monseigneur Charles Guillard, then Bishop of
Chartres, became something like a Huguenot, and ceased, with the
concurrence of ecclesiastical authority, from his high functions.
Even now he was but a protege of King Charles in his relations to a
more than suspicious Pope; and a rumour of the fact, reaching somehow
these brisk young ears, had already set Gaston's mind in action,
tremblingly, as to those small degrees, scarcely realisable perhaps
one by one, though so immeasurable in their joint result, by which
one might part from the "living vine"; and at times he started back,
as if he saw his own benighted footsteps pacing lightly towards an
awful precipice.  At present, indeed, the assumption that there was
sanctity in everything the kindly prelate touched, was part of the
well-maintained etiquette of the little ecclesiastical court.  But,
as you meet in the street faces that are like a sacrament, so there
are faces, looks, tones of voice, among dignified priests as among
other people, to hear or look upon which is to feel the hypothesis of
an unseen world impossible.  As he smiled amiably out of the midst of
his pontifical array on Gaston's scrupulous devotion, it was as if
the old Roman augur smiled not only to his fellow augur but to the
entire assistant world.  In after years Gaston seemed to understand,
and, as a consequence of [40] understanding, to judge his old patron
equitably: the religious sense too, had its various species.  The
nephew of his predecessor in the see, with a real sense of the divine
world but as something immeasurably distant, Monseigneur Guillard had
been brought by maladroit worldly good-fortune a little too close to
its immediate and visible embodiments.  From afar, you might trace
the divine agency on its way.  But to touch, to handle it, with these
fleshly hands:--well! for Monseigneur, that was by no means to
believe because the thing was "incredible, or absurd."  He had
smiled, not certainly from irreverence, nor (a prelate for half his
life) in conscious incredulity, but only in mute surprise, at an
administration of divine graces--this administration in which he was
a high priest--in itself, to his quite honest thinking, so unfitting,
so improbable.  And was it that Gaston too was a less independent
ruler of his own mental world than he had fancied, that he derived
his impressions of things not directly from them, but mediately from
other people's impressions about them, and he needed the pledge of
their assents to ratify his own?  Only, could that, after all, be a
real sun, at which other people's faces were not irradiated?  And
sometimes it seemed, with a riotous swelling of the heart, as if his
own wondrous appetite in these matters had been deadened by surfeit,
and there would be a pleasant sense of liberty, of escape out-of-
doors, [41] could he be as little touched as almost all other people
by Our Lady's Church, and old associations, and all those relics, and
those dark, close, fragrant aisles.

At such times, to recall the winged visitant, gentle, yet withal
sensitive to offence, which had settled on his youth with so deep a
sense of assurance, he would climb the tower of Jean de Beauce, then
fresh in all its array of airy staircase and pierced traceries, and
great uncovered timbers, like some gigantic birdnest amid the stones,
whence the large, quiet, country spaces became his own again, and the
curious eye, at least, went home.  He was become well aware of the
power of those familiar influences in restoring equanimity, as he
might have used a medicine or a wine.  At each ascending storey, as
the flight of the birds, the scent of the fields, swept past him,
till he stood at last amid the unimpeded light and air of the watch-
chamber above the great bells, some coil of perplexity, of
unassimilable thought or fact, fell away from him.  He saw the
distant paths, and seemed to hear the breeze piping suddenly upon
them under the cloudless sky, on its unseen, capricious way through
those vast reaches of atmosphere.  At this height, the low ring of
blue hills was visible, with suggestions of that south-west country
of peach-blossom and wine which had sometimes decoyed his thoughts
towards the sea, and beyond it to "that new world of the Indies,"
[42] which was held to explain a certain softness in the air from
that quarter, even in the most vehement weather.  Amid those vagrant
shadows and shafts of light must be Deux-manoirs, the deserted rooms,
the gardens, the graves.  In mid-distance, even then a funeral
procession was on its way humbly to one of the village churchyards.
He seemed almost to hear the words across the stillness.

They identified themselves, as with his own earliest prepossessions,
so also with what was apt to present itself as being the common human
prepossession--a certain finally authoritative common sense upon the
quiet experience of things--the oldest, the most authentic, of all
voices, audible always, if one stepped aside for a moment and got
one's ears into what might after all be their normal condition.  It
might be heard, it would seem, in proportion as men were in touch
with the Earth itself, in country life, in manual work upon it, above
all by the open grave, as if, reminiscent of some older, deeper, more
permanent ground of fact, it whispered then oracularly a certain
secret to those who came into such close contact with it.  Persistent
after-thought!  Would it always survive, amid the indifference of
others, amid the verdicts of the world, amid a thousand doubts?  It
seemed to have found, and filled to overflowing, the soul of one
amiable little child who had a kind of genius for tranquillity, and
on his first coming hither had led Gaston to what he held to be the
[43] choicest, pleasantest places, as being impregnable by noise.  In
his small stock of knowledge, he knew, like all around him, that he
was going to die, and took kindly to the thought of a small grave in
the little green close, as to a natural sleeping-place, in which he
would be at home beforehand.  Descending from the tower, Gaston knew
he should find the child seated alone, enjoying the perfect quiet of
the warm afternoon, for all the world was absent--gone forth to
receive or gaze at a company of distinguished pilgrims.

Coming, sometimes with immense prelude and preparation, as when King
Charles himself arrived to replace an image disfigured by profane
Huguenots, sometimes with the secrecy and suddenness of an apparition
vanished before the public was aware, the pilgrims to "Our Lady under
the Earth" were the standing resource of those (such there were at
Chartres as everywhere else) who must needs depend for the interest
of their existence on the doings of their neighbours.  A motley host,
only needing their Chaucer to figure as a looking-glass of life, type
against type, they brought with them, on the one hand, the very
presence and perfume of Paris, the centre of courtly propriety and
fashion; on the other hand, with faces which seemed to belong to
another age, curiosities of existence from remote provinces of
France, or Europe, from distant, half-fabulous lands, remoter still.
Jules Damville, who would have liked best to be a sailor, [44] to
command, not in any spiritual ark, but in the French fleet--should
half-ruined France ever come to have one--led his companions one
evening to inspect a strange maritime personage, stout and square,
returned, contrary to all expectation, after ten years' captivity
among the savages of Florida, kneeling among the lights at the
shrine, with the frankness of a good child, his hair like a mat, his
hands tattooed, his mahogany face seamed with a thousand weather-
wrinklings, his outlandish offerings lying displayed around him.

Looking, listening, as they served them in the episcopal guest-
chamber, those young clerks made wonderful leaps, from time to time,
in manly knowledge.  With what eager shrewdness they noted,
discussed, reproduced, the manners and attire of their pilgrim
guests, sporting what was to their liking therein in the streets of
Chartres.  The more cynical or supercilious pilgrim would sometimes
present himself--a personage oftenest of high ecclesiastical station,
like the eminent translator of Plutarch, Amyot, afterwards Bishop of
Auxerre, who seemed to care little for shrine or relic, but lingered
long over certain dim manuscripts in the canonical library, where our
scholarly Gaston was of service, helping him directly to what he
desired to see.  And one morning early, visible at a distance to all
the world, risen betimes to gaze, the Queen-mother and her three sons
were [45] kneeling there--yearning, greedy, as ever, for a hundred
diverse, perhaps incompatible, things.  It was at the beginning of
that winter of the great siege of Chartres, the morning on which the
child Guy Debreschescourt died in his sleep.  His tiny body--the
placid, massive, baby head still one broad smile, the rest of him
wrapped round together like a chrysalis--was put to rest finally, in
a fold of the winding-sheet of a very aged person, deceased at the
same hour.

For a hard winter, like that famous winter of 1567, the hardest that
had been known for fifty years, makes an end of the weak--the aged,
the very young.  To the robust, how pleasant had the preparation for
it seemed--the scent of the first wood-fire upon the keen October
air; the earth turning from grey to black under the plough; the great
stacks of fuel, come down lazily from the woods of Le Perche, along
the winding Eure; its wholesome perfume; the long, soothing nights,
and early twilight.  The mind of Gaston, for one, was touched by the
sense of some remote and delicate beauty in these things, like
magicians' work, like an effect of magic as being extorted from
unsuspected sources.

What winter really brought however, was the danger and vexation of a
great siege.  The householders of catholic Chartres had watched the
forces of their Huguenot enemies gathering from this side and that;
and at last the dreaded circle was complete.  They were prisoners
like [46] the rest, Gaston and the grandparents, shut up in their
little hotel; and Gaston, face to face with it, understood at last
what war really means.  After all, it took them by surprise.  It was
early in the day.  A crowd of worshippers filled the church of
Sainte-Foy, built partly upon the ramparts; and at the conclusion of
the mass, the Sacrament was to be carried to a sick person.  Touched
by unusual devotion at this perilous time, the whole assembly rose to
escort the procession on its way, passing out slowly, group after
group, as if by mechanical instinct, the more reluctant led on by the
general consent.  Gaston, the last lingerer, halting to let others
proceed quietly before him, turned himself about to gaze upon the
deserted church, half tempted to remain, ere he too stepped forth
lightly and leisurely, when under a shower of massy stones from the
coulevrines or great cannon of the besiegers, the entire roof of the
place sank into the empty space behind him.  But it was otherwise in
a neighbouring church, crushed, in a similar way, with all its good
people, not long afterwards.

And in the midst of the siege, with all its tumult about her, the old
grandmother died, to the undissembled sorrow of Gaston, bereft,
unexpectedly as it seemed, of the gentle creature, to whom he had
always turned for an affection, that had been as no other in its
absolute incapacity of offence.  A tear upon the cheek, like [47] the
bark of a tree, testified to some unfulfilled hope, something wished
for but not to be, which left resignation, by nature or grace, still
imperfect, and made death at fourscore years and ten seem, after all,
like a premature summons in the midst of one's days.  For a few
hours, the peace which followed brought back to the face a protesting
gleam of youth, far antecedent to anything Gaston could possibly have
remembered there, moving him to a pity, a peculiar sense of pleading
helplessness, which to the end of his life was apt to revive at the
sight (it might be in an animal) of what must perforce remember that
it had been young but was old.

That broken link with life seemed to end some other things for him.
As one puts away the toys of childhood, so now he seemed to discard
what had been the central influence of his earlier youth, what more
than anything else had stirred imagination and brought the
consciousness of his own life warm and full.  Gazing now upon the
"holy and beautiful place," as he had gazed on the dead face, for a
moment he seemed to anticipate the indifference of age.  And when not
long after the rude hands of catholics themselves, at their wits' end
for the maintenance of the "religious war," spoiled it of the
accumulated treasure of centuries, leaving Notre-Dame de Chartres in
the bareness with which we see it to-day, he had no keen sense of
personal loss.



III.  MODERNITY

[48] The besieging armies disappeared like the snow, leaving city and
suburb in all the hardened soilure of war and winter, which only the
torrents of spring would carry away.  And the spring came suddenly:
it was pleasant, after that long confinement, to walk afar securely
through its early fervours.  Gaston too went forth on his way home,
not alone.  Three chosen companions went with him, pledged to the old
manor for months to come; its lonely ancient master welcoming readily
the tread of youth about him.

"The Triumvirate":--so their comrades had been pleased to call the
three; that term (delightful touch of classic colour on one's own
trite but withal pedantic age) being then familiar, as the
designation of three conspicuous agents on the political scene of the
generation just departing.  Only, these young Latinists went back for
the associations of the word to its Roman original, to the three
gallants of the distant time, rather than to those native French [49]
heroes--Montmorenci, Saint-Andre, Guise--too close to them to seem
really heroic.  Mark Antony, knight of Venus, of Cleopatra; shifty
Lepidus; bloody, yellow-haired Augustus, so worldly and so fine; you
might find their mimic semblance, more easily than any suggestion of
that threadbare triad of French adventurers, in the unfolding manhood
of Jasmin, Amadee, and Camille.

They had detached themselves by an irresistible natural effectiveness
from the surface of that youthful scholastic world around the
episcopal throne of Chartres, carrying its various aptitudes as if to
a perfect triple flower; restless Amadee de l'Autrec, who was to be a
soldier, dazzled early into dangerous, rebellious paths by the iron
ideal of the soldiers of "the religion," and even now fitting his
blond prettiness to airs of Huguenot austerity; Camille Pontdormi,
who meant to be a lawyer in an age in which certain legists had
asserted an audacity of genius after a manner very captivating to
youth with any appetite for predominance over its fellows--already
winsomely starched a little, amid his courtly finery, of garb, and
manner, and phrase; Jasmin de Villebon, who hardly knew what he meant
to be, except perhaps a poet--himself, certainly, a poem for any
competent reader.  Vain,--yes! a little; and mad, said his
companions, of course, with his clinging, exigent, lover's ways.  It
was he who had led the others on this visit to Gaston de Latour.
Threads to [50] be cut short, one by one, before his eyes, the three
would cross and recross, gaily, pathetically, in the tapestry of
Gaston's years; and, divided far asunder afterwards, seemed at this
moment, moving there before him in the confidential talk he could not
always share, inseparably linked together, like some complicated
pictorial arabesque, under the common light, of their youth, and of
the morning, and of their sympathetic understanding of the visible
world.

So they made their way, under the rows of miraculous white thorn-
blossom, and through the green billows, at peace just then, though
the war still blazed or smouldered along the southern banks of the
Loire and far beyond, and it was with a delightful sense of peril, of
prowess attested in the facing of it, that they passed from time to
time half-ruined or deserted farm-buildings where the remnants of the
armies might yet be lingering.  It was Jasmin, poetic Jasmin, who, in
giving Gaston the book he now carried ever ready to hand, had done
him perhaps the best of services, for it had proved the key to a new
world of seemingly boundless intellectual resources, and yet with a
special closeness to visible or sensuous things;--the scent and
colour of the field-flowers, the amorous business of the birds, the
flush and re-fledging of the black earth itself in that fervent
springtide, which was therefore unique in Gaston's memory.  It was
his intellectual springtide; as people look back to [51] a physical
spring, which for once in ten or fifteen years, for once in a
lifetime, was all that spring could be.

The book was none other than Pierre de Ronsard's "Odes," with
"Mignonne!  allons voir si la Rose," and "The Skylark" and the lines
to April--itself verily like nothing so much as a jonquil, in its
golden-green binding and yellow edges and perfume of the place where
it had lain--sweet, but with something of the sickliness of all
spring flowers since the days of Proserpine.  Just eighteen years
old, and the work of the poet's own youth, it took possession of
Gaston with the ready intimacy of one's equal in age, fresh at every
point; and he experienced what it is the function of contemporary
poetry to effect anew for sensitive youth in each succeeding
generation.  The truant and irregular poetry of his own nature, all
in solution there, found an external and authorised mouthpiece,
ranging itself rightfully, as the latest achievement of human soul in
this matter, along with the consecrated poetic voices of the past.

Poetry!  Hitherto it had seemed hopelessly chained to the bookshelf,
like something in a dead language, "dead, and shut up in reliquaries
of books," or like those relics "one may only see through a little
pane of glass," as one of its recent "liberators" had said.  Sure,
apparently, of its own "niche in the temple of Fame," the recognised
poetry of literature had had the [52] pretension to defy or
discredit, as depraved and irredeemably vulgar, the poetic motions in
the living genius of to-day.  Yet the genius of to-day, extant and
forcible, the wakeful soul of present time consciously in possession,
would assert its poetic along with all its other rights; and in
regard to the curiosity, the intellectual interest, of Gaston, for
instance, it had of course the advantage of being close at hand, with
the effectiveness of a personal presence.  Studious youth, indeed, on
its mettle about "scholarship," though actually of listless humour
among books that certainly stirred the past, makes a docile act of
faith regarding the witchery, the thaumaturgic powers, of Virgil, or
may we say of Shakespeare?  Yet how faint and dim, after all, the
sorrows of Dido, of Juliet, the travail of Aeneas, beside quite
recent things felt or done--stories which, floating to us on the
light current of to-day's conversation, leave the soul in a flutter!
At best, poetry of the past could move one with no more directness
than the beautiful faces of antiquity which are not here for us to
see and unaffectedly love them.  Gaston's demand (his youth only
conforming to pattern therein) was for a poetry, as veritable, as
intimately near, as corporeal, as the new faces of the hour, the
flowers of the actual season.  The poetry of mere literature, like
the dead body, could not bleed, while there was a heart, a poetic
heart, in the living world, which beat, bled, spoke with irresistible
power.  Elderly [53] people, Virgil in hand, might assert
professionally that the contemporary age, an age, of course, of
little people and things, deteriorate since the days of their own
youth, must necessarily be unfit for poetic uses.  But then youth,
too, had its perpetual part to play, protesting that, after all said,
the sun in the air, and in its own veins, was still found to be hot,
still begetting, upon both alike, flowers and fruit; nay! visibly new
flowers, and fruit richer than ever.  Privately, in fact, Gaston had
conceived of a poetry more thaumaturgic than could be anything of
earlier standing than himself.  The age renews itself; and in
immediate derivation from it a novel poetry also grows superb and
large, to fill a certain mental situation made ready in advance.
Yes! the acknowledged, and, so to call it, legitimate, poetry of
literature was but a thing he might sip at, like some sophisticated
rarity in the way of wine, for example, pleasing the acquired taste.
It was another sort of poetry, unexpressed, perhaps inexpressible,
certainly not hitherto made known in books, that must drink up and
absorb him, like the joyful air--him, and the earth, with its deeds,
its blossoms, and faces.

In such condition of mind, how deeply, delightfully, must the poetry
of Ronsard and his fellows have moved him, when he became aware, as
from age to age inquisitive youth by good luck does become aware, of
the literature of his own day, confirming--more than confirming--
[54] anticipation!  Here was a poetry which boldly assumed the dress,
the words, the habits, the very trick, of contemporary life, and
turned them into gold.  It took possession of the lily in one's hand,
and projecting it into a visionary distance, shed upon the body of
the flower the soul of its beauty.  Things were become at once more
deeply sensuous and more deeply ideal.  As at the touch of a wizard,
something more came into the rose than its own natural blush.
Occupied so closely with the visible, this new poetry had so profound
an intuition of what can only be felt, and maintained that mood in
speaking of such objects as wine, fruit, the plume in the cap, the
ring on the finger.  And still that was no dubious or generalised
form it gave to flower or bird, but the exact pressure of the Jay at
the window; you could count the petals,--of the exact natural number;
no expression could be too faithful to the precise texture of things;
words, too, must embroider, be twisted and spun, like silk or golden
hair.  Here were real people, in their real, delightful attire, and
you understood how they moved; the visible was more visible than ever
before, just because soul had come to its surface.  The juice in the
flowers, when Ronsard named them, was like wine or blood.  It was
such a coloured thing; though the grey things also, the cool things,
all the fresher for the contrast--with a freshness, again, that
seemed to touch and cool the soul--found their account [55] there;
the clangorous passage of the birds at night foretokening rain, the
moan of the wind at the door, the wind's self made visible over the
yielding corn.

It was thus Gaston understood the poetry of Ronsard, generously
expanding it to the full measure of its intention.  That poetry, too,
lost its thaumaturgic power in turn, and became mere literature in
exchange for life, partly in the natural revolution of poetic taste,
partly for its faults.  Faults and all, however, Gaston loyally
accepted it; those faults--the lapse of grace into affectation, of
learning into pedantry, of exotic fineness into a trick--counting
with him as but the proof of faith to its own dominant positions.
They were but characteristics, needing no apology with the initiated,
or welcome even, as savouring of the master's peculiarities of
perfection.  He listened, he looked round freely, but always now with
the ear, the eye, of his favourite poet.  It had been a lesson, a
doctrine, the communication of an art,--the art of placing the
pleasantly aesthetic, the welcome, elements of life at an advantage,
in one's view of it, till they seemed to occupy the entire surface;
and he was sincerely grateful for an undeniable good service.

And yet the gifted poet seemed but to have spoken what was already in
Gaston's own mind, what he had longed to say, had been just going to
say; so near it came, that it had the charm [56] of a discovery of
one's own.  That was an illusion, perhaps; it was because the poet
told one so much about himself, making so free a display of what
though personal was very contagious; of his love-secrets especially,
how love and nothing else filled his mind.  He was in truth but
"love's secretary," noting from hour to hour its minutely changing
fortunes.  Yes! that was the reason why visible, audible, sensible
things glowed so brightly, why there was such luxury in sounds,
words, rhythms, of the new light come on the world, of that wonderful
freshness.  With a masterly appliance of what was near and familiar,
or again in the way of bold innovation, he found new words for
perennially new things, and the novel accent awakened long-slumbering
associations.  Never before had words, single words, meant so much.
What expansion, what liberty of heart, in speech: how associable to
music, to singing, the written lines!  He sang of the lark, and it
was the lark's voluble self.  The physical beauty of humanity lent
itself to every object, animate or inanimate, to the very hours and
lapses and changes of time itself.  An almost burdensome fulness of
expression haunted the gestures, the very dress, the personal
ornaments, of the people on the highway.  Even Jacques Bonhomme at
his labour, or idling for an hour, borrowed from his love, homely as
it was, a touch of dignity or grace, and some secret of utterance,
which made [57] one think of Italy or Greece.  The voice of the
shepherd calling, the chatter of the shepherdess turning her spindle,
seemed to answer, or wait for answer,--to be fragments of love's
ideal and eternal communing.

It was the power of "modernity," as renewed in every successive age
for genial youth, protesting, defiant of all sanction in these
matters, that the true "classic" must be of the present, the force
and patience of present time.  He had felt after the thing, and here
it was,--the one irresistible poetry there had ever been, with the
magic word spoken in due time, transforming his own age and the world
about him, presenting its everyday touch, the very trick one knew it
by, as an additional grace, asserting the latent poetic rights of the
transitory, the fugitive, the contingent.  Poetry need no longer mask
itself in the habit of a bygone day: Gaston could but pity the people
of bygone days for not being above-ground to read.  Here, was a
discovery, a new faculty, a privileged apprehension, to be conveyed
in turn to one and to another, to be propagated for the imaginative
regeneration of the world.  It was a manner, a habit of thought,
which would invade ordinary life, and mould that to its intention.
In truth, all the world was already aware, and delighted.  The
"school" was soon to pay the penalty of that immediate acceptance,
that intimate fitness to the mind of its own time, by sudden [58] and
profound neglect, as a thing preternaturally tarnished and tame, like
magic youth, or magic beauty, turned in a moment by magic's own last
word into withered age.  But then, to the liveliest spirits of that
time it had seemed nothing less than "impeccable," after the manner
of the great sacred products of the past, though in a living tongue.
Nay! to Gaston for one, the power of the old classic poetry itself
was explained by the reflex action of the new, and might seem to
justify its pretensions at last.

From the poem fancy wandered to the poet, and curious youth would
fain see the writer in person,--what a poet was like, with anxious
surmises, this way and that, as to the degree in which the precious
mental particles might be expected to have wrought up the outward
presence to their own high quality.  A creature of the eye, in this
case at least, the intellectual hold on him being what it was, Gaston
had no fear of disillusion.  His poetic readings had borrowed an
additional relish from the genial, companionable, manner of his life
at this time, taking him into the remotest corners of the vast level
land, and its outer ring of blue up-lands; amid which, as he rode one
day with "the three," towards perfectly new prospects, he had chanced
on some tangible rumour of the great poet's present abode.  The hill
they had mounted at leisure, in talk with a village priest, dropped
suddenly upon a vague tract of wood and pasture, [59] with a dark
ridge beyond towards the south-west; and the black notch, which broke
its outline against the mellow space of evening light, was the
steeple of the priory of Croix-val, of which reverend body Pierre de
Ronsard, although a layman, was, by special favour of King Charles,
Superior.

Though a formal peace was come, though the primary movers of war had
taken hands or kissed each other, and were exchanging suspicious
courtesies, yet the unquiet temper of war was still abroad
everywhere, with an after-crop of miserable incidents.  The
captainless national and mercenary soldiers were become in large
number thieves or beggars, and the peasant's hand sank back to the
tame labour of the plough reluctantly.  Relieved a little by the
sentimental humour of the hour, lending, as Ronsard prompted, a
poetic and always amorous interest to everything around him, poor
Gaston's very human soul was vexed nevertheless at the spectacle of
the increased hardness of human life, with certain misgivings from
time to time at the contrast of his own luxurious tranquillity.  The
homeless woman suckling her babe at the roadside, the grey-beard
hasting before the storm, the tattered fortune-teller who, when he
shook his head at her proposal to "read his hand," assured him
(perhaps with some insight into his character) "You do that"--you
shake your head, negatively--"too much!" these, and the like, [60]
might count as fitting human accidents in an impassioned landscape
picture.  And his new imaginative culture had taught him to value
"surprises" in nature itself; the quaint, exciting charm of the
mistletoe in the wood, of the blossom before the leaf, the cry of
passing birds at night.  Nay! the most familiar details of nature,
its daily routine of light and darkness, beset him now with a kind of
troubled and troubling eloquence.  The rain, the first streak of
dawn, the very sullenness of the sky, had a power, only to be
described by saying that they seemed to be moral facts.

On his way at last to gaze on the abode of the new hero or demi-god
of poetry, Gaston perceives increasingly, as another excellence of
his verse, how truthful, how close it is to the minute fact of the
scene around; as there are pleasant wines which, expressing the
peculiar quality of their native soil, lose their special
pleasantness away from home.  The physiognomy of the scene was
changed; the plain of La Beauce had ruffled itself into low green
hills and gently winding valleys, with clear, quick water, and
fanciful patches of heath and wood-land.  Here and there a secular
oak tree maintained a solitude around it.  It was the district of the
"little river Loir"--the Vendomois; and here, in its own country, the
new poetry, notwithstanding its classic elegance, might seem a native
wild flower, modest enough.

[61] He came riding with his companions towards evening along the
road which had suddenly abandoned its day-long straightness for
wanton curves and ascents; and there, as an owl on the wing cried
softly, beyond the tops of the spreading poplars was the west front,
silver-grey, and quiet, inexpressibly quiet, with its worn, late-
gothic "flamings" from top to bottom, as full of reverie to Gaston's
thinking as the enchanted castle in a story-book.  The village lay
thinly scattered around the wide, grass-grown space; below was the
high espaliered garden-wall, and within it, visible through the open
doors, a gaunt figure, hook-nosed, like a wizard, at work with the
spade, too busily to turn and look.  Or was it that he did not hear
at all the question repeated thrice:--Could one see His Reverence the
Prior, at least in his convent church?  "You see him" was the answer,
as a face, all nerve, distressed nerve, turned upon them not
unkindly, the vanity of the great man aware and pleasantly tickled.
The unexpected incident had quickened a prematurely aged pulse, and
in reward for their good service the young travellers were bidden
carry their equipment, not to the village inn, but to the guest-
chamber of the half-empty priory.  The eminent man of letters, who
had been always an enthusiastic gardener, though busy just now not
with choice flowers but with salutary kitchen-stuff, working indeed
with much effort, to counteract the gout, was ready enough [62] in
his solitude to make the most of chance visitors, especially youthful
ones.  A bell clanged; he laid aside the spade, and casting an eye at
the whirling weather-vanes announced that it would snow.  There had
been no "sunset."  They had travelled away imperceptibly from genial
afternoon into a world of ashen evening.

The enemies of the lay Prior, satirists literary and religious,
falsely made a priest of him, a priest who should have sacrificed a
goat to pagan Bacchus.  And in truth the poet, for a time a soldier,
and all his life a zealous courtier, had always been capable, as a
poet should be, of long-sustained meditation, adapting himself easily
enough to the habits of the "religious," following attentively the
choir-services in their church, of which he was a generous
benefactor, and to which he presently proceeded for vespers.  Gaston
and "the three" sat among the Brethren, tempting curious eyes, in the
stalls of the half-lighted choir, while in purple cope and jaunty
biretta the lay Prior "assisted," his confidentiaire, or priestly
substitute, officiating at the altar.  The long, sad, Lenten office
over, an invitation to supper followed, for Ronsard still loved, in
his fitful retirements at one or another of his numerous benefices,
to give way to the chance recreation of flattering company, and these
gay lads' enthusiasm for his person was obvious.  And as for himself,
the great poet, with his [63] bodily graces and airs of court, had
always possessed the gift of pleasing those who encountered him.

The snow was falling now in big, slow flakes, a great fire blazing
under the chimney with its cipher and enigmatic motto, as they sat
down to the leek-soup, the hard eggs, and the salad grown and
gathered by their host's own hands.  The long stone passages through
which they passed from church, with the narrow brown doors of the
monks' dormitories one after another along the white-washed wall,
made the coquetries of the Prior's own distant apartment all the more
reassuring.  You remembered that from his ninth year he had been the
pet of princesses, the favourite of kings.  Upon the cabinets,
chests, book-cases, around, were ranged the souvenirs received from
various royal persons, including three kings of France, the fair
Queen of Scots, Elizabeth of England; and the conversation fell to,
and was kept going by, the precious contents of the place where they
were sitting, the books printed and bound as they had never been
before--books which meant assiduous study, the theory of poetry with
Ronsard always accompanying its practice--delicate things of art,
which beauty had handled or might handle, the pictured faces on the
walls, in their frames of reeded ebony or jewelled filigree.  There
was the Minerva, decreed him at a conference of the elegant, pedantic
"Jeux Floraux," which had proclaimed [64] Pierre de Ronsard "Prince
of Poets." The massive silver image Ronsard had promptly offered to
his patron King Charles; but in vain, for, though so greatly in want
of ready-money that he melted down church ornaments and exacted
"black" contributions from the clergy, one of the things in which
Charles had ever been sincere was a reverence for literature.

So there it stood, doing duty for Our Lady, with gothic crown and a
fresh sprig of consecrated box, bringing the odd, enigmatic
physiognomy, preferred by the art of that day, within the sphere of
religious devotion.  The King's manuscript, declining, in verse
really as good as Ronsard's, the honour not meant for him, might be
read, attached to the pedestal.  The ladies of his own verse, Marie,
Cassandre, and the rest, idols one after another of a somewhat
artificial and for the most part unrequited love, from the Angevine
maiden--La petite pucelle Angevine--who had vexed his young soul by
her inability to yield him more than a faint Platonic affection, down
to Helen, to whom he had been content to propose no other, gazed,
more impassibly than ever, from the walls.

They might have been sisters, those many successive loves, or one and
the same lady over and over again, in slightly varied humour and
attire perhaps, at the different intervals of some rather lengthy,
mimetic masque of love, to which the theatrical dress of that day was
appropriate; [65] for the mannered Italian, or Italianised, artists,
including the much-prized, native Janet, with his favourite water-
green backgrounds, aware of the poet's predilection, had given to all
alike the same brown eyes and tender eyelids and golden hair and
somewhat ambered paleness, varying only the curious artifices of the
dress--knots, and nets, and golden spider-work, and clear, flat
stones.  Dangerous guests in that simple, cloistral place, Sibyls of
the Renaissance on a mission from Italy to France, to Gaston one and
all seemed under the burden of some weighty message concerning a
world unknown to him; the stealthy lines of cheek and brow contriving
to express it, while the lips and eyes only smiled, not quite
honestly.  It had been a learned love, with undissembled "hatred of
the vulgar."  Three royal Margarets, much-praised pearls of three
succeeding generations (for to the curious in these objects purity is
far from being the only measure of value) asserted charms a thought
more frank, or French, though still gracefully pedantic, with their
quaintly kerchiefed books--books of what?--in their pale hands.
Among the ladies, on the pictured wall as in life, were the poet's
male companions, stirring memories of a more material sort, though
their common interest had been poetry--memories of that "Bohemia,"
which even a prince of court poets had frequented when he was young,
of his cruder youthful vanities. [66] In some cases the date of death
was inscribed below.

One there was among them, the youngest, of whose genial fame to come
this experienced judge of men and books, two years before "St.
Bartholomew's," was confident--a crowned boy, King Charles himself.
Here perhaps was the single entirely disinterested sentiment of the
poet's life, wholly independent of a long list of benefits, or
benefices; for the younger had turned winsomely, appealingly, to the
elder, who, forty years of age, feeling chilly at the thought, had no
son.  And of one only of those companions did the memory bring a
passing cloud.  It was long ago, on a journey, that he had first
spoken, accidentally, with Joachim du Bellay, whose friendship had
been the great intellectual fortune of his life.  For a moment one
saw the encounter at the wayside inn, in the broad, gay morning, a
quarter of a century since; and there was the face--deceased at
thirty-five.  Pensive, plaintive, refined by sickness, of exceeding
delicacy, it must from the first have been best suited to the
greyness of an hour like this.  To-morrow, where will be the snow?

The leader in that great poetic battle of the Pleiad, their host
himself (he explained the famous device, and named the seven chief
stars in the constellation) was depicted appropriately, in veritable
armour, with antique Roman cuirass of minutely inlaid gold, and
flowered mantle; [67] the crisp, ceremonial, laurel-wreath of the
Roman conqueror lying on the audacious, over-developed brows, above
the great hooked nose of practical enterprise.  In spite of his
pretension to the Epicurean conquest of a kingly indifference of
mind, the portrait of twenty years ago betrayed, not less than the
living face with its roving, astonished eyes, the haggard soul of a
haggard generation, whose eagerly-sought refinements had been after
all little more than a theatrical make-believe--an age of wild
people, of insane impulse, of homicidal mania.  The sweet-souled
songster had no more than others attained real calm in it.  Even in
youth nervous distress had been the chief facial characteristic.
Triumphant, nevertheless, in his battle for Greek beauty--for the
naturalisation of Greek beauty in the brown cloud-lands of the North-
-he might have been thinking, contemptuously, of barking little
Saint-Gelais, or of Monsieur Marot's pack-thread poems.  He, for his
part, had always held that poetry should be woven of delicate silk,
or of fine linen, or at least of good home-spun worsted.

To Gaston, yielding himself to its influence, for a moment the scene
around seemed unreal: an exotic, embalming air, escaped from some old
Greek or Roman pleasure-place, had turned the poet's workroom into a
strange kind of private sanctuary, amid these rude conventual
buildings, with the March wind aloud in the chimneys. [68]
Notwithstanding, what with the long day's ride, the keen evening,
they had done justice to the monastic fare, the "little" wine of the
country, the cream, the onions,--fine Camille, and dainty Jasmin, and
the poet turned to talk upon gardening, concerning which he could
tell them a thing or two--of early salads, and those special apples
the king loved to receive from him, mille-fleurs pippins, painted
with a thousand tiny streaks of red, yellow, and green.  A dish of
them came to table now, with a bottle, at the right moment, from the
darkest corner of the cellar.  And then, in nasal voice, well-trained
to Latin intonation, giving a quite medieval amplitude to the poet's
sonorities of rhythm and vocabulary, the Sub-prior was bidden to
sing, after the notation of Goudimel, the "Elegy of the Rose"; the
author girding cheerily at the clerkly man's assumed ignorance of
such compositions.

It was but a half-gaiety, in truth, that awoke in the poet even now,
with the singing and the good wine, as the notes echoed windily along
the passages.  On his forty-sixth year the unaffected melancholy of
his later life was already gathering.  The dead!--he was coming to be
on their side.  The fact came home to Gaston that this evocator of
"the eternally youthful" was visibly old before his time; his work
being done, or centered now for the most part on amendments, not
invariably happy, of his earlier [69] verse.  The little panelled
drawers were full of them.  The poet pulled out one, and as it stood
open for a moment there lay the first book of the Franciade, in
silken cover, white and gold, ready for the king's hands, but never
to be finished.

Gaston, as he turned from that stolen reading of the opening verse in
jerky, feverish, gouty manuscript, to the writer, let out his soul
perhaps; for the poet's face struck fire too, and seeming to detect
on a sudden the legible document of something by no means
conventional below the young man's well-controlled manner and
expression, he became as if paternally anxious for his intellectual
furtherance, and in particular for the addition of "manly power" to a
"grace" of mind, obviously there already in due sufficiency.  Would
he presently carry a letter with recommendation of himself to
Monsieur Michel de Montaigne?  Linked they were, in the common
friendship of the late Etienne de la Boetie yonder!  Monsieur Michel
could tell him much of the great ones--of the Greek and Latin masters
of style.  Let his study be in them!  With what justice, by the way,
had those Latin poets dealt with winter, and wintry charms, in their
bland Italy!  And just then, at the striking of a rickety great bell
of the Middle Age, in the hands of a cowled brother came the
emblazoned grace-cup, with which the Prior de Ronsard had enriched
his "house," and the guests withdrew.

[70] "Yesterday's snow" was nowhere, a surprising sunlight
everywhere; through which, after gratefully bidding adieu to the
great poet, almost on their knees for a blessing, our adventurers
returned home.  Gaston, intently pondering as he lingered behind the
others, was aware that this new poetry, which seemed to have
transformed his whole nature into half-sensuous imagination, was the
product not of one or more individual writers, but (it might be in
the way of a response to their challenge) a general direction of
men's minds, a delightful "fashion" of the time.  He almost
anticipated our modern idea, or platitude, of the Zeit-geist.  A
social instinct was involved in the matter, and loyalty to an
intellectual movement.  As its leader had himself been the first to
suggest, the actual authorship belonged not so much to a star as to a
constellation, like that hazy Pleiad he had pointed out in the sky,
or like the swarm of larks abroad this morning over the corn, led by
a common instinct, a large element in which was sympathetic trust in
the instinct of others.  Here, truly, was a doctrine to propagate, a
secret open to every one who would learn, towards a new management of
life,--nay! a new religion, or at least a new worship, maintaining
and visibly setting forth a single overpowering apprehension.

The worship of physical beauty a religion, the proper faculty of
which would be the bodily eye!  Looked at in this way, some of the
well- [71] marked characteristics of the poetry of the Pleiad assumed
a hieratic, almost an ecclesiastical air.  That rigid correctness;
that gracious unction, as of the medieval Latin psalmody; that
aspiring fervour; that jealousy of the profane "vulgar"; the sense,
flattering to one who was in the secret, that this thing, even in its
utmost triumph, could never be really popular:--why were these so
welcome to him but from the continuity of early mental habit?  He
might renew the over-grown tonsure, and wait, devoutly, rapturously,
in this goodly sanctuary of earth and sky about him, for the
manifestation, at the moment of his own worthiness, of flawless
humanity, in some undreamed-of depth and perfection of the loveliness
of bodily form.

And therewith came the consciousness, no longer of mere bad-
neighbourship between what was old and new in his life, but of
incompatibility between two rival claimants upon him, of two ideals.
Might that new religion be a religion not altogether of goodness, a
profane religion, in spite of its poetic fervours?  There were
"flowers of evil," among the rest.  It came in part, avowedly, as a
kind of consecration of evil, and seemed to give it the beauty of
holiness.  Rather, good and evil were distinctions inapplicable in
proportion as these new interests made themselves felt.  For a
moment, amid casuistical questions as to one's indefeasible right to
liberty of heart, he saw himself, somewhat [72] wearily, very far
gone from the choice, the consecration, of his boyhood.  If he could
but be rid of that altogether!  Or if that would but speak with
irresistible decision and effect!  Was there perhaps somewhere, in
some penetrative mind in this age of novelties, some scheme of truth,
some science about men and things, which might harmonise for him his
earlier and later preference, "the sacred and the profane loves," or,
failing that, establish, to his pacification, the exclusive supremacy
of the latter?



IV.  PEACH-BLOSSOM AND WINE

[73] Those searchings of mind brought from time to time cruel starts
from sleep, a sudden shudder at any wide outlook over life and its
issues, draughts of mental east-wind across the hot mornings, into
which the voices of his companions called him, to lose again in long
rambles every thought save that of his own firm, abounding youth.
These rambles were but the last, sweet, wastefully-spent remnants of
a happy season.  The letter for Monsieur Michel de Montaigne was to
hand, with preparations for the distant journey which must presently
break up their comradeship.  Nevertheless, its actual termination
overtook them at the last as if by surprise: on a sudden that
careless interval of time was over.

The carelessness of "the three" at all events had been entire.
Secure, on the low, warm, level surface of things, they talked, they,
rode, they ate and drank, with no misgivings, mental or moral, no too
curious questions as to the essential nature of their so palpable
well-being, [74] or the rival standards thereof, of origins and
issues.  And yet, with all their gaiety, as its last triumphant note
in truth, they were ready to trifle with death, welcoming, by way of
a foil to the easy character of their days, a certain luxurious sense
of danger--the night-alarm, the arquebuse peeping from some quiet
farm-building across their way, the rumoured presence in their
neighbourhood of this or that great military leader--delightful
premonitions of the adventurous life soon to be their own in Paris.
What surmises they had of any vaguer sort of danger, took effect, in
that age of wizardry, as a quaintly practical superstition, the
expectation of cadaverous "churchyard things" and the like, intruding
themselves where they should not be, to be dissipated in turn by
counter-devices of the dark craft which had evoked them.  Gaston,
then, as in after years, though he saw no ghosts, could not bear to
trifle with such matters: to his companions it was a delight, as they
supped, to note the indication of nameless terrors, if it were only
in the starts and crackings of the timbers of the old place.  To the
turbid spirits of that generation the midnight heaven itself was by
no means a restful companion; and many were the hours wasted by those
young astrophiles in puzzling out the threats, or the enigmatic
promises, of a starry sky.

The fact that armed persons were still abroad, thieves or assassins,
lurking under many disguises, [75] might explain what happened on the
last evening of their time together, when they sat late at the open
windows as the night increased, serene but covered summer night,
aromatic, velvet-footed.  What coolness it had was pleasant after the
wine; and they strolled out, fantastically muffled in certain old
heraldic dresses of parade, caught up in the hall as they passed
through, Gaston alone remaining to attend on his grandfather.  In
about an hour's time they returned, not a little disconcerted, to
tell a story of which Gaston was reminded (seeing them again in
thought as if only half real, amid the bloomy night, with blood upon
their boyish flowers) as they crossed his path afterwards at three
intervals.  Listening for the night-hawk, pushing aside the hedge-row
to catch the evening breath of the honeysuckle, they had sauntered
on, scarcely looking in advance, along the causeway.  Soft sounds
came out of the distance, but footsteps on the hard road they had not
heard, when three others fronted them face to face--Jasmin, Amadee,
and Camille--their very selves, visible in the light of the lantern
carried by Camille: they might have felt the breath upon their
cheeks: real, close, definite, cap for cap, plume for plume, flower
for flower, a light like their own flashed up counter-wise, but with
blood, all three of them, fresh upon the bosom, or in the mouth.  It
was well to draw the sword, be one's enemy carnal or spiritual; even
devils, [76] as wise men know, taking flight at its white glitter
through the air.  Out flashed the brave youths' swords, still with
mimic counter-motion, upon nothing--upon the empty darkness before
them.

Curdled at heart for an hour by that strange encounter, they went on
their way next morning no different.  There was something in the mere
belief that peace was come at last.  For a moment Huguenots were, or
pretended to be, satisfied with a large concession of liberty; to be
almost light of soul.  The French, who can always pause in the very
midst of civil bloodshed to eulogise the reign of universal kindness,
were determined to treat a mere armistice as nothing less than
realised Utopia.  To bear offensive weapons became a crime; and the
sense of security at home was attested by vague schemes of glory to
be won abroad, under the leadership of "The Admiral," the great
Huguenot Coligni, anxious to atone for his share in the unhappiness
of France by helping her to foreign conquests.  Philip of Spain had
been watching for the moment when Charles and Catherine should call
the Duke of Alva into France to continue his devout work there.
Instead, the poetic mind of Charles was dazzled for a moment by the
dream of wrestling the misused Netherlands from Spanish rule
altogether.

Under such genial conditions, then, Gaston set out towards those
south-west regions he had [77] always yearned to, as popular
imagination just now set thither also, in a vision of French ships
going forth from the mouths of the Loire and the Gironde, from
Nantes, Bordeaux, and La Rochelle, to the Indies, in rivalry of
Spanish adventure.  The spasmodic gaiety of the time blent with that
of the season of the year, of his own privileged time of life, and
allowed the opulent country through which he was to pass all its
advantages.  Ever afterwards that low ring of blue hills beyond La
Beauce meant more for him, not less, than of old.  After the reign of
his native apple-blossom and corn, it was that of peach-blossom and
wine.  Southwards to Orleans and the Loire then, with the course of
the sunny river, to Blois, to Amboise, to Tours, he traversed a
region of unquestioned natural charm, heightened greatly by the
mental atmosphere through which it reached him.  Black Angers, white
Saumur, with its double in the calm broad water below, the melancholy
seigneurial woods of Blois, ranged themselves in his memory as so
many distinct types of what was dignified or pleasant in human
habitations.  Frequently, along the great historic stream, as along
some vast street, contemporary genius was visible (a little
prematurely as time would show) in a novel and seductive
architecture, which, by its engrafting of exotic grace on homely
native forms, spoke of a certain restless aspiration to be what one
was not but might become--the old [78] Gaulish desire to be refined,
to be mentally enfranchised by the sprightlier genius of Italy.  With
their terraced gardens, their airy galleries, their triumphal
chimney-pieces, their spacious stairways, their conscious provision
for the elegant enjoyment of all seasons in turn, here surely were
the new abodes for the new humanity of this new, poetic, picturesque
age.  What but flawless bodies, duly appointed to typically developed
souls, could move on the daily business of life through these dreamy
apartments into which he entered from time to time, finding their
very garniture like a personal presence in them?  Was there light
here in the earth itself?  It was a landscape, certainly, which did
not merely accept the sun, but flashed it back gratefully from the
white, gracious, carven houses, that were like a natural part of it.
As he passed below, fancy would sometimes credit the outlook from
their lofty gables with felicities of combination beyond possibility.
What prospects of mountain and sea-shore from those aerial window-
seats!

And still, as in some sumptuous tapestry, the architecture, the
landscape, were but a setting for the human figures: these palatial
abodes, never out of sight, high on the river bank, challenged
continual speculation as to their inhabitants--how they moved, read
poetry and romance, or wrote the memoirs which were like romance,
passed through all the hourly changes of their all- [79]
accomplished, intimate life.  The Loire was the river pre-eminently
of the monarchy, of the court; and the fleeting human interests, fact
or fancy, which gave its utmost value to the liveliness of the
natural scene, found a centre in the movements of Catherine and her
sons, still roving, after the eccentric habit inherited from Francis
the First, from one "house of pleasure" to another, in the pursuit at
once of amusement and of that political intrigue which was the
serious business of their lives.  Like some fantastic company of
strolling players amid the hushed excitement of a little town, the
royal family, with all its own small rivalries, would be housed for
the night under the same roof with some of its greater enemies--Henri
de Guise, Conde, "The Admiral," all alike taken by surprise--but
courteously, and therefore ineffectively.  And Gaston, come thus by
chance so close to them, had the sense not so much of nearness to the
springs of great events, as of the likeness of the whole matter to a
stage-play with its ingeniously contrived encounters, or the
assortments of a game of chance.

And in a while the dominant course of the river itself, the animation
of its steady, downward flow, even amid the sand-shoals and
whispering islets of the dry season, bore his thoughts beyond it, in
a sudden irresistible appetite for the sea; and he determined,
varying slightly from the prescribed route, to reach his destination
by way [80] of the coast.  From Nantes he descended imperceptibly
along tall hedge-rows of acacia, till on a sudden, with a novel
freshness in the air, through a low archway of laden fruit-trees it
was visible--sand, sea, and sky, in three quiet spaces, line upon
line.  The features of the landscape changed again, and the gardens,
the rich orchards, gave way to bare, grassy undulations: only, the
open sandy spaces presented their own native flora, for the fine
silex seemed to have crept into the tall, wiry stalks of the ixias,
like grasses the seeds of which had expanded, by solar magic, into
veritable flowers, crimson, green, or yellow patched with black.

It was pleasant to sleep as if in the sea's arms, amid the low
murmurs, the salt odour mingled with the wild garden scents of a
little inn or farm, forlorn in the wide enclosure of an ancient
manor, deserted as the sea encroached--long ago, for the fig-trees in
the riven walls were tough and old.  Next morning he must turn his
back betimes, with the freshness of the outlook still undimmed, all
colours turning to white on the shell-beach, the wrecks, the children
at play on it, the boat with its gay streamers dancing in the foam.
Bright as the scene of his journey had been, it had had from time to
time its grisly touches; a forbidden fortress with its steel-clad
inmates thrust itself upon the way; the village church had been
ruined too recently to count as picturesque; and at last, at the
meeting-point of [81] five long causeways across a wide expanse of
marshland, where the wholesome sea turned stagnant, La Rochelle
itself scowled through the heavy air, the dark ramparts still rising
higher around its dark townsfolk:--La Rochelle, the "Bastion of the
Gospel" according to John Calvin, the conceded capital of the
Huguenots.  They were there, and would not leave it, even to share
the festivities of the marriage of King Charles to his little
Austrian Elizabeth about this time--the armed chiefs of
Protestantism, dreaming of a "dictator" after the Roman manner, who
should set up a religious republic.  Serried closely together on
land, they had a strange mixed following on the sea.  Lair of
heretics, or shelter of martyrs, La Rochelle was ready to protect the
outlaw.  The corsair, of course, would be a Protestant, actually
armed perhaps by sour old Jeanne of Navarre--the ship he fell across,
of course, Spanish.  A real Spanish ship of war, gay, magnificent,
was gliding even then, stealthily, through the distant haze; and
nearer lay what there was of a French navy.  Did the enigmatic
"Admiral," the coming dictator, Coligni, really wish to turn it to
foreign adventure, in rivalry of Spain, as the proper patriotic
outcome of this period, or breathing-space, of peace and national
unity?

Undoubtedly they were still there, even in this halcyon weather,
those causes of disquiet, like the volcanic forces beneath the
massive [82] chestnut-woods, spread so calmly through the breathless
air, on the ledges and levels of the red heights of the Limousin,
under which Gaston now passed on his way southwards.  On his right
hand a broad, lightly diversified expanse of vineyard, of towns and
towers innumerable, rolled its burden of fat things down the slope of
the Gironde towards the more perfect level beyond.  In the heady
afternoon an indescribable softness laid hold on him, from the
objects, the atmosphere, the lazy business, of the scene around.  And
was that the quarter whence the dry daylight, the intellectual iron,
the chalybeate influence, was to come?--those coquettish, well-kept,
vine-wreathed towers, smiling over a little irregular old village,
itself half-hidden in gadding vine, pointed out by the gardeners (all
labourers here were gardeners) as the end of his long, pleasant
journey, as the abode of Monsieur Michel de Montaigne, the singular
but not unpopular gentleman living there among his books, of whom
Gaston hears so much over-night at the inn where he rests, before
delivering the great poet's letter, entering his room at last in a
flutter of curiosity.

In those earlier days of the Renaissance, a whole generation had been
exactly in the position in which Gaston now found himself.  An older
ideal moral and religious, certain theories of man and nature
actually in possession, still haunted humanity, at the very moment
when it was [83] called, through a full knowledge of the past, to
enjoy the present with an unrestricted expansion of its own
capacities.--Might one enjoy?  Might one eat of all the trees?--Some
had already eaten, and needed, retrospectively, a theoretic
justification, a sanction of their actual liberties, in some new
reading of human nature itself and its relation to the world around
it.--Explain to us the propriety, on the full view of things, of this
bold course we have taken, or know we shall take!

Ex post facto, at all events, that justification was furnished by the
Essays of Montaigne.  The spirit of the essays doubtless had been
felt already in many a mind, as, by a universal law of reaction, the
intellect does supply the due theoretic equivalent to an inevitable
course of conduct.  But it was Montaigne certainly who turned that
emancipating ethic into current coin.  To Pascal, looking back upon
the sixteenth century as a whole, Montaigne was to figure as the
impersonation of its intellectual licence; while Shakespeare, who
represents the free spirit of the Renaissance moulding the drama,
hints, by his well-known preoccupation with Montaigne's writings,
that just there was the philosophic counterpart to the fulness and
impartiality of his own artistic reception of the experience of life.

Those essays, as happens with epoch-marking books, were themselves a
life, the power which [84] makes them what they are having been
accumulated in them imperceptibly by a thousand repeated
modifications, like character in a person: at the moment when Gaston
presented himself, to go along with the great "egotist" for a season,
that life had just begun.  Born here, at the place whose name he
took, Montaigne--the acclivity--of Saint Michael, just thirty-six
years before, brought up simply, earthily, at nurse in one of the
neighbouring villages, to him it was doubled strength to return
thither, when, disgusted with the legal business which had filled his
days hitherto, seeing that "France had more laws than all the rest of
the world," and was what one saw, he began the true work of his life,
a continual journey in thought, "a continual observation of new and
unknown things," his bodily self remaining, for the most part, with
seeming indolence at home.

It was Montaigne's boast that throughout those invasive times his
house had lain open to all comers, that his frankness had been
rewarded by immunity from all outrages of war, of the crime war
shelters: and openness--that all was wide open, searched through by
light and warmth and air from the soil--was the impression it made on
Gaston, as he passed from farmyard to garden, from garden to court,
to hall, up the wide winding stair, to the uppermost chamber of the
great round tower; in which sun-baked place the studious man still
lingered over a late [85] breakfast, telling, like all around, of a
certain homely epicureanism, a rare mixture of luxury with a
preference for the luxuries that after all were home-grown and
savoured of his native earth.

Sociable, of sociable intellect, and still inclining instinctively,
as became his fresh and agreeable person, from the midway of life,
towards its youthful side, he was ever on the alert for a likely
interlocutor to take part in the conversation, which (pleasantest,
truly! of all modes of human commerce) was also of ulterior service
as stimulating that endless inward converse from which the essays
were a kind of abstract.  For him, as for Plato, for Socrates whom he
cites so often, the essential dialogue was that of the mind with
itself; but this dialogue throve best with, often actually needed,
outward stimulus--physical motion, some text shot from a book, the
queries and objections of a living voice.--"My thoughts sleep, if I
sit still."  Neither "thoughts," nor "dialogues," exclusively, but
thoughts still partly implicate in the dialogues which had evoked
them, and therefore not without many seemingly arbitrary transitions,
many links of connexion to be supposed by the reader, constituting
their characteristic difficulty, the Essays owed their actual
publication at last to none of the usual literary motives--desire for
fame, to instruct, to amuse, to sell--but to the sociable desire for
a still wider range of conversation with others.  [86] He wrote for
companionship, "if but one sincere man would make his acquaintance";
speaking on paper, as he "did to the first person he met."--"If there
be any person, any knot of good company, in France or elsewhere, who
can like my humour, and whose humours I can like, let them but
whistle, and I will run!"

Notes of expressive facts, of words also worthy of note (for he was a
lover of style), collected in the first instance for the help of an
irregular memory, were becoming, in the quaintly labelled drawers,
with labels of wise old maxim or device, the primary, rude stuff, or
"protoplasm," of his intended work, and already gave token of its
scope and variety.  "All motion discovers us"; if to others, so also
to ourselves.  Movement, rapid movement of some kind, a ride, the
hasty survey of a shelf of books, best of all a conversation like
this morning's with a visitor for the first time,--amid the
felicitous chances of that, at some random turn by the way, he would
become aware of shaping purpose: the beam of light or heat would
strike down, to illuminate, to fuse and organise the coldly
accumulated matter, of reason, of experience.  Surely, some
providence over thought and speech led one finely through those
haphazard journeys!  But thus dependent to so great a degree on
external converse for the best fruit of his own thought, he was also
an efficient evocator of the thought of another--himself an original
spirit more than tolerating [87] the originality of others,--which
brought it into play.  Here was one who (through natural
predilection, reinforced by theory) would welcome one's very self,
undistressed by, while fully observant of, its difference from his
own--one's errors, vanities, perhaps fatuities.  Naturally eloquent,
expressive, with a mind like a rich collection of the choice things
of all times and countries, he was at his best, his happiest, amid
the magnetic contacts of an easy conversation.  When Gaston years
afterwards came to read the famous Essays, he found many a delightful
actual conversation re-set, and had the key we lack to their
surprises, their capricious turns and lapses.--Well!  Montaigne had
opened the letter, had forthwith passed his genial criticism on the
writer, and then, characteristically, forgetting all about it, turned
to the bearer as if he had been intimate with him from childhood.
And the feeling was mutual.  Gaston in half an hour seemed to have
known his entertainer all his life.

In unimpeded talk with sincere persons of what quality soever--there,
rather than in shadowy converse with even the best books--the flower,
the fruit, of mind was still in life-giving contact with its root.
With books, as indeed with persons, his intercourse was apt to be
desultory.  Books!--He was by way of asserting his independence of
them, was their very candid friend:--they were far from being  [88]
an unmixed good.  He would observe (the fact was its own scornful
comment) that there were more books upon books than upon any other
subject.  Yet books, more than a thousand volumes, a handsome library
for that day, nicely representative not only of literature but of the
owner's taste therein, lay all around; and turning now to this, now
to that, he handled their pages with nothing less than tenderness: it
was the first of many inconsistencies which yet had about them a
singularly taking air, of reason, of equity.  Plutarch and Seneca
were soon in the foreground: they would "still be at his elbow to
test and be tested": masters of the autumnal wisdom that was coming
to be his own, ripe and placid--from the autumn of old Rome, of life,
of the world, the very genius of second thoughts, of exquisite tact
and discretion, of judgment upon knowledge.

But the books dropped from his hands in the very midst of
enthusiastic quotation; and the guest was mounting a little turret
staircase, was on the leaden roof of the old tower, amid the fat,
noonday Gascon scenery.  He saw, in bird's-eye view, the country he
was soon to become closely acquainted with, a country (like its
people) of passion and capacity, though at that moment emphatically
lazy.  Towards the end of life some conscientious pangs seem to have
touched Montaigne's singularly humane and sensitive spirit, when he
looked back on the [89] long intellectual entertainment he had had,
in following, as an inactive spectator, "the ruin of his country,"
through a series of chapters, every one of which had told
emphatically in his own immediate neighbourhood.  With its old and
new battlefields, its business, its fierce changes, and the old
perennial sameness of men's ways beneath them all, it had been
certainly matter of more assiduous reading than even those choice,
incommensurable, books, of ancient Greek and Roman experience.  The
variableness, the complexity, the miraculous surprises of man,
concurrent with the variety, the complexity, the surprises of nature,
making all true knowledge of either wholly relative and provisional;
a like insecurity in one's self, if one turned thither for some ray
of clear and certain evidence; this, with an equally strong sense all
the time of the interest, the power and charm, alike of man and
nature and of the individual mind;--such was the sense of this open
book, of all books and things.  That was what this quietly
enthusiastic reader was ready to assert as the sum of his studies;
disturbingly, as Gaston found, reflecting on his long unsuspicious
sojourn there, and detaching from the habits, the random traits of
character, his concessions and hints and sudden emphatic statements,
the soul and potency of the man.

How imperceptibly had darkness crept over them, effacing everything
but the interior of [90] the great circular chamber, its book-shelves
and enigmatic mottoes and the tapestry on the wall,--Circe and her
sorceries, in many parts--to draw over the windows in winter.  Supper
over, the young wife entered at last.  Always on the lookout for the
sincerities of human nature (sincerity counting for life-giving form,
whatever the matter might be) as he delighted in watching children,
Montaigne loved also to watch grown people when they were most like
children; at their games, therefore, and in the mechanical and
customary parts of their existence, as discovering the real soul in
them.  Abstaining from the dice himself, since for him such "play was
not play enough, but too grave and serious a diversion," and
remarking that "the play of children is not performed in play, but to
be judged as their most serious action," he set Gaston and the
amiable, unpedantic, lady to play together, where he might observe
them closely; the game turning still, irresistibly, to conversation,
the last and sweetest if somewhat drowsy relics of this long day's
recreations.--Was Circe's castle here?  If Circe could turn men into
swine, could she also release them again?  It was frailty, certainly,
that Gaston remained here week after week, scarce knowing why; the
conversation begun that morning lasting for nine months, over books,
meals, in free rambles chiefly on horseback, as if in the waking
intervals of a long day-sleep.



V.  SUSPENDED JUDGMENT

[91] The diversity, the undulancy, of human nature!--so deep a sense
of it went with Montaigne always that himself too seemed to be ever
changing colour sympathetically therewith.  Those innumerable
differences, mental and physical, of which men had always been aware,
on which they had so largely fed their vanity, were ultimate.  That
the surface of humanity presented an infinite variety was the tritest
of facts.  Pursue that variety below the surface!--the lines did but
part further and further asunder, with an ever-increasing divergency,
which made any common measure of truth impossible.  Diversity of
custom!--What was it but diversity in the moral and mental view,
diversity of opinion? and diversity of opinion, what but radical
diversity of mental constitution?  How various in kind and degree had
he found men's thoughts concerning death, for instance, "some (ah
me!) even running headlong upon it, with [92] a real affection"?
Death, life; wealth, poverty; the whole sum of contrasts; nay! duty
itself,--the relish of right and wrong"; all depend upon the opinion
each one has of them, and "receive no colour of good or evil but
according to the application of the individual soul."  Did Hamlet
learn of him that "there is nothing either good or bad but thinking
makes it so"?--What we call evil is not so of itself: it depends only
upon us, to give it another taste and complexion.--Things, in respect
of themselves, have peradventure their weight, measure, and
conditions; but when once we have taken them into us, the soul forms
them as she pleases.--Death is terrible to Cicero, courted by Cato,
indifferent to Socrates.--Fortune, circumstance, offers but the
matter: 'tis the soul adds the form.--Every opinion, how fantastic
soever to some, is to another of force enough to be espoused at the
risk of life."

For opinion was the projection of individual will, of a native
original predilection.  Opinions!--they are like the clothes we wear,
which warm us, not with their heat, but with ours.  Track your way
(as he had learned to do) to the remote origin of what looks like
folly; at home, on its native soil, it was found to be justifiable,
as a proper growth of wisdom.  In the vast conflict of taste,
preference, conviction, there was no real inconsistency.  It was but
that the soul looked "upon things with [93] another eye, and
represented them to itself with another kind of face; reason being a
tincture almost equally infused into all our manners and opinions;
though there never were in the world two opinions exactly alike."
And the practical comment was, not as one might have expected,
towards the determination of some common standard of truth amid that
infinite variety, but to this effect rather, that we are not bound to
receive every opinion we are not able to refute, nor to accept
another's refutation of our own; these diversities being themselves
ultimate, and the priceless pearl of truth lying, if anywhere, not in
large theoretic apprehension of the general, but in minute vision of
the particular; in the perception of the concrete phenomenon, at this
particular moment, and from this unique point of view--that for you,
this for me--now, but perhaps not then.

Now; and not then!  For if men are so diverse, not less disparate are
the many men who keep discordant company within each one of us,
"every man carrying in him the entire form of human condition."
"That we taste nothing pure:" the variancy of the individual in
regard to himself: the complexity of soul which there, too, makes
"all judgments in the gross" impossible or useless, certainly
inequitable, he delighted to note.  Men's minds were like the
grotesques which some artists of that day loved to joint together, or
like one of his own [94] inconstant essays, never true for a page to
its proposed subject.  "Nothing is so supple as our understanding: it
is double and diverse; and the matters are double and diverse, too."

Here, as it seemed to Gaston, was one for whom exceptions had taken
the place of law: the very genius of qualification followed him
through all his keen, constant, changeful consideration of men and
things.  How many curious moral variations he had to show!--"vices
that are lawful": vices in us which "help to make up the seam in our
piecing, as poisons are useful for the conservation of health":
"actions good and excusable that are not lawful in themselves": "the
soul discharging her passions upon false objects where the true are
wanting": men doing more than they propose, or they hardly know what,
at immense hazard, or pushed to do well by vice itself, or working
for their enemies: "condemnations more criminal than the crimes they
condemn": the excuses that are self-accusations: instances, from his
own experience, of a hasty confidence in other men's virtue which
"God had favoured": and how, "even to the worst people, it is sweet,
their end once gained by a vicious act, to foist into it some show of
justice."  In the presence of this indefatigable analyst of act and
motive all fixed outlines seemed to vanish away.  The healthful
pleasure of motion, of thoughts in motion!--Yes! Gaston felt them,
the oldest of [95] them, moving, as he listened, under and away from
his feet, as if with the ground he stood on.  And this was the vein
of thought which oftenest led the master back contemptuously to
emphasise the littleness of man.--"I think we can never be despised
according to our full desert."

By way of counterpoise, there were admirable surprises in man.  That
cross-play of human tendencies determined from time to time in the
forces of unique and irresistible character, "moving all together,"
pushing the world around it to phenomenal good or evil.  For such as
"make it their business to oversee human actions, it seems impossible
they should proceed from one and the same person."  Consolidation of
qualities supposed, this did but make character, already the most
attractive, because the most dynamic, phenomenon of experience, more
interesting still.  So tranquil a spectator of so average a world, a
too critical minimiser, it might seem, of all that pretends to be of
importance, Montaigne was constantly, gratefully, announcing his
contact, in life, in books, with undeniable power and greatness, with
forces full of beauty in their vigour, like lightning, the sea, the
torrents:--overpowering desire augmented, yet victorious, by its very
difficulty; the bewildering constancy of martyrs; single-hearted
virtue not to be resolved into anything less surprising than itself;
the devotion of that famed, so companionable, wife, dying cheerfully
[96] by her own act along with the sick husband "who could do no
better than kill himself"; the grief, the joy, of which men suddenly
die; the unconscious Stoicism of the poor; that stern self-control
with which Jacques Bonhomme goes as usual to his daily labour with a
heart tragic for the dead child at home; nay! even the boldness and
strength of "those citizens who sacrifice honour and conscience, as
others of old sacrificed their lives, for the good of their country."
So carefully equable, his mind nevertheless was stored with, and
delighted in, incidents, personalities, of barbarous strength--Esau,
in all his phases--the very rudest children or "our great and
powerful mother, nature."  As Plato had said, "'twas to no purpose
for a sober-minded man to knock at the door of poesy," or, if truth
were spoken, of any other high matter of doing or making.  That was
consistent with his sympathetic belief in the capability of mere
impetuous youth as such.  Even those unexpected traits in ordinary
people which seem to hint at larger laws and deeper forces of
character, disconcerting any narrow judgment upon them, he welcomed
as akin to his own indolent, but suddenly kindling, nature:--the mere
self-will of men, the shrewd wisdom of an unlettered old woman, the
fount of goodness in a cold or malicious heart.  "I hear every day
fools say things far from foolish."  Those invincible prepossessions
of humanity, or of the [97] individual, which Bacon reckoned "idols
of the cave," are no offence to him; are direct informations, it may
be, beyond price, from a kindly spirit of truth in things.

For him there had been two grand surprises, two pre-eminent
manifestations of the power and charm of man, not to be explained
away,--one, within the compass of general and public observation: the
other, a matter of special intimacy to himself.  There had been the
greatness of the old Greek and Roman life, so greatly recorded: there
had been the wisdom and kindness of Etienne de la Boetie, as made
known in all their fulness to him alone.  That his ardent devotion to
the ancients had been rewarded with minute knowledge concerning them,
was the privilege of the age in which he was born, late in the
Revival of Letters.  But the classical reading, which with others was
often but an affectation, seducing them from the highest to a lower
degree of reality, from men and women to their mere shadows in old
books, had been for him nothing less than personal contact.  "The
qualities and fortunes" of the old Romans, especially, their
wonderful straight ways through the world, the straight passage of
their armies upon them, the splendour of their armour, of their
entire external presence and show, their "riches and embellishments,"
above all, "the suddenness of Augustus," in that grander age for
which decision was justifiable because really [98] possible, had ever
been "more in his head than the fortunes of his own country."  If "we
have no hold even on things present but by imagination," as he loved
to observe,--then, how much more potent, steadier, larger, the
imaginative substance of the world of Alexander and Socrates, of
Virgil and Caesar, than that of an age, which seemed to him, living
in the midst of it, respectable mainly by its docility, by an
imitation of the ancients which after all left untouched the real
sources of their greatness.  They had been indeed great, at the least
dramatically, redeemed in part by magnificent courage and tact, in
their very sins.  "Our force is no more able to reach them in their
vicious than in their virtuous qualities; for both the one and the
other proceed from a vigour of soul which was without comparison
greater in them than in us."

And yet, thinking of his friendship with the "incomparable Etienne de
la Boetie, so perfect, inviolate and entire, that the like is hardly
to be found in story," he had to confess that the sources of
greatness must still be quick in the world.  That had remained with
him as his one fixed standard of value in the estimate of men and
things.  On this single point, antiquity itself had been surpassed;
the discourses it had left upon friendship seeming to him "poor and
flat in comparison of the sense he had of it."  For once, his
sleepless habit of analysis had been checked by the inexplicable, the
absolute; [99] amid his jealously guarded indifference of soul he had
been summoned to yield, and had yielded, to the magnetic power of
another.  "We were halves throughout, so that methinks by outliving
him I defraud him of his part.  I was so grown to be always his
double in all things that methinks I am no more than half of myself.
There is no action or thought of mine wherein I do not miss him, as I
know that he would have missed me."  Tender yet heroic, impulsive yet
so wise, he might have done what the survivor (so it seemed to
himself) was but vainly trying to do.  It was worth his while to
become famous, if that hapless memory might but be embalmed in one's
fame.  It had been better than love,--that friendship! to the
building of which so much "concurrence" had been requisite, that
"'twas much if fortune brought the like to pass once in three ages."
Actually, we may think, the "sweet society" of those four years, in
comparison with which the rest of his so pleasant life "was but
smoke," had touched Montaigne's nature with refinements it might
otherwise have lacked.  He would have wished "to speak concerning it,
to those who had experience" of what he said, could such have been
found.  In despair of that, he loved to discourse of it to all
comers,--how it had come about, the circumstances of its sudden and
wonderful growth.  Yet after all were he pressed to say why he had so
loved Etienne de la Boetie, he [100] could but answer, "Because it
was He!  Because it was I!"

And the surprises there are in man, his complexity, his variancy,
were symptomatic of the changefulness, the confusion, the surprises,
of the earth under one's feet, of the whole material world.  The
irregular, the unforeseen, the inconsecutive, miracle, accident, he
noted lovingly: it had a philosophic import.  It was habit rather
than knowledge of them that took away the strangeness of the things
actually about one.  How many unlikely matters there were, testified
by persons worthy of faith, "which, if we cannot persuade ourselves
to believe, we ought at least to leave in suspense.--Though all that
had arrived by report of past time should be true, it would be less
than nothing in comparison of what is unknown."

On all sides we are beset by the incalculable--walled up suddenly, as
if by malign trickery, in the open field, or pushed forward
senselessly, by the crowd around us, to good-fortune.  In art, as in
poetry, there are the "transports" which lift the artist out of, as
they are not of, himself; for orators also, "those extraordinary
motions which sometimes carry them above their design."  Himself, "in
the necessity and heat of combat," had sometimes made answers, that
went "through and through," beyond hope.  The work, by its own force
and fortune, sometimes outstrips the workman.  And then, in [101]
defiance of the proprieties, whereas poets sometimes "flag, and
languish in a prosaic manner," prose will shine with the lustre,
vigour and boldness, with "the fury" of poetry.

And as to "affairs,"--how spasmodic the mixture, collision or
coincidence, of the mechanic succession of things with men's
volition!  Mere rumour, so large a factor in events,--who could trace
out its ways?  Various events (he was never tired of illustrating the
fact) "followed from the same counsel."  Fortune, chance, that is to
say, the incalculable contribution of mere matter to man, "would
still be mistress of events"; and one might think it no un-wisdom to
commit everything to fortuity.  But no! "fortune too is oft-times
observed to act by the rule of reason: chance itself comes round to
hold of justice;" war, above all, being a matter in which fortune was
inexplicable, though men might seem to have made it the main business
of their lives.  If "the force of all counsel lies in the occasion,"
that is because things perpetually shift.  If man--his taste, his
very conscience--change with the habit of time and place, that is
because habit is the emphatic determination, the tyranny, of changing
external and material circumstance.  So it comes about that every one
gives the name of barbarism to what is not in use round about him,
excepting perhaps the Greeks and Romans, somewhat conventionally; and
Montaigne was fond of assuring people, [102] suddenly, that could we
have those privileged Greeks and Romans actually to sit beside us for
a while, they would be found to offend our niceties at a hundred
points.  We have great power of taking ourselves in, and "pay
ourselves with words."  Words too, language itself, and therewith the
more intimate physiognomy of thought, "slip every day through our
fingers."  With his eye on his own labour, wistfully, he thought on
the instability of the French language in particular--a matter, after
all, so much less "perennial than brass."  In no respect was nature
more stable, more consecutive, than man.

In nature, indeed, as in one's self, there might be no ultimate
inconsequence: only, "the soul looks upon things with another eye,
and represents them to itself with another kind of face: for
everything has many faces and several aspects.  There is nothing
single and rare in respect of itself, but only in respect of our
knowledge, which is a wretched foundation whereon to ground our
rules, and one that represents to us a very false image of things."
Ah! even in so "dear" a matter as bodily health, immunity from
physical pain, what doubts! what variations of experience, of learned
opinion!  Already, in six years of married life, of four children
treated so carefully, never, for instance, roughly awaked from sleep,
"wherein," he would observe, "children are much more profoundly
involved than we,"--of four children, [103] two were dead, and one
even now miserably sick.  Seeing the doctor depart one morning a
little hastily, on the payment of his fee, he was tempted to some
nice questions as to the money's worth.  "There are so many maladies,
and so many circumstances, presented to the physician, that human
sense must soon be at the end of its lesson:--the many complexions in
a melancholy person; the many seasons in winter; the many nations in
the French; the many ages in age; the many celestial mutations in the
conjunction of Venus and Saturn; the many parts in man's body, nay,
in a finger.  And suppose the cure effected, how can we assure
ourselves that it was not because the disease was arrived at its
period, or an effect of chance, or the operation of something else
that the child had eaten, drunk, or touched that day, or by virtue of
his mother's prayers?  We suppose we see one side of a thing when we
are really looking at another.  As for me, I never see all of
anything; neither do they who so largely promise to show it to
others.  Of the hundred faces that everything has I take one, and am
for the most part attracted by some new light I find in it."

And that new light was sure to lead him back very soon to his
"governing method, ignorance"--an ignorance "strong and generous, and
that yields nothing in honour and courage to knowledge; an ignorance,
which to conceive requires no less knowledge than to conceive [104]
knowledge itself"--a sapient, instructed, shrewdly ascertained
ignorance, suspended judgment, doubt everywhere.--Balances, very
delicate balances; he was partial to that image of equilibrium, or
preponderance, in things.  But was there, after all, so much as
preponderance anywhere?  To Gaston there was a kind of fascination,
an actually aesthetic beauty, in the spectacle of that keen-edged
intelligence, dividing evidence so finely, like some exquisite steel
instrument with impeccable sufficiency, always leaving the last word
loyally to the central intellectual faculty, in an entire
disinterestedness.  If on the one hand he was always distrustful of
things that he wished, on the other he had many opinions he would
endeavour to make his son dislike, if he had one.  What if the truest
opinions were not always the most commodious to man, "being of so
wild a composition"?  He would say nothing to one party that he might
not on occasion say to the other, "with a little alteration of
accent."  Yes!  Doubt, everywhere! doubt in the far background, as
the proper intellectual equivalent to the infinite possibilities of
things: doubt, shrewdly economising the opportunities of the present
hour, in the very spirit of the traveller who walks only for the
walk's sake,--"every day concludes my expectation, and the journey of
my life is carried on after the same fashion": doubt, finally, as
"the best of pillows to sleep on."  And in fact Gaston did sleep well
after [105] those long days of physical and intellectual movement, in
that quiet world, till the spring came round again.

But beyond and above all the various interests upon which the
philosopher's mind was for ever afloat, there was one subject always
in prominence--himself.  His minute peculiarities, mental and
physical, what was constitutional with him as well as his transient
humours, how things affected him, what they really were to him,
Michael, much more than man, all this Gaston came to know, as the
world knew it afterwards in the Essays, often amused, sometimes
irritated, but never suspicious of postures, or insincerity.
Montaigne himself admitted his egotism with frank humour:--"in favour
of the Huguenots, who condemn our private confession, I confess
myself in public."  And this outward egotism of manner was but the
symptom of a certain deeper doctrinal egotism:--"I have no other end
in writing but to discover myself."  And what was the purport, what
the justification, of this undissembled egotism?  It was the
recognition, over against, or in continuation of, that world of
floating doubt, of the individual mind, as for each one severally, at
once the unique organ, and the only matter, of knowledge,--the
wonderful energy, the reality and authority of that, in its absolute
loneliness, conforming all things to its law, without witnesses as
without judge, without appeal, save to itself. [106] Whatever truth
there might be, must come for each one from within, not from without.
To that wonderful microcosm of the individual soul, of which, for
each one, all other worlds are but elements,--to himself,--to what
was apparent immediately to him, what was "properly of his own having
and substance": he confidently dismissed the inquirer.  His own
egotism was but the pattern of the true intellectual life of every
one.  "The greatest thing in the world is for a man to know that he
is his own.  If the world find fault that I speak too much of myself,
I find fault that they do not so much as think of themselves."  How
it had been "lodged in its author":--that, surely, was the essential
question, concerning every opinion that comes to one man from
another.

Yet, again, even on this ultimate ground of judgment, what undulancy,
complexity, surprises!--"I have no other end in writing but to
discover myself, who also shall peradventure be another thing to-
morrow."  The great work of his life, the Essays, he placed "now
high, now low, with great doubt and inconstancy."  "What are we but
sedition? like this poor France, faction against faction, within
ourselves, every piece playing every moment its own game, with as
much difference between us and ourselves as between ourselves and
others.  Whoever will look narrowly into his own bosom will hardly
find himself twice in the same condition. [107] I give to myself
sometimes one face and sometimes another, according to the side I
turn to.  I have nothing to say of myself, entirely and without
qualification.  One grows familiar with all strange things by time.
But the more I frequent myself and the better I know myself, the less
do I understand myself.  If others would consider themselves as I do,
they would find themselves full of caprice.  Rid myself of it I
cannot without making myself away.  They who are not aware of it have
the better bargain.  And yet I know not whether they have or no!"

One's own experience!--that, at least, was one's own: low and earthy,
it might be; still, the earth was, emphatically, good, good-natured;
and he loved, emphatically, to recommend the wisdom, amid all doubts,
of keeping close to it.  Gaston soon knew well a certain threadbare
garment worn by Montaigne in all their rides together, sitting
quaintly on his otherwise gallant appointments,--an old mantle that
had belonged to his father.  Retained, as he tells us, in spite of
its inconvenience, "because it seemed to envelope me in him," it was
the symbol of a hundred natural, perhaps somewhat material, pieties.
Parentage, kinship, relationship through earth,--the touch of that
was everywhere like a caress to him.  His fine taste notwithstanding,
he loved, in those long rambles, to partake of homely fare, paying
largely for it.  Everywhere it was as if the earth in him turned
kindly to [108] earth.  "Under the sun," the sturdy purple thistles,
the blossoming burrs also, were worth knowing.  Let us grow together
with you! they seem to say.  Himself was one of those whom he thought
"Heaven favoured" in making them die, so naturally, by degrees.  "I
shall be blind before I am sensible of the decay of my sight, with
such kindly artifice do the Fatal Sisters entwist our lives.  I melt,
and steal away from myself.  How variously is it no longer I!"  It
was not he who would carry a furry robe at midsummer, because he
might need it in the winter.--"In fine, we must live among the
living, and let the river flow under the bridge without our care,
above all things avoiding fear, that great disturber of reason.  The
thing in the world I am most afraid of is fear."

And still, health, the invincible survival of youth, "admonished him
to a better wisdom than years and sickness."  Was there anything
better, fairer, than the beautiful light of health?  To be in health
was itself the sign, perhaps the essence, of wisdom--a wisdom, rich
in counsels regarding all one's contacts with the earthy side of
existence.  And how he could laugh!--at that King of Thrace, for
instance, who had a religion and a god all to himself, which his
subjects might not presume to worship; at that King of Mexico, who
swore at his coronation not only to keep the laws, but also to make
the sun run his annual course; at those followers [109] of Alexander,
who all carried their heads on one side as Alexander did.  The
natural second-best, the intermediate and unheroic virtue (even the
Church, as we know, by no means requiring "heroic" virtue), was
perhaps actually the best, better than any kind of heroism, in an age
whose very virtues were apt to become insane; an age "guilty and
extravagant" in its very justice; for which, as regards all that
belongs to the spirit, the one thing needful was moderation.  And it
was characteristic of Montaigne, a note of the real helpfulness there
was in his thoughts, that he preferred to base virtue on low, safe,
ground.  "The lowest walk is the safest: 'tis the seat of constancy."
The wind about the tower, coming who knows whence and whither?--could
one enjoy its music, unless one knew the foundations safe, twenty
feet below-ground?  Always he loved to hear such words as "soften and
modify the temerity of our propositions."  To say less than the truth
about it, to dissemble the absoluteness of its claim, was agreeable
to his confidence in the natural charm, the gaiety, of goodness,
"that fair and beaten path nature has traced for us," over against
any difficult, militant, or chimerical virtue.--"Never had any morose
and ill-looking physician done anything to purpose."  In that age, it
was a great thing to be just blameless.  Virtue had its bounds,
"which once transgressed, the next step was into the territories
[110] of vice."  "All decent and honest means of securing ourselves
from harm, were not only permitted but commendable."  Any man who
despises his own life, might "always be master of that of another."
He would not condemn "a magistrate who sleeps; provided the people
under his charge sleep as well as he."  Though a blundering world,
in collusion with a prejudiced philosophy, has "a great suspicion of
facility," there was a certain easy taking of things which made life
the richer for others as well as for one's self, and was at least an
excellent makeshift for disinterested service to them.  With all his
admiration for the antique greatness of character, he would never
commend "so savage a virtue, and one that costs so dear," as that,
for instance, of the Greek mother, the Roman father, who assisted to
put their own erring sons to death.  More truly commendable was the
custom of the Lacedaemonians, who when they went to battle sacrificed
always to the Muses, that "these might, by their sweetness and
gaiety, soften martial fury."  How had divine philosophy herself been
discredited by the sour mask, the sordid patches, with which, her
enemies surely! had sent her abroad into the world.  "I love a gay
and civil philosophy.  There is nothing more cheerful than wisdom: I
had like to have said more wanton."

Was that why his conversation was sometimes coarse?  "All the
contraries are to be found in [111] me, in one corner or another"; if
delicacy, so also coarseness.  Delicacy there was, certainly,--a
wonderful fineness of sensation.  "To the end," he tells us, "that
sleep should not so stupidly escape from me, I have caused myself to
be disturbed in my sleep, so that I might the better and more
sensibly taste and relish it.--Of scents, the simple and natural seem
to me the most pleasing, and I have often observed that they cause an
alteration in me, and work upon my spirits according to their several
virtues.  In excessive heats I always travel by night, from sunset to
sunrise.  I am betimes sensible of the little breezes that begin to
sing and whistle in the shrouds, the forerunners of the storm.--When
I walk alone in a beautiful orchard, if my thoughts are for a while
taken up with foreign occurrences, I some part of the time call them
back again to my walk, to the orchard, to the sweetness of the
solitude, and to myself.--There is nothing in us either purely
corporeal, or purely spiritual.  'Tis an inhuman wisdom that would
have us despise and hate the culture of the body.  'Tis not a soul,
'tis not a body, we are training up, but a man; and we ought not to
divide him.  Of all the infirmities we have, the most savage is to
despise our being."

There was a fineness of sensation in these unpremeditated thoughts,
which to Gaston seemed to connect itself with the exquisite words he
had found to paint his two great affections, for his [112] father and
for Etienne de la Boetie,--a fineness of sensation perhaps quite
novel in that age, but still of physical sensation: and in pursuit of
fine physical sensation he came, on his broad, easy, indifferent
passage through the world, across the coarsest growths which also
thrive "under the sun," and was not revolted.  They were akin to that
ruder earth within himself, of which a kind of undissembled greed was
symptomatic; the love of "meats little roasted, very high, and even,
as to several, quite gone"; while, in drinking, he loved "clear
glass, that the eye might taste too, according to its capacity"; akin
also to a certain slothfulness:--"Sleeping," he says, "has taken up a
great part of my life."  And there was almost nothing he would not
say: no fact, no story, from his curious half-medical reading, he
would not find some plausible pretext to tell.  Man's kinship to the
animal, the material, and all the proofs of it:--he would never blush
at them!  In truth, he led the way to the immodesty of French
literature; and had his defence, a sort of defence, ready.  "I know
very well that few will quarrel with the licence of my writings, who
have not more to quarrel with in the licence of their own thoughts."

Yet when Gaston, twenty years afterwards, heard of the seemingly
pious end of Monsieur de Montaigne, he recalled a hundred, always
quiet but not always insignificant, acts of devotion, noticeable in
those old days, on passing a village [113] church, or at home, in the
little chapel--superstitions, concessions to others, strictly
appropriate recognitions rather, as it might seem, of a certain great
possibility, which might lie among the conditions of so complex a
world.  That was a point which could hardly escape so reflective a
mind as Gaston's: and at a later period of his life, at the harvest
of his own second thoughts, as he pondered on the influence over him
of that two-sided thinker, the opinion that things as we find them
would bear a certain old-fashioned construction, seemed to have been
the consistent motive, however secret and subtle in its working, of
Montaigne's sustained intellectual activity.  A lowly philosophy of
ignorance would not be likely to disallow or discredit whatever
intimations there might be, in the experience of the wise or of the
simple, in favour of a venerable religion, which from its long
history had come to seem like a growth of nature.  Somewhere, among
men's seemingly random and so inexplicable apprehensions, might lie
the grains of a wisdom more precious than gold, or even its priceless
pearl.  That "free and roving thing," the human soul--what might it
not have found out for itself, in a world so wide?  To deny, at all
events, would be only "to limit the mind, by negation."

It was not however this side of that double philosophy which
recommended itself just now to Gaston.  The master's wistful
tolerance, so [114] extraordinary a characteristic in that age,
attracted him, in his present humour, not so much in connexion with
those problematic heavenly lights that might find their way to one
from infinite skies, as with the pleasant, quite finite, objects and
experiences of the indubitable world of sense, so close around him.
Over against the world's challenge to make trial of it, here was that
general licence, which his own warm and curious appetite just then
demanded of the moral theorist.  For so pronounced a lover of
sincerity as Monsieur de Montaigne, there was certainly a strange
ambiguousness in the result of his lengthy inquiries, on the greatest
as well as on the lightest matters, and it was inevitable that a
listener should accept the dubious lesson in his own sense.  Was this
shrewd casuist only bringing him by a roundabout way to principles he
would not have cared to avow?  To the great religious thinker of the
next century, to Pascal, Montaigne was to figure as emphatically on
the wrong side, not merely because "he that is not with us, is
against us."  It was something to have been, in the matter of
religious tolerance, as on many other matters of justice and
gentleness, the solitary conscience of the age.  But could one really
care for truth, who never even seemed to find it?  Did he fear,
perhaps, the practical responsibility of getting to the very bottom
of certain questions?  That the actual discourse of so keen a thinker
appeared often inconsistent or inconsecutive, might be a [115] hint
perhaps that there was some deeper ground of thought in reserve; as
if he were really moving, securely, over ground you did not see.
What might that ground be?  As to Gaston himself,--had this kindly
entertainer only been drawing the screws of a very complex piece of
machinery which had worked well enough hitherto for all practical
purposes?--Was this all that had been going on, while he lingered
there, week after week, in a kind of devout attendance on theories,
and, for his part, feeling no reverberation of actual events around
him, still less of great events in preparation?  These were the
questions Gaston had in mind, as, at length, he thanked his host one
morning with real regret, and took his last look around that
meditative place, the manuscripts, the books, the emblems,--the house
of Circe on the wall.



VI.  SHADOWS OF EVENTS

[116] We all feel, I suppose, the pathos of that mythic situation in
Homer, where the Greeks at the last throb of battle around the body
of Patroclus find the horror of supernatural darkness added to their
other foes; feel it through some touch of truth to our own experience
how the malignancy of the forces against us may be doubled by their
uncertainty and the resultant confusion of one's own mind--blindfold
night there too, at the moment when daylight and self-possession are
indispensable.

In that old dream-land of the Iliad such darkness is the work of a
propitiable deity, and withdrawn at its pleasure; in life, it often
persists obstinately.  It was so with the agents on the terrible Eve
of St. Bartholomew, 1572, when a man's foes were those of his own
household.  An ambiguity of motive and influence, a confusion of
spirit amounting, as we approach the centre of action, to physical
madness, encompasses [117] those who are formally responsible for
things; and the mist around that great crime, or great "accident," in
which the gala weather of Gaston's coming to Paris broke up, leaving
a sullenness behind it to remain for a generation, has never been
penetrated.  The doubt with which Charles the Ninth would seem to
have left the world, doubt as to his own complicity therein, as well
as to the precise nature, the course and scope, of the event itself,
is still unresolved.  So it was with Gaston also.  The incident in
his life which opened for him the profoundest sources of regret and
pity, shaped as it was in a measure by those greater historic
movements, owed its tragic significance there to an unfriendly shadow
precluding knowledge how certain facts had really gone, a shadow
which veiled from others a particular act of his and the true
character of its motives.

For, the scene of events being now contracted very closely to Paris,
the predestined actors therein were gradually drawn thither as into
some narrow battlefield or slaughter-house or fell trap of destiny,
and Gaston, all unconsciously, along with them--he and his private
fortunes involved in those larger ones.  Result of chance, or fate,
or cunning prevision, there are in the acts great and little--the
acts and the words alike--of the king and his associates, at this
moment, coincidences which give them at least superficially the
colour of an elaborate conspiracy. [118] Certainly, as men looked
back afterwards, all the seemingly random doings of those restless
months ending in the Noces Vermeilles marriage of Henry of Navarre
with Margaret of France, lent themselves agreeably to the theory of a
great plot to crush out at one blow, in the interest of the reigning
Valois, not the Huguenots only but the rival houses of Guise and
Bourbon.  The word, the act, from hour to hour through what presented
itself at the time as a long-continued season of frivolity, suggested
in retrospect alike to friend and foe the close connexion of a
mathematical problem.  And yet that damning coincidence of date, day
and hour apparently so exactly timed, in the famous letter to the
Governor of Lyons, by which Charles, the trap being now ready, seems
to shut all the doors upon escaping victims, is admitted even by
Huguenot historians to have been fortuitous.  Gaston, recalling to
mind the actual mien of Charles as be passed to and fro across the
chimeric scene, timid, and therefore constitutionally trustful
towards older persons, filially kissing the hand of the grim Coligni-
-Mon pere!  Mon pere!--all his calineries in that age of courtesy and
assassinations--would wonder always in time to come, as the more
equitable sort of historians have done, what amount of guilty
foresight the young king had carried in his bosom.  And this
ambiguity regarding the nearest agent in so great a crime, adding
itself to the general mystery of life, touched Gaston duly with a
sense [119] of the dim melancholy of man's position in the world.  It
might seem the function of some cruel or merely whimsical power,
thus, by the flinging of mere dust through the air, to double our
actual misfortunes.  However carefully the critical intelligence in
him might trim the balance, his imagination at all events would never
be clear of the more plausible construction of events.  In spite of
efforts not to misjudge, in proportion to the clearness with which he
recalled the visible footsteps of the "accursed" Valois, he saw them,
irresistibly, in connexion with the end actually reached, moving to
the sounds of wedding music, through a world of dainty gestures, amid
sonnets and flowers, and perhaps the most refined art the world has
seen, to their surfeit of blood.

And if those "accursed" Valois might plead to be judged refinedly, so
would Gaston, had the opportunity come, have pleaded not to be
misunderstood.  Of the actual event he was not a spectator, and his
sudden absence from Paris at that moment seemed to some of those he
left there only a cruelly characteristic incident in the great
treachery.  Just before that delirious night set in, the news that
his old grandfather lay mortally sick at Deux-manoirs had snatched
him away to watch by the dying bed, amid the peaceful ministries of
the religion which was even then filling the houses of Paris with
blood.  But the yellow-haired woman, light of soul, whose husband he
had become by dubious and [120] irregular Huguenot rites, the
religious sanction of which he hardly recognised--flying after his
last tender kiss, with the babe in her womb, from the ruins of her
home, and the slaughter of her kinsmen, supposed herself
treacherously deserted.  For him, on the other hand, "the pity of
it," the pity of the thing supplied all that had been wanting in its
first consecration, and made the lost mistress really a wife.  His
recoil from that damaging theory of his conduct brought home to a
sensitive conscience the fact that there had indeed been a measure of
self-indulgent weakness in his acts, and made him the creature for
the rest of his days of something like remorse.

The gaiety, the strange devils' gaiety of France, at least in all
places whither its royalty came, ended appropriately in a marriage--a
marriage of "The Reform" in the person of Prince Henry of Navarre, to
Catholicism in the person of Margaret of Valois, Margaret of the
"Memoirs," Charles's sister, in tacit defiance of, or indifference
to, the Pope.  With the great Huguenot leaders, with the princes of
the house of Guise, and the Court, like one united family, all in
gaudy evidence in its streets, Paris, ever with an eye for the chance
of amusement, always preoccupied with the visible side of things,
always Catholic--was bidden to be tolerant for a moment, to carry no
fire-arms under penalties, "to renew no past [121] quarrels," and
draw no sword in any new one.  It was the perfect stroke of
Catherine's policy, the secret of her predominance over her sons,
thus, with a flight of purchaseable fair women ever at command, to
maintain perpetual holiday, perpetual idleness, with consequent
perpetual, most often idle, thoughts about marriage, amid which the
actual conduct of affairs would be left to herself.  Yet for Paris
thus Catholic, there was certainly, even if the Pope were induced to
consent, and the Huguenot bride-groom to "conform," something illicit
and inauspicious about this marriage within the prohibited degrees of
kinship.  In fact, the cunningly sought papal dispensation never
came; Charles, with apparent unconcern, fulfilled his threat, and did
without it; must needs however trick the old Cardinal de Bourbon into
performing his office, not indeed "in the face of the Church," but in
the open air outside the doors of the cathedral of Notre-Dame, the
Catholics quietly retiring into the interior, when that starveling
ceremony was over, to hear the nuptial mass.  Still, the open air,
the August sunshine, had lent the occasion an irresistible physical
gaiety in this hymeneal Assumption weather.  Paris, suppressing its
scruples, its conscientious and unconscientious hatreds, at least for
a season, had adorned herself as that fascinating city always has
been able to adorn herself, if with something of artifice, certainly
[121] with great completeness, almost to illusion.  Whatever gloom
the Middle Age with its sins and sorrows might have left there, was
under gallant disguise to-day.  In the train of the young married
people, jeunes premiers in an engagement which was to turn out almost
as transitory as a stage-play, a long month of masquerade meandered
night and day through the public places.  His carnality and hers, so
startling in their later developments, showed now in fact but as the
engaging force of youth, since youth, however unpromising its
antecedents, can never have sinned irretrievably.  Yet to curious
retrospective minds not long afterwards, these graceful follies would
seem tragic or allegoric, with an undercurrent of infernal irony
throughout.  Charles and his two brothers, keeping the gates of a
mimic paradise in the court of the Louvre, while the fountains ran
wine--were they already thinking of a time when they would keep those
gates, with iron purpose, while the gutters ran blood?

If Huguenots were disgusted with the frivolities of the hour, passing
on the other side of the street in sad attire, plotting, as some have
thought, as their enemies will persuade the Pope, a yet more terrible
massacre of their own, only anticipated by the superior force and
shrewdness of the Catholics, on the very eve of its accomplishment--
they did but serve just now to relieve the predominant white and red,
[123] and thereby double the brilliancy, of a gay picture.  Yet a
less than Machiavellian cunning might perhaps have detected, amid all
this sudden fraternity--as in some unseasonably fine weather signs of
coming distress--a risky element of exaggeration in those
precipitately patched-up amities, a certain hollow ring in those
improbable religious conversions, those unlikely reconciliations in
what was after all an age of treachery as a fine art.  With Gaston,
however, the merely receptive and poetic sense of life was abundantly
occupied with the spectacular value of the puissant figures in motion
around him.  If he went beyond the brilliancy of the present moment
in his wonted pitiful equitable after-thoughts, he was still
concerned only with the more general aspects of the human lot, and
did not reflect that every public movement, however generous in its
tendency, is really flushed to active force by identification with
some narrower personal or purely selfish one.  Coligni, "the
Admiral," centre of Huguenot opposition, just, kind, grim, to the
height of inspired genius, the grandest character his faith had yet
produced--undeterred by those ominous voices (of aged women and the
like) which are apt to beset all great actions, yielded readily to
the womanish endearments of Charles, his filial words and fond
touching of the hands, the face, aged at fifty-five--just this
portion of his conduct let us hope being exclusive of his precise
share [124] in the "conspiracy."  And the opportune death in Paris of
the Huguenot Queen of Navarre only stirred question for a moment:
autopsy revealed no traces of unfair play, though at a time credulous
as to impossible poisoned perfumes and such things, romantic in its
very suspicions.

Delirium was in the air already charged with thunder, and laid hold
on Gaston too.  It was as if through some unsettlement in the
atmospheric medium the objects around no longer acted upon the senses
with the normal result.  Looking back afterwards, this singularly
self-possessed person had to confess that under its influence he had
lost for a while the exacter view of certain outlines, certain real
differences and oppositions of things in that hotly coloured world of
Paris (like a shaken tapestry about him) awaiting the Eve of Saint
Bartholomew.  Was the "undulant" philosophy of Monsieur de Montaigne,
in collusion with this dislocating time, at work upon him, that,
following with only too entire a mobility the experience of the hour,
he found himself more than he could have thought possible the toy of
external accident?  Lodged in Abelard's quarter, he all but repeats
Abelard's typical experience.  His new Heloise, with capacities
doubtless, as he reflected afterwards regretfully, for a refined and
serious happiness, although actually so far only a man's plaything,
sat daintily amid her posies and painted potteries in the [125]
window of a house itself as forbidding and stern as her kinsmen, busy
Huguenot printers, well-to-do at a time not only fertile in new books
and new editions, but profuse of tracts, sheets, satiric handbills
for posting all over France.  Gaston's curiosity, a kind of
fascination he finds in their dark ways, takes him among them on
occasion, to feel all the more keenly the contrast of that picture-
like prettiness in this framing of their grim company, their grim
abode.  Her frivolity is redeemed by a sensitive affection for these
people who protect her, by a self-accusing respect for their
religion, for the somewhat surly goodness, the hard and unattractive
pieties into which she cannot really enter; and she yearns after her
like, for those harmless forbidden graces towards which she has a
natural aptitude, loses her heart to Gaston as he goes to and fro,
wastes her days in reminiscence of that bright passage, notes the
very fineness of his linen.  To him, in turn, she seems, as all
longing creatures ever have done, to have some claim upon him--a
right to consideration--to an effort on his part: he finds a sister
to encourage: she touches him, clings where she touches.  The gloomy,
honest, uncompromising Huguenot brothers interfere just in time to
save her from the consequence of what to another than Gaston might
have counted as only a passing fondness to be soon forgotten; and the
marriage almost forced upon him seemed under its actual conditions no
binding sacrament. [126] A marriage really indissoluble in itself,
and for the heart of Colombe sacramental, as he came afterwards to
understand--for his own conscience at the moment, the transaction
seemed to have but the transitoriness, as also the guilt of a vagrant
love.  A connexion so light of motive, so inexpressive of what seemed
the leading forces of his character, he might, but for the sorrow
which stained its actual issue, have regarded finally as a mere
mistake, or an unmeaning accident in his career.

Coligni lay suffering in the fiery August from the shot of the
ambiguous assassin which had missed his heart, amid the real or
feigned regrets of the Guises, of the royal family, of his true
friends, wondering as they watched whether the bullet had been a
poisoned one.  The other Huguenot leaders had had their warnings to
go home, as the princes of the house of Navarre, Conde and Henry of
Bearn, would fain have done--the gallant world about them being come
just now to have certain suspicious resemblances to a prison or a
trap.  Under order of the king the various quarters of Paris had been
distributed for some unrevealed purpose of offence or defence.  To
the officers in immediate charge it was intimated that "those of the
new religion" designed "to rise against the king's authority, to the
trouble of his subjects and the city of Paris.  For the prevention of
which conspiracy the king enjoined the Provost to possess himself
[127] of the keys of the various city gates, and seize all boats
plying on the river, to the end that none might enter or depart."
And just before the lists close around the doomed, Gaston has bounded
away on his road homeward to the bed of the dying grandfather, after
embracing his wife, anxious, if she might, to share his journey, with
some forecast of coming evil among those dark people.

The white badges of Catholicism had been distributed, not to every
Catholic (a large number of Catholics perished), to some Huguenots
such as La Rochefoucauld, brave guerrier et joyeux compagnon, dear to
Charles, hesitating still with some last word of conscience in his
ear at the very gate of the Louvre, when a random pistol-shot, in the
still undisturbed August night, rousing sudden fear for himself,
precipitates the event, and as if in delirium he is driven forth on
the scent of human blood.  He had always hunted like a madman.  It
was thus "the matins of Paris" began, in which not religious zealots
only assisted, but the thieves, the wanton, the unemployed, the
reckless children, les enfants massacreurs like those seen dragging
an insulted dead body to the Seine, greed or malice or the desire for
swift settlement of some long-pending law-suit finding here an
opportunity.  A religious pretext had brought into sudden evidence
all the latent ferocities of a corrupt though dainty civilisation,
and while the stairways of the Louvre, the streets, [128] the vile
trap-doors of Paris, run blood, far away at Deux-manoirs Gaston
watches as the light creeps over the silent cornfields, the last
sense of it in those aged eyes now ebbing softly away.  The village
priest, almost as aged, assists patiently with his immemorial
consolations at this long, leisurely, scarce perceptible ending to a
long, leisurely life, on the quiet double-holiday morning.*

The wild news of public disaster, penetrating along the country roads
now bristling afresh with signs of universal war, seemed of little
consequence in comparison with that closer grief at home, which made
just then the more effective demand on his sympathy, till the thought
came of the position of Colombe--his wife left behind there in Paris.
Immediate rumour, like subsequent history, gave variously the number-
-the number of thousands--who perished.  The great Huguenot leader
was dead, one party at least, the royal party, safe for the moment
and in high spirits.  As Charles himself put it, the ancient private
quarrel between the houses of Guise and Chatillon was ended by the
decease of the chief of the latter, Coligni de Chatillon--a death so
saintly after its new fashion that the long-delayed vengeance of
Henri de Guise on the presumed instigator of the murder of his father
seemed a martyrdom.  And around that central barbarity the slaughter
had spread over Paris in widening [129] circles.  With conflicting
thoughts, in wild terror and grief, Gaston seeks the footsteps of
Colombe, of her people, from their rifled and deserted house to the
abodes of their various acquaintance, like the traces of wrecked men
under deep water.  Yet even amid his private distress, queries on
points of more general interest in the event would not be excluded.
With whom precisely, in whose interest had the first guilty motion
been?--Gaston on the morrow asked in vain as the historian asks
still.  And more and more as he picked his way among the direful
records of the late massacre, not the cruelty only but the obscurity,
the accidental character, yet, alas! also the treachery, of the
public event seemed to identify themselves tragically with his own
personal action.  Those queries, those surmises were blent with the
enigmatic sense of his own helplessness amid the obscure forces
around him, which would fain compromise the indifferent, and had made
him so far an accomplice in their unfriendly action that he felt
certainly not quite guiltless, thinking of his own irresponsible,
self-centered, passage along the ways, through the weeks that had
ended in the public crime and his own private sorrow.  Pity for those
unknown or half-known neighbours whose faces he must often have
looked on--ces pauvres morts!--took an almost remorseful character
from his grief for the delicate creature whose vain longings had been
perhaps but a rudimentary aptitude for the [130] really high things
himself had represented to her fancy, the refined happiness to which
he might have helped her.  The being whose one claim had lain in her
incorrigible lightness, came to seem representative of the suffering
of the whole world in its plenitude of piteous detail, in those
unvalued caresses, that desire towards himself, that patient half-
expressed claim not to be wholly despised, poignant now for ever.
For he failed to find her: and her brothers being presumably dead,
all he could discover of a certainty from the last survivor of her
more distant kinsmen was the fact of her flight into the country,
already in labour it was thought, and in the belief that she had been
treacherously deserted, like many another at that great crisis.  In
the one place in the neighbourhood of Paris with which his knowledge
connected her he seeks further tidings, but hears only of her passing
through it, as of a passage into vague infinite space; a little
onward, dimly of her death, with the most damaging view of his own
conduct presented with all the condemnatory resources of Huguenot
tongues, but neither of the place nor the circumstances of that
event, nor whether, as seemed hardly probable, the child survived.
It was not till many years afterwards that he stood by her grave,
still with no softening of the cruel picture driven then as with fire
into his soul; her affection, her confidence in him still contending
with the suspicions, the ill-concealed [131] antipathy to him of her
hostile brothers, the distress of her flight, half in dread to find
the husband she was pursuing with the wildness of some lost child,
who seeking its parents begins to suspect treacherous abandonment.
That most mortifying view of his actions had doubtless been further
enforced on her by others, the worst possible reading, to her own
final discomfiture, of a not unfaithful heart.

NOTES

128. *Sunday, August 24, Feast of St. Bartholomew.



VII.  THE LOWER PANTHEISM

     Jetzo, da ich ausgewachsen,
     Viel gelesen, viel gereist,
     Schwillt mein Herz, und ganz von Herzen,
     Glaub' ich an den Heilgen Geist.--HEINE.+

[132] Those who were curious to trace the symmetries of chance or
destiny felt now quite secure in observing that, of nine French kings
of the name, every third Charles had been a madman.  Over the exotic,
nervous creature who had inherited so many delicacies of
organisation, the coarse rage or rabies of the wolf, part, doubtless,
of an inheritance older still, had asserted itself on that terrible
night of Saint Bartholomew, at the mere sight, the scent, of blood,
in the crime he had at least allowed others to commit; and it was not
an unfriendly witness who recorded that, the fever once upon him, for
an hour he had been less a man than a beast of prey.  But,
exemplifying that exquisite fineness of cruelty proper to an ideal
tragedy, with the [133] work of his madness all around him, he awoke
sane next day, to remain so--aged at twenty-one--seeking for the few
months left him to forget himself in his old out-of-door amusements,
rending a consumptive bosom with the perpetual horn-blowing which
could never rouse again the gay morning of life.

"I have heard," says Brantome, of Elisabeth, Charles's queen, "that
on the Eve of Saint Bartholomew, she, having no knowledge of the
matter, went to rest at her accustomed hour, and, sleeping till the
morning, was told, as she arose, of the brave mystery then playing.
'Alas!' she cried; 'the king! my husband! does he know it?'  'Ay!
Madam,' they answered; 'the king himself has ordained it.'  'God!'
she cried; 'how is this? and what counsellors be they who have given
him this advice?  O God, be pitiful! for unless Thou art pitiful I
fear this offence will never be pardoned unto him;' and asking for
her 'Hours,' suddenly betook herself to prayer, weeping."

Like the shrinking, childish Elisabeth, the Pope also wept at that
dubious service to his Church from one who was, after all, a Huguenot
in belief; and Huguenots themselves pitied his end.--"Ah!  ces
pauvres morts! que j'ai eu un meschant conseil!  Ah! ma nourrice! ma
mie, ma nourrice! que de sang, et que de meurtres!"

It was a peculiarity of the naturally devout [134] Gaston that,
habituated to yield himself to the poetic guidance of the Catholic
Church in her wonderful, year-long, dramatic version of the story of
redemption, he had ever found its greatest day least evocative of
proportionate sympathy.  The sudden gaieties of Easter morning, the
congratulations to the Divine Mother, the sharpness of the recoil
from one extreme of feeling to the other, for him never cleared away
the Lenten pre-occupation with Christ's death and passion: the empty
tomb, with the white clothes lying, was still a tomb: there was no
human warmth in the "spiritual body": the white flowers, after all,
were those of a funeral, with a mortal coldness, amid the loud
Alleluias, which refused to melt at the startling summons, any more
than the earth will do in the March morning because we call it
Spring.  It was altogether different with that other festival which
celebrates the Descent of the Spirit, the tongues, the nameless
impulses gone all abroad, to soften slowly, to penetrate, all things,
as with the winning subtlety of nature, or of human genius.  The
gracious Pentecostal fire seemed to be in alliance with the sweet,
warm, relaxing winds of that later, securer, season, bringing their
spicy burden from unseen sources.  Into the close world, like a
walled garden, about him, influences from remotest time and space
found their way, travelling unerringly on their long journeys, as
[135] if straight to him, with the assurance that things were not
wholly left to themselves; yet so unobtrusively that, a little later,
the transforming spiritual agency would be discernible at most in the
grateful cry of an innocent child, in some good deed of a bad man, or
unlooked-for gentleness of a rough one, in the occasional turning to
music of a rude voice.  Through the course of years during which
Gaston was to remain in Paris, very close to other people's sins,
interested, all but entangled, in a world of corruption in flower
(pleasantly enough to the eye), those influences never failed him.
At times it was as if a legion of spirits besieged his door: "Open
unto me!  Open unto me!  My sister, my love, my dove, my undefiled!"
And one result, certainly, of this constant prepossession was, that
it kept him on the alert concerning theories of the divine assistance
to man, and the world,--theories of inspiration.  On the Feast of
Pentecost, on the afternoon of the thirtieth of May, news of the
death of Charles the Ninth had gone abroad promptly, with large
rumours as to the manner of it.  Those streams of blood blent
themselves fantastically in Gaston's memory of the event with the
gaudy colours of the season--the crazy red trees in blossom upon the
heated sky above the old grey walls; like a fiery sunset, it might
seem, as he looked back over the ashen intervening years.  To
Charles's successor (he and [136] the Queen-mother now delightfully
secure from fears, however unreasonable, of Charles's jerking dagger)
the day became a sweet one, to be noted unmistakably by various pious
and other observances, which still further fixed the thought of that
Sunday on Gaston's mind, with continual surmise as to the tendencies
of so complex and perplexing a scene.

The last words of Charles had asserted his satisfaction in leaving no
male child to wear his crown.  But the brother, whose obvious kingly
qualities, the chief facts really known of him so far, Charles was
thought to have envied--the gallant feats of his youth, de ses Jeunes
guerres, his stature, his high-bred beauty, his eloquence, his almost
pontifical refinement and grace,--had already promptly deserted the
half-barbarous kingdom, his acceptance of which had been but the mask
of banishment; though he delayed much on his way to the new one,
passing round through the cities of Venice and Lombardy, seductive
schools of the art of life as conceived by Italian epicures, of which
he became only too ready a student.  On Whit-Monday afternoon, while
Charles "went in lead," amid very little private or public concern,
to join his kinsfolk at Saint-Denys, Paris was already looking out
for its new king, following, through doubtful rumour, his circuitous
journey to the throne, by Venice, Padua, Ferrara, Mantua, Turin, over
Mont Cenis, by Lyons, to French [137] soil, still building
confidently on the prestige of his early manhood.  Seeing him at
last, all were conscious in a moment of the inversion of their hopes.
Had the old witchcrafts of Poland, the old devilries of his race,
laid visible hold on the hopeful young man, that he must now take
purely satiric estimate of so great an opportunity, with a programme
which looked like formal irony on the kingly position, a premeditated
mockery of those who yielded him, on demand, a servile reverence
never before paid to any French monarch?  Well! the amusement, or
business, of Parisians, at all events, would still be that of
spectators, assisting at the last act of the Valois tragedy, in the
course of which fantastic traits and incidents would naturally be
multiplied.  Fantastic humour seemed at its height in the institution
of a new order of knighthood, the enigmatic splendours of which were
to be a monument of Henry's superstitious care, or, as some said, of
his impious contempt, of the day which had made him master of his
destiny,--that great Church festival, towards the emphatic marking of
which he was ever afterwards ready to welcome any novel or striking
device for the spending of an hour.

It was on such an occasion, then,--on a Whitsunday afternoon, amid
the gaudy red hues of the season, that Gaston listened to one, who,
as if with some intentional new version of the sacred event then
commemorated, had a great [138] deal to say concerning the Spirit;
above all, of the freedom, the indifference, of its operations; and
who would give a strangely altered colour, for a long time to come,
to the thoughts, to the very words, associated with the celebration
of Pentecost.  The speaker, though understood to be a brother of the
Order of Saint Dominic, had not been present at the mass--the daily
University red mass, De Spiritu Sancto, but said to-day according to
the proper course of the season in the chapel of the Sorbonne, with
much pomp, by the Italian Bishop of Paris.  It was the reign of the
Italians just then, a doubly refined, somewhat morbid, somewhat ash-
coloured, Italy in France, more Italian still.  What our Elisabethan
poets imagined about Italian culture--forcing all they knew of Italy
to an ideal of dainty sin such as had never actually existed there,--
that the court of Henry, so far as in it lay, realised in fact.  Men
of Italian birth, "to the great suspicion of simple people," swarmed
in Paris, already "flightier, less constant, than the girouettes on
its steeples"; and it was love for Italian fashions that had brought
king and courtiers here this afternoon, with great eclat, as they
said, frizzed and starched, in the beautiful, minutely considered,
dress of the moment, pressing the learned University itself into the
background; for the promised speaker, about whom tongues had been
busy, not only in the Latin quarter, had [139] come from Italy.  In
an age in which all things about which Parisians much cared must be
Italian, there might be a hearing for Italian philosophy.  Courtiers
at least would understand Italian; and this speaker was rumoured to
possess in perfection all the curious arts of his native language.
And of all the kingly qualities of Henry's youth, the single one
which had held by him was that gift of eloquence he was able also to
value in others; an inherited gift perhaps, for amid all contemporary
and subsequent historic gossip about his mother, the two things
certain are, that the hands credited with so much mysterious ill-
doing were fine ones, and that she was an admirable speaker.

Bruno himself tells us, long after he had withdrawn himself from it,
that the monastic life promotes the freedom of the intellect by its
silence and self-concentration.  The prospect of such freedom
sufficiently explains why a young man who, however well-found in
worldly and personal advantages, was above all conscious of great
intellectual possessions, and of fastidious spirit also, with a
remarkable distaste for the vulgar, should have espoused poverty,
chastity, and obedience, in a Dominican cloister.  What liberty of
mind may really come to, in such places, what daring new departures
it may suggest even to the strictly monastic temper, is exemplified
by the dubious and dangerous mysticism of men like John of Parma and
[140] Joachim of Flora, the reputed author of a new "Everlasting
Gospel"; strange dreamers, in a world of sanctified rhetoric, of that
later dispensation of the Spirit, in which all law will have passed
away; or again by a recognised tendency, in the great rival Order of
Saint Francis, in the so-called "spiritual" Franciscans, to
understand the dogmatic words of faith, with a difference.

The three convents in which successively Bruno had lived, at Naples,
at Citta di Campagna, and finally the Minerva at Rome, developed
freely, we may suppose, all the mystic qualities of a genius, in
which, from the first, a heady southern imagination took the lead.
But it was from beyond monastic bounds that he would look for the
sustenance, the fuel, of an ardour born or bred within them.  Amid
such artificial religious stillness the air itself becomes generous
in undertones.  The vain young monk (vain, of course) would feed his
vanity by puzzling the good, sleepy heads of the average sons of
Dominic with his neology, putting new wine into old bottles, teaching
them their own business, the new, higher, truer sense of the most
familiar terms, of the chapters they read, the hymns they sang; above
all, as it happened, every word that referred to the Spirit, the
reign of the Spirit, and its excellent freedom.  He would soon pass
beyond the utmost possible limits of his brethren's sympathy, beyond
the [141] largest and freest interpretation such words would bear, to
words and thoughts on an altogether different plane, of which the
full scope was only to be felt in certain old pagan writers,--pagan,
though approached, perhaps, at first, as having a kind of natural,
preparatory, kinship with Scripture itself.  The Dominicans would
seem to have had well-stocked, and liberally-selected, libraries; and
this curious youth, in that age of restored letters, read eagerly,
easily, and very soon came to the kernel of a difficult old author,
Plotinus or Plato,--to the real purpose of thinkers older still,
surviving by glimpses only in the books of others, Empedocles, for
instance, and Pythagoras, who had been nearer the original sense of
things; Parmenides, above all, that most ancient assertor of God's
identity with the world.  The affinities, the unity, of the visible
and the invisible, of earth and heaven, of all things whatever, with
one another, through the consciousness, the person, of God the
Spirit, who was at every moment of infinite time, in every atom of
matter, at every point of infinite space; aye! was everything, in
turn: that doctrine--l'antica filosofia Italiana--was in all its
vigour there, like some hardy growth out of the very heart of nature,
interpreting itself to congenial minds with all the fulness of
primitive utterance.  A big thought! yet suggesting, perhaps, from
the first, in still, small, immediately practical, voice, a freer way
of taking, a possible modification [142] of, certain moral precepts.
A primitive morality,--call it! congruous with those larger primitive
ideas, with that larger survey, with the earlier and more liberal
air.

Returning to this ancient "pantheism," after the long reign of a
seemingly opposite faith, Bruno unfalteringly asserts "the vision of
all things in God" to be the aim of all metaphysical speculation, as
of all enquiry into nature.  The Spirit of God, in countless variety
of forms, neither above, nor in any way without, but intimately
within, all things, is really present, with equal integrity and
fulness, in the sunbeam ninety millions of miles long, and the
wandering drop of water as it evaporates therein.  The divine
consciousness has the same relation to the production of things as
the human intelligence to the production of true thoughts concerning
them.  Nay! those thoughts are themselves actually God in man: a loan
to man also of His assisting Spirit, who, in truth, is the Creator of
things, in and by His contemplation of them.  For Him, as for man in
proportion as man thinks truly, thought and being are identical, and
things existent only in so far as they are known.  Delighting in
itself, in the sense of its own energy, this sleepless, capacious,
fiery intelligence, evokes all the orders of nature, all the
revolutions of history, cycle upon cycle, in ever new types.  And God
the Spirit, the soul of the world, being therefore really identical
with the [143] soul of Bruno also, as the universe shapes itself to
Bruno's reason, to his imagination, ever more and more articulately,
he too becomes a sharer of the divine joy in that process of the
formation of true ideas, which is really parallel to the process of
creation, to the evolution of things.  In a certain mystic sense,
which some in every age of the world have understood, he, too, is the
creator; himself actually a participator in the creative function.
And by such a philosophy, Bruno assures us, it was his experience
that the soul is greatly expanded: con questa filosofia l'anima mi
s'aggrandisce: mi se magnifica l'intelletto!

For, with characteristic largeness of mind, Bruno accepted this
theory in the whole range of its consequences.  Its more immediate
corollary was the famous axiom of "indifference," of "the coincidence
of contraries."  To the eye of God, to the philosophic vision through
which God sees in man, nothing is really alien from Him.  The
differences of things, those distinctions, above all, which schoolmen
and priests, old or new, Roman or Reformed, had invented for
themselves, would be lost in the length and breadth of the
philosophic survey: nothing, in itself, being really either great or
small; and matter certainly, in all its various forms, not evil but
divine.  Dare one choose or reject this or that?  If God the Spirit
had made, nay! was, all things indifferently, then, matter and
spirit, the spirit and the flesh, heaven and earth, freedom [144] and
necessity, the first and the last, good and evil, would be
superficial rather than substantial differences.  Only, were joy and
sorrow also, together with another distinction, always of emphatic
reality to Gaston, for instance, to be added to the list of phenomena
really "coincident," or "indifferent," as some intellectual kinsmen
of Bruno have claimed they should?

The Dominican brother was at no distant day to break far enough away
from the election, the seeming "vocation," of his youth, yet would
remain always, and under all circumstances, unmistakably a monk in
some predominant qualities of temper.  At first it was only by way of
thought that he asserted his liberty--delightful, late-found,
privilege!--traversing, in strictly mental journeys, that spacious
circuit, as it broke away before him at every moment upon ever-new
horizons.  Kindling thought and imagination at once, the prospect
draws from him cries of joy, of a kind of religious joy, as in some
new "canticle of the creatures," some new hymnal, or antiphonary.
"Nature" becomes for him a sacred term.--"Conform thyself to Nature!
"with what sincerity, what enthusiasm, what religious fervour, he
enounces that precept, to others, to himself!  Recovering, as he
fancies, a certain primeval sense of Deity broadcast on things, a
sense in which Pythagoras and other "inspired" theorists of early
Greece had abounded, in his hands philosophy becomes a poem, a [145]
sacred poem, as it had been with them.  That Bruno himself, in "the
enthusiasm of the idea," drew from his axiom of the "indifference of
contraries" the practical consequence which is in very deed latent
there, that he was ready to sacrifice to the antinomianism, which is
certainly a part of its rigid logic, the austerities, the purity of
his own youth, for instance, there is no proof.  The service, the
sacrifice, he is ready to bring to the great light that has dawned
for him, occupying his entire conscience with the sense of his
responsibilities to it, is the sacrifice of days and nights spent in
eager study, of plenary, disinterested utterance of the thoughts that
arise in him, at any hazard, at the price, say! of martyrdom.  The
work of the divine Spirit, as he conceives it, exalts, inebriates
him, till the scientific apprehension seems to take the place of
prayer, oblation, communion.  It would be a mistake, he holds, to
attribute to the human soul capacities merely passive or receptive.
She, too, possesses initiatory power as truly as the divine soul of
the world, to which she responds with the free gift of a light and
heat that seem her own.

Yet a nature so opulently endowed can hardly have been lacking in
purely physical or sensuous ardours.  His pantheistic belief that the
Spirit of God is in all things, was not inconsistent with, nay! might
encourage, a keen and restless eye for the dramatic details of life
and character [146] however minute, for humanity in all its visible
attractiveness, since there too, in truth, divinity lurks.  From
those first fair days of early Greek speculation, love had occupied a
large place in the conception of philosophy; and in after days Bruno
was fond of developing, like Plato, like the Christian Platonists,
combining something of the peculiar temper of each, the analogy
between the flights of intellectual enthusiasm and those of physical
love, with an animation which shows clearly enough the reality of his
experience in the latter.  The Eroici Furori, his book of books,
dedicated to Philip Sidney, who would be no stranger to such
thoughts, presents a singular blending of verse and prose, after the
manner of Dante's Vita Nuova.  The supervening philosophic comment
reconsiders those earlier, physically erotic, impulses which had
prompted the sonnet in voluble Italian, entirely to the advantage of
their abstract, incorporeal, theoretic, equivalents.  Yet if it is
after all but a prose comment, it betrays no lack of the natural
stuff out of which such mystic transferences must be made.  That
there is no single name of preference, no Beatrice, or Laura, by no
means proves the young man's earlier desires to have been merely
Platonic; and if the colours of love inevitably lose a little of
their force and propriety by such deflexion from their earlier
purpose, their later intellectual purpose as certainly finds its
opportunity thereby, in the [147] matter of borrowed fire and wings.
A kind of old scholastic pedantry creeping back over the ardent youth
who had thrown it off so defiantly (as if love himself went in now
for a University degree), Bruno developes, under the mask of amorous
verse, all the various stages of abstraction, by which, as the last
step of a long ladder, the mind attains actual "union."  For, as with
the purely religious mystics, "union," the mystic union of souls with
one another and their Lord, nothing less than union between the
contemplator and the contemplated--the reality, or the sense, or at
least the name of such union--was always at hand.  Whence that
instinctive tendency towards union if not from the Creator of things
Himself, who has doubtless prompted it in the physical universe, as
in man?  How familiar the thought that the whole creation, not less
than the soul of man, longs for God, "as the hart for the water-
brooks"!  To unite oneself to the infinite by largeness and lucidity
of intellect, to enter, by that admirable faculty, into eternal life-
-this was the true vocation of the spouse, of the rightly amorous
soul.  A filosofia e necessario amore.  There would be degrees of
progress therein, as of course also of relapse: joys and sorrows,
therefore.  And, in interpreting these, the philosopher, whose
intellectual ardours have superseded religion and physical love, is
still a lover and a monk.  All the influences of the convent, the
sweet, heady [148] incense, the pleading sounds, the sophisticated
light and air, the grotesque humours of old gothic carvers, the thick
stratum of pagan sentiment beneath all this,--Santa Maria sopra
Minervam!--are indelible in him.  Tears, sympathies, tender
inspirations, attraction, repulsion, zeal, dryness, recollection,
desire:--he finds a place for them all: knows them all well in their
unaffected simplicity, while he seeks the secret and secondary, or,
as he fancies, the primary, form and purport of each.

Whether as a light on actual life, or as a mere barren scholastic
subtlety, never before had the pantheistic doctrine been developed
with such completeness, never before connected with so large a sense
of nature, so large a promise of the knowledge of it as it really is.
The eyes that had not been wanting to visible humanity turned now
with equal liveliness on the natural world, in that region of his
birth, where all the colour and force of nature are at least two-
fold.  Nature is not only a thought or meditation in the divine mind;
it is also the perpetual energy of that mind, which, ever identical
with itself, puts forth and absorbs in turn all the successive forms
of life, of thought, of language even.  What seemed like striking
transformations of matter were in truth only a chapter, a clause, in
the great volume of the transformations of the divine Spirit.  The
mystic recognition that all is indeed divine had accompanied a
realisation [149] of the largeness of the field of concrete
knowledge, the infinite extent of all there was actually to know.
Winged, fortified, by that central philosophic faith, the student
proceeds to the detailed reading of nature, led on from point to
point by manifold lights, which will surely strike on him by the way,
from the divine intelligence in it, speaking directly,
sympathetically, to a like intelligence in him.  The earth's
wonderful animation, as divined by one who anticipates by a whole
generation the Baconian "philosophy of experience": in that, those
bold, flighty, pantheistic speculations become tangible matter of
fact.  Here was the needful book for man to read; the full
revelation, the story in detail, of that one universal mind,
struggling, emerging, through shadow, substance, manifest spirit, in
various orders of being,--the veritable history of God.  And nature,
together with the true pedigree and evolution of man also, his
gradual issue from it, was still all to learn.  The delightful tangle
of things!--it would be the delightful task of man's thoughts to
disentangle that.  Already Bruno had measured the space which Bacon
would fill, with room, perhaps, for Darwin also.  That Deity is
everywhere, like all such abstract propositions, is a two-edged
force, depending for its practical effect on the mind which admits it
on the peculiar perspective of that mind.  To Dutch Spinosa, in the
next century, faint, consumptive, with a naturally [150] faint hold
on external things, the theorem that God was in all things whatever,
annihilating their differences, suggested a somewhat chilly
withdrawal from the contact of all alike.  But in Bruno, eager and
impassioned, an Italian of the Italians, it awoke a constant,
inextinguishable appetite for every form of experience,--a fear, as
of the one sin possible, of limiting, for one's self or another, the
great stream flowing for thirsty souls, that wide pasture set ready
for the hungry heart.

Considered from the point of view of a minute observation of nature,
the Infinite might figure as "the infinitely little"; no blade of
grass being like another, as there was no limit to the complexities
of an atom of earth,--cell, sphere, within sphere.  And the earth
itself, hitherto seemingly the privileged centre of a very limited
universe, was, after all, but an atom in an infinite world of starry
space, then lately divined by candid intelligence, which the
telescope was one day to present to bodily eyes.  For if Bruno must
needs look forward to the future, to Bacon, for adequate knowledge of
the earth, the infinitely little, he could look backwards also
gratefully to another daring mind which had already put that earth
into its modest place, and opened the full view of the heavens.  If
God is eternal, then, the universe is infinite and worlds
innumerable.  Yes! one might well have divined what reason now
demonstrated, indicating those endless [151] spaces which a real
sidereal science would gradually occupy.

That the stars are suns: that the earth is in motion: that the earth
is of like stuff with the stars:--now the familiar knowledge of
children--dawning on Bruno as calm assurance of reason on appeal from
the prejudice of the eye, brought to him an inexpressibly
exhilarating sense of enlargement in the intellectual, nay! the
physical atmosphere.  And his consciousness of unfailing unity and
order did not desert him in that broader survey, which made the
utmost one could ever know of the earth seem but a very little
chapter in the endless history of God the Spirit, rejoicing so
greatly in the admirable spectacle that it never ceases to evolve
from matter new conditions.  The immoveable earth, as we term it,
beneath one's feet!--Why, one almost felt the movement, the
respiration, of God in it.  And yet how greatly even the physical
eye, the sensible imagination (so to term it) was flattered by the
theorem.  What joy in that motion, in the prospect, the music!  "The
music of the spheres!"--he could listen to it in a perfection such as
had never been conceded to Plato, to Pythagoras even.--

     Veni, Creator Spiritus,
     Mentes tuorum visita,
     Imple superna gratia,
     Quae tu creasti pectora.+

Yes!  The grand old Christian hymns, perhaps [152] the grandest of
them all, seemed to lend themselves in the chorus, to be deepened
immeasurably under this new intention.  It is not always, or often,
that men's abstract ideas penetrate the temperament, touch the animal
spirits, affect conduct.  It was what they did with Bruno.  The
ghastly spectacle of the endless material universe--infinite dust, in
truth, starry as it may look to our terrestrial eyes--that prospect
from which the mind of Pascal recoiled so painfully, induced in Bruno
only the delightful consciousness of an ever-widening kinship and
sympathy, since every one of those infinite worlds must have its
sympathetic inhabitants.  Scruples of conscience, if he felt such,
might well be pushed aside for the "excellency" of such knowledge as
this.  To shut the eyes, whether of the body or the mind, would be a
kind of sullen ingratitude;--the one sin to believe, directly or
indirectly, in any absolutely dead matter anywhere, as being
implicitly a denial of the indwelling spirit.--A free spirit,
certainly, as of old!  Through all his pantheistic flights, from
horizon to horizon, it was still the thought of liberty that
presented itself, to the infinite relish of this "prodigal son" of
Dominic.  God the Spirit had made all things indifferently, with a
largeness, a beneficence, impiously belied by any theory of
restrictions, distinctions, of absolute limitation.  Touch! see!
listen! eat freely of all the trees of the garden of Paradise, with
the voice of the [153] Lord God literally everywhere!--here was the
final counsel of perfection.  The world was even larger than youthful
appetite, youthful capacity.  Let theologian and every other theorist
beware how he narrowed either.  "The plurality of worlds!"--How petty
in comparison seemed those sins, the purging of which was men's chief
motive in coming to places like this convent, whence Bruno, with vows
broken, or for him obsolete, presently departed.  A sonnet,
expressive of the joy with which he returned to so much more than the
liberty of ordinary men, does not suggest that he was driven from it.
Though he must have seemed to those who surely had loved so loveable
a creature there to be departing, like the "prodigal" of the Gospel,
into the farthest of possible far countries, there is no proof of
harsh treatment on their part, or even of an effort to detain him.

It happens most naturally of course that those who undergo the shock
of spiritual or intellectual change sometimes fail to recognise their
debt to the deserted cause:--How much of the heroism, or other high
quality, of their rejection has really been the product of what they
reject?  Bruno, the escaped monk, is still a monk; and his
philosophy, impious as it might seem to some, a religion; very new
indeed, yet a religion.  He came forth well-fitted by conventual
influences to play upon men as he had been played upon.  A challenge,
a war-cry, an [154] alarum, everywhere he seemed to be but the
instrument of some subtly materialised spiritual force, like that of
the old Greek prophets, that "enthusiasm" he was inclined to set so
high, or like impulsive Pentecostal fire.  His hunger to know, fed
dreamily enough at first within the convent walls, as he wandered
over space and time, an indefatigable reader of books, would be fed
physically now by ear and eye, by large matter-of-fact experience, as
he journeys from university to university; less as a teacher than a
courtier, a citizen of the world, a knight-errant of intellectual
light.  The philosophic need to try all things had given reasonable
justification to the stirring desire for travel common to youth, in
which, if in nothing else, that whole age of the later Renaissance
was invincibly young.  The theoretic recognition of that mobile
spirit of the world, ever renewing its youth, became the motive of a
life as mobile, as ardent, as itself, of a continual journey, the
venture and stimulus of which would be the occasion of ever-new
discoveries, of renewed conviction.

The unity, the spiritual unity, of the world:--that must involve the
alliance, the congruity, of all things with one another, of the
teacher's personality with the doctrine he had to deliver, of the
spirit of that doctrine with the fashion of his utterance, great
reinforcements of sympathy.  In his own case, certainly, when Bruno
confronted his audience at Paris, himself, his theme, [155] his
language, were alike the fuel of one clear spiritual flame, which
soon had hold of his audience also; alien, strangely alien, as that
audience might seem from the speaker.  It was intimate discourse, in
magnetic touch with every one present, with his special point of
impressibility; the sort of speech which, consolidated into literary
form as a book, would be a dialogue according to the true Attic
genius, full of those diversions, passing irritations, unlooked-for
appeals, in which a solicitous missionary finds his largest range of
opportunity, and takes even dull wits unaware.  In Bruno, that
abstract theory of the perpetual motion of the world was become a
visible person talking with you.

And as the runaway Dominican was still in temper a monk, so he
presented himself to his audience in the comely Dominican habit.  The
reproachful eyes were to-day for the most part kindly observant,
registering every detail of that singular company, all the
physiognomic effects which come, by the way, on people, and, through
them, on things,--the "shadows of ideas" in men's faces--his own
pleasantly expressive with them, in turn.  De Umbris Idearum: it was
the very title of his discourse.  There was "heroic gaiety" there:
only, as usual with gaiety, it made the passage of a peevish cloud
seem all the chillier.  Lit up, in the agitation of speaking, by many
a harsh or scornful beam, yet always sinking, in moments of repose,
to an [156] expression of high-bred melancholy, the face was one that
looked, after all, made for suffering,--already half pleading, half
defiant, as of a creature you could hurt, but to the last never shake
a hair's-breadth from its estimate of yourself.

Like nature, like nature in that opulent country of his birth which
the "Nolan," as he delighted to call himself, loved so well that,
born wanderer as he was, he must perforce return thither sooner or
later at the risk of life, he gave plenis manibus, but without
selection, and was hardly more fastidious in speech than the
"asinine" vulgar he so deeply contemned.  His rank, un-weeded
eloquence, abounding in play of words, rabbinic allegories, verses
defiant of prosody, in the kind of erudition he professed to despise,
with here and there a shameless image,--the product not of formal
method, but of Neapolitan improvisation--was akin to the heady wine,
the sweet, coarse odours, of that fiery, volcanic soil, fertile in
such irregularities as manifest power.  Helping himself indifferently
to all religions for rhetoric illustration, his preference was still
for that of the soil, the old pagan religion, and for the primitive
Italian gods, whose names and legends haunt his speech, as they do
the carved and pictorial work of that age of the Renaissance.  To
excite, to surprise, to move men's minds, like the volcanic earth as
if in travail, and, according to the Socratic fancy, [157] to bring
them to the birth, was after all the proper function of the teacher,
however unusual it might seem in so ancient a university.
"Fantastic!"--from first to last, that was the descriptive epithet;
and the very word, carrying us to Shakespeare, reminds one how
characteristic of the age such habit was, and that it was pre-
eminently due to Italy.  A man of books, he had yet so vivid a hold
on people and things, that the traits and tricks of the audience
seemed to strike from his memory all the graphic resources of his old
readings.  He seemed to promise some greater matter than was then
actually exposed by him; to be himself enjoying the fulness of a
great outlook, the vague suggestion of which did but sustain the
curiosity of the listeners.  And still, in hearing him speak you
seemed to see that subtle spiritual fire to which he testified
kindling from word to word.  What Gaston then heard was, in truth,
the first fervid expression of all those contending views out of
which his written works would afterwards be compacted, of course with
much loss of heat in the process.  Satyric or hybrid growths, things
due to hybris,+ insult, insolence, to what the old satyrs of fable
embodied,--the volcanic South is kindly prolific of these, and Bruno
abounded in mockery; though it was by way of protest.  So much of a
Platonist, for Plato's genial humour he had nevertheless substituted
the harsh laughter of Aristophanes.  Paris, teeming, beneath a [158]
very courtly exterior, with mordant words, in unabashed criticism of
all real or suspected evil, provoked his utmost powers of scorn for
the "Triumphant Beast," the "installation of the ass," shining even
there amid the university folk,--those intellectual bankrupts of the
Latin Quarter, who had so long passed between them, however gravely,
a worthless "parchment and paper" currency.  In truth, Aristotle, the
supplanter of Plato, was still in possession, pretending, as Bruno
conceived, to determine heaven and earth by precedent, hiding the
proper nature of things from the eyes of men.  "Habit"--the last word
of his practical philosophy--indolent habit! what would this mean, in
the intellectual life, but just that sort of dead judgments which,
because the mind, the eye, were no longer really at work in them, are
most opposed to the essential quickness and freedom of the spirit?

The Shadows of Ideas: De Umbris Idearum: such, in set terms, have
been the subject of Bruno's discourse, appropriately to the still
only half emancipated intellect of his audience:--on approximations
to truth: the divine imaginations, as seen, darkly, more bearably by
weaker faculties, in words, in visible facts, in their shadows
merely.  According to the doctrine of "Indifference," indeed, there
would be no real distinction between substance and shadow.  In regard
to man's feeble wit, however, varying degrees of knowledge
constituted such a distinction. [159] "Ideas, and Shadows of Ideas":
the phrase recurred often; and, as such mystic phrases will, fixed
itself in Gaston's fancy, though not quite according to the mind of
the speaker; accommodated rather to the thoughts which just then
preoccupied his own.  As already in his life there had been the
Shadows of Events,--the indirect yet fatal influence there of deeds
in which he had no part, so now, for a time, he seemed to fall under
the spell, the power, of the Shadows of Ideas, of Bruno's Ideas; in
other words, of those indirect suggestions, which, though no
necessary part of, yet inevitably followed upon, his doctrines.
What, for instance, might be the proper practical limitations of that
telling theory of "the coincidence, the indifference, of opposites"?

To that true son of the Renaissance, in the light of his large,
antique, pagan ideas, the difference between Rome and the Reform
would figure, of course, as but an insignificant variation upon some
deeper and more radical antagonism, between two tendencies of men's
minds.  But what about an antagonism deeper still?  Between Christ
and the world, say!--Christ and the flesh!--or about that so very
ancient antagonism between good and evil.  Was there any place really
left for imperfection, moral or otherwise, in a world, wherein the
minutest atom, the lightest thought, could not escape from God's
presence?  Who should note the crime, the sin, [160] the mistake, in
the operation of that eternal spirit, which was incapable of mis-
shapen births?  In proportion as man raised himself to the ampler
survey of the divine work around him, just in that proportion did the
very notion of evil disappear.  There were no weeds, no "tares," in
the endless field.  The truly illuminated mind, discerning
spiritually, might do what it would.  Even under the shadow of
monastic walls, that had sometimes been the precept, which larger
theories of "inspiration" had bequeathed to practice.  "Of all the
trees of the garden thou mayest freely eat!--If ye take up any deadly
thing, it shall not hurt you!--And I think that I, too, have the
spirit of God."

Bruno, a citizen of the world, Bruno at Paris, was careful to warn
off the vulgar from applying the decisions of philosophy beyond its
proper speculative limits.  But a kind of secrecy, an ambiguous
atmosphere, encompassed, from the first, alike the speaker and the
doctrine; and in that world of fluctuating and ambiguous characters,
the alerter mind certainly, pondering on this novel "reign of the
spirit"--what it might actually be--would hardly fail to find in
Bruno's doctrines a method of turning poison into food, to live and
thrive thereon; an art, to Paris, in the intellectual and moral
condition of that day, hardly less opportune than had it related to
physical poisons.  If Bruno himself was cautious not to suggest the
ethic or practical [161] equivalent to his theoretic positions, there
was that in his very manner of speech, in that rank, un-weeded
eloquence of his, which seemed naturally to discourage any effort at
selection, any sense of fine difference, of nuances or proportion, in
things.  The loose sympathies of his genius were allied to nature,
nursing, with equable maternity of soul, good, bad, and indifferent
alike, rather than to art, distinguishing, rejecting, refining.
Commission and omission! sins of the former surely had the natural
preference.  And how would Paolo and Francesca have read this lesson?
How would Henry, and Margaret of the "Memoirs," and other susceptible
persons then present, read it, especially if the opposition between
practical good and evil traversed diametrically another distinction,
the "opposed points" of which, to Gaston for instance, could never by
any possibility become "indifferent,"--the distinction, namely,
between the precious and the base, aesthetically; between what was
right and wrong in the matter of art?

NOTES:

132. +From Aus der Harzreise, "Bergidylle 2": "Tannenbaum, mit grunen
Fingern," Stanza 10.  E-text editor's translation: "Now that I have
grown to maturity, / Have read and traveled much, / My whole heart
expands / With my belief in the Holy Spirit."

151. +The beginning of a hymn used by the Catholic Church to
commemorate solemn occasions.  Dryden's translation: "Creator Spirit,
by whose aid / The world's foundations first were laid, / Come visit
every pious mind, Come pour Thy joys on human kind."

157. +Transliteration: hybris.  Liddell and Scott definition: "wanton
violence, arising from the pride of strength, passion, etc."

THE END














Produced by Alfred J. Drake, Ph.D.





GREEK STUDIES: A SERIES OF ESSAYS

By WALTER HORATIO PATER

E-text Editor: Alfred J. Drake, Ph.D.
Electronic Version 1.0 / Date 10-17-01


DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES

[1] I DISCLAIM ALL LIABILITY TO YOU FOR DAMAGES, COSTS AND
EXPENSES, INCLUDING LEGAL FEES, AND

[2] YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE OR UNDER STRICT LIABILITY, OR
FOR BREACH OF WARRANTY OR CONTRACT, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU
GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.

THE E-TEXTS ON THIS SITE ARE PROVIDED TO YOU "AS-IS".  NO WARRANTIES
OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ARE MADE TO YOU AS TO THE E-TEXTS OR
ANY MEDIUM THEY MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF
MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Some states do not allow disclaimers of implied warranties or the
exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the above
disclaimers and exclusions may not apply to you, and you may have
other legal rights.



GREEK STUDIES: A SERIES OF ESSAYS
WALTER HORATIO PATER

NOTES BY THE E-TEXT EDITOR:

Reliability: Although I have done my best to ensure that the text you
read is error-free in comparison with an exact reprint of the
standard edition--Macmillan's 1910 Library Edition--please exercise
scholarly caution in using it.  It is not intended as a substitute
for the printed original but rather as a searchable supplement.  My
e-texts may prove convenient substitutes for hard-to-get works in a
course where both instructor and students accept the possibility of
some imperfections in the text, but if you are writing a scholarly
article, dissertation, or book, you should use the standard hard-copy
editions of any works you cite.

Pagination and Paragraphing: To avoid an unwieldy electronic copy, I
have transferred original pagination to brackets.  A bracketed
numeral such as [22] indicates that the material immediately
following the number marks the beginning of the relevant page.  I
have preserved paragraph structure except for first-line indentation.

Hyphenation: I have not preserved original hyphenation since an e-
text does not require line-end or page-end hyphenation.

Greek typeface: For this full-text edition, I have transliterated
Pater's Greek quotations.  If there is a need for the original Greek,
it can be viewed at my site, http://www.ajdrake.com/etexts, a
Victorianist archive that contains the complete works of Walter Pater
and many other nineteenth-century texts, mostly in first editions.





CONTENTS





GREEK STUDIES: A SERIES OF ESSAYS

WALTER PATER

London: Macmillan, 1910. (The Library Edition.)

E-text Editor: Alfred J. Drake, Ph.D.

Electronic Version 1.0 / Date 10-12-01

Disclaimer of Damages for All Texts on This Web

E-text Editor's Note

Preface by Charles Shadwell

A Study of Dionysus: The Spiritual Form of Fire and Dew: 9-52

The Bacchanals of Euripides: 53-80

The Myth of Demeter and Persephone I. 81-112

The Myth of Demeter and Persephone II. 113-151

Hippolytus Veiled: A Study from Euripides: 152-186

The Beginnings of Greek Sculpture--I. The Heroic Age of Greek Art:
187-223

The Beginnings of Greek Sculpture--II. The Age of Graven Images: 224-
250

The Marbles of Aegina: 251-268

The Age of Athletic Prizemen: A Chapter in Greek Art: 269-end





PREFACE BY CHARLES L. SHADWELL

[1] THE present volume consists of a collection of essays by the
late Mr. Pater, all of which have already been given to the public in
various Magazines; and it is owing to the kindness of the several
proprietors of those Magazines that they can now be brought together
in a collected shape.  It will, it is believed, be felt, that their
value is considerably enhanced by their appearance in a single
volume, where they can throw light upon one another, and exhibit by
their connexion a more complete view of the scope and purpose of Mr.
Pater in dealing with the art and literature of the ancient world.

The essays fall into two distinct groups, one dealing with the
subjects of Greek mythology and Greek poetry, the other with the
history of Greek sculpture and Greek architecture.  But these two
groups are not wholly distinct; they mutually illustrate one another,
and serve to enforce Mr. Pater's conception of the essential [2]
unity, in all its many-sidedness, of the Greek character.  The god
understood as the "spiritual form" of the things of nature is not
only the key-note of the "Study of Dionysus"* and "The Myth of
Demeter and Persephone,"* but reappears as contributing to the
interpretation of the growth of Greek sculpture.*  Thus, though in
the bibliography of his writings, the two groups are separated by a
considerable interval, there is no change of view; he had already
reached the centre of the problem, and, the secret once gained, his
mode of treatment of the different aspects of Greek life and thought
is permanent and consistent.

The essay on "The Myth of Demeter and Persephone" was originally
prepared as two lectures, for delivery, in 1875, at the Birmingham
and Midland Institute.  These lectures were published in the
Fortnightly Review, in Jan. and Feb. 1876.  The "Study of Dionysus"
appeared in the same Review in Dec. 1876.  "The Bacchanals of
Euripides" must have been written about the same time, as a sequel to
the "Study of Dionysus"; for, in 1878, Mr. Pater revised the four
essays, with the intention, apparently, of publishing them
collectively in a volume, an intention afterwards abandoned. [3] The
text now printed has, except that of "The Bacchanals," been taken
from proofs then set up, further corrected in manuscript.  "The
Bacchanals," written long before, was not published until 1889, when
it appeared in Macmillan's Magazine for May.  It was reprinted,
without alteration, prefixed to Dr. Tyrrell's edition of the Bacchae.
"Hippolytus Veiled" first appeared in August 1889, in Macmillan's
Magazine.  It was afterwards rewritten, but with only a few
substantial alterations, in Mr. Pater's own hand, with a view,
probably, of republishing it with other essays.  This last revise has
been followed in the text now printed.

The papers on Greek sculpture* are all that remain of a series which,
if Mr. Pater had lived, would, probably, have grown into a still more
important work.  Such a work would have included one or more essays
on Phidias and the Parthenon, of which only a fragment, though an
important fragment, can be found amongst his papers; and it was to
have been prefaced by an Introduction to Greek Studies, only a page
or two of which was ever written.

[4] This is not the place to speak of Mr. Pater's private virtues,
the personal charm of his character, the brightness of his talk, the
warmth of his friendship, the devotion of his family life.  But a few
words may be permitted on the value of the work by which he will be
known to those who never saw him.

Persons only superficially acquainted, or by hearsay, with his
writings, are apt to sum up his merits as a writer by saying that he
was a master, or a consummate master of style; but those who have
really studied what he wrote do not need to be told that his
distinction does not lie in his literary grace alone, his fastidious
choice of language, his power of word-painting, but in the depth and
seriousness of his studies.  That the amount he has produced, in a
literary life of thirty years, is not greater, is one proof among
many of the spirit in which he worked.  His genius was "an infinite
capacity for taking pains."  That delicacy of insight, that gift of
penetrating into the heart of things, that subtleness of
interpretation, which with him seems an instinct, is the outcome of
hard, patient, conscientious study.  If he had chosen, he might,
without difficulty, have produced a far greater body of work of less
value; and from a worldly point of view, he would have been wise.
Such was not his understanding [5] of the use of his talents.  Cui
multum datum est, multum quaeretur ab eo.  Those who wish to
understand the spirit in which he worked, will find it in this
volume.  C.L.S.

Oct. 1894.

NOTES

2. *See p. 34.

2. *See p. 100.

2. *See pp. 220, 254.

3. *"The Beginnings of Greek Sculpture" was published in the
Fortnightly Review, Feb. and March 1880; "The Marbles of Aegina" in
the same Review in April.  "The Age of Athletic Prizemen" was
published in the Contemporary Review in February of the present year.





A STUDY OF DIONYSUS:
THE SPIRITUAL FORM OF FIRE AND DEW

[9] WRITERS on mythology speak habitually of the religion of the
Greeks.  In thus speaking, they are really using a misleading
expression, and should speak rather of religions; each race and class
of Greeks--the Dorians, the people of the coast, the fishers--having
had a religion of its own, conceived of the objects that came nearest
to it and were most in its thoughts, and the resulting usages and
ideas never having come to have a precisely harmonised system, after
the analogy of some other religions.  The religion of Dionysus is the
religion of people who pass their lives among the vines.  As the
religion of Demeter carries us back to the cornfields and farmsteads
of Greece, and places us, in fancy, among a primitive race, in the
furrow and beside the granary; so the religion of Dionysus carries us
back to its vineyards, and is a monument of the ways and thoughts of
people whose days go by beside the winepress, and [10] under the
green and purple shadows, and whose material happiness depends on the
crop of grapes.  For them the thought of Dionysus and his circle, a
little Olympus outside the greater, covered the whole of life, and
was a complete religion, a sacred representation or interpretation of
the whole human experience, modified by the special limitations, the
special privileges of insight or suggestion, incident to their
peculiar mode of existence.

Now, if the reader wishes to understand what the scope of the
religion of Dionysus was to the Greeks who lived in it, all it
represented to them by way of one clearly conceived yet complex
symbol, let him reflect what the loss would be if all the effect and
expression drawn from the imagery of the vine and the cup fell out of
the whole body of existing poetry; how many fascinating trains of
reflexion, what colour and substance would therewith have been
deducted from it, filled as it is, apart from the more aweful
associations of the Christian ritual, apart from Galahad's cup, with
all the various symbolism of the fruit of the vine.  That supposed
loss is but an imperfect measure of all that the name of Dionysus
recalled to the Greek mind, under a single imaginable form, an
outward body of flesh presented to the senses, and comprehending, as
its animating soul, a whole world of thoughts, surmises, greater and
less experiences.

[11] The student of the comparative science of religions finds in the
religion of Dionysus one of many modes of that primitive tree-worship
which, growing out of some universal instinctive belief that trees
and flowers are indeed habitations of living spirits, is found almost
everywhere in the earlier stages of civilisation, enshrined in legend
or custom, often graceful enough, as if the delicate beauty of the
object of worship had effectually taken hold on the fancy of the
worshipper.  Shelley's Sensitive Plant shows in what mists of
poetical reverie such feeling may still float about a mind full of
modern lights, the feeling we too have of a life in the green world,
always ready to assert its claim over our sympathetic fancies.  Who
has not at moments felt the scruple, which is with us always
regarding animal life, following the signs of animation further
still, till one almost hesitates to pluck out the little soul of
flower or leaf?

And in so graceful a faith the Greeks had their share; what was crude
and inane in it becoming, in the atmosphere of their energetic,
imaginative intelligence, refined and humanised.  The oak-grove of
Dodona, the seat of their most venerable oracle, did but perpetuate
the fancy that the sounds of the wind in the trees may be, for
certain prepared and chosen ears, intelligible voices; they could
believe in the transmigration of souls into mulberry and laurel, mint
and hyacinth; and the dainty Metamorphoses of Ovid [12] are but a
fossilised form of one morsel here and there, from a whole world of
transformation, with which their nimble fancy was perpetually
playing.  "Together with them," says the Homeric hymn to Aphrodite,
of the Hamadryads, the nymphs which animate the forest trees, "with
them, at the moment of their birth, grew up out of the soil, oak-tree
or pine, fair, flourishing among the mountains.  And when at last the
appointed hour of their death has come, first of all, those fair
trees are dried up; the bark perishes from around them, and the
branches fall away; and therewith the soul of them deserts the light
of the sun."+

These then are the nurses of the vine, bracing it with interchange of
sun and shade.  They bathe, they dance, they sing songs of
enchantment, so that those who seem oddly in love with nature, and
strange among their fellows, are still said to be nympholepti; above
all, they are weavers or spinsters, spinning or weaving with airiest
fingers, and subtlest, many-coloured threads, the foliage of the
trees, the petals of flowers, the skins of the fruit, the long thin
stalks on which the poplar leaves are set so lightly that Homer
compares to them, in their constant motion, the maids who sit
spinning in the house of Alcinous.  The nymphs of Naxos, where the
grape-skin is darkest, weave for him a purple robe.  Only, the ivy is
never transformed, is visible as natural ivy to the last, pressing
the [13] dark outline of its leaves close upon the firm, white, quite
human flesh of the god's forehead.

In its earliest form, then, the religion of Dionysus presents us with
the most graceful phase of this graceful worship, occupying a place
between the ruder fancies of half-civilised people concerning life in
flower or tree, and the dreamy after-fancies of the poet of the
Sensitive Plant.  He is the soul of the individual vine, first; the
young vine at the house-door of the newly married, for instance, as
the vine-grower stoops over it, coaxing and nursing it, like a pet
animal or a little child; afterwards, the soul of the whole species,
the spirit of fire and dew, alive and leaping in a thousand vines, as
the higher intelligence, brooding more deeply over things, pursues,
in thought, the generation of sweetness and strength in the veins of
the tree, the transformation of water into wine, little by little;
noting all the influences upon it of the heaven above and the earth
beneath; and shadowing forth, in each pause of the process, an
intervening person--what is to us but the secret chemistry of nature
being to them the mediation of living spirits.  So they passed on to
think of Dionysus (naming him at last from the brightness of the sky
and the moisture of the earth) not merely as the soul of the vine,
but of all that life in flowing things of which the vine is the
symbol, because its most emphatic example.  At Delos he bears a son,
from whom [14] in turn spring the three mysterious sisters Oeno,
Spermo, and Elais, who, dwelling in the island, exercise respectively
the gifts of turning all things at will into oil, and corn, and wine.
In the Bacchae of Euripides, he gives his followers, by miracle,
honey and milk, and the water gushes for them from the smitten rock.
He comes at last to have a scope equal to that of Demeter, a realm as
wide and mysterious as hers; the whole productive power of the earth
is in him, and the explanation of its annual change.  As some embody
their intuitions of that power in corn, so others in wine.  He is the
dispenser of the earth's hidden wealth, giver of riches through the
vine, as Demeter through the grain.  And as Demeter sends the airy,
dainty-wheeled and dainty-winged spirit of Triptolemus to bear her
gifts abroad on all winds, so Dionysus goes on his eastern journey,
with its many intricate adventures, on which he carries his gifts to
every people.

A little Olympus outside the greater, I said, of Dionysus and his
companions; he is the centre of a cycle, the hierarchy of the
creatures of water and sunlight in many degrees; and that fantastic
system of tree-worship places round him, not the fondly whispering
spirits of the more graceful inhabitants of woodland only, the nymphs
of the poplar and the pine, but the whole satyr circle, intervening
between the headship of the vine and the mere earth, the grosser,
less human [15] spirits, incorporate and made visible, of the more
coarse and sluggish sorts of vegetable strength, the fig, the reed,
the ineradicable weed-things which will attach themselves, climbing
about the vine-poles, or seeking the sun between the hot stones.  For
as Dionysus, the spiritual form of the vine, is of the highest human
type, so the fig-tree and the reed have animal souls, mistakeable in
the thoughts of a later, imperfectly remembering age, for mere
abstractions of animal nature; Snubnose, and Sweetwine, and Silenus,
the oldest of them all, so old that he has come to have the gift of
prophecy.

Quite different from them in origin and intent, but confused with
them in form, are those other companions of Dionysus, Pan and his
children.  Home-spun dream of simple people, and like them in the
uneventful tenour of his existence, he has almost no story; he is but
a presence; the spiritual form of Arcadia, and the ways of human life
there; the reflexion, in sacred image or ideal, of its flocks, and
orchards, and wild honey; the dangers of its hunters; its weariness
in noonday heat; its children, agile as the goats they tend, who run,
in their picturesque rags, across the solitary wanderer's path, to
startle him, in the unfamiliar upper places; its one adornment and
solace being the dance to the homely shepherd's pipe, cut by Pan
first from the sedges of the brook Molpeia.

Breathing of remote nature, the sense of which [16] is so profound in
the Homeric hymn to Pan, the pines, the foldings of the hills, the
leaping streams, the strange echoings and dying of sound on the
heights, "the bird, which among the petals of many-flowered spring,
pouring out a dirge, sends forth her honey-voiced song," "the crocus
and the hyacinth disorderly mixed in the deep grass"+--things which
the religion of Dionysus loves--Pan joins the company of the Satyrs.
Amongst them, they give their names to insolence and mockery, and the
finer sorts of malice, to unmeaning and ridiculous fear.  But the
best spirits have found in them also a certain human pathos, as in
displaced beings, coming even nearer to most men, in their very
roughness, than the noble and delicate person of the vine; dubious
creatures, half-way between the animal and human kinds, speculating
wistfully on their being, because not wholly understanding themselves
and their place in nature; as the animals seem always to have this
expression to some noticeable degree in the presence of man.  In the
later school of Attic sculpture they are treated with more and more
of refinement, till in some happy moment Praxiteles conceived a
model, often repeated, which concentrates this sentiment of true
humour concerning them; a model of dainty natural ease in posture,
but with the legs slightly crossed, as only lowly-bred gods are used
to carry them, and with some puzzled trouble of youth, you might wish
for a moment [17] to smoothe away, puckering the forehead a little,
between the pointed ears, on which the goodly hair of his animal
strength grows low.  Little by little, the signs of brute nature are
subordinated, or disappear; and at last, Robetta, a humble Italian
engraver of the fifteenth century, entering into the Greek fancy
because it belongs to all ages, has expressed it in its most
exquisite form, in a design of Ceres and her children, of whom their
mother is no longer afraid, as in the Homeric hymn to Pan.  The puck-
noses have grown delicate, so that, with Plato's infatuated lover,
you may call them winsome, if you please; and no one would wish those
hairy little shanks away, with which one of the small Pans walks at
her side, grasping her skirt stoutly; while the other, the sick or
weary one, rides in the arms of Ceres herself, who in graceful
Italian dress, and decked airily with fruit and corn, steps across a
country of cut sheaves, pressing it closely to her, with a child's
peevish trouble in its face, and its small goat-legs and tiny hoofs
folded over together, precisely after the manner of a little child.

There is one element in the conception of Dionysus, which his
connexion with the satyrs, Marsyas being one of them, and with Pan,
from whom the flute passed to all the shepherds of Theocritus, alike
illustrates, his interest, namely, in one of the great species of
music.  One form of that wilder vegetation, of which the Satyr race
is the soul made visible, is the reed, which [18] the creature plucks
and trims into musical pipes.  And as Apollo inspires and rules over
all the music of strings, so Dionysus inspires and rules over all the
music of the reed, the water-plant, in which the ideas of water and
of vegetable life are brought close together, natural property,
therefore, of the spirit of life in the green sap.  I said that the
religion of Dionysus was, for those who lived in it, a complete
religion, a complete sacred representation and interpretation of the
whole of life; and as, in his relation to the vine, he fills for them
the place of Demeter, is the life of the earth through the grape as
she through the grain, so, in this other phase of his being, in his
relation to the reed, he fills for them the place of Apollo; he is
the inherent cause of music and poetry; he inspires; he explains the
phenomena of enthusiasm, as distinguished by Plato in the Phaedrus,
the secrets of possession by a higher and more energetic spirit than
one's own, the gift of self-revelation, of passing out of oneself
through words, tones, gestures.  A winged Dionysus, venerated at
Amyclae, was perhaps meant to represent him thus, as the god of
enthusiasm, of the rising up on those spiritual wings, of which also
we hear something in the Phaedrus of Plato.

The artists of the Renaissance occupied themselves much with the
person and the story of Dionysus; and Michelangelo, in a work still
remaining in Florence, in which he essayed [19] with success to
produce a thing which should pass with the critics for a piece of
ancient sculpture, has represented him in the fulness, as it seems,
of this enthusiasm, an image of delighted, entire surrender to
transporting dreams.  And this is no subtle after-thought of a later
age, but true to certain finer movements of old Greek sentiment,
though it may seem to have waited for the hand of Michelangelo before
it attained complete realisation.  The head of Ion leans, as they
recline at the banquet, on the shoulder of Charmides; he mutters in
his sleep of things seen therein, but awakes as the flute-players
enter, whom Charmides has hired for his birthday supper.  The soul of
Callias, who sits on the other side of Charmides, flashes out; he
counterfeits, with life-like gesture, the personal tricks of friend
or foe; or the things he could never utter before, he finds words for
now; the secrets of life are on his lips.  It is in this loosening of
the lips and heart, strictly, that Dionysus is the Deliverer,
Eleutherios; and of such enthusiasm, or ecstasy, is, in a certain
sense, an older patron than Apollo himself.  Even at Delphi, the
centre of Greek inspiration and of the religion of Apollo, his claim
always maintained itself; and signs are not wanting that Apollo was
but a later comer there.  There, under his later reign, hard by the
golden image of Apollo himself, near the sacred tripod on which the
Pythia sat to prophesy, was to be seen a strange object--a sort [20]
of coffin or cinerary urn with the inscription, "Here lieth the body
of Dionysus, the son of Semele."  The pediment of the great temple
was divided between them--Apollo with the nine Muses on that side,
Dionysus, with perhaps three times three Graces, on this.  A third of
the whole year was held sacred to him; the four winter months were
the months of Dionysus; and in the shrine of Apollo itself he was
worshipped with almost equal devotion.

The religion of Dionysus takes us back, then, into that old Greek
life of the vineyards, as we see it on many painted vases, with much
there as we should find it now, as we see it in Bennozzo Gozzoli's
mediaeval fresco of the Invention of Wine in the Campo Santo at Pisa-
-the family of Noah presented among all the circumstances of a Tuscan
vineyard, around the press from which the first wine is flowing, a
painted idyll, with its vintage colours still opulent in decay, and
not without its solemn touch of biblical symbolism.  For differences,
we detect in that primitive life, and under that Greek sky, a nimbler
play of fancy, lightly and unsuspiciously investing all things with
personal aspect and incident, and a certain mystical apprehension,
now almost departed, of unseen powers beyond the material veil of
things, corresponding to the exceptional vigour and variety of the
Greek organisation.  This peasant life lies, in unhistoric time,
behind the definite forms with which poetry and a refined [21]
priesthood afterwards clothed the religion of Dionysus; and the mere
scenery and circumstances of the vineyard have determined many things
in its development.  The noise of the vineyard still sounds in some
of his epithets, perhaps in his best-known name--Iacchus, Bacchus.
The masks suspended on base or cornice, so familiar an ornament in
later Greek architecture, are the little faces hanging from the
vines, and moving in the wind, to scare the birds.  That garland of
ivy, the aesthetic value of which is so great in the later imagery of
Dionysus and his descendants, the leaves of which, floating from his
hair, become so noble in the hands of Titian and Tintoret, was
actually worn on the head for coolness; his earliest and most sacred
images were wrought in the wood of the vine.  The people of the
vineyard had their feast, the little or country Dionysia, which still
lived on, side by side with the greater ceremonies of a later time,
celebrated in December, the time of the storing of the new wine.  It
was then that the potters' fair came, calpis and amphora, together
with lamps against the winter, laid out in order for the choice of
buyers; for Keramus, the Greek Vase, is a son of Dionysus, of wine
and of Athene, who teaches men all serviceable and decorative art.
Then the goat was killed, and its blood poured out at the root of the
vines; and Dionysus literally drank the blood of goats; and, being
Greeks, with quick and mobile sympathies, [22] deisidaimones,+
"superstitious," or rather "susceptible of religious impressions,"
some among them, remembering those departed since last year, add yet
a little more, and a little wine and water for the dead also;
brooding how the sense of these things might pass below the roots, to
spirits hungry and thirsty, perhaps, in their shadowy homes.  But the
gaiety, that gaiety which Aristophanes in the Acharnians has depicted
with so many vivid touches, as a thing of which civil war had
deprived the villages of Attica, preponderates over the grave.  The
travelling country show comes round with its puppets; even the slaves
have their holiday;* the mirth becomes excessive; they hide their
faces under grotesque masks of bark, or stain them with wine-lees, or
potters' crimson even, like the old rude idols painted red; and carry
in midnight procession such rough symbols of the productive force of
nature as the women and children had best not look upon; which will
be frowned upon, and refine themselves, or disappear, in the feasts
of cultivated Athens.

Of the whole story of Dionysus, it was the episode of his marriage
with Ariadne about which ancient art concerned itself oftenest, and
with most effect.  Here, although the antiquarian [23] may still
detect circumstances which link the persons and incidents of the
legend with the mystical life of the earth, as symbols of its annual
change, yet the merely human interest of the story has prevailed over
its earlier significance; the spiritual form of fire and dew has
become a romantic lover.  And as a story of romantic love, fullest
perhaps of all the motives of classic legend of the pride of life, it
survived with undiminished interest to a later world, two of the
greatest masters of Italian painting having poured their whole power
into it; Titian with greater space of ingathered shore and mountain,
and solemn foliage, and fiery animal life; Tintoret with profounder
luxury of delight in the nearness to each other, and imminent
embrace, of glorious bodily presences; and both alike with consummate
beauty of physical form.  Hardly less humanised is the Theban legend
of Dionysus, the legend of his birth from Semele, which, out of the
entire body of tradition concerning him, was accepted as central by
the Athenian imagination.  For the people of Attica, he comes from
Boeotia, a country of northern marsh and mist, but from whose sombre,
black marble towns came also the vine, the musical reed cut from its
sedges, and the worship of the Graces, always so closely connected
with the religion of Dionysus.  "At Thebes alone," says Sophocles,
"mortal women bear immortal gods."  His mother is the daughter of
Cadmus, himself marked out by [24] many curious circumstances as the
close kinsman of the earth, to which he all but returns at last, as
the serpent, in his old age, attesting some closer sense lingering
there of the affinity of man with the dust from whence he came.
Semele, an old Greek word, as it seems, for the surface of the earth,
the daughter of Cadmus, beloved by Zeus, desires to see her lover in
the glory with which he is seen by the immortal Hera.  He appears to
her in lightning.  But the mortal may not behold him and live.
Semele gives premature birth to the child Dionysus; whom, to preserve
it from the jealousy of Hera, Zeus hides in a part of his thigh, the
child returning into the loins of its father, whence in due time it
is born again.  Yet in this fantastic story, hardly less than in the
legend of Ariadne, the story of Dionysus has become a story of human
persons, with human fortunes, and even more intimately human appeal
to sympathy; so that Euripides, pre-eminent as a poet of pathos,
finds in it a subject altogether to his mind.  All the interest now
turns on the development of its points of moral or sentimental
significance; the love of the immortal for the mortal, the
presumption of the daughter of man who desires to see the divine form
as it is; on the fact that not without loss of sight, or life itself,
can man look upon it.  The travail of nature has been transformed
into the pangs of the human mother; and the poet dwells much on the
pathetic incident of death in childbirth, making [25] Dionysus, as
Callimachus calls him, a seven months' child, cast out among its
enemies, motherless.  And as a consequence of this human interest,
the legend attaches itself, as in an actual history, to definite
sacred objects and places, the venerable relic of the wooden image
which fell into the chamber of Semele with the lightning-flash, and
which the piety of a later age covered with plates of brass; the Ivy-
Fountain near Thebes, the water of which was so wonderfully bright
and sweet to drink, where the nymphs bathed the new-born child; the
grave of Semele, in a sacred enclosure grown with ancient vines,
where some volcanic heat or flame was perhaps actually traceable,
near the lightning-struck ruins of her supposed abode.

Yet, though the mystical body of the earth is forgotten in the human
anguish of the mother of Dionysus, the sense of his essence of fire
and dew still lingers in his most sacred name, as the son of Semele,
Dithyrambus.  We speak of a certain wild music in words or rhythm as
dithyrambic, like the dithyrambus, that is, the wild choral-singing
of the worshippers of Dionysus.  But Dithyrambus seems to have been,
in the first instance, the name, not of the hymn, but of the god to
whom the hymn is sung; and, through a tangle of curious etymological
speculations as to the precise derivation of this name, one thing
seems clearly visible, that it commemorates, namely, the double birth
of the vine-god; that [26] he is born once and again; his birth,
first of fire, and afterwards of dew; the two dangers that beset him;
his victory over two enemies, the capricious, excessive heats and
colds of spring.

He is pyrigenes,+ then, fire-born, the son of lightning; lightning
being to light, as regards concentration, what wine is to the other
strengths of the earth.  And who that has rested a hand on the
glittering silex of a vineyard slope in August, where the pale globes
of sweetness are lying, does not feel this?  It is out of the bitter
salts of a smitten, volcanic soil that it comes up with the most
curious virtues.  The mother faints and is parched up by the heat
which brings the child to the birth; and it pierces through, a wonder
of freshness, drawing its everlasting green and typical coolness out
of the midst of the ashes; its own stem becoming at last like a
tangled mass of tortured metal.  In thinking of Dionysus, then, as
fire-born, the Greeks apprehend and embody the sentiment, the poetry,
of all tender things which grow out of a hard soil, or in any sense
blossom before the leaf, like the little mezereon-plant of English
gardens, with its pale-purple, wine-scented flowers upon the leafless
twigs in February, or like the almond-trees of Tuscany, or Aaron's
rod that budded, or the staff in the hand of the Pope when
Tannhauser's repentance is accepted.

And his second birth is of the dew.  The fire of which he was born
would destroy him in [27] his turn, as it withered up his mother; a
second danger comes; from this the plant is protected by the
influence of the cooling cloud, the lower part of his father the sky,
in which it is wrapped and hidden, and of which it is born again, its
second mother being, in some versions of the legend, Hye--the Dew.
The nursery, where Zeus places it to be brought up, is a cave in
Mount Nysa, sought by a misdirected ingenuity in many lands, but
really, like the place of the carrying away of Persephone, a place of
fantasy, the oozy place of springs in the hollow of the hillside,
nowhere and everywhere, where the vine was "invented."  The nymphs of
the trees overshadow it from above; the nymphs of the springs sustain
it from below--the Hyades, those first leaping maenads, who, as the
springs become rain-clouds, go up to heaven among the stars, and
descend again, as dew or shower, upon it; so that the religion of
Dionysus connects itself, not with tree-worship only, but also with
ancient water-worship, the worship of the spiritual forms of springs
and streams.  To escape from his enemies Dionysus leaps into the sea,
the original of all rain and springs, whence, in early summer, the
women of Elis and Argos were wont to call him, with the singing of a
hymn.  And again, in thus commemorating Dionysus as born of the dew,
the Greeks apprehend and embody the sentiment, the poetry, of water.
For not the heat only, but its solace--the freshness of the [28] cup-
-this too was felt by those people of the vineyard, whom the prophet
Melampus had taught to mix always their wine with water, and with
whom the watering of the vines became a religious ceremony; the very
dead, as they thought, drinking of and refreshed by the stream.  And
who that has ever felt the heat of a southern country does not know
this poetry, the motive of the loveliest of all the works attributed
to Giorgione, the Fete Champetre in the Louvre; the intense
sensations, the subtle and far-reaching symbolisms, which, in these
places, cling about the touch and sound and sight of it?  Think of
the darkness of the well in the breathless court, with the delicate
ring of ferns kept alive just within the opening; of the sound of the
fresh water flowing through the wooden pipes into the houses of
Venice, on summer mornings; of the cry Acqua fresca! at Padua or
Verona, when the people run to buy what they prize, in its rare
purity, more than wine, bringing pleasures so full of exquisite
appeal to the imagination, that, in these streets, the very beggars,
one thinks, might exhaust all the philosophy of the epicurean.

Out of all these fancies comes the vine-growers' god, the spiritual
form of fire and dew.  Beyond the famous representations of Dionysus
in later art and poetry--the Bacchanals of Euripides, the statuary of
the school of Praxiteles--a multitude of literary allusions and local
[29] customs carry us back to this world of vision unchecked by
positive knowledge, in which the myth is begotten among a primitive
people, as they wondered over the life of the thing their hands
helped forward, till it became for them a kind of spirit, and their
culture of it a kind of worship.  Dionysus, as we see him in art and
poetry, is the projected expression of the ways and dreams of this
primitive people, brooded over and harmonised by the energetic Greek
imagination; the religious imagination of the Greeks being,
precisely, a unifying or identifying power, bringing together things
naturally asunder, making, as it were, for the human body a soul of
waters, for the human soul a body of flowers; welding into something
like the identity of a human personality the whole range of man's
experiences of a given object, or series of objects--all their
outward qualities, and the visible facts regarding them--all the
hidden ordinances by which those facts and qualities hold of unseen
forces, and have their roots in purely visionary places.

Dionysus came later than the other gods to the centres of Greek life;
and, as a consequence of this, he is presented to us in an earlier
stage of development than they; that element of natural fact which is
the original essence of all mythology being more unmistakeably
impressed upon us here than in other myths.  Not the least
interesting point in the study of him is, that he illustrates very
clearly, not only the [30] earlier, but also a certain later
influence of this element of natural fact, in the development of the
gods of Greece.  For the physical sense, latent in it, is the clue,
not merely to the original signification of the incidents of the
divine story, but also to the source of the peculiar imaginative
expression which its persons subsequently retain, in the forms of the
higher Greek sculpture.  And this leads me to some general thoughts
on the relation of Greek sculpture to mythology, which may help to
explain what the function of the imagination in Greek sculpture
really was, in its handling of divine persons.

That Zeus is, in earliest, original, primitive intention, the open
sky, across which the thunder sometimes sounds, and from which the
rain descends--is a fact which not only explains the various stories
related concerning him, but determines also the expression which he
retained in the work of Pheidias, so far as it is possible to recall
it, long after the growth of those later stories had obscured, for
the minds of his worshippers, his primary signification.  If men
felt, as Arrian tells us, that it was a calamity to die without
having seen the Zeus of Olympia; that was because they experienced
the impress there of that which the eye and the whole being of man
love to find above him; and the genius of Pheidias had availed to
shed, upon the gold and ivory of the physical form, the blandness,
the breadth, the smile of the open sky; the mild [31] heat of it
still coming and going, in the face of the father of all the children
of sunshine and shower; as if one of the great white clouds had
composed itself into it, and looked down upon them thus, out of the
midsummer noonday: so that those things might be felt as warm, and
fresh, and blue, by the young and the old, the weak and the strong,
who came to sun themselves in the god's presence, as procession and
hymn rolled on, in the fragrant and tranquil courts of the great
Olympian temple; while all the time those people consciously
apprehended in the carved image of Zeus none but the personal, and
really human, characteristics.

Or think, again, of the Zeus of Dodona.  The oracle of Dodona, with
its dim grove of oaks, and sounding instruments of brass to husband
the faintest whisper in the leaves, was but a great consecration of
that sense of a mysterious will, of which people still feel, or seem
to feel, the expression, in the motions of the wind, as it comes and
goes, and which makes it, indeed, seem almost more than a mere symbol
of the spirit within us.  For Zeus was, indeed, the god of the winds
also; Aeolus, their so-called god, being only his mortal minister, as
having come, by long study of them, through signs in the fire and the
like, to have a certain communicable skill regarding them, in
relation to practical uses.  Now, suppose a Greek sculptor to have
proposed to himself to present [32] to his worshippers the image of
this Zeus of Dodona, who is in the trees and on the currents of the
air.  Then, if he had been a really imaginative sculptor, working as
Pheidias worked, the very soul of those moving, sonorous creatures
would have passed through his hand, into the eyes and hair of the
image; as they can actually pass into the visible expression of those
who have drunk deeply of them; as we may notice, sometimes, in our
walks on mountain or shore.

Victory again--Nike--associated so often with Zeus--on the top of his
staff, on the foot of his throne, on the palm of his extended hand--
meant originally, mythologic science tells us, only the great victory
of the sky, the triumph of morning over darkness.  But that physical
morning of her origin has its ministry to the later aesthetic sense
also.  For if Nike, when she appears in company with the mortal, and
wholly fleshly hero, in whose chariot she stands to guide the horses,
or whom she crowns with her garland of parsley or bay, or whose names
she writes on a shield, is imaginatively conceived, it is because the
old skyey influences are still not quite suppressed in her clear-set
eyes, and the dew of the morning still clings to her wings and her
floating hair.

The office of the imagination, then, in Greek sculpture, in its
handling of divine persons, is thus to condense the impressions of
natural things into human form; to retain that early mystical sense
of water, or wind, or light, in the [33] moulding of eye and brow; to
arrest it, or rather, perhaps, to set it free, there, as human
expression.  The body of man, indeed, was for the Greeks, still the
genuine work of Prometheus; its connexion with earth and air asserted
in many a legend, not shaded down, as with us, through innumerable
stages of descent, but direct and immediate; in precise contrast to
our physical theory of our life, which never seems to fade, dream
over it as we will, out of the light of common day.  The oracles with
their messages to human intelligence from birds and springs of water,
or vapours of the earth, were a witness to that connexion.  Their
story went back, as they believed, with unbroken continuity, and in
the very places where their later life was lived, to a past,
stretching beyond, yet continuous with, actual memory, in which
heaven and earth mingled; to those who were sons and daughters of
stars, and streams, and dew; to an ancestry of grander men and women,
actually clothed in, or incorporate with, the qualities and
influences of those objects; and we can hardly over-estimate the
influence on the Greek imagination of this mythical connexion with
the natural world, at not so remote a date, and of the solemnising
power exercised thereby over their thoughts.  In this intensely
poetical situation, the historical Greeks, the Athenians of the age
of Pericles, found themselves; it was as if the actual roads on which
men daily walk, went up and on, into a visible wonderland.

[34] With such habitual impressions concerning the body, the physical
nature of man, the Greek sculptor, in his later day, still free in
imagination, through the lingering influence of those early dreams,
may have more easily infused into human form the sense of sun, or
lightning, or cloud, to which it was so closely akin, the spiritual
flesh allying itself happily to mystical meanings, and readily
expressing seemingly unspeakable qualities.  But the human form is a
limiting influence also; and in proportion as art impressed human
form, in sculpture or in the drama, on the vaguer conceptions of the
Greek mind, there was danger of an escape from them of the free
spirit of air, and light, and sky.  Hence, all through the history of
Greek art, there is a struggle, a Streben, as the Germans say,
between the palpable and limited human form, and the floating essence
it is to contain.  On the one hand, was the teeming, still fluid
world, of old beliefs, as we see it reflected in the somewhat
formless theogony of Hesiod; a world, the Titanic vastness of which
is congruous with a certain sublimity of speech, when he has to
speak, for instance, of motion or space; as the Greek language itself
has a primitive copiousness and energy of words, for wind, fire,
water, cold, sound--attesting a deep susceptibility to the
impressions of those things--yet with edges, most often, melting into
each other.  On the other hand, there was that limiting, controlling
tendency, [35] identified with the Dorian influence in the history of
the Greek mind, the spirit of a severe and wholly self-conscious
intelligence; bent on impressing everywhere, in the products of the
imagination, the definite, perfectly conceivable human form, as the
only worthy subject of art; less in sympathy with the mystical
genealogies of Hesiod, than with the heroes of Homer, ending in the
entirely humanised religion of Apollo, the clearly understood
humanity of the old Greek warriors in the marbles of Aegina.  The
representation of man, as he is or might be, became the aim of
sculpture, and the achievement of this the subject of its whole
history; one early carver had opened the eyes, another the lips, a
third had given motion to the feet; in various ways, in spite of the
retention of archaic idols, the genuine human expression had come,
with the truthfulness of life itself.

These two tendencies, then, met and struggled and were harmonised in
the supreme imagination, of Pheidias, in sculpture--of Aeschylus, in
the drama.  Hence, a series of wondrous personalities, of which the
Greek imagination became the dwelling-place; beautiful, perfectly
understood human outlines, embodying a strange, delightful, lingering
sense of clouds and water and sun.  Such a world, the world of really
imaginative Greek sculpture, we still see, reflected in many a humble
vase or battered coin, in Bacchante, and Centaur, and Amazon; [36]
evolved out of that "vasty deep"; with most command, in the
consummate fragments of the Parthenon; not, indeed, so that he who
runs may read, the gifts of Greek sculpture being always delicate,
and asking much of the receiver; but yet visible, and a pledge to us,
of creative power, as, to the worshipper, of the presence, which,
without that material pledge, had but vaguely haunted the fields and
groves.

This, then, was what the Greek imagination did for men's sense and
experience of natural forces, in Athene, in Zeus, in Poseidon; for
men's sense and experience of their own bodily qualities--swiftness,
energy, power of concentrating sight and hand and foot on a momentary
physical act--in the close hair, the chastened muscle, the perfectly
poised attention of the quoit-player; for men's sense, again, of
ethical qualities--restless idealism, inward vision, power of
presence through that vision in scenes behind the experience of
ordinary men--in the idealised Alexander.

To illustrate this function of the imagination, as especially
developed in Greek art, we may reflect on what happens with us in the
use of certain names, as expressing summarily, this name for you and
that for me--Helen, Gretchen, Mary--a hundred associations, trains of
sound, forms, impressions, remembered in all sorts of degrees, which,
through a very wide and full experience, they have the power of
bringing with [37] them; in which respect, such names are but
revealing instances of the whole significance, power, and use of
language in general.  Well,--the mythical conception, projected at
last, in drama or sculpture, is the name, the instrument of the
identification, of the given matter,--of its unity in variety, its
outline or definition in mystery; its spiritual form, to use again
the expression I have borrowed from William Blake--form, with hands,
and lips, and opened eyelids--spiritual, as conveying to us, in that,
the soul of rain, or of a Greek river, or of swiftness, or purity.

To illustrate this, think what the effect would be, if you could
associate, by some trick of memory, a certain group of natural
objects, in all their varied perspective, their changes of colour and
tone in varying light and shade, with the being and image of an
actual person.  You travelled through a country of clear rivers and
wide meadows, or of high windy places, or of lowly grass and willows,
or of the Lady of the Lake; and all the complex impressions of these
objects wound themselves, as a second animated body, new and more
subtle, around the person of some one left there, so that they no
longer come to recollection apart from each other.  Now try to
conceive the image of an actual person, in whom, somehow, all those
impressions of the vine and its fruit, as the highest type of the
life of the green sap, had become incorporate;--all the scents and
colours of its flower and fruit, and [38] something of its curling
foliage; the chances of its growth; the enthusiasm, the easy flow of
more choice expression, as its juices mount within one; for the image
is eloquent, too, in word, gesture, and glancing of the eyes, which
seem to be informed by some soul of the vine within it: as Wordsworth
says,

Beauty born of murmuring sound
Shall pass into her face--

so conceive an image into which the beauty, "born" of the vine, has
passed; and you have the idea of Dionysus, as he appears, entirely
fashioned at last by central Greek poetry and art, and is consecrated
in the Oinophoria and the Anthesteria,+ the great festivals of the
Winepress and the Flowers.

The word wine, and with it the germ of the myth of Dionysus, is older
than the separation of the Indo-Germanic race.  Yet, with the people
of Athens, Dionysus counted as the youngest of the gods; he was also
the son of a mortal, dead in childbirth, and seems always to have
exercised the charm of the latest born, in a sort of allowable
fondness.  Through the fine-spun speculations of modern ethnologists
and grammarians, noting the changes in the letters of his name, and
catching at the slightest historical records of his worship, we may
trace his coming from Phrygia, the birthplace of the more mystical
elements of [39] Greek religion, over the mountains of Thrace.  On
the heights of Pangaeus he leaves an oracle, with a perpetually
burning fire, famous down to the time of Augustus, who reverently
visited it.  Southwards still, over the hills of Parnassus, which
remained for the inspired women of Boeotia the centre of his
presence, he comes to Thebes, and the family of Cadmus.  From Boeotia
he passes to Attica; to the villages first; at last to Athens; at an
assignable date, under Peisistratus; out of the country, into the
town.

To this stage of his town-life, that Dionysus of "enthusiasm" already
belonged; it was to the Athenians of the town, to urbane young men,
sitting together at the banquet, that those expressions of a sudden
eloquence came, of the loosened utterance and finer speech, its
colour and imagery.  Dionysus, then, has entered Athens, to become
urbane like them; to walk along the marble streets in frequent
procession, in the persons of noble youths, like those who at the
Oschophoria bore the branches of the vine from his temple, to the
temple of Athene of the Parasol, or of beautiful slaves; to
contribute through the arts to the adornment of life, yet perhaps
also in part to weaken it, relaxing ancient austerity.  Gradually,
his rough country feasts will be outdone by the feasts of the town;
and as comedy arose out of those, so these will give rise to tragedy.
For his entrance upon this new stage of his career, his coming into
the town, is from the [40] first tinged with melancholy, as if in
entering the town he had put off his country peace.  The other
Olympians are above sorrow.  Dionysus, like a strenuous mortal hero,
like Hercules or Perseus, has his alternations of joy and sorrow, of
struggle and hard-won triumph.  It is out of the sorrows of Dionysus,
then,--of Dionysus in winter--that all Greek tragedy grows; out of
the song of the sorrows of Dionysus, sung at his winter feast by the
chorus of satyrs, singers clad in goat-skins, in memory of his rural
life, one and another of whom, from time to time, steps out of the
company to emphasise and develope this or that circumstance of the
story; and so the song becomes dramatic.  He will soon forget that
early country life, or remember it but as the dreamy background of
his later existence.  He will become, as always in later art and
poetry, of dazzling whiteness; no longer dark with the air and sun,
but like one eskiatrofekos+--brought up under the shade of Eastern
porticoes or pavilions, or in the light that has only reached him
softened through the texture of green leaves; honey-pale, like the
delicate people of the city, like the flesh of women, as those old
vase-painters conceive of it, who leave their hands and faces
untouched with the pencil on the white clay.  The ruddy god of the
vineyard, stained with wine-lees, or coarser colour, will hardly
recognise his double, in the white, graceful, mournful figure,
weeping, chastened, lifting up his arms in yearning+ [41] affection
towards his late-found mother, as we see him on a famous Etruscan
mirror.  Only, in thinking of this early tragedy, of these town-
feasts, and of the entrance of Dionysus into Athens, you must
suppose, not the later Athens which is oftenest in our thoughts, the
Athens of Pericles and Pheidias; but that little earlier Athens of
Peisistratus, which the Persians destroyed, which some of us perhaps
would rather have seen, in its early simplicity, than the greater
one; when the old image of the god, carved probably out of the stock
of an enormous vine, had just come from the village of Eleutherae to
his first temple in the Lenaeum--the quarter of the winepresses, near
the Limnae--the marshy place, which in Athens represents the cave of
Nysa; its little buildings on the hill-top, still with steep rocky
ways, crowding round the ancient temple of Erechtheus and the grave
of Cecrops, with the old miraculous olive-tree still growing there,
and the old snake of Athene Polias still alive somewhere in the
temple court.

The artists of the Italian Renaissance have treated Dionysus many
times, and with great effect, but always in his joy, as an embodiment
of that glory of nature to which the Renaissance was a return.  But
in an early engraving of Mocetto there is for once a Dionysus treated
differently.  The cold light of the background displays a barren
hill, the bridge and towers of [42] an Italian town, and quiet water.
In the foreground, at the root of a vine, Dionysus is sitting, in a
posture of statuesque weariness; the leaves of the vine are grandly
drawn, and wreathing heavily round the head of the god, suggest the
notion of his incorporation into it.  The right hand, holding a great
vessel languidly and indifferently, lets the stream of wine flow
along the earth; while the left supports the forehead, shadowing
heavily a face, comely, but full of an expression of painful
brooding.  One knows not how far one may really be from the mind of
the old Italian engraver, in gathering from his design this
impression of a melancholy and sorrowing Dionysus.  But modern
motives are clearer; and in a Bacchus by a young Hebrew painter, in
the exhibition of the Royal Academy of 1868, there was a complete and
very fascinating realisation of such a motive; the god of the
bitterness of wine, "of things too sweet"; the sea-water of the
Lesbian grape become somewhat brackish in the cup.  Touched by the
sentiment of this subtler, melancholy Dionysus, we may ask whether
anything similar in feeling is to be actually found in the range of
Greek ideas;--had some antitype of this fascinating figure any place
in Greek religion?  Yes; in a certain darker side of the double god
of nature, obscured behind the brighter episodes of Thebes and Naxos,
but never quite forgotten, something corresponding to this deeper,
more refined idea, [43] really existed--the conception of Dionysus
Zagreus; an image, which has left, indeed, but little effect in Greek
art and poetry, which criticism has to put patiently together, out of
late, scattered hints in various writers; but which is yet
discernible, clearly enough to show that it really visited certain
Greek minds here and there; and discernible, not as a late after-
thought, but as a tradition really primitive, and harmonious with the
original motive of the idea of Dionysus.  In its potential, though
unrealised scope, it is perhaps the subtlest dream in Greek religious
poetry, and is, at least, part of the complete physiognomy of
Dionysus, as it actually reveals itself to the modern student, after
a complete survey.

The whole compass of the idea of Dionysus, a dual god of both summer
and winter, became ultimately, as we saw, almost identical with that
of Demeter.  The Phrygians believed that the god slept in winter and
awoke in summer, and celebrated his waking and sleeping; or that he
was bound and imprisoned in winter, and unbound in spring.  We saw
how, in Elis and at Argos, the women called him out of the sea, with
the singing of hymns, in early spring; and a beautiful ceremony in
the temple at Delphi, which, as we know, he shares with Apollo,
described by Plutarch, represents his mystical resurrection.  Yearly,
about the time of the shortest day, just as the light begins to
increase, [44] and while hope is still tremulously strung, the
priestesses of Dionysus were wont to assemble with many lights at his
shrine, and there, with songs and dances, awoke the new-born child
after his wintry sleep, waving in a sacred cradle, like the great
basket used for winnowing corn, a symbolical image, or perhaps a real
infant.  He is twofold then--a Doppelganger; like Persephone, he
belongs to two worlds, and has much in common with her, and a full
share of those dark possibilities which, even apart from the story of
the rape, belong to her.  He is a Chthonian god, and, like all the
children of the earth, has an element of sadness; like Hades himself,
he is hollow and devouring, an eater of man's flesh--sarcophagus--the
grave which consumed unaware the ivory-white shoulder of Pelops.

And you have no sooner caught a glimpse of this image, than a certain
perceptible shadow comes creeping over the whole story; for, in
effect, we have seen glimpses of the sorrowing Dionysus, all along.
Part of the interest of the Theban legend of his birth is that he
comes of the marriage of a god with a mortal woman; and from the
first, like merely mortal heroes, he falls within the sphere of human
chances.  At first, indeed, the melancholy settles round the person
of his mother, dead in childbirth, and ignorant of the glory of her
son; in shame, according to Euripides; punished, as her own sisters
allege, for impiety.  The death of Semele [45] is a sort of ideal or
type of this peculiar claim on human pity, as the descent of
Persephone into Hades, of all human pity over the early death of
women.  Accordingly, his triumph being now consummated, he descends
into Hades, through the unfathomable Alcyonian lake, according to the
most central version of the legend, to bring her up from thence; and
that Hermes, the shadowy conductor of souls, is constantly associated
with Dionysus, in the story of his early life, is not without
significance in this connexion.  As in Delphi the winter months were
sacred to him, so in Athens his feasts all fall within the four
months on this and the other side of the shortest day; as Persephone
spends those four months--a third part of the year--in Hades.  Son or
brother of Persephone he actually becomes at last, in confused, half-
developed tradition; and even has his place, with his dark sister, in
the Eleusinian mysteries, as Iacchus; where, on the sixth day of the
feast, in the great procession from Athens to Eleusis, we may still
realise his image, moving up and down above the heads of the vast
multitude, as he goes, beside "the two," to the temple of Demeter,
amid the light of torches at noonday.

But it was among the mountains of Thrace that this gloomier element
in the being of Dionysus had taken the strongest hold.  As in the
sunny villages of Attica the cheerful elements of his religion had
been developed, so, in those [46] wilder northern regions, people
continued to brood over its darker side, and hence a current of
gloomy legend descended into Greece.  The subject of the Bacchanals
of Euripides is the infatuated opposition of Pentheus, king of
Thebes, to Dionysus and his religion; his cruelty to the god, whom he
shuts up in prison, and who appears on the stage with his delicate
limbs cruelly bound, but who is finally triumphant; Pentheus, the man
of grief, being torn to pieces by his own mother, in the judicial
madness sent upon her by the god.  In this play, Euripides has only
taken one of many versions of the same story, in all of which
Dionysus is victorious, his enemy being torn to pieces by the sacred
women, or by wild horses, or dogs, or the fangs of cold; or the
maenad Ambrosia, whom he is supposed to pursue for purposes of lust,
suddenly becomes a vine, and binds him down to the earth
inextricably, in her serpentine coils.

In all these instances, then, Dionysus punishes his enemies by
repaying them in kind.  But a deeper vein of poetry pauses at the
sorrow, and in the conflict does not too soon anticipate the final
triumph.  It is Dionysus himself who exhausts these sufferings.
Hence, in many forms--reflexes of all the various phases of his
wintry existence--the image of Dionysus Zagreus, the Hunter--of
Dionysus in winter--storming wildly on the dark Thracian hills, from
which, like Ares and Boreas, he originally descends into [47] Greece;
the thought of the hunter concentrating into itself all men's
forebodings over the departure of the year at its richest, and the
death of all sweet things in the long-continued cold, when the sick
and the old and little children, gazing out morning after morning on
the dun sky, can hardly believe in the return any more of a bright
day.  Or he is connected with the fears, the dangers and hardships of
the hunter himself, lost or slain sometimes, far from home, in the
dense woods of the mountains, as he seeks his meat so ardently;
becoming, in his chase, almost akin to the wild beasts--to the wolf,
who comes before us in the name of Lycurgus, one of his bitterest
enemies--and a phase, therefore, of his own personality, in the true
intention of the myth.  This transformation, this image of the
beautiful soft creature become an enemy of human kind, putting off
himself in his madness, wronged by his own fierce hunger and thirst,
and haunting, with terrible sounds, the high Thracian farms, is the
most tragic note of the whole picture, and links him on to one of the
gloomiest creations of later romance, the werewolf, the belief in
which still lingers in Greece, as in France, where it seems to become
incorporate in the darkest of all romantic histories, that of Gilles
de Retz.

And now we see why the tradition of human sacrifice lingered on in
Greece, in connexion with Dionysus, as a thing of actual detail, and
[48] not remote, so that Dionysius of Halicarnassus counts it among
the horrors of Greek religion.  That the sacred women of Dionysus
ate, in mystical ceremony, raw flesh, and drank blood, is a fact
often mentioned, and commemorates, as it seems, the actual sacrifice
of a fair boy deliberately torn to pieces, fading at last into a
symbolical offering.  At Delphi, the wolf was preserved for him, on
the principle by which Venus loves the dove, and Hera peacocks; and
there were places in which, after the sacrifice of a kid to him, a
curious mimic pursuit of the priest who had offered it represented
the still surviving horror of one who had thrown a child to the
wolves.  The three daughters of Minyas devote themselves to his
worship; they cast lots, and one of them offers her own tender infant
to be torn by the three, like a roe; then the other women pursue
them, and they are turned into bats, or moths, or other creatures of
the night.  And fable is endorsed by history; Plutarch telling us
how, before the battle of Salamis, with the assent of Themistocles,
three Persian captive youths were offered to Dionysus the Devourer.

As, then, some embodied their fears of winter in Persephone, others
embodied them in Dionysus, a devouring god, whose sinister side (as
the best wine itself has its treacheries) is illustrated in the dark
and shameful secret society described by Livy, in which his worship
ended at Rome, afterwards abolished by solemn act of the senate. [49]
He becomes a new Aidoneus, a hunter of men's souls; like him, to be
appeased only by costly sacrifices.

And then, Dionysus recovering from his mid-winter madness, how
intensely these people conceive the spring!  It is that triumphant
Dionysus, cured of his great malady, and sane in the clear light of
the longer days, whom Euripides in the Bacchanals sets before us, as
still, essentially, the Hunter, Zagreus; though he keeps the red
streams and torn flesh away from the delicate body of the god, in his
long vesture of white and gold, and fragrant with Eastern odours.  Of
this I hope to speak in another paper; let me conclude this by one
phase more of religious custom.

If Dionysus, like Persephone, has his gloomy side, like her he has
also a peculiar message for a certain number of refined minds,
seeking, in the later days of Greek religion, such modifications of
the old legend as may minister to ethical culture, to the perfecting
of the moral nature.  A type of second birth, from first to last, he
opens, in his series of annual changes, for minds on the look-out for
it, the hope of a possible analogy, between the resurrection of
nature, and something else, as yet unrealised, reserved for human
souls; and the beautiful, weeping creature, vexed by the wind,
suffering, torn to pieces, and rejuvenescent again at last, like a
tender shoot of living green out of the hardness and stony darkness+
[50] of the earth, becomes an emblem or ideal of chastening and
purification, and of final victory through suffering.  It is the
finer, mystical sentiment of the few, detached from the coarser and
more material religion of the many, and accompanying it, through the
course of its history, as its ethereal, less palpable, life-giving
soul, and, as always happens, seeking the quiet, and not too anxious
to make itself felt by others.  With some unfixed, though real, place
in the general scheme of Greek religion, this phase of the worship of
Dionysus had its special development in the Orphic literature and
mysteries.  Obscure as are those followers of the mystical Orpheus,
we yet certainly see them, moving, and playing their part, in the
later ages of Greek religion.  Old friends with new faces, though
they had, as Plato witnesses, their less worthy aspect, in certain
appeals to vulgar, superstitious fears, they seem to have been not
without the charm of a real and inward religious beauty, with their
neologies, their new readings of old legends, their sense of mystical
second meanings, as they refined upon themes grown too familiar, and
linked, in a sophisticated age, the new to the old.  In this respect,
we may perhaps liken them to the mendicant orders in the Middle Ages,
with their florid, romantic theology, beyond the bounds of orthodox
tradition, giving so much new matter to art and poetry.  They are a
picturesque addition, also, to the exterior of Greek life, with [51]
their white dresses, their dirges, their fastings and ecstasies,
their outward asceticism and material purifications.  And the central
object of their worship comes before us as a tortured, persecuted,
slain god--the suffering Dionysus--of whose legend they have their
own special and esoteric version.  That version, embodied in a
supposed Orphic poem, The Occultation of Dionysus, is represented
only by the details that have passed from it into the almost endless
Dionysiaca of Nonnus, a writer of the fourth century; and the imagery
has to be put back into the shrine, bit by bit, and finally
incomplete.  Its central point is the picture of the rending to
pieces of a divine child, of whom a tradition, scanty indeed, but
harmonious in its variations, had long maintained itself.  It was in
memory of it, that those who were initiated into the Orphic mysteries
tasted of the raw flesh of the sacrifice, and thereafter ate flesh no
more; and it connected itself with that strange object in the Delphic
shrine, the grave of Dionysus.

Son, first, of Zeus, and of Persephone whom Zeus woos, in the form of
a serpent--the white, golden-haired child, the best-beloved of his
father, and destined by him to be the ruler of the world, grows up in
secret.  But one day, Zeus, departing on a journey in his great
fondness for the child, delivered to him his crown and staff, and so
left him--shut in a strong tower.  Then it came to pass that the
jealous Here sent [52] out the Titans against him.  They approached
the crowned child, and with many sorts of playthings enticed him
away, to have him in their power, and then miserably slew him--
hacking his body to pieces, as the wind tears the vine, with the axe
Pelekus, which, like the swords of Roland and Arthur, has its proper
name.  The fragments of the body they boiled in a great cauldron, and
made an impious banquet upon them, afterwards carrying the bones to
Apollo, whose rival the young child should have been, thinking to do
him service.  But Apollo, in great pity for this his youngest
brother, laid the bones in a grave, within his own holy place.
Meanwhile, Here, full of her vengeance, brings to Zeus the heart of
the child, which she had snatched, still beating, from the hands of
the Titans.  But Zeus delivered the heart to Semele; and the soul of
the child remaining awhile in Hades, where Demeter made for it new
flesh, was thereafter born of Semele--a second Zagreus--the younger,
or Theban Dionysus.

NOTES

12. +"Hymn to Aphrodite," lines 264-72 (Greek text).  The Homeric
Hymns and Homerica with an English Translation by Hugh G. Evelyn-
White.  Homeric Hymns. Cambridge, MA., Harvard University Press;
London, William Heinemann Ltd. 1914.

16. +"Hymn to Pan," lines 16ff.  The Homeric Hymns and Homerica with
an English Translation by Hugh G. Evelyn-White.  Homeric Hymns.
Cambridge, MA., Harvard University Press; London, William Heinemann
Ltd. 1914.

22. +Transliteration: deisidaimones.  Liddell and Scott definition:
"fearing the gods," in both a good and bad sense--i.e. either pious
or superstitious.

22. *There were some who suspected Dionysus of a secret democratic
interest; though indeed he was liberator only of men's hearts, and
eleuthereus only because he never forgot Eleutherae, the little
place which, in Attica, first received him.

26. +E-text editor's transliteration: pyrigenes.  Liddell and Scott
definition: "born of fire."

38. +Transliteration: Oinophoria  . . . Anthesteria.  Liddell and
Scott definition of Anthesteria: "The Feast of Flowers, the three
days' festival of Bacchus at Athens, in the month Anthesterion."

40. +Transliteration: eskiatrofekos.  Liddell and Scott definition:
participle of skiatropheo, "to rear in the shade."



THE BACCHANALS OF EURIPIDES

[53] So far, I have endeavoured to present, with something of the
concrete character of a picture, Dionysus, the old Greek god, as we
may discern him through a multitude of stray hints in art and poetry
and religious custom, through modern speculation on the tendencies of
early thought, through traits and touches in our own actual states of
mind, which may seem sympathetic with those tendencies.  In such a
picture there must necessarily be a certain artificiality; things
near and far, matter of varying degrees of certainty, fact and
surmise, being reflected and concentrated, for its production, as if
on the surface of a mirror.  Such concrete character, however, Greek
poet or sculptor, from time to time, impressed on the vague world of
popular belief and usage around him; and in the Bacchanals of
Euripides we have an example of the figurative or imaginative power
of poetry, selecting and combining, at will, from that mixed and
floating mass, weaving the many-coloured threads together, blending
the various phases of legend--all the light and shade of the [54]
subject--into a shape, substantial and firmly set, through which a
mere fluctuating tradition might retain a permanent place in men's
imaginations.  Here, in what Euripides really says, in what we
actually see on the stage, as we read his play, we are dealing with a
single real object, not with uncertain effects of many half-fancied
objects.  Let me leave you for a time almost wholly in his hands,
while you look very closely at his work, so as to discriminate its
outlines clearly.

This tragedy of the Bacchanals--a sort of masque or morality, as we
say--a monument as central for the legend of Dionysus as the Homeric
hymn for that of Demeter, is unique in Greek literature, and has also
a singular interest in the life of Euripides himself.  He is writing
in old age (the piece was not played till after his death) not at
Athens, nor for a polished Attic audience, but for a wilder and less
temperately cultivated sort of people, at the court of Archelaus, in
Macedonia.  Writing in old age, he is in that subdued mood, a mood
not necessarily sordid, in which (the shudder at the nearer approach
of the unknown world coming over him more frequently than of old)
accustomed ideas, conformable to a sort of common sense regarding the
unseen, oftentimes regain what they may have lost, in a man's
allegiance.  It is a sort of madness, he begins to think, to differ
from the received opinions thereon.  Not that he is insincere or
ironical, but that he tends, in the [55] sum of probabilities, to
dwell on their more peaceful side; to sit quiet, for the short
remaining time, in the reflexion of the more cheerfully lighted side
of things; and what is accustomed--what holds of familiar usage--
comes to seem the whole essence of wisdom, on all subjects; and the
well-known delineation of the vague country, in Homer or Hesiod,
one's best attainable mental outfit, for the journey thither.  With
this sort of quiet wisdom the whole play is penetrated.  Euripides
has said, or seemed to say, many things concerning Greek religion, at
variance with received opinion; and now, in the end of life, he
desires to make his peace--what shall at any rate be peace with men.
He is in the mood for acquiescence, or even for a palinode; and this
takes the direction, partly of mere submission to, partly of a
refining upon, the authorised religious tradition: he calmly
sophisticates this or that element of it which had seemed grotesque;
and has, like any modern writer, a theory how myths were made, and
how in lapse of time their first signification gets to be obscured
among mortals; and what he submits to, that he will also adorn
fondly, by his genius for words.

And that very neighbourhood afforded him his opportunity.  It was in
the neighbourhood of Pella, the Macedonian capital, that the worship
of Dionysus, the newest of the gods, prevailed in its most
extravagant form--the [56] Thiasus, or wild, nocturnal procession of
Bacchic women, retired to the woods and hills for that purpose, with
its accompaniments of music, and lights, and dancing.  Rational and
moderate Athenians, as we may gather from some admissions of
Euripides himself, somewhat despised all that; while those who were
more fanatical forsook the home celebrations, and went on pilgrimage
from Attica to Cithaeron or Delphi.  But at Pella persons of high
birth took part in the exercise, and at a later period we read in
Plutarch how Olympias, the mother of Alexander the Great, was devoted
to this enthusiastic worship.  Although in one of Botticelli's
pictures the angels dance very sweetly, and may represent many
circumstances actually recorded in the Hebrew scriptures, yet we
hardly understand the dance as a religious ceremony; the bare mention
of it sets us thinking on some fundamental differences between the
pagan religions and our own.  It is to such ecstasies, however, that
all nature-worship seems to tend; that giddy, intoxicating sense of
spring--that tingling in the veins, sympathetic with the yearning
life of the earth, having, apparently, in all times and places,
prompted some mode of wild dancing.  Coleridge, in one of his
fantastic speculations, refining on the German word for enthusiasm--
Schwarmerei, swarming, as he says, "like the swarming of bees
together"--has explained how the sympathies of mere numbers, as such,
the random catching on [57] fire of one here and another there, when
people are collected together, generates as if by mere contact, some
new and rapturous spirit, not traceable in the individual units of a
multitude.  Such swarming was the essence of that strange dance of
the Bacchic women: literally like winged things, they follow, with
motives, we may suppose, never quite made clear even to themselves,
their new, strange, romantic god.  Himself a woman-like god,--it was
on women and feminine souls that his power mainly fell.  At Elis, it
was the women who had their own little song with which at spring-time
they professed to call him from the sea: at Brasiae they had their
own temple where none but women might enter; and so the Thiasus,
also, is almost exclusively formed of women--of those who experience
most directly the influence of things which touch thought through the
senses--the presence of night, the expectation of morning, the
nearness of wild, unsophisticated, natural things--the echoes, the
coolness, the noise of frightened creatures as they climbed through
the darkness, the sunrise seen from the hill-tops, the disillusion,
the bitterness of satiety, the deep slumber which comes with the
morning.  Athenians visiting the Macedonian capital would hear, and
from time to time actually see, something of a religious custom, in
which the habit of an earlier world might seem to survive.  As they
saw the lights flitting over the mountains, [58] and heard the wild,
sharp cries of the women, there was presented, as a singular fact in
the more prosaic actual life of a later time, an enthusiasm otherwise
relegated to the wonderland of a distant past, in which a supposed
primitive harmony and understanding between man and nature renewed
itself.  Later sisters of Centaur and Amazon, the Maenads, as they
beat the earth in strange sympathy with its waking up from sleep, or
as, in the description of the Messenger, in the play of Euripides,
they lie sleeping in the glen, revealed among the morning mists, were
themselves indeed as remnants--flecks left here and there and not yet
quite evaporated under the hard light of a later and commoner day--of
a certain cloud-world which had once covered all things with a veil
of mystery.  Whether or not, in what was often probably coarse as
well as extravagant, there may have lurked some finer vein of ethical
symbolism, such as Euripides hints at--the soberer influence, in the
Thiasus, of keen air and animal expansion, certainly, for art, and a
poetry delighting in colour and form, it was a custom rich in
suggestion.  The imitative arts would draw from it altogether new
motives of freedom and energy, of freshness in old forms.  It is from
this fantastic scene that the beautiful wind-touched draperies, the
rhythm, the heads suddenly thrown back, of many a Pompeian wall-
painting and sarcophagus-frieze are originally derived; and that
melting languor, that perfectly [59] composed lassitude of the fallen
Maenad, became a fixed type in the school of grace, the school of
Praxiteles.

The circumstances of the place thus combining with his peculiar
motive, Euripides writes the Bacchanals.  It is this extravagant
phase of religion, and the latest-born of the gods, which as an
amende honorable to the once slighted traditions of Greek belief, he
undertakes to interpret to an audience composed of people who, like
Scyles, the Hellenising king of Scythia, feel the attraction of Greek
religion and Greek usage, but on their quainter side, and partly
relish that extravagance.  Subject and audience alike stimulate the
romantic temper, and the tragedy of the Bacchanals, with its
innovations in metre and diction, expressly noted as foreign or
barbarous--all the charm and grace of the clear-pitched singing of
the chorus, notwithstanding--with its subtleties and sophistications,
its grotesques, mingled with and heightening a real shudder at the
horror of the theme, and a peculiarly fine and human pathos, is
almost wholly without the reassuring calm, generally characteristic
of the endings of Greek tragedy: is itself excited, troubled,
disturbing--a spotted or dappled thing, like the oddly dappled fawn-
skins of its own masquerade, so aptly expressive of the shifty,
twofold, rapidly-doubling genius of the divine, wild creature
himself.  Let us listen and watch the strange masks coming and going,
for a while, [60] as far as may be as we should do with a modern
play.  What are its charms?  What is still alive, impressive, and
really poetical for us, in the dim old Greek play?

The scene is laid at Thebes, where the memory of Semele, the mother
of Dionysus, is still under a cloud.  Her own sisters, sinning
against natural affection, pitiless over her pathetic death and
finding in it only a judgment upon the impiety with which, having
shamed herself with some mortal lover, she had thrown the blame of
her sin upon Zeus, have, so far, triumphed over her.  The true and
glorious version of her story lives only in the subdued memory of the
two aged men, Teiresias the prophet, and her father Cadmus, apt now
to let things go loosely by, who has delegated his royal power to
Pentheus, the son of one of those sisters--a hot-headed and impious
youth.  So things had passed at Thebes; and now a strange
circumstance has happened.  An odd sickness has fallen upon the
women: Dionysus has sent the sting of his enthusiasm upon them, and
has pushed it to a sort of madness, a madness which imitates the true
Thiasus.  Forced to have the form without the profit of his worship,
the whole female population, leaving distaff and spindle, and headed
by the three princesses, have deserted the town, and are lying
encamped on the bare rocks, or under the pines, among the solitudes
of Cithaeron.  And it is just at this point that the divine child,
[61] supposed to have perished at his mother's side in the flames,
returns to his birthplace, grown to manhood.

Dionysus himself speaks the prologue.  He is on a journey through the
world to found a new religion; and the first motive of this new
religion is the vindication of the memory of his mother.  In
explaining this design, Euripides, who seeks always for pathetic
effect, tells in few words, touching because simple, the story of
Semele--here, and again still more intensely in the chorus which
follows--the merely human sentiment of maternity being not forgotten,
even amid the thought of the divine embraces of her fiery bed-fellow.
It is out of tenderness for her that the son's divinity is to be
revealed.  A yearning affection, the affection with which we see him
lifting up his arms about her, satisfied at last, on an old Etruscan
metal mirror, has led him from place to place: everywhere he has had
his dances and established his worship; and everywhere his presence
has been her justification.  First of all the towns in Greece he
comes to Thebes, the scene of her sorrows: he is standing beside the
sacred waters of Dirce and Ismenus: the holy place is in sight: he
hears the Greek speech, and sees at last the ruins of the place of
her lying-in, at once his own birth-chamber and his mother's tomb.
His image, as it detaches itself little by little from the episodes
of the play, and is further characterised by the [62] songs of the
chorus, has a singular completeness of symbolical effect.  The
incidents of a fully developed human personality are superinduced on
the mystical and abstract essence of that fiery spirit in the flowing
veins of the earth--the aroma of the green world is retained in the
fair human body, set forth in all sorts of finer ethical lights and
shades--with a wonderful kind of subtlety.  In the course of his long
progress from land to land, the gold, the flowers, the incense of the
East, have attached themselves deeply to him: their effect and
expression rest now upon his flesh like the gleaming of that old
ambrosial ointment of which Homer speaks as resting ever on the
persons of the gods, and cling to his clothing--the mitre binding his
perfumed yellow hair--the long tunic down to the white feet, somewhat
womanly, and the fawn-skin, with its rich spots, wrapped about the
shoulders.  As the door opens to admit him, the scented air of the
vineyards (for the vine-blossom has an exquisite perfume) blows
through; while the convolvulus on his mystic rod represents all
wreathing flowery things whatever, with or without fruit, as in
America all such plants are still called vines.  "Sweet upon the
mountains," the excitement of which he loves so deeply and to which
he constantly invites his followers--"sweet upon the mountains," and
profoundly amorous, his presence embodies all the voluptuous
abundance of Asia, its beating [63] sun, its "fair-towered cities,
full of inhabitants," which the chorus describe in their luscious
vocabulary, with the rich Eastern names--Lydia, Persia, Arabia Felix:
he is a sorcerer or an enchanter, the tyrant Pentheus thinks: the
springs of water, the flowing of honey and milk and wine, are his
miracles, wrought in person.

We shall see presently how, writing for that northern audience,
Euripides crosses the Theban with the gloomier Thracian legend, and
lets the darker stain show through.  Yet, from the first, amid all
this floweriness, a touch or trace of that gloom is discernible.  The
fawn-skin, composed now so daintily over the shoulders, may be worn
with the whole coat of the animal made up, the hoofs gilded and tied
together over the right shoulder, to leave the right arm disengaged
to strike, its head clothing the human head within, as Alexander, on
some of his coins, looks out from the elephant's scalp, and Hercules
out of the jaws of a lion, on the coins of Camarina.  Those
diminutive golden horns attached to the forehead, represent not
fecundity merely, nor merely the crisp tossing of the waves of
streams, but horns of offence.  And our fingers must beware of the
thyrsus, tossed about so wantonly by himself and his chorus.  The
pine-cone at its top does but cover a spear-point; and the thing is a
weapon--the sharp spear of the hunter Zagreus--though hidden now by
the fresh leaves, and that button of pine-cone (useful also to dip in
[64] wine, to check the sweetness) which he has plucked down, coming
through the forest, at peace for a while this spring morning.

And the chorus emphasise this character, their songs weaving for the
whole piece, in words more effective than any painted scenery, a
certain congruous background which heightens all; the intimate sense
of mountains and mountain things being in this way maintained
throughout, and concentrated on the central figure.  "He is sweet
among the mountains," they say, "when he drops down upon the plain,
out of his mystic musings"--and we may think we see the green
festoons of the vine dropping quickly, from foot-place to foot-place,
down the broken hill-side in spring, when like the Bacchanals, all
who can, wander out of the town to enjoy the earliest heats.  "Let us
go out into the fields," we say; a strange madness seems to lurk
among the flowers, ready to lay hold on us also; autika ga pasa
choreusei+--soon the whole earth will dance and sing.

Dionysus is especially a woman's deity, and he comes from the east
conducted by a chorus of gracious Lydian women, his true sisters--
Bassarids, clad like himself in the long tunic, or bassara.  They
move and speak to the music of clangorous metallic instruments,
cymbals and tambourines, relieved by the clearer notes of the pipe;
and there is a strange variety of almost imitative sounds for such
music, in their very [65] words.  The Homeric hymn to Demeter
precedes the art of sculpture, but is rich in suggestions for it;
here, on the contrary, in the first chorus of the Bacchanals, as
elsewhere in the play, we feel that the poetry of Euripides is
probably borrowing something from art; that in these choruses, with
their repetitions and refrains, he is reproducing perhaps the spirit
of some sculptured relief which, like Luca della Robbia's celebrated
work for the organ-loft of the cathedral of Florence, worked by
various subtleties of line, not in the lips and eyes only, but in the
drapery and hands also, to a strange reality of impression of musical
effect on visible things.

They beat their drums before the palace; and then a humourous little
scene, a reflex of the old Dionysiac comedy--of that laughter which
was an essential element of the earliest worship of Dionysus--follows
the first chorus.  The old blind prophet Teiresias, and the aged king
Cadmus, always secretly true to him, have agreed to celebrate the
Thiasus, and accept his divinity openly.  The youthful god has
nowhere said decisively that he will have none but young men in his
sacred dance.  But for that purpose they must put on the long tunic,
and that spotted skin which only rustics wear, and assume the thyrsus
and ivy-crown.  Teiresias arrives and is seen knocking at the doors.
And then, just as in the medieval mystery, comes the [66] inevitable
grotesque, not unwelcome to our poet, who is wont in his plays,
perhaps not altogether consciously, to intensify by its relief both
the pity and the terror of his conceptions.  At the summons of
Teiresias, Cadmus appears, already arrayed like him in the appointed
ornaments, in all their odd contrast with the infirmity and staidness
of old age.  Even in old men's veins the spring leaps again, and they
are more than ready to begin dancing.  But they are shy of the
untried dress, and one of them is blind--poi dei choreuein; poi
kathistanai poda; kai krata seisai polion;+ and then the difficulty
of the way! the long, steep journey to the glens! may pilgrims boil
their peas? might they proceed to the place in carriages?  At last,
while the audience laugh more or less delicately at their aged
fumblings, in some co-operative manner, the eyes of the one combining
with the hands of the other, the pair are about to set forth.

Here Pentheus is seen approaching the palace in extreme haste.  He
has been absent from home, and returning, has just heard of the state
of things at Thebes--the strange malady of the women, the dancings,
the arrival of the mysterious stranger: he finds all the women
departed from the town, and sees Cadmus and Teiresias in masque.
Like the exaggerated diabolical figures in some of the religious
plays and imageries of the Middle Age, he is an impersonation of
stupid impiety, one of those whom the gods willing to [67] destroy
first infatuate.  Alternating between glib unwisdom and coarse
mockery, between violence and a pretence of moral austerity, he
understands only the sorriest motives; thinks the whole thing
feigned, and fancies the stranger, so effeminate, so attractive of
women with whom he remains day and night, but a poor sensual
creature, and the real motive of the Bacchic women the indulgence of
their lust; his ridiculous old grandfather he is ready to renounce,
and accuses Teiresias of having in view only some fresh source of
professional profit to himself in connexion with some new-fangled
oracle; his petty spite avenges itself on the prophet by an order to
root up the sacred chair, where he sits to watch the birds for
divination, and disturb the order of his sacred place; and even from
the moment of his entrance the mark of his doom seems already set
upon him, in an impotent trembling which others notice in him.  Those
of the women who still loitered, he has already caused to be shut up
in the common prison; the others, with Ino, Autonoe, and his own
mother, Agave, he will hunt out of the glens; while the stranger is
threatened with various cruel forms of death.  But Teiresias and
Cadmus stay to reason with him, and induce him to abide wisely with
them; the prophet fittingly becomes the interpreter of Dionysus, and
explains the true nature of the visitor; his divinity, the completion
or counterpart of that of Demeter; his gift of prophecy; [68] all the
soothing influences he brings with him; above all, his gift of the
medicine of sleep to weary mortals.  But the reason of Pentheus is
already sickening, and the judicial madness gathering over it.
Teiresias and Cadmus can but "go pray."  So again, not without the
laughter of the audience, supporting each other a little grotesquely
against a fall, they get away at last.

And then, again, as in those quaintly carved and coloured imageries
of the Middle Age--the martyrdom of the youthful Saint Firmin, for
instance, round the choir at Amiens--comes the full contrast, with a
quite medieval simplicity and directness, between the insolence of
the tyrant, now at last in sight of his prey, and the outraged beauty
of the youthful god, meek, surrounded by his enemies, like some fair
wild creature in the snare of the hunter.  Dionysus has been taken
prisoner; he is led on to the stage, with his hands bound, but still
holding the thyrsus.  Unresisting he had submitted himself to his
captors; his colour had not changed; with a smile he had bidden them
do their will, so that even they are touched with awe, and are almost
ready to admit his divinity.  Marvellously white and red, he stands
there; and now, unwilling to be revealed to the unworthy, and
requiring a fitness in the receiver, he represents himself, in answer
to the inquiries of Pentheus, not as Dionysus, but simply as the
god's prophet, [69] in full trust in whom he desires to hear his
sentence.  Then the long hair falls to the ground under the shears;
the mystic wand is torn from his hand, and he is led away to be tied
up, like some dangerous wild animal, in a dark place near the king's
stables.

Up to this point in the play, there has been a noticeable ambiguity
as to the person of Dionysus, the main figure of the piece; he is in
part Dionysus, indeed; but in part, only his messenger, or minister
preparing his way; a certain harshness of effect in the actual
appearance of a god upon the stage being in this way relieved, or
made easy, as by a gradual revelation in two steps.  To Pentheus, in
his invincible ignorance, his essence remains to the last unrevealed,
and even the women of the chorus seem to understand in him, so far,
only the forerunner of their real leader.  As he goes away bound,
therefore, they too, threatened also in their turn with slavery,
invoke his greater original to appear and deliver them.  In pathetic
cries they reproach Thebes for rejecting them--ti m' anainei, ti me
pheugeis;+ yet they foretell his future greatness; a new Orpheus, he
will more than renew that old miraculous reign over animals and
plants.  Their song is full of suggestions of wood and river.  It is
as if, for a moment, Dionysus became the suffering vine again; and
the rustle of the leaves and water come through their words to
refresh it.  The [70] fountain of Dirce still haunted by the virgins
of Thebes, where the infant god was cooled and washed from the flecks
of his fiery birth, becomes typical of the coolness of all springs,
and is made, by a really poetic licence, the daughter of the distant
Achelous--the earliest born, the father in myth, of all Greek rivers.

A giddy sonorous scene of portents and surprises follows--a distant,
exaggerated, dramatic reflex of that old thundering tumult of the
festival in the vineyard--in which Dionysus reappears, miraculously
set free from his bonds.  First, in answer to the deep-toned
invocation of the chorus, a great voice is heard from within,
proclaiming him to be the son of Semele and Zeus.  Then, amid the
short, broken, rapturous cries of the women of the chorus,
proclaiming him master, the noise of an earthquake passes slowly; the
pillars of the palace are seen waving to and fro; while the strange,
memorial fire from the tomb of Semele blazes up and envelopes the
whole building.  The terrified women fling themselves on the ground;
and then, at last, as the place is shaken open, Dionysus is seen
stepping out from among the tottering masses of the mimic palace,
bidding them arise and fear not.  But just here comes a long pause in
the action of the play, in which we must listen to a messenger newly
arrived from the glens, to tell us what he has seen there, among the
Maenads.  The singular, somewhat sinister beauty of this speech, and
a [71] similar one subsequent--a fair description of morning on the
mountain-tops, with the Bacchic women sleeping, which turns suddenly
to a hard, coarse picture of animals cruelly rent--is one of the
special curiosities which distinguish this play; and, as it is wholly
narrative, I shall give it in English prose, abbreviating, here and
there, some details which seem to have but a metrical value:--

"I was driving my herd of cattle to the summit of the scaur to feed,
what time the sun sent forth his earliest beams to warm the earth.
And lo! three companies of women, and at the head of one of them
Autonoe, thy mother Agave at the head of the second, and Ino at the
head of the third.  And they all slept, with limbs relaxed, leaned
against the low boughs of the pines, or with head thrown heedlessly
among the oak-leaves strewn upon the ground--all in the sleep of
temperance, not, as thou saidst, pursuing Cypris through the
solitudes of the forest, drunken with wine, amid the low rustling of
the lotus-pipe.

"And thy mother, when she heard the lowing of the kine, stood up in
the midst of them, and cried to them to shake off sleep.  And they,
casting slumber from their eyes, started upright, a marvel of beauty
and order, young and old and maidens yet unmarried.  And first, they
let fall their hair upon their shoulders; and those [72] whose
cinctures were unbound re-composed the spotted fawn-skins, knotting
them about with snakes, which rose and licked them on the chin.
Some, lately mothers, who with breasts still swelling had left their
babes behind, nursed in their arms antelopes, or wild whelps of
wolves, and yielded them their milk to drink; and upon their heads
they placed crowns of ivy or of oak, or of flowering convolvulus.
Then one, taking a thyrsus-wand, struck with it upon a rock, and
thereupon leapt out a fine rain of water; another let down a reed
upon the earth, and a fount of wine was sent forth there; and those
whose thirst was for a white stream, skimming the surface with their
finger-tips, gathered from it abundance of milk; and from the ivy of
the mystic wands streams of honey distilled.  Verily! hadst thou seen
these things, thou wouldst have worshipped whom now thou revilest.

"And we shepherds and herdsmen came together to question with each
other over this matter--what strange and terrible things they do.
And a certain wayfarer from the city, subtle in speech, spake to us--
'O! dwellers upon these solemn ledges of the hills, will ye that we
hunt down, and take, amid her revelries, Agave, the mother of
Pentheus, according to the king's pleasure?'  And he seemed to us to
speak wisely; and we lay in wait among the bushes; and they, at the
time appointed, began moving their wands for the Bacchic dance, [73]
calling with one voice upon Bromius!--Iacchus!--the son of Zeus! and
the whole mountain was moved with ecstasy together, and the wild
creatures; nothing but was moved in their running.  And it chanced
that Agave, in her leaping, lighted near me, and I sprang from my
hiding-place, willing to lay hold on her; and she groaned out, 'O!
dogs of hunting, these fellows are upon our traces; but follow me!
follow! with the mystic wands for weapons in your hands.'  And we, by
flight, hardly escaped tearing to pieces at their hands, who
thereupon advanced with knifeless fingers upon the young of the kine,
as they nipped the green; and then hadst thou seen one holding a
bleating calf in her hands, with udder distent, straining it asunder;
others tore the heifers to shreds amongst them; tossed up and down
the morsels lay in sight--flank or hoof--or hung from the fir-trees,
dropping churned blood.  The fierce, horned bulls stumbled forward,
their breasts upon the ground, dragged on by myriad hands of young
women, and in a moment the inner parts were rent to morsels.  So,
like a flock of birds aloft in flight, they retreat upon the level
lands outstretched below, which by the waters of Asopus put forth the
fair-flowering crop of Theban people--Hysiae and Erythrae--below the
precipice of Cithaeron."--

A grotesque scene follows, in which the [74] humour we noted, on
seeing those two old men diffidently set forth in chaplet and fawn-
skin, deepens into a profound tragic irony.  Pentheus is determined
to go out in arms against the Bacchanals and put them to death, when
a sudden desire seizes him to witness them in their encampment upon
the mountains.  Dionysus, whom he still supposes to be but a prophet
or messenger of the god, engages to conduct him thither; and, for
greater security among the dangerous women, proposes that he shall
disguise himself in female attire.  As Pentheus goes within for that
purpose, he lingers for a moment behind him, and in prophetic speech
declares the approaching end;--the victim has fallen into the net;
and he goes in to assist at the toilet, to array him in the ornaments
which he will carry to Hades, destroyed by his own mother's hands.
It is characteristic of Euripides--part of his fine tact and
subtlety--to relieve and justify what seems tedious, or constrained,
or merely terrible and grotesque, by a suddenly suggested trait of
homely pathos, or a glimpse of natural beauty, or a morsel of form or
colour seemingly taken directly from picture or sculpture.  So here,
in this fantastic scene our thoughts are changed in a moment by
the singing of the chorus, and divert for a while to the dark-haired
tresses of the wood; the breath of the river-side is upon us; beside
it, a fawn escaped from the hunter's net is flying swiftly in [75]
its joy; like it, the Maenad rushes along; and we see the little head
thrown back upon the neck, in deep aspiration, to drink in the dew.

Meantime, Pentheus has assumed his disguise, and comes forth tricked
up with false hair and the dress of a Bacchanal; but still with some
misgivings at the thought of going thus attired through the streets
of Thebes, and with many laughable readjustments of the unwonted
articles of clothing.  And with the woman's dress, his madness is
closing faster round him; just before, in the palace, terrified at
the noise of the earthquake, he had drawn sword upon a mere fantastic
appearance, and pierced only the empty air.  Now he begins to see the
sun double, and Thebes with all its towers repeated, while his
conductor seems to him transformed into a wild beast; and now and
then, we come upon some touches of a curious psychology, so that we
might almost seem to be reading a modern poet.  As if Euripides had
been aware of a not unknown symptom of incipient madness (it is said)
in which the patient, losing the sense of resistance, while lifting
small objects imagines himself to be raising enormous weights,
Pentheus, as he lifts the thyrsus, fancies he could lift Cithaeron
with all the Bacchanals upon it.  At all this the laughter of course
will pass round the theatre; while those who really pierce into the
purpose of the poet, shudder, as they see the victim thus grotesquely
clad going to his doom, [76] already foreseen in the ominous chant of
the chorus--and as it were his grave-clothes, in the dress which
makes him ridiculous.

Presently a messenger arrives to announce that Pentheus is dead, and
then another curious narrative sets forth the manner of his death.
Full of wild, coarse, revolting details, of course not without
pathetic touches, and with the loveliness of the serving Maenads, and
of their mountain solitudes--their trees and water--never quite
forgotten, it describes how, venturing as a spy too near the sacred
circle, Pentheus was fallen upon, like a wild beast, by the mystic
huntresses and torn to pieces, his mother being the first to begin
"the sacred rites of slaughter."

And at last Agave herself comes upon the stage, holding aloft the
head of her son, fixed upon the sharp end of the thyrsus, calling
upon the women of the chorus to welcome the revel of the Evian god;
who, accordingly, admit her into the company, professing themselves
her fellow-revellers, the Bacchanals being thus absorbed into the
chorus for the rest of the play.  For, indeed, all through it, the
true, though partly suppressed relation of the chorus to the
Bacchanals is this, that the women of the chorus, staid and temperate
for the moment, following Dionysus in his alternations, are but the
paler sisters of his more wild and gloomy votaries--the true
followers of the mystical Dionysus--the real chorus of Zagreus; the
idea that their [77] violent proceedings are the result of madness
only, sent on them as a punishment for their original rejection of
the god, being, as I said, when seen from the deeper motives of the
myth, only a "sophism" of Euripides--a piece of rationalism of which
he avails himself for the purpose of softening down the tradition of
which he has undertaken to be the poet.  Agave comes on the stage,
then, blood-stained, exulting in her "victory of tears," still quite
visibly mad indeed, and with the outward signs of madness, and as her
mind wanders, musing still on the fancy that the dead head in her
hands is that of a lion she has slain among the mountains--a young
lion, she avers, as she notices the down on the young man's chin, and
his abundant hair--a fancy in which the chorus humour her, willing to
deal gently with the poor distraught creature.  Supported by them,
she rejoices "exceedingly, exceedingly," declaring herself
"fortunate" in such goodly spoil; priding herself that the victim has
been slain, not with iron weapons, but with her own white fingers,
she summons all Thebes to come and behold.  She calls for her aged
father to draw near and see; and for Pentheus himself, at last, that
he may mount and rivet her trophy, appropriately decorative there,
between the triglyphs of the cornice below the roof, visible to all.

And now, from this point onwards, Dionysus himself becomes more and
more clearly discernible [78] as the hunter, a wily hunter, and man
the prey he hunts for; "Our king is a hunter," cry the chorus, as
they unite in Agave's triumph and give their sanction to her deed.
And as the Bacchanals supplement the chorus, and must be added to it
to make the conception of it complete; so in the conception of
Dionysus also a certain transference, or substitution, must be made--
much of the horror and sorrow of Agave, of Pentheus, of the whole
tragic situation, must be transferred to him, if we wish to realise
in the older, profounder, and more complete sense of his nature, that
mystical being of Greek tradition to whom all these experiences--his
madness, the chase, his imprisonment and death, his peace again--
really belong; and to discern which, through Euripides' peculiar
treatment of his subject, is part of the curious interest of this
play.

Through the sophism of Euripides!  For that, again, is the really
descriptive word, with which Euripides, a lover of sophisms, as
Aristophanes knows, himself supplies us.  Well;--this softened
version of the Bacchic madness is a sophism of Euripides; and
Dionysus Omophagus--the eater of raw flesh, must be added to the
golden image of Dionysus Meilichius--the honey-sweet, if the old
tradition in its completeness is to be, in spite of that sophism, our
closing impression; if we are to catch, in its fulness, that deep
undercurrent of horror which runs below, all through [79] this masque
of spring, and realise the spectacle of that wild chase, in which
Dionysus is ultimately both the hunter and the spoil.

But meantime another person appears on the stage; Cadmus enters,
followed by attendants bearing on a bier the torn limbs of Pentheus,
which lying wildly scattered through the tangled wood, have been with
difficulty collected and now decently put together and covered over.
In the little that still remains before the end of the play, destiny
now hurrying things rapidly forward, and strong emotions, hopes and
forebodings being now closely packed, Euripides has before him an
artistic problem of enormous difficulty.  Perhaps this very haste and
close-packing of the matter, which keeps the mind from dwelling
overmuch on detail, relieves its real extravagance, and those who
read it carefully will think that the pathos of Euripides has been
equal to the occasion.  In a few profoundly designed touches he
depicts the perplexity of Cadmus, in whose house a god had become an
inmate, only to destroy it--the regret of the old man for the one
male child to whom that house had looked up as the pillar whereby
aged people might feel secure; the piteous craziness of Agave; the
unconscious irony with which she caresses the florid, youthful head
of her son; the delicate breaking of the thing to her reviving
intelligence, as Cadmus, though he can but wish that she might live
on for ever in her visionary enjoyment, [80] prepares the way, by
playing on that other horrible legend of the Theban house, the
tearing of Actaeon to death--he too destroyed by a god.  He gives us
the sense of Agave's gradual return to reason through many glimmering
doubts, till she wakes up at last to find the real face turned up
towards the mother and murderess; the quite naturally spontaneous
sorrow of the mother, ending with her confession, down to her last
sigh, and the final breaking up of the house of Cadmus; with a result
so genuine, heartfelt, and dignified withal in its expression of a
strange ineffable woe, that a fragment of it, the lamentation of
Agave over her son, in which the long-pent agony at last finds vent,
were, it is supposed, adopted into his paler work by an early
Christian poet, and have figured since, as touches of real fire, in
the Christus Patiens of Gregory Nazianzen.

NOTES

64. +Transliteration: autika ga pasa choreusei.  E-text editor's
translation: "Straightway all the earth shall dance."  Euripides,
Bacchae 114.  Euripidis Fabulae, ed. Gilbert Murray, vol. 3.
Oxford: Clarendon Press, 1913.

66. +Transliteration: poi dei choreuein; poi kathistanai poda; kai
krata seisai polion.  Translation: "Where must I dance?  Where must
I stand and shake my white locks?"  Euripides, Bacchae 184-85.
Euripidis Fabulae, ed. Gilbert Murray, vol. 3.  Oxford: Clarendon
Press, 1913.

69. +Transliteration: ti m' anainei, ti me pheugeis.  Translation:
"Why do you reject me, why do you run from me?" Bacchae 519. Euripidis
Fabulae, ed. Gilbert Murray, vol. 3.  Oxford: Clarendon Press, 1913.



THE MYTH OF DEMETER AND PERSEPHONE: I

[81] No chapter in the history of human imagination is more curious
than the myth of Demeter, and Kore or Persephone.  Alien in some
respects from the genuine traditions of Greek mythology, a relic of
the earlier inhabitants of Greece, and having but a subordinate place
in the religion of Homer, it yet asserted its interest, little by
little, and took a complex hold on the minds of the Greeks, becoming
finally the central and most popular subject of their national
worship.  Following its changes, we come across various phases of
Greek culture, which are not without their likenesses in the modern
mind.  We trace it in the dim first period of instinctive popular
conception; we see it connecting itself with many impressive elements
of art, and poetry, and religious custom, with the picturesque
superstitions of the many, and with the finer intuitions of the few;
and besides this, it is in itself full of [82] interest and
suggestion, to all for whom the ideas of the Greek religion have any
real meaning in the modern world.  And the fortune of the myth has
not deserted it in later times.  In the year 1780, the long-lost text
of the Homeric Hymn to Demeter was discovered among the manuscripts
of the imperial library at Moscow; and, in our own generation, the
tact of an eminent student of Greek art, Sir Charles Newton, has
restored to the world the buried treasures of the little temple and
precinct of Demeter, at Cnidus, which have many claims to rank in the
central order of Greek sculpture.  The present essay is an attempt to
select and weave together, for those who are now approaching the
deeper study of Greek thought, whatever details in the development of
this myth, arranged with a view rather to a total impression than to
the debate of particular points, may seem likely to increase their
stock of poetical impressions, and to add to this some criticisms on
the expression which it has left of itself in extant art and poetry.

The central expression, then, of the story of Demeter and Persephone
is the Homeric hymn, to which Grote has assigned a date at least as
early as six hundred years before Christ. The one survivor of a whole
family of hymns on this subject, it was written, perhaps, for one of
those contests which took place on the seventh day of the Eleusinian
festival, and in which a bunch of [83] ears of corn was the prize;
perhaps, for actual use in the mysteries themselves, by the
Hierophantes, or Interpreter, who showed to the worshippers at
Eleusis those sacred places to which the poem contains so many
references.  About the composition itself there are many difficult
questions, with various surmises as to why it has remained only in
this unique manuscript of the end of the fourteenth century.
Portions of the text are missing, and there are probably some
additions by later hands; yet most scholars have admitted that it
possesses some of the true characteristics of the Homeric style, some
genuine echoes of the age immediately succeeding that which produced
the Iliad and the Odyssey.  Listen now to a somewhat abbreviated
version of it.

"I begin the song of Demeter"--says the prize-poet, or the
Interpreter, the Sacristan of the holy places--"the song of Demeter
and her daughter Persephone, whom Aidoneus carried away by the
consent of Zeus, as she played, apart from her mother, with the deep-
bosomed daughters of the Ocean, gathering flowers in a meadow of soft
grass--roses and the crocus and fair violets and flags, and
hyacinths, and, above all, the strange flower of the narcissus, which
the Earth, favouring the desire of Aidoneus, brought forth for the
first time, to snare the footsteps of the flower-like girl.  A
hundred [84] heads of blossom grew up from the roots of it, and the
sky and the earth and the salt wave of the sea were glad at the scent
thereof.  She stretched forth her hands to take the flower; thereupon
the earth opened, and the king of the great nation of the dead sprang
out with his immortal horses.  He seized the unwilling girl, and bore
her away weeping, on his golden chariot.  She uttered a shrill cry,
calling upon her father Zeus; but neither man nor god heard her
voice, nor even the nymphs of the meadow where she played; except
Hecate only, the daughter of Persaeus, sitting, as ever, in her cave,
half veiled with a shining veil, thinking delicate thoughts; she, and
the Sun also, heard her.

"So long as she could still see the earth, and the sky, and the sea
with the great waves moving, and the beams of the sun, and still
thought to see again her mother, and the race of the ever-living
gods, so long hope soothed her, in the midst of her grief.  The peaks
of the hills and the depths of the sea echoed her cry.  And the
mother heard it.  A sharp pain seized her at the heart; she plucked
the veil from her hair, and cast down the blue hood from her
shoulders, and fled forth like a bird, seeking Persephone over dry
land and sea.  But neither man nor god would tell her the truth; nor
did any bird come to her as a sure messenger.

"Nine days she wandered up and down upon the earth, having blazing
torches in her hands; [85] and, in her great sorrow, she refused to
taste of ambrosia, or of the cup of the sweet nectar, nor washed her
face.  But when the tenth morning came, Hecate met her, having a
light in her hands.  But Hecate had heard the voice only, and had
seen no one, and could not tell Demeter who had borne the girl away.
And Demeter said not a word, but fled away swiftly with her, having
the blazing torches in her hands, till they came to the Sun, the
watchman both of gods and men; and the goddess questioned him, and
the Sun told her the whole story.

"Then a more terrible grief took possession of Demeter, and, in her
anger against Zeus, she forsook the assembly of the gods and abode
among men, for a long time veiling her beauty under a worn
countenance, so that none who looked upon her knew her, until she
came to the house of Celeus, who was then king of Eleusis.  In her
sorrow, she sat down at the wayside by the virgin's well, where the
people of Eleusis come to draw water, under the shadow of an olive-
tree.  She seemed as an aged woman whose time of child-bearing is
gone by, and from whom the gifts of Aphrodite have been withdrawn,
like one of the hired servants, who nurse the children or keep house,
in kings' palaces.  And the daughters of Celeus, four of them, like
goddesses, possessing the flower of their youth, Callidice,
Cleisidice, Demo, and Callithoe the eldest of them, coming to draw
water that they [86] might bear it in their brazen pitchers to their
father's house, saw Demeter and knew her not.  The gods are hard for
men to recognise.

"They asked her kindly what she did there, alone; and Demeter
answered, dissemblingly, that she was escaped from certain pirates,
who had carried her from her home and meant to sell her as a slave.
Then they prayed her to abide there while they returned to the
palace, to ask their mother's permission to bring her home.

"Demeter bowed her head in assent; and they, having filled their
shining vessels with water, bore them away, rejoicing in their
beauty. They came quickly to their father's house, and told their
mother what they had seen and heard.  Their mother bade them return,
and hire the woman for a great price; and they, like the hinds or
young heifers leaping in the fields in spring, fulfilled with the
pasture, holding up the folds of their raiment, sped along the hollow
road-way, their hair, in colour like the crocus, floating about their
shoulders as they went.  They found the glorious goddess still
sitting by the wayside, unmoved.  Then they led her to their father's
house; and she, veiled from head to foot, in her deep grief, followed
them on the way, and her blue robe gathered itself as she walked, in
many folds about her feet.  They came to the house, and passed
through the sunny porch, where their mother, Metaneira, was [87]
sitting against one of the pillars of the roof, having a young child
in her bosom.  They ran up to her; but Demeter crossed the threshold,
and, as she passed through, her head rose and touched the roof, and
her presence filled the doorway with a divine brightness.

"Still they did not wholly recognise her.  After a time she was made
to smile.  She refused to drink wine, but tasted of a cup mingled of
water and barley, flavoured with mint.  It happened that Metaneira
had lately borne a child.  It had come beyond hope, long after its
elder brethren, and was the object of a peculiar tenderness and of
many prayers with all.  Demeter consented to remain, and become the
nurse of this child.  She took the child in her immortal hands, and
placed it in her fragrant bosom; and the heart of the mother
rejoiced.  Thus Demeter nursed Demophoon.  And the child grew like a
god, neither sucking the breast, nor eating bread; but Demeter daily
anointed it with ambrosia, as if it had indeed been the child of a
god, breathing sweetly over it and holding it in her bosom; and at
nights, when she lay alone with the child, she would hide it secretly
in the red strength of the fire, like a brand; for her heart yearned
towards it, and she would fain have given to it immortal youth.

"But the foolishness of his mother prevented it.  For a suspicion
growing up within her, she awaited her time, and one night peeped in
upon [88] them, and thereupon cried out in terror at what she saw.
And the goddess heard her; and a sudden anger seizing her, she
plucked the child from the fire and cast it on the ground,--the child
she would fain have made immortal, but who must now share the common
destiny of all men, though some inscrutable grace should still be
his, because he had lain for awhile on the knees and in the bosom of
the goddess.

"Then Demeter manifested herself openly.  She put away the mask of
old age, and changed her form, and the spirit of beauty breathed
about her.  A fragrant odour fell from her raiment, and her flesh
shone from afar; the long yellow hair descended waving over her
shoulders, and the great house was filled as with the brightness of
lightning.  She passed out through the halls; and Metaneira fell to
the earth, and was speechless for a long time, and remembered not to
lift the child from the ground.  But the sisters, hearing its piteous
cries, leapt from their beds and ran to it.  Then one of them lifted
the child from the earth, and wrapped it in her bosom, and another
hastened to her mother's chamber to awake her: they came round the
child, and washed away the flecks of the fire from its panting body,
and kissed it tenderly all about: but the anguish of the child ceased
not; the arms of other and different nurses were about to enfold it.

"So, all night, trembling with fear, they [89] sought to propitiate
the glorious goddess; and in the morning they told all to their
father, Celeus.  And he, according to the commands of the goddess,
built a fair temple; and all the people assisted; and when it was
finished every man departed to his own home.  Then Demeter returned,
and sat down within the temple-walls, and remained still apart from
the company of the gods, alone in her wasting regret for her daughter
Persephone.

"And, in her anger, she sent upon the earth a year of grievous
famine.  The dry seed remained hidden in the soil; in vain the oxen
drew the ploughshare through the furrows; much white seed-corn fell
fruitless on the earth, and the whole human race had like to have
perished, and the gods had no more service of men, unless Zeus had
interfered.  First he sent Iris, afterwards all the gods, one by one,
to turn Demeter from her anger; but none was able to persuade her;
she heard their words with a hard countenance, and vowed by no means
to return to Olympus, nor to yield the fruit of the earth, until her
eyes had seen her lost daughter again.  Then, last of all, Zeus sent
Hermes into the kingdom of the dead, to persuade Aidoneus to suffer
his bride to return to the light of day.  And Hermes found the king
at home in his palace, sitting on a couch, beside the shrinking
Persephone, consumed within herself by desire for her mother.  A
doubtful smile passed over [90] the face of Aidoneus; yet he obeyed
the message, and bade Persephone return; yet praying her a little to
have gentle thoughts of him, nor judge him too hardly, who was also
an immortal god.  And Persephone arose up quickly in great joy; only,
ere she departed, he caused her to eat a morsel of sweet pomegranate,
designing secretly thereby, that she should not remain always upon
earth, but might some time return to him.  And Aidoneus yoked the
horses to his chariot; and Persephone ascended into it; and Hermes
took the reins in his hands and drove out through the infernal halls;
and the horses ran willingly; and they two quickly passed over the
ways of that long journey, neither the waters of the sea, nor of the
rivers, nor the deep ravines of the hills, nor the cliffs of the
shore, resisting them; till at last Hermes placed Persephone before
the door of the temple where her mother was; who, seeing her, ran out
quickly to meet her, like a Maenad coming down a mountain-side, dusky
with woods.

"So they spent all that day together in intimate communion, having
many things to hear and tell.  Then Zeus sent to them Rhea, his
venerable mother, the oldest of divine persons, to bring them back
reconciled, to the company of the gods; and he ordained that
Persephone should remain two parts of the year with her mother, and
one third part only with her husband, in the kingdom of the dead.  So
Demeter suffered [91] the earth to yield its fruits once more, and
the land was suddenly laden with leaves and flowers and waving corn.
Also she visited Triptolemus and the other princes of Eleusis, and
instructed them in the performance of her sacred rites,--those
mysteries of which no tongue may speak.  Only, blessed is he whose
eyes have seen them; his lot after death is not as the lot of other
men!"

In the story of Demeter, as in all Greek myths, we may trace the
action of three different influences, which have moulded it with
varying effects, in three successive phases of its development.
There is first its half-conscious, instinctive, or mystical, phase,
in which, under the form of an unwritten legend, living from mouth to
mouth, and with details changing as it passes from place to place,
there lie certain primitive impressions of the phenomena of the
natural world.  We may trace it next in its conscious, poetical or
literary, phase, in which the poets become the depositaries of the
vague instinctive product of the popular imagination, and handle it
with a purely literary interest, fixing its outlines, and simplifying
or developing its situations.  Thirdly, the myth passes into the
ethical phase, in which the persons and the incidents of the poetical
narrative are realised as abstract symbols, because intensely
characteristic examples, of moral or spiritual conditions. [92]
Behind the adventures of the stealing of Persephone and the
wanderings of Demeter in search of her, as we find them in the
Homeric hymn, we may discern the confused conception, under which
that early age, in which the myths were first created, represented to
itself those changes in physical things, that order of summer and
winter, of which it had no scientific, or systematic explanation, but
in which, nevertheless, it divined a multitude of living agencies,
corresponding to those ascertained forces, of which our colder modern
science tells the number and the names.  Demeter--Demeter and
Persephone, at first, in a sort of confused union--is the earth, in
the fixed order of its annual changes, but also in all the accident
and detail of the growth and decay of its children.  Of this
conception, floating loosely in the air, the poets of a later age
take possession; they create Demeter and Persephone as we know them
in art and poetry.  From the vague and fluctuating union, in which
together they had represented the earth and its changes, the mother
and the daughter define themselves with special functions, and with
fixed, well-understood relationships, the incidents and emotions of
which soon weave themselves into a pathetic story.  Lastly, in
proportion as the literary or aesthetic activity completes the
picture or the poem, the ethical interest makes itself felt.  These
strange persons--Demeter and Persephone--these marvellous incidents--
the translation into Hades, the seeking [93] of Demeter, the return
of Persephone to her,--lend themselves to the elevation and
correction of the sentiments of sorrow and awe, by the presentment to
the senses and the imagination of an ideal expression of them.
Demeter cannot but seem the type of divine grief.  Persephone is the
goddess of death, yet with a promise of life to come.  Those three
phases, then, which are more or less discernible in all mythical
development, and constitute a natural order in it, based on the
necessary conditions of human apprehension, are fixed more plainly,
perhaps, than in any other passage of Greek mythology in the story of
Demeter.  And as the Homeric hymn is the central expression of its
literary or poetical phase, so the marble remains, of which I shall
have to speak by and bye, are the central extant illustration of what
I have called its ethical phase.

Homer, in the Iliad, knows Demeter, but only as the goddess of the
fields, the originator and patroness of the labours of the
countryman, in their yearly order.  She stands, with her hair yellow
like the ripe corn, at the threshing-floor, and takes her share in
the toil, the heap of grain whitening, as the flails, moving in the
wind, disperse the chaff.  Out in the fresh fields, she yields to the
embraces of Iasion, to the extreme jealousy of Zeus, who slays her
mortal lover with lightning.  The flowery town of Pyrasus--the wheat-
town,--an ancient place in Thessaly, is her sacred precinct.  But
when [94] Homer gives a list of the orthodox gods, her name is not
mentioned.

Homer, in the Odyssey, knows Persephone also, but not as Kore; only
as the queen of the dead--epaine Persephone+--dreadful Persephone, the
goddess of destruction and death, according to the apparent import of
her name.+  She accomplishes men's evil prayers; she is the mistress
and manager of men's shades, to which she can dispense a little more
or less of life, dwelling in her mouldering palace on the steep shore
of the Oceanus, with its groves of barren willows and tall poplars.
But that Homer knew her as the daughter of Demeter there are no
signs; and of his knowledge of the rape of Persephone there is only
the faintest sign,--he names Hades by the golden reins of his
chariot, and his beautiful horses.

The main theme, then, the most characteristic peculiarities, of the
story, as subsequently developed, are not to be found, expressly, in
the true Homer.  We have in him, on the one hand, Demeter, as the
perfectly fresh and blithe goddess of the fields, whose children, if
she has them, must be as the perfectly discreet and peaceful,
unravished Kore; on the other hand, we have Persephone, as the wholly
terrible goddess of death, who brings to Ulysses the querulous
shadows of the dead, and has the head of the gorgon Medusa in her
keeping.  And it is only when these two contrasted images have been
[95] brought into intimate relationship, only when Kore and
Persephone have been identified, that the deeper mythology of Demeter
begins.

This combination has taken place in Hesiod; and in three lines of the
Theogony we find the stealing of Persephone by Aidoneus,*--one of
those things in Hesiod, perhaps, which are really older than Homer.
Hesiod has been called the poet of helots, and is thought to have
preserved some of the traditions of those earlier inhabitants of
Greece who had become a kind of serfs; and in a certain shadowiness
in his conceptions of the gods, contrasting with the concrete and
heroic forms of the gods of Homer, we may perhaps trace something of
the quiet unspoken brooding of a subdued people--of that silently
dreaming temper to which the story of Persephone properly belongs.
However this may be, it is in Hesiod that the two images,
unassociated in Homer--the goddess of summer and the goddess of
death, Kore and Persephone--are identified with much significance;
and that strange, dual being makes her first appearance, whose latent
capabilities the poets afterwards developed; among the rest, a
peculiar blending of those two contrasted aspects, full of purpose
for the duly chastened intelligence; death, resurrection,
rejuvenescence.--Awake, and sing, ye that dwell in the dust!

[96] Modern science explains the changes of the natural world by the
hypothesis of certain unconscious forces; and the sum of these
forces, in their combined action, constitutes the scientific
conception of nature.  But, side by side with the growth of this more
mechanical conception, an older and more spiritual, Platonic,
philosophy has always maintained itself, a philosophy more of
instinct than of the understanding, the mental starting-point of
which is not an observed sequence of outward phenomena, but some such
feeling as most of us have on the first warmer days in spring, when
we seem to feel the genial processes of nature actually at work; as
if just below the mould, and in the hard wood of the trees, there
were really circulating some spirit of life, akin to that which makes
its energies felt within ourselves.  Starting with a hundred
instincts such as this, that older unmechanical, spiritual, or
Platonic, philosophy envisages nature rather as the unity of a living
spirit or person, revealing itself in various degrees to the kindred
spirit of the observer, than as a system of mechanical forces.  Such
a philosophy is a systematised form of that sort of poetry (we may
study it, for instance, either in Shelley or in Wordsworth), which
also has its fancies of a spirit of the earth, or of the sky,--a
personal intelligence abiding in them, the existence of which is
assumed in every suggestion such poetry makes to us of a sympathy
between the ways [97] and aspects of outward nature and the moods of
men.  And what stood to the primitive intelligence in place of such
metaphysical conceptions were those cosmical stories or myths, such
as this of Demeter and Persephone, which springing up spontaneously
in many minds, came at last to represent to them, in a certain number
of sensibly realised images, all they knew, felt, or fancied, of the
natural world about them.  The sky in its unity and its variety,--the
sea in its unity and its variety,--mirrored themselves respectively
in these simple, but profoundly impressible spirits, as Zeus, as
Glaucus or Poseidon.  And a large part of their experience--all, that
is, that related to the earth in its changes, the growth and decay of
all things born of it--was covered by the story of Demeter, the myth
of the earth as a mother.  They thought of Demeter as the old Germans
thought of Hertha, or the later Greeks of Pan, as the Egyptians
thought of Isis, the land of the Nile, made green by the streams of
Osiris, for whose coming Isis longs, as Demeter for Persephone; thus
naming together in her all their fluctuating thoughts, impressions,
suspicions, of the earth and its appearances, their whole complex
divination of a mysterious life, a perpetual working, a continuous
act of conception there.  Or they thought of the many-coloured earth
as the garment of Demeter, as the great modern pantheist poet speaks
of it as the "garment of God."  Its [98] brooding fertility; the
spring flowers breaking from its surface, the thinly disguised
unhealthfulness of their heavy perfume, and of their chosen places of
growth; the delicate, feminine, Prosperina-like motion of all growing
things; its fruit, full of drowsy and poisonous, or fresh, reviving
juices; its sinister caprices also, its droughts and sudden volcanic
heats; the long delays of spring; its dumb sleep, so suddenly flung
away; the sadness which insinuates itself into its languid
luxuriance; all this grouped itself round the persons of Demeter and
her circle.  They could turn always to her, from the actual earth
itself, in aweful yet hopeful prayer, and a devout personal
gratitude, and explain it through her, in its sorrow and its promise,
its darkness and its helpfulness to man.

The personification of abstract ideas by modern painters or
sculptors, of wealth, of commerce, of health, for instance, shocks,
in most cases, the aesthetic sense, as something conventional or
rhetorical, as a mere transparent allegory, or figure of speech,
which could please almost no one.  On the other hand, such symbolical
representations, under the form of human persons, as Giotto's Virtues
and Vices at Padua, or his Saint Poverty at Assisi, or the series of
the planets in certain early Italian engravings, are profoundly
poetical and impressive.  They seem to be something more than mere
symbolism, [99] and to be connected with some peculiarly sympathetic
penetration, on the part of the artist, into the subjects he intended
to depict.  Symbolism intense as this, is the creation of a special
temper, in which a certain simplicity, taking all things literally,
au pied de la lettre, is united to a vivid pre-occupation with the
aesthetic beauty of the image itself, the figured side of figurative
expression, the form of the metaphor.  When it is said, "Out of his
mouth goeth a sharp sword," that temper is ready to deal directly and
boldly with that difficult image, like that old designer of the
fourteenth century, who has depicted this, and other images of the
Apocalypse, in a coloured window at Bourges.  Such symbolism cares a
great deal for the hair of Temperance, discreetly bound, for some
subtler likeness to the colour of the sky in the girdle of Hope, for
the inwoven flames in the red garment of Charity.  And what was
specially peculiar to the temper of the old Florentine painter,
Giotto, to the temper of his age in general, doubtless, more than to
that of ours, was the persistent and universal mood of the age in
which the story of Demeter and Persephone was first created.  If some
painter of our own time has conceived the image of The Day so
intensely, that we hardly think of distinguishing between the image,
with its girdle of dissolving morning mist, and the meaning of the
image; if William Blake, to our so great delight, makes the morning
stars [100] literally "sing together,"--these fruits of individual
genius are in part also a "survival" from a different age, with the
whole mood of which this mode of expression was more congruous than
it is with ours.  But there are traces of the old temper in the man
of to-day also; and through these we can understand that earlier
time--a very poetical time, with the more highly gifted peoples--in
which every impression men received of the action of powers without
or within them suggested to them the presence of a soul or will, like
their own--a person, with a living spirit, and senses, and hands, and
feet; which, when it talked of the return of Kore to Demeter, or the
marriage of Zeus and Here, was not using rhetorical language, but
yielding to a real illusion; to which the voice of man "was really a
stream, beauty an effluence, death a mist."

The gods of Greek mythology overlap each other; they are confused or
connected with each other, lightly or deeply, as the case may be, and
sometimes have their doubles, at first sight as in a troubled dream,
yet never, when we examine each detail more closely, without a
certain truth to human reason.  It is only in a limited sense that it
is possible to lift, and examine by itself, one thread of the network
of story and imagery, which, in a certain age of civilisation, wove
itself over every detail of life and thought, over every name in the
past, and almost every place in [101] Greece.  The story of Demeter,
then, was the work of no single author or place or time; the poet of
its first phase was no single person, but the whole consciousness of
an age, though an age doubtless with its differences of more or less
imaginative individual minds--with one, here or there, eminent,
though but by a little, above a merely receptive majority, the
spokesman of a universal, though faintly-felt prepossession,
attaching the errant fancies of the people around him to definite
names and images.  The myth grew up gradually, and at many distant
places, in many minds, independent of each other, but dealing in a
common temper with certain elements and aspects of the natural world,
as one here, and another there, seemed to catch in that incident or
detail which flashed more incisively than others on the inward eye,
some influence, or feature, or characteristic of the great mother.
The various epithets of Demeter, the local variations of her story,
its incompatible incidents, bear witness to the manner of its
generation.  They illustrate that indefiniteness which is
characteristic of Greek mythology, a theology with no central
authority, no link on historic time, liable from the first to an
unobserved transformation.  They indicate the various, far-distant
spots from which the visible body of the goddess slowly collected its
constituents, and came at last to have a well-defined existence in
the popular mind.  In this sense, Demeter appears to one in [102] her
anger, sullenly withholding the fruits of the earth, to another in
her pride of Persephone, to another in her grateful gift of the arts
of agriculture to man; at last only, is there a general recognition
of a clearly-arrested outline, a tangible embodiment, which has
solidified itself in the imagination of the people, they know not
how.

The worship of Demeter belongs to that older religion, nearer to the
earth, which some have thought they could discern, behind the more
definitely national mythology of Homer.  She is the goddess of dark
caves, and is not wholly free from monstrous form.  She gave men the
first fig in one place, the first poppy in another; in another, she
first taught the old Titans to mow.  She is the mother of the vine
also; and the assumed name by which she called herself in her
wanderings, is Dos--a gift; the crane, as the harbinger of rain, is
her messenger among the birds.  She knows the magic powers of certain
plants, cut from her bosom, to bane or bless; and, under one of her
epithets, herself presides over the springs, as also coming from the
secret places of the earth.  She is the goddess, then, at first, of
the fertility of the earth in its wildness; and so far, her
attributes are to some degree confused with those of the Thessalian
Gaia and the Phrygian Cybele.  Afterwards, and it is now that her
most characteristic attributes begin to concentrate themselves, [103]
she separates herself from these confused relationships, as specially
the goddess of agriculture, of the fertility of the earth when
furthered by human skill.  She is the preserver of the seed sown in
hope, under many epithets derived from the incidents of vegetation,
as the simple countryman names her, out of a mind full of the various
experiences of his little garden or farm.  She is the most definite
embodiment of all those fluctuating mystical instincts, of which
Gaia,* the mother of the earth's gloomier offspring, is a vaguer and
mistier one.  There is nothing of the confused outline, the mere
shadowiness of mystical dreaming, in this most concrete human figure.
No nation, less aesthetically gifted than the Greeks, could have thus
lightly thrown its mystical surmise and divination into images so
clear and idyllic as those of the solemn goddess of the country, in
whom the characteristics of the mother are expressed with so much
tenderness, and the "beauteous head" of Kore, then so fresh and
peaceful.

In this phase, then, the story of Demeter appears as the peculiar
creation of country-people of a high impressibility, dreaming over
their work in spring or autumn, half consciously touched by a sense
of its sacredness, and a sort of [104] mystery about it.  For there
is much in the life of the farm everywhere which gives to persons of
any seriousness of disposition, special opportunity for grave and
gentle thoughts.  The temper of people engaged in the occupations of
country life, so permanent, so "near to nature," is at all times
alike; and the habitual solemnity of thought and expression which
Wordsworth found in the peasants of Cumberland, and the painter
Francois Millet in the peasants of Brittany, may well have had its
prototype in early Greece.  And so, even before the development, by
the poets, of their aweful and passionate story, Demeter and
Persephone seem to have been pre-eminently the venerable, or aweful,
goddesses.  Demeter haunts the fields in spring, when the young lambs
are dropped; she visits the barns in autumn; she takes part in mowing
and binding up the corn, and is the goddess of sheaves.  She presides
over all the pleasant, significant details of the farm, the
threshing-floor and the full granary, and stands beside the woman
baking bread at the oven.  With these fancies are connected certain
simple rites; the half-understood local observance, and the half-
believed local legend, reacting capriciously on each other.  They
leave her a fragment of bread and a morsel of meat, at the cross-
roads, to take on her journey; and perhaps some real Demeter carries
them away, as she wanders through the country.  The incidents of
their yearly labour become to [105] them acts of worship; they seek
her blessing through many expressive names, and almost catch sight of
her, at dawn or evening, in the nooks of the fragrant fields.  She
lays a finger on the grass at the road-side, and some new flower
comes up.  All the picturesque implements of country life are hers;
the poppy also, emblem of an inexhaustible fertility, and full of
mysterious juices for the alleviation of pain.  The countrywoman who
puts her child to sleep in the great, cradle-like, basket, for
winnowing the corn, remembers Demeter Courotrophos, the mother of
corn and children alike, and makes it a little coat out of the dress
worn by its father at his initiation into her mysteries.  Yet she is
an angry goddess too, sometimes--Demeter Erinnys, the goblin of the
neighbourhood, haunting its shadowy places.  She lies on the ground
out of doors on summer nights, and becomes wet with the dew.  She
grows young again every spring, yet is of great age, the wrinkled
woman of the Homeric hymn, who becomes the nurse of Demophoon.  Other
lighter, errant stories nest themselves, as time goes on, within the
greater.  The water-newt, which repels the lips of the traveller who
stoops to drink, is a certain urchin, Abas, who spoiled by his
mockery the pleasure of the thirsting goddess, as she drank once of a
wayside spring in her wanderings.  The night-owl is the transformed
Ascalabus, who alone had seen Persephone eat that morsel [106] of
pomegranate, in the garden of Aidoneus.  The bitter wild mint was
once a girl, who for a moment had made her jealous, in Hades.

The episode of Triptolemus, to whom Demeter imparts the mysteries of
the plough, like the details of some sacred rite, that he may bear
them abroad to all people, embodies, in connexion with her, another
group of the circumstances of country life.  As with all the other
episodes of the story, there are here also local variations,
traditions of various favourites of the goddess at different places,
of whom grammarians can tell us, finally obscured behind the greater
fame of Triptolemus of Eleusis.  One might fancy, at first, that
Triptolemus was a quite Boeotian divinity, of the ploughshare.  Yet
we know that the thoughts of the Greeks concerning the culture of the
earth from which they came, were most often noble ones; and if we
examine carefully the works of ancient art which represent him, the
second thought will suggest itself, that there was nothing clumsy or
coarse about this patron of the plough--something, rather, of the
movement of delicate wind or fire, about him and his chariot.  And
this finer character is explained, if, as we are justified in doing,
we bring him into closest connexion with that episode, so full of a
strange mysticism, of the Nursing of Demophoon, in the Homeric hymn.
For, according to some traditions, none other [107] than Triptolemus
himself was the subject of that mysterious experiment, in which
Demeter laid the child nightly, in the red heat of the fire; and he
lives afterwards, not immortal indeed, not wholly divine, yet, as
Shakspere says, a "nimble spirit," feeling little of the weight of
the material world about him--the element of winged fire in the clay.
The delicate, fresh, farm-lad we may still actually see sometimes,
like a graceful field-flower among the corn, becomes, in the sacred
legend of agriculture, a king's son; and then, the fire having
searched out from him the grosser elements on that famous night, all
compact now of spirit, a priest also, administering the gifts of
Demeter to all the earth.  Certainly, the extant works of art which
represent him, gems or vase-paintings, conform truly enough to this
ideal of a "nimble spirit," though he wears the broad country hat,
which Hermes also wears, going swiftly, half on the airy, mercurial
wheels of his farm instrument, harrow or plough--half on wings of
serpents--the worm, symbolical of the soil, but winged, as sending up
the dust committed to it, after subtle firing, in colours and odours
of fruit and flowers.  It is an altogether sacred character, again,
that he assumes in another precious work, of the severer period of
Greek art, lately discovered at Eleusis, and now preserved in the
museum of Athens, a singularly refined bas-relief, in which he
stands, a firm and serious youth, between Demeter and [108]
Persephone, who places her hand as with some sacred influence, and
consecrating gesture, upon him.

But the house of the prudent countryman will be, of course, a place
of honest manners; and Demeter Thesmophoros is the guardian of
married life, the deity of the discretion of wives.  She is therefore
the founder of civilised order.  The peaceful homes of men, scattered
about the land, in their security--Demeter represents these fruits of
the earth also, not without a suggestion of the white cities, which
shine upon the hills above the waving fields of corn, seats of
justice and of true kingship.  She is also in a certain sense the
patron of travellers, having, in her long wanderings after
Persephone, recorded and handed down those omens, caught from little
things--the birds which crossed her path, the persons who met her on
the way, the words they said, the things they carried in their hands,
einodia symbola+--by noting which, men bring their journeys to a
successful end; so that the simple countryman may pass securely on
his way; and is led by signs from the goddess herself, when he
travels far to visit her, at Hermione or Eleusis.

So far the attributes of Demeter and Kore are similar.  In the
mythical conception, as in the religious acts connected with it, the
mother and the daughter are almost interchangeable; [109] they are
the two goddesses, the twin-named.  Gradually, the office of
Persephone is developed, defines itself; functions distinct from
those of Demeter are attributed to her.  Hitherto, always at the side
of Demeter and sharing her worship, she now appears detached from
her, going and coming, on her mysterious business.  A third part of
the year she abides in darkness; she comes up in the spring; and
every autumn, when the countryman sows his seed in the earth, she
descends thither again, and the world of the dead lies open, spring
and autumn, to let her in and out.  Persephone, then, is the summer-
time, and, in this sense, a daughter of the earth; but the summer as
bringing winter; the flowery splendour and consummated glory of the
year, as thereafter immediately beginning to draw near to its end, as
the first yellow leaf crosses it, in the first severer wind.  She is
the last day of spring, or the first day of autumn, in the threefold
division of the Greek year.  Her story is, indeed, but the story, in
an intenser form, of Adonis, of Hyacinth, of Adrastus--the king's
blooming son, fated, in the story of Herodotus, to be wounded to
death with an iron spear--of Linus, a fair child who is torn to
pieces by hounds every spring-time--of the English Sleeping Beauty.
From being the goddess of summer and the flowers, she becomes the
goddess of night and sleep and death, confuseable with Hecate, the
goddess of midnight [110] terrors--Kore arretos,+ the mother of the
Erinnyes, who appeared to Pindar, to warn him of his approaching
death, upbraiding him because he had made no hymn in her praise,
which swan's song he thereupon began, but finished with her.  She is
a twofold goddess, therefore, according as one or the other of these
two contrasted aspects of her nature is seized, respectively.  A
duality, an inherent opposition in the very conception of Persephone,
runs all through her story, and is part of her ghostly power.  There
is ever something in her of a divided or ambiguous identity: hence
the many euphemisms of later language concerning her.

The "worship of sorrow," as Goethe called it, is sometimes supposed
to have had almost no place in the religion of the Greeks.  Their
religion has been represented as a religion of mere cheerfulness, the
worship by an untroubled, unreflecting humanity, conscious of no
deeper needs, of the embodiments of its own joyous activity.  It
helped to hide out of their sight those traces of decay and
weariness, of which the Greeks were constitutionally shy, to keep
them from peeping too curiously into certain shadowy places,
appropriate enough to the gloomy imagination of the middle age; and
it hardly proposed to itself to give consolation to people who, in
truth, were never "sick or sorry."  But this familiar view of Greek
religion is based on a consideration of a part only of what is known
[111] concerning it, and really involves a misconception, akin to
that which underestimates the influence of the romantic spirit
generally, in Greek poetry and art; as if Greek art had dealt
exclusively with human nature in its sanity, suppressing all motives
of strangeness, all the beauty which is born of difficulty,
permitting nothing but an Olympian, though perhaps somewhat wearisome
calm.  In effect, such a conception of Greek art and poetry leaves in
the central expressions of Greek culture none but negative qualities;
and the legend of Demeter and Persephone, perhaps the most popular of
all Greek legends, is sufficient to show that the "worship of sorrow"
was not without its function in Greek religion; their legend is a
legend made by and for sorrowful, wistful, anxious people; while the
most important artistic monuments of that legend sufficiently prove
that the Romantic spirit was really at work in the minds of Greek
artists, extracting by a kind of subtle alchemy, a beauty, not
without the elements of tranquillity, of dignity and order, out of a
matter, at first sight painful and strange.

The student of origins, as French critics say, of the earliest stages
of art and poetry, must be content to follow faint traces; and in
what has been here said, much may seem to have been made of little,
with too much completion, by a general framework or setting, of what
after [112] all are but doubtful or fragmentary indications.  Yet
there is a certain cynicism too, in that over-positive temper, which
is so jealous of our catching any resemblance in the earlier world to
the thoughts that really occupy our own minds, and which, in its
estimate of the actual fragments of antiquity, is content to find no
seal of human intelligence upon them.  Slight indeed in themselves,
these fragmentary indications become suggestive of much, when viewed
in the light of such general evidence about the human imagination as
is afforded by the theory of "comparative mythology," or what is
called the theory of "animism."  Only, in the application of these
theories, the student of Greek religion must never forget that, after
all, it is with poetry, not with systematic theological belief or
dogma, that he has to do.  As regards this story of Demeter and
Persephone, what we actually possess is some actual fragments of
poetry, some actual fragments of sculpture; and with a curiosity,
justified by the direct aesthetic beauty of these fragments, we feel
our way backwards to that engaging picture of the poet-people, with
which the ingenuity of modern theory has filled the void in our
knowledge.  The abstract poet of that first period of mythology,
creating in this wholly impersonal, intensely spiritual way,--the
abstract spirit of poetry itself, rises before the mind; and, in
speaking of this poetical age, we must take heed, before all things,
in no sense to misconstrue the poets.

NOTES

94. +Transliteration: epaine Persephone.  Translation: "dread
Persephone."  See, for example, Odyssey, Book 10.490 and 563.

94. +"According to the apparent import of her name"; Pater likely
refers to the etymology of "Persophone"--"bringer of destruction."

95. *Theogony, 912-14:

+Transliteration:

Autar ho Demetros polyphorbes es lechos elthen
e teke Persephonen leukolenon, hen Aidoneus
herpasen hes para metros, edoke de metieta Zeus.

+Translation: "And he came to bountiful Demeter's bed, / and she
gave birth to white-armed Persephone, whom Aidoneus / took from her
mother's side; but Zeus, wise counsellor, gave her to him."  Hesiod.
The Homeric Hymns and Homerica.  Theogony.  Cambridge, MA., Harvard
University Press.  London, William Heinemann Ltd. 1914.

103. *In the Homeric hymn, pre-eminently, of the flower which grew up
for the first time, to snare the footsteps of Kore, the fair but
deadly Narcissus, the flower of narke, the numbness of death.

108. +Transliteration: einodia symbola.  Translation: "signs along
the roadside."

110. +Transliteration: Kore arretos.  Translation: "Kore the
mysterious, the horrible ."



THE MYTH OF DEMETER AND PERSEPHONE: II

[113] THE stories of the Greek mythology, like other things which
belong to no man, and for which no one in particular is responsible,
had their fortunes.  In that world of floating fancies there was a
struggle for life; there were myths which never emerged from that
first stage of popular conception, or were absorbed by stronger
competitors, because, as some true heroes have done, they lacked the
sacred poet or prophet, and were never remodelled by literature;
while, out of the myth of Demeter, under the careful conduct of
poetry and art, came the little pictures, the idylls, of the Homeric
hymn, and the gracious imagery of Praxiteles.  The myth has now
entered its second or poetical phase, then, in which more definite
fancies are grouped about the primitive stock, in a conscious
literary temper, and the whole interest settles round the images of
the beautiful girl going down into the darkness, and the weary woman
who seeks her lost daughter--divine persons, then since